Bedside diagnosis of imported malaria using the Binax Now malaria antigen detection test.Malaria may be misdiagnosed in non-endemic countries when the necessary experience for rapid expert microscopy is lacking. Rapid diagnostic tests may improve the diagnosis and may play a role as a bedside diagnostic tool. In a multicentre study we recruited patients suspected of malaria over a period of 14 months. The Binax Now Malaria rapid test was used at the bedside and in the clinical microbiology laboratory. The training of clinical staff was monitored and their experience with the use of the test was recorded. 542 patients were included, 80 of whom had malaria diagnosed by microscopy. The rapid test used at the bedside had a sensitivity of 88% for the detection of P. falciparum compared to 95% when the test was performed in the microbiology laboratory. The risk of technical problems and invalid tests was highest when the test was used at the bedside. The rapid diagnostic test may be useful for the diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria when used by routine laboratory staff, but could lead to misdiagnoses when used at the bedside. Microscopy is still essential in order to identify the few missed diagnoses, to determine the degree of parasitaemia, and to ensure species diagnosis, including mixed infections.Field evaluation of a malaria rapid diagnostic test (ICT Pf).Malaria rapid diagnostic tests (MRDTs) are quick and easy to perform and useful for diagnosing malaria in primary health care settings. In South Africa most malaria infections are due to Plasmodium falciparurrm, and HRPII-based MRDTs have been used since 2001. Previous studies in Africa showed variability in sensitivity and specificity of HRPII-based MRDTs; hence, we conducted a field evaluation in Limpopo province to determine the accuracy of the MRDT currently used in public sector clinics and hospitals.A cross-sectional observational study was conducted to determine the sensitivity and specificity of an ICT Pf MRDT. We tested 405 patients with fever with ICT Pf MRDT and compared the results with blood film microscopy (the gold standard). RESULTS. The overall sensitivity of the ICT Pf MRDT was 99.48% (95% confidence interval (CI) 96.17-100%), while specificity was 96.26% (95% CI 94.7-100%). The positive predictive value of the test was 98.48 (99% CI 98.41-100%), and the negative predictive value was 99.52% (95% CI 96.47-100%).The ICT Pf MRDT is an appropriate test to use in the field in South Africa where laboratory facilities are not available. It has a high degree of sensitivity and acceptable level of specificity in accordance with the World Health Organization criteria. However, sensitivity of MRDT at low levels of parasitaemia (<100 parasites/microl of blood) in field conditions must still be established.Treatment guided by rapid diagnostic tests for malaria in Tanzanian children: safety and alternative bacterial diagnoses.WHO guidelines for the treatment of young children with suspected malaria have recently changed from presumptive treatment to anti-malarial treatment guided by a blood slide or malaria rapid diagnostic test (RDT). However, there is limited evidence of the safety of this policy in routine outpatient settings in Africa.Children 3-59 months of age with a non-severe febrile illness and no obvious cause were enrolled over a period of one year in a malaria endemic area of Tanzania. Treatment was determined by the results of a clinical examination and RDT result, and blood culture and serum lactate were also collected. RDT-negative children were followed up over 14 days.Over the course of one year, 965 children were enrolled; 158 (16.4%) were RDT-positive and treated with artemether-lumefantrine and 807 (83.4%) were RDT-negative and treated with non-anti-malarial medicines. Compared with RDT-positives, RDT-negative children were on average younger with a lower axillary temperature and more likely to have a history of cough or difficulty in breathing. Six (0.6%) children became RDT-positive after enrollment, all of whom were PCR-negative for Plasmodium falciparum DNA at enrollment. In addition, 12 (1.2%) children were admitted to hospital, one with possible malaria, none of whom died. A bacterial pathogen was identified in 9/965 (0.9%) children, eight of whom were RDT-negative and one was RDT-positive, but slide-negative. Excluding three children with Salmonella typhi, all of the children with bacteraemia were ≤ 12 months of age. Compared to double-read research slide results RDTs had a sensitivity of 97.8% (95% CI 96.9-98.7) and specificity of 96.3% (95% CI 96.3-98.4).Use of RDTs to direct the use of anti-malarial drugs in young children did not result in any missed diagnoses of malaria although new infections soon after a consultation with a negative RDT result may undermine confidence in results. Invasive bacterial disease is uncommon in children with non-severe illness and most cases occurred in infants with a current fever.Evaluation of the rapid diagnostic test OptiMAL for diagnosis of malaria due to Plasmodium vivax.To determine the sensitivity and specificity of the rapid diagnostic test OptiMAL for diagnosis of Plasmodium vivax malaria.We included all the patients who sought medical attention in the San Martin Pangoa Hospital, Junin, an area endemic for vivax malaria in Peru, between October and December 1998, who had fever during the previous 72 hours and who were older than 12 months. The gold standard for diagnosis was thick blood film microscopy. We determined the parasitemia rate for each of the positive slides. We calculated sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the test.We included 72 patients; 39 of them were positive for P. vivax by microscopic examination. The sensitivity of the Optimal test was 92.3%, the specificity 100%, the positive predictive value 100% and the negative predictive value 91.6%. The accuracy of the test was 95.8%. The sensitivity of the OptiMAL test progressively decreased when parasitemia was lower than 1,000 parasites/microliter.the OptiMAL test has a high sensitivity and specificity for diagnosis of P. vivax malaria. However, its sensitivity decreased when parasitemia levels were lower. It is a very simple technique, which makes it a good alternative for malaria diagnosis in remote places, although its elevated cost is still a problem.Prevalence of PCR detectable malaria infection among febrile patients with a negative Plasmodium falciparum specific rapid diagnostic test in Zanzibar.We screened for malaria in 594 blood samples from febrile patients who tested negative by a Plasmodium falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein-2-based rapid diagnostic test at 12 health facilities in Zanzibar districts North A and Micheweni, from May to August 2010. Screening was with microscopy, polymerase chain reaction (PCR) targeting the cytochrome b gene (cytbPCR) of the four major human malaria species, and quantitative PCR (qPCR). The prevalence of cytbPCR-detectable malaria infection was 2% (12 of 594), including 8 P. falciparum, 3 Plasmodium malariae, and 1 Plasmodium vivax infections. Microscopy identified 4 of 8 P. falciparum infections. Parasite density as estimated by microscopy or qPCR was > 4,000 parasites/μL in 5 of 8 cytbPCR-detectable P. falciparum infections. The infections that were missed by the rapid diagnostic test represent a particular challenge in malaria elimination settings and highlight the need for more sensitive point-of-care diagnostic tools to improve case detection of all human malaria species in febrile patients.Development and evaluation of an immunochromatographic kit for the detection of antibody to Plasmodium vivax infection in South Korea.Malaria is a major parasitic disease in tropical areas. Three to five hundred million people suffer from the disease and it kill a million people per year. Blood smear observation was developed for the diagnosis of malaria, but the examination needs skilled experts and exact diagnosis is time consuming. A kit based on immunochromatography can be a reliable and rapid method for clinical diagnosis, even in the hands of inexperienced personnel. However, all such currently developed kits can only diagnose P. falciparum malaria. In our previous report, the C-terminal region of P. vivax merozoite surface protein 1 (PvcMSP) was cloned and expressed in E. coli. In the present study, we developed an immunochromatographic kit using this PvcMSP for the diagnosis of specific antibody to P. vivax malaria in serum samples. The kit was used to examine sera from vivax malaria patients and non-malaria- infected person and the test showed 100% sensitivity (78/78) and 98.3% specificity (58/59). This result demonstrated that the immunochromatographic kit for P. vivax antibody detection is applicable for the rapid and precise diagnosis of P. vivax malaria.Devices for rapid diagnosis of Malaria: evaluation of prototype assays that detect Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 and a Plasmodium vivax-specific antigen.The ParaSight F test was developed as a pioneer industry effort in the large-scale, process-controlled production of a device for the rapid diagnosis of malaria. This device performed well in field settings but was limited to the detection of a single malaria species, Plasmodium falciparum. The ParaSight F+V assay advanced upon the ParaSight F test format by incorporating a monoclonal antibody directed against a proprietary Plasmodium vivax-specific antigen, in addition to the antibody directed against P. falciparum histidine-rich protein 2, which was used in the ParaSight F assay. The modified assay was developed to add the capability to detect P. falciparum and P. vivax in a single-test-strip format. The present study evaluated three distinct ParaSight F+V prototypes with samples from symptomatic patients in regions of Thailand and Peru where malaria is endemic. Over a 2-year enrollment period (1998 and 1999), a total of 4,894 patients consented to participation in the study. Compared with the results for duplicate microscopic examinations of Giemsa-stained blood smears as the reference diagnostic standard, each successive prototype showed substantial improvement in performance. The final ParaSight F+V prototype, evaluated in 1999, had an overall sensitivity for detection of asexual P. falciparum parasites of 98%. The sensitivity of the device was 100% for P. falciparum densities of >500 parasites/ micro l, with a sensitivity of 83% for parasite densities of </=500/ micro l. The specificity for the exclusion of P. falciparum was 93%. For P. vivax, the overall sensitivity was 87% for the final 1999 prototype. The sensitivities calculated for different levels of P. vivax parasitemia were 99% for parasite densities of >5,000/ micro l, 92% for parasite densities of 1,001 to 5,000/ micro l, 94% for parasite densities of 501 to 1,000/ micro l, and 55% for parasite densities of 1 to 500/ micro l. The specificity for the exclusion of P. vivax was 87%. The areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves for the diagnostic performance of the assay for the detection of P. falciparum and P. vivax were 0.8907 and 0.8522, respectively. These findings indicate that assays for rapid diagnosis have the potential to enhance diagnostic capabilities in those instances in which skilled microscopy is not readily available.Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria.Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria parasites.Malaria presents a diagnostic challenge to laboratories in most countries. Endemic malaria, population movements, and travelers all contribute to presenting the laboratory with diagnostic problems for which it may have little expertise available. Drug resistance and genetic variation has altered many accepted morphological appearances of malaria species, and new technology has given an opportunity to review available procedures. Concurrently the World Health Organization has opened a dialogue with scientists, clinicians, and manufacturers on the realistic possibilities for developing accurate, sensitive, and cost-effective rapid diagnostic tests for malaria, capable of detecting 100 parasites/microl from all species and with a semiquantitative measurement for monitoring successful drug treatment. New technology has to be compared with an accepted "gold standard" that makes comparisons of sensitivity and specificity between different methods. The majority of malaria is found in countries where cost-effectiveness is an important factor and ease of performance and training is a major consideration. Most new technology for malaria diagnosis incorporates immunochromatographic capture procedures, with conjugated monoclonal antibodies providing the indicator of infection. Preferred targeted antigens are those which are abundant in all asexual and sexual stages of the parasite and are currently centered on detection of HRP-2 from Plasmodium falciparum and parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase or Plasmodium aldolase from the parasite glycolytic pathway found in all species. Clinical studies allow effective comparisons between different formats, and the reality of nonmicroscopic diagnoses of malaria is considered.Accuracy of rapid tests for malaria and treatment outcomes for malaria and non-malaria cases among under-five children in rural Ghana.WHO now recommends test-based management of malaria across all transmission settings. The accuracy of rapid diagnostic test (RDT) and the outcome of treatment based on the result of tests will influence acceptability of and adherence to the new guidelines.We conducted a study at the Kintampo hospital in rural Ghana to evaluate the performance of CareStart, a HRP-2 based RDT, using microscopy as reference. We applied IMCI treatment guidelines, restricted ACT to RDT-positive children and followed-up both RDT-positive (malaria) and RDT-negative (non-malaria) cases over 28 days.436 children were enrolled in the RDT evaluation and 391 (children with haemoglobin >8.0 gm/dl) were followed-up to assess treatment outcomes. Mean age was 25.4 months (s.d. 14.6). Sensitivity and specificity of the RDT were 100.0% and 73.0% respectively. Over the follow-up period, 32 (18.5%) RDT-negative children converted to positive, with 7 (4.0%) of them presenting with fever. More children in the non-malaria group made unscheduled visits than children in the malaria group (13.3% versus 7.7%) On all scheduled follow-up visits, proportion of children having a temperature higher than that recorded on day 0 was higher in the non-malaria group compared to the malaria group. Reports of unfavourable treatment outcomes by caregivers were higher among the non-malaria group than the malaria group.The RDT had good sensitivity and specificity. However a minority of children who will not receive ACT based on RDT results may develop clinical malaria within a short period in high transmission settings. This could undermine caregivers' and health workers' confidence in the new guidelines. Improving the quality of management of non-malarial febrile illnesses should be a priority in the era of test-based management of malaria.ClinicalTrials.gov NCT00832754.ParaSight-F test to diagnose malaria in hypo-endemic and epidemic prone regions of Vietnam.The antigen capture ParaSight-F test was evaluated during a drug sensitivity survey in a hypoendemic region of northern Vietnam. When only asexual blood forms of P. falciparum were considered, sensitivity of ParaSight-F was 100%, specificity 88% (95% CI 95-80%), positive predictive value 68% (95% CI 85-50%) and negative predictive value 100%. ParaSight-F proved very convenient for rapid screening and selection of patients to enrol in a drug sensitivity study. In northern Vietnam, the introduction of the test as a routine diagnostic tool is not justified, considering its high cost, the necessity to carry out the treatment of presumptive Plasmodium vivax cases and the persistence of positive reactions following treatment. However, the test will be a valuable tool in remote areas in emergency situations, where rapid confirmation of a P. falciparum outbreak is required.Field and laboratory comparative evaluation of ten rapid malaria diagnostic tests.The paper reports on a comparative evaluation of 10 rapid malaria tests available in South Africa in 1998: AccuCheck (AC, developmental), Cape Biotech (CB), ICT Malaria Pf (ICT1) and Pf/Pv (ICT2), Kat Medical (KAT), MakroMal (MM), OptiMAL (OP), ParaSight-F (PS), Quorum (Q), Determine-Malaria (DM). In a laboratory study, designed to test absolute detection limits, Plasmodium falciparum-infected blood was diluted with uninfected blood to known parasite concentrations ranging from 500 to 0.1 parasites per microlitre (P/microL). The 50% detection limits were: ICT1, 3.28; ICT2, 4.86; KAT, 6.36; MM, 9.37; CB, 11.42; DM, 12.40; Q, 16.98; PS, 20; AC, 31.15 and OP, 91.16 P/microL. A field study was carried out to test post-treatment specificity. Blood samples from malaria patients were tested with all products (except AC and DM) on the day of treatment and 3 and 7 days thereafter, against a gold standard of microscopy and polymerase chain reaction (PCR). OP and PS produced fewer false-positive results on day 7 (18 and 19%, respectively) than the other rapid tests (38-56%). However, microscopy, PCR, OP and PS disagreed largely as to which individuals remained positive. The tests were further compared with regard to general specificity, particularly cross-reactivity with rheumatoid factor, speed, simplicity, their ability to detect other species, storage requirements and general presentation.Validity, reliability and ease of use in the field of five rapid tests for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Uganda.A study was conducted to measure the overall performance of several rapid diagnostic tests for Plasmodium falciparum infection, in order to select the most appropriate test to be used in the field. A total of 742 patients attending the out-patient department of Mbarara Hospital with a clinical suspicion of malaria were included in the study. For each patient, a thick/thin film and 5 rapid tests based on the detection of histidine-rich protein II (HRP-II) (Paracheck Pf dipstick and device, ParaHIT f, Malaria Rapid and BIO P.F.) were performed. Outcomes were validity, inter-reader reliability and 'ease of use in the field', measured by both the general characteristics of the test and by the opinion of the readers. About half (57%) of the patients were positive for P. falciparum. The Paracheck Pf (dipstick and device) was considered as the most appropriate for the use in the field, being sensitive (97%), moderately specific (88%), reliable (kappa coefficient = 0.97), easy to use and cheap (about US$ 0.5/test). The ParaHIT f represented a good alternative.Reducing malaria misdiagnosis: the importance of correctly interpreting Paracheck Pf® "faint test bands" in a low transmission area of Tanzania.Although malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) have been extensively evaluated since their introduction in the early 1990's, sensitivity and specificity vary widely limiting successful integration into clinical practice. This paper reviews specific issues surrounding RDT use in field settings and presents results of research investigating how to interpret "faint test bands" on ParaCheck Pf® in areas of low transmission in order to reduce malaria misdiagnosis.A multi-phase cross-sectional study was conducted at a remote hospital in the northern Tanzanian highlands. Capillary blood samples were taken from consenting participants (n = 319) for blood smear and ParaCheck Pf® testing. Primary outcome variables were sensitivity, specificity and proportion misdiagnosed by ParaCheck Pf® and local microscopy. ParaCheck Pf® "faint bands" were classified as both true positives or true negatives during evaluation to determine appropriate clinical interpretation. Multivariate logistic regression adjusted for age and gender was conducted to determine odds of misdiagnosis for local microscopy and ParaCheck Pf®.Overall, 23.71% of all ParaCheck Pf® tests resulted in a "faint band" and 94.20% corresponded with true negatives. When ParaCheck Pf® "faint bands" were classified as positive, specificity was 75.5% (95% CI = 70.3%-80.6%) as compared to 98.9% (95% CI = 97.0%-99.8%) when classified as negative. The odds of misdiagnosis by local microscopy for those > 5 years as compared to those ≤ 5 years are 0.370 (95% CI = 0.1733-0.7915, p = 0.010). In contrast, even when ParaCheck Pf® faint bands are considered positive, the odds of misdiagnosis by ParaCheck Pf® for those > 5 years as compared to those ≤ 5 years are 0.837 (95% CI = 0.459-1.547, p = 0.5383).We provide compelling evidence that in areas of low transmission, "faint bands" should be considered a negative test when used to inform clinical decision-making. Correct interpretation of RDT test bands in a clinical setting plays a central role in successful malaria surveillance, appropriate patient management and most importantly reducing misdiagnosis.Performance of OptiMAL-IT compared to microscopy, for malaria detection in Burkina Faso.To compare the performance of OptiMAL-IT, a rapid diagnostic test for malaria, with that of microscopy in Burkina Faso.Finger-prick blood samples of 464 children attending hospital for suspected malaria were tested for malaria by microscopy and OptiMAL-IT.The sensitivity and specificity of OptiMAL-IT were 98.7% (CI 95% = 97.6-99.8) and 96.2% (CI 95% = 94.3-98.1) respectively, with a high positive likelihood ratio (25.97).OptiMAL-IT can be considered a good method to diagnose malaria in Burkina Faso, particularly in remote areas with little or no access to microscopy services.Performance characteristics of a rapid diagnostic test for malaria, when used to confirm cerebral malaria in children and young adults.Evaluation & usefulness of a immunochromatographic test for rapid detection of Plasmodium falciparum infection.Rapid test (Parachek Pf) based on detection of HRP-2 protein specific to Plasmodium falciparum by immunochromatographic technique was evaluated. Prevalence of infection was 8.5%. The test was 100% sensitive & 99.5% specific on comparison with light microscopy. The test is useful for making 'on the spot' diagnosis.Evaluation of a parasite lactate dehydrogenase-based colloid gold-immunochromatography assay for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum.To establish a colloid gold-immunochromatography assay (GICA) for detecting Plasmodium falciparum.The monoclonal antibodies (mAbs) against lactate dehydrogenase of P. falciparum (LDHpf) were screened for preparation of GICA strips. With microscopic examination of the blood smears and PCR test as control, GICA was evaluated for its sensitivity, specificity and stability in the diagnosis of malaria in the outpatient clinics in China.Four hybridoma cell lines against LDHpf were prepared. Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay demonstrated that the 4 mAbs reacted only with P. falciparum, but not with protein of normal human red cell, P. vivax, Toxoplasma gondii, or Schistosoma japonicam. All the 4 mAbs recognized a 33 kD protein designated as LDHpf as shown by Western blot analysis. Compared with the microscopic examination of blood smears and PCR test, GICA had the sensitivities of 88.37% and 86.67% and the specificities of 95.65% and 97.78%, respectively. Concordance between microscopic examination and GICA for P. falciparum infection was 91.55%.GICA established in this study is simple, rapid, sensitive and specific for detecting P. falciparum, and is potentially useful in developing reagent kits for clinical use.Immunocapture diagnostic assays for malaria using Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH).We have developed two diagnostic assays based on the specific detection of Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) activity. These assays exploit a panel of monoclonal antibodies that capture the parasite enzyme and allow for the quantitation and speciation of human malaria infections. An immunocapture pLDH activity assay (ICpLDH) allows for the rapid purification and measurement of pLDH from infected blood using the NAD analog APAD, which reacts specifically with Plasmodium LDH isoforms. An immunochromatographic test (the OptiMAL assay) was also formatted and allowed the detection of parasite infections of approximately 200 parasites/microl of blood. By using a combination of antibodies, both tests can not only detect but differentiate between P. falciparum and non-P. falciparum malaria. Both assays show a sensitivity comparable with other commercial nonmicroscopic tests; importantly, we found very few instances of false-positive samples, especially with samples from patients recently cleared of malaria infection. Furthermore, we find that when one uses the quantitative ICpLDH assay, the levels of pLDH activity closely mirror the levels of parasitemia in both initial diagnosis and while following patient therapy. We conclude that diagnostic tests based on the detection of pLDH are both sensitive and practical for the detection, speciation, and quantitation of all human Plasmodium infections and can also be used to indicate drug-resistant infections.Evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test, 'Determine malaria pf', in epidemic-prone, forest villages of central India (Madhya Pradesh).A rapid, immunochromatographic test for malaria diagnosis, 'Determine malaria pf', was evaluated by a field team in the epidemic-affected, forest setting of Chhindwara district, in Madhya Pradesh, central India. In all, 526 fever cases were screened for Plasmodium falciparum in October or November, 1999. Those found to be infected were treated with sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine and primaquine. Using microscopy as the gold standard, the new test had a sensitivity of 98% and a specificity of 87%. The positive and negative predictive values were 88% and 98%, respectively. Although follow-up of 64 subjects on day 7 post-treatment revealed that 20% of those who then appeared smear-negative were still antigenaemic, 34% of the subjects were still smear-positive, for asexual parasites, at that time. The Determine test was found to be very easy to perform and the results could be read reliably by field workers, without any supervision. The ease of use of the test indicates that it could be useful in the management of malaria, particularly in remote and inaccessible areas, provided that its accuracy can be assured and that it can be made affordable.A rapid immunochromatographic test (ICT) for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum.A field study was conducted to assess the sensitivity and specificity of rapid immunodiagnostic test based on detection of Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein-2 (PfHRP-2) in peripheral blood for diagnosis of P. falciparum infection. Evaluation in 173 patients showed that the assay was 98.59% sensitive and 97.1% specific. There was no cross-reactivity with P. vivax. The test was positive in few patients who were found to be negative by microscopy showing the presence of antigen after curative chemotherapy. The test is a valuable diagnostic tool for falciparum malaria, especially in emergency/field situations requiring rapid diagnosis.Usefulness of an inexpensive, Paracheck test in detecting asymptomatic infectious reservoir of plasmodium falciparum during dry season in an inaccessible terrain in central India.The performance of a new indigenous rapid diagnostic test, Paracheck Pf was evaluated in detection of Plasmodium falciparum in asymptomatic children in remote forest villages of Mandla district, central India to determine the lower limits of sensitivity and specificity of rapid test.A finger prick blood sample was collected to prepare blood smear and for testing with the Paracheck test. The blood smears were read by an experienced technician blinded to the Paracheck results. The figures for specificity, sensitivity, accuracy and predictive values were calculated using microscopy as gold standard.The new diagnostic test had a sensitivity of 94% and a specificity of 89%. The positive and negative predictive values were 71% and 98%, respectively. The J -index was 0.83%.The rapid test was found to be very easy to perform and the result could be read reliably by field workers. The field evaluation with this new inexpensive test, ($0.65/test) indicates that it could be used as an epidemiological tool in the management of malaria particularly in areas where microscopy is not operationally feasible to attain the goal of the roll back malaria initiative.Multicentre study, in patients with imported malaria, on the sensitivity and specificity of a dipstick test (ICT Malaria P.f./P.v.) compared with expert microscopy.A prospective, multicentre study was carried out in Italy to assess the sensitivity and specificity of a rapid dipstick test (ICT Malaria P.f./P.v.) in the diagnosis of imported malaria caused by Plasmodium falciparum and other Plasmodium spp. The test is based on the detection of histidine-rich protein-2 (HRP-2) from P. falciparum and 'panmalarial' antigen in peripheral blood. The 241 subjects were international travellers or immigrants from areas where malaria is endemic. When compared with the microscopical examination of bloodsmears (used as the 'gold standard'), the dipsticks were found to be 94.4% sensitive and 94.5% specific for pure infections with P. falciparum. The performance of the tests when used on patients infected with species other than P. falciparum or more than one Plasmodium spp. showed a high degree of variability. Although the dipsticks represent a very simple, rapid, and valuable diagnostic aid, they should not be considered a complete substitute for direct microscopical diagnosis using stained bloodsmears.Update on rapid diagnostic testing for malaria.To help mitigate the expanding global impact of malaria, with its associated increasing drug resistance, implementation of prompt and accurate diagnosis is needed. Malaria is diagnosed predominantly by using clinical criteria, with microscopy as the current gold standard for detecting parasitemia, even though it is clearly inadequate in many health care settings. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) have been recognized as an ideal method for diagnosing infectious diseases, including malaria, in recent years. There have been a number of RDTs developed and evaluated widely for malaria diagnosis, but a number of issues related to these products have arisen. This review highlights RDTs, including challenges in assessing their performance, internationally available RDTs, their effectiveness in various health care settings, and the selection of RDTs for different health care systems.Rapid diagnostic test for Plasmodium falciparum in 32 Marines medically evacuated from Liberia with a febrile illness.Diagnostic and prognostic utility of an inexpensive rapid on site malaria diagnostic test (ParaHIT f) among ethnic tribal population in areas of high, low and no transmission in central India.Malaria presents a diagnostic challenge in most tropical countries. Rapid detection of the malaria parasite and early treatment of infection still remain the most important goals of disease management. Therefore, performance characteristics of the new indigenous ParaHIT f test (Span diagnostic Ltd, Surat, India) was determined among ethnic tribal population in four districts of different transmission potential in central India to assess whether this rapid diagnostic test (RDT) could be widely applied as a diagnostic tool to control malaria. Beyond diagnosis, the logical utilization of RDTs is to monitor treatment outcome.A finger prick blood sample was collected from each clinically suspected case of malaria to prepare blood smear and for testing with the RDT after taking informed consent. The blood smears were read by an experienced technician blinded to the RDT results and clinical status of the subjects. The figures for specificity, sensitivity, accuracy and predictive values were calculated using microscopy as gold standard.The prevalence of malaria infection estimated by RDT in parallel with microscopy provide evidence of the type of high, low or no transmission in the study area. Analysis revealed (pooled data of all four epidemiological settings) that overall sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of the RDT were >90% in areas of different endemicity. While, RDT is useful to confirm the diagnosis of new symptomatic cases of suspected P. falciparum infection, the persistence of parasite antigen leading to false positives even after clearance of asexual parasitaemia has limited its utility as a prognostic tool.The study showed that the ParaHIT f test was easy to use, reliable and cheap. Thus this RDT is an appropriate test for the use in the field by paramedical staff when laboratory facilities are not available and thus likely to contribute greatly to an effective control of malaria in resource poor countries.Genetic variability in Plasmodium vivax aldolase gene in Korean isolates and the sensitivity of the Binax Now malaria test.Introduction of rapid malaria diagnostic tests (RDT) initiated numerous field evaluations in various epidemiologic settings. But the efficiency of some RTD kits based on aldolase raised reservations for direct implementation of RDT into clinical settings. We performed Binax Now malaria test in 84 Korean Plasmodium vivax isolates and compared it with the traditional Giemsa stain microscopy test as the reference standard. The sensitivity of Binax Now was 62.0% for P. vivax cases (52/84, 95% CI 51.2-71.6%) with 100.0% specificity (50/50, 95% confidence interval 92.9-100%). After the aldolase gene sequence analysis of 84 isolates, two synonymous mutations in aldolase gene were identified in both Binax Now positive and negative samples. No significant association between the mutations and Binax Now malaria tests was found. Thus, the genetic variability would not explain the poor performance of P. vivax RDTs by detecting aldolase in ROK isolates.Detection and species determination of malaria parasites by PCR: comparison with microscopy and with ParaSight-F and ICT malaria Pf tests in a clinical environment.A rapid procedure for the diagnosis of malaria infections directly from dried blood spots by PCR amplification was evaluated with samples from 52 patients. Plasmodium infections were identified with a genus-specific primer set, and species differentiation between Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax was analyzed by multiplex PCR. The PCR test with any of the three primer sets was able to detect as few as four parasites per microliter by gel electrophoresis or by nonisotopic paper hybridization chromatography. The diagnoses obtained by PCR correlated closely with those obtained by Giemsa staining except for two samples observed to have mixed P. falciparum-P. vivax infections. These were initially missed by microscopic analysis. In comparison with antigen-capture assays for P. falciparum, the PCR assays were able to detect three infections that were missed by the ParaSight-F test. The PCR test was negative for nine ParaSight-F-positive samples and one ICT Malaria Pf-positive sample, and these were confirmed to be false-positive results. The PCR thus gave no false-negative or false-positive results. Patients undergoing antimalarial therapy were also monitored by the PCR assay. Four of seven patients who were PCR positive for P. vivax at the time of discharge were later readmitted to the hospital with a recurrence of P. vivax infection. We would like to propose that PCR is a sensitive and easy method that can serve as a useful addition to microscopy for the diagnosis and the clinical monitoring of treatment of malaria.Diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in pregnancy in sub-Saharan Africa: the challenges and public health implications.Plasmodium falciparum malaria in pregnancy is a major public health problem in sub-Saharan Africa and represents enormous diagnostic challenge. The objective of this report was to review scientific data from studies conducted in sub-Saharan Africa on the diagnosis of malaria in pregnancy within the last two decades (1987 to 2007), to highlight the challenges and the public health implications. Using the Medline Entrez-Pubmed search, relevant publications were identified for the review via combinations of key words such as Malaria, Pregnancy, and Sub-Saharan Africa, which yielded 777 entries as of September 2007. The results from the various studies were discordant, due to differences in the techniques of sample collection and analysis, based on the differences in the definition of clinical, peripheral, and placental malaria. Definitions were based on the presence of malaria parasite and/or pigments in blood smear from peripheral/placental blood, on histological placental findings, on the use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) and polymerase chain reaction (PCR). Nonspecific clinical presentation of malaria, lack of efficient diagnostic facilities and trained personnel, and absence of regulatory standards for diagnostic tests, are some of the major diagnostic challenges. Increased allocation of resources to development and application of accurate diagnostics will improve malaria diagnosis in pregnancy.Evaluation of rapid diagnostics for Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax in Mae Sot Malaria endemic area, Thailand.Prompt and accurate diagnosis of malaria is the key to prevent disease morbidity and mortality. This study was carried out to evaluate diagnostic performance of 3 commercial rapid detection tests (RDTs), i.e., Malaria Antigen Pf/Pan™, Malaria Ag-Pf™, and Malaria Ag-Pv™ tests, in comparison with the microscopic and PCR methods. A total of 460 blood samples microscopically positive for Plasmodium falciparum (211 samples), P. vivax (218), mixed with P. falciparum and P. vivax (30), or P. ovale (1), and 124 samples of healthy subjects or patients with other fever-related infections, were collected. The sensitivities of Malaria Ag-Pf™ and Malaria Antigen Pf/Pan™ compared with the microscopic method for P. falciparum or P. vivax detection were 97.6% and 99.0%, or 98.6% and 99.0%, respectively. The specificities of Malaria Ag-Pf™, Malaria Ag-Pv™, and Malaria Antigen Pf/Pan™ were 93.3%, 98.8%, and 94.4%, respectively. The sensitivities of Malaria Ag-Pf™, Malaria Antigen Pf/Pan™, and microscopic method, when PCR was used as a reference method for P. falciparum or P. vivax detection were 91.8%, 100%, and 96.7%, or 91.9%, 92.6%, and 97.3%, respectively. The specificities of Malaria Ag-Pf™, Malaria Ag-Pv™, Malaria Antigen Pf/Pan™, and microscopic method were 66.2%, 92.7%, 73.9%, and 78.2%, respectively. Results indicated that the diagnostic performances of all the commercial RDTs are satisfactory for application to malaria diagnosis.Evaluation of Paracheck pf o and Parascreen pan/pf o tests for the diagnosis of malaria in an endemic area, South Ethiopia.Laboratory diagnosis of malaria is limited in peripheral health care services and mainly depends on non-specific clinical examination until the advent of Rapid Diagnostic Tests.Evaluation of the effectiveness of Paracheck pf and Parascreen pan/pf tests for the diagnosis of malaria.A Health Center based cross-sectional study was conducted in Kella and Bussa Health Centers, Wondo-Genet area, South Ethiopia where malaria is endemic. Microscopy of Giemsa stained thick blood film was used as gold standard.The sensitivity and specificity of Paracheck Pf test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum were 96.7% and 76%, respectively, with positive predictive value of 67.1% and negative predictive value of 97.9%. The sensitivity and specificity of the Parascreen Pan/pf test for the diagnosis of P. falciparum were 100% and 65.1%, respectively, while its positive and negative predictive values were 67.9 and 100% respectively. Its sensitivity and specificity for Plasmodium vivax were 100 and 42.3%, respectively, with a positive predictive value of 33.3% and a negative predictive value of 100%.Although further study is needed to evaluate their specificities, both tests were found to be effective for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria at peripheral health care unit where skilled personnel and laboratory facilities are not available for blood film examination.Rapid diagnostic test-based management of malaria: an effectiveness study in Papua New Guinean infants with Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax malaria.In malaria-endemic areas it is recommended that febrile children be tested for malaria by rapid diagnostic test (RDT) or blood slide (BS) and receive effective malaria treatment only if results are positive. However, RDTs are known to perform less well for Plasmodium vivax. We evaluated the safety of withholding antimalarial drugs from young Papua New Guinean children with negative RDT results in areas with high levels of both Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax infections.Longitudinal prospective study of children aged 3-27 months visiting outpatient clinics for fever. RDT was administered at first visit. RDT and microscopy were performed if children returned because of persistent symptoms. Outcomes were rates of reattendance and occurrence of severe illnesses.Of 5670 febrile episodes, 3942 (70%) involved a negative RDT result. In 133 cases (3.4%), the children reattended the clinic within 7 days for fever, of whom 29 (0.7%) were parasitemic by RDT or microscopy. Of children who reattended, 24 (0.7%) presented with a severe illness: 2 had lower respiratory tract infections (LRTIs) with low-density P. vivax on BS; 2 received a diagnosis of P. vivax malaria on the basis of RDT but BSs were negative; 16 had LRTIs; 3 had alternative diagnoses. Of these 24, 22 were cured at day 28. Two children died of illnesses other than malaria and were RDT and BS negative at the initial and subsequent visits.Treatment for malaria based on RDT results is safe and feasible even in infants living in areas with moderate to high endemicity for both P. falciparum and P. vivax infections.[Efficiency and specificity of the KAT-test for rapid diagnosis of falciparum malaria].A new rapid KAT Quick Malaria test for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, which is based on the detection of a monoclonal antibody-antigen complex of malaria parasites, has been worked out by the KAT Medical CC in South Africa. The efficiency and specificity of the KAT test were compared with those of the microscopic method and with the ICT test for rapid diagnosis of P. falciparum and P. vivax. The polymerase chain reaction was used as a control test. Testing for malaria was performed on 98 blood samples from feverish patients in Vietnam and Tadjikistan and among the persons who had returned to Moscow from endemic regions. The efficiency of the KAT test for falciparum-malaria was found to be 100% versus 90.5% with ICT. The absence of cross-reactions with P. vivax and the presence of pseudopositive results of the KAT test for fever cases of non-malaria origin indicate its high specificity. There was no correlation between the rate of test line colouring and the level of parasitemia. The KAT test yielded positive results only when gametocytes were found in blood specimens.[Evaluation of immunochromatographic test in the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax].To evaluate the effectiveness of immunochromatographic test(ICT) in detecting Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax in malaria endemic areas.ICT was used to detect P. falciparum and P. vivax among patients with fever in the outpatient clinics by comparason with thick blood smear method.The sensitivity of ICT to detect P. falciparum and P. vivax was 96.7% and 90.4%, respectively. The specificity of ICT was 98.6%, and the coincidence rate was 94.7%. There is no cross reaction between P. falciparum and P. vivax.ICT could detect P. falciparum and P. vivax simutaneously, being more rapid and simple than blood smear method.Evaluation of light microscopy and rapid diagnostic test for the detection of malaria under operational field conditions: a household survey in Ethiopia.In most resource-poor settings, malaria is usually diagnosed based on clinical signs and symptoms and not by detection of parasites in the blood using microscopy or rapid diagnostic tests (RDT). In population-based malaria surveys, accurate diagnosis is important: microscopy provides the gold standard, whilst RDTs allow immediate findings and treatment. The concordance between RDTs and microscopy in low or unstable transmission areas has not been evaluated.This study aimed to estimate the prevalence of malaria parasites in randomly selected malarious areas of Amhara, Oromia, and Southern Nations, Nationalities and Peoples' (SNNP) regions of Ethiopia, using microscopy and RDT, and to investigate the agreement between microscopy and RDT under field conditions.A population-based survey was conducted in 224 randomly selected clusters of 25 households each in Amhara, Oromia and SNNP regions, between December 2006 and February 2007. Fingerpick blood samples from all persons living in even-numbered households were tested using two methods: light microscopy of Giemsa-stained blood slides; and RDT (ParaScreen device for Pan/Pf).A total of 13,960 people were eligible for malaria parasite testing of whom 11,504 (82%) were included in the analysis. Overall slide positivity rate was 4.1% (95% confidence interval [CI] 3.4-5.0%) while ParaScreen RDT was positive in 3.3% (95% CI 2.6-4.1%) of those tested. Considering microscopy as the gold standard, ParaScreen RDT exhibited high specificity (98.5%; 95% CI 98.3-98.7) and moderate sensitivity (47.5%; 95% CI 42.8-52.2) with a positive predictive value of 56.8% (95% CI 51.7-61.9) and negative predictive value of 97.6% (95% CI 97.6-98.1%) under field conditions.Blood slide microscopy remains the preferred option for population-based prevalence surveys of malaria parasitaemia. The level of agreement between microscopy and RDT warrants further investigation in different transmission settings and in the clinical situation.Comparison of blood smear microscopy to a rapid diagnostic test for in-vitro testing for P. falciparum malaria in Kenyan school children.To compare the diagnostic performance of microscopy using Giemsa-stained thick and thin blood smears to a rapid malaria dipstick test (RDT) in detecting P. falciparum malaria in Kenyan school children.Randomised, controlled feeding intervention trial from 1998-2001.Rural Embu district, Kenya. The area is considered endemic for malaria, with four rainy seasons per year. Chloroquine resistance was estimated in 80% of patients. Children had a spleen rate of 45%.A sample of 515 rural Kenyan primary school children, aged 7-11 years, who were enrolled in a feeding intervention trial from 1998-2001.Percent positive and negative P. falciparum malaria status, sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values of RDT.For both years, the RDT yielded positive results of 30% in children compared to microscopy (17%). With microscopy as the "gold standard", RDT yielded a sensitivity of 81.3% in 1998 and 79.3% in 2000. Specificity was 81.6% in 1998 and 78.3% in 2000. Positive predictive value was 47.3% in 1998 and 42.6% in 2000, and negative predictive value was 95.6% in 1998 and 94.9% in 2000.Rapid diagnostic testing is a valuable tool for diagnosis and can shorten the interval for starting treatment, particularly where microscopy may not be feasible due to resource and distance limitations.Diagnostic performance of CareStart™ malaria HRP2/pLDH (Pf/pan) combo test versus standard microscopy on falciparum and vivax malaria between China-Myanmar endemic borders.Rapid diagnostic test (RDT) is becoming an alternative way of establishing quickly the diagnosis of malaria infections, by detecting specific malaria antigens in suspected patients' blood between the China-Myanmar endemic borders areas, towards achieving the National Malaria Elimination programme by 2020. The objective of this study is to evaluate the performance of CareStart™ Malaria Pf/Pan RDT kit for the diagnosis of malaria infections in suspected patients. Blood examination by microscopy was taken as gold standard to evaluate CareStart™ kit's sensitivity, specificity and predictive value and corrected with PCR assay.Overall 126 of 241 (52.28%) malaria cases were detected by microscopy compared to 115 of 241(47.72%) CareStart™ kit and 128 of 241 (53.11%) PCR corrected assay. CareStart™ kit's sensitivity and specificity for the diagnosis of malaria were 89.68% and 98.26% respectively, compared to standard microscopy, whereas the sensitivity and specificity for falciparum malaria were 88.52% and 98.26%, and for vivax malaria: 90.77% and 100%. The CareStart™ positive predictive values were 98.26% (93.88-99.52%, 95% CI) compared to 100% (96.77-100%, 95% CI) for PCR-corrected, and the negative predictive values of 89.68% (83.15-93.87%, 95% CI) were the same in microscopy as PCR-corrected. The diagnostic accuracy of CareStart™ kit versus microscopy and PCR were 93.78% (89.99-96.19%, 95% CI) and 94.61% (90.99-96.82%, 95% CI) respectively. The likelihood of diagnostic of malaria positive was almost similar between microscopy and CareStart™ kit, with an entropy reduction of 60.0% compared to a weak likelihood of misdiagnosis of 0.10 (0.09-0.12, 95% CI), with an entropy reduction of 36.01%.The accuracy of CareStart™ kit is comparable to gold standard microscopy in these areas, it is easy to perform and suitable for cross-border diagnosis and monitoring of local or imported malaria patterns by any local health staff in endemic remotes.Rapid diagnosis of vivax malaria by the SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test when thrombocytopenia is present.An easy and reliable diagnostic method for malaria is highly desirable. We examined the recently introduced SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test, which detects Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase, with the additional aid of the presence or absence of thrombocytopenia to diagnose vivax malaria. We enrolled 732 patients with clinically suspected malaria in an area where vivax malaria is endemic. We performed microscopic examination of thin film, applied the SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test, and checked platelet counts. One hundred ninety-five patients were smear positive for vivax malaria. The sensitivity of the SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test was 96.4%, and its specificity was 98.9%. We found that 95.4% of malaria patients had thrombocytopenia, and the proportion with malaria increased as platelet counts decreased. A positive SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test when thrombocytopenia was present showed a 100% positive predictive value for vivax malaria. In conclusion, the SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test is a rapid and accurate diagnostic method for vivax malaria, and a platelet count can facilitate a rapid diagnosis of malaria.A comparison of antigen dipstick assays with polymerase chain reaction (PCR) technique and blood film examination in the rapid diagnosis of malaria.Early diagnosis of malaria for military personnel training in the field is crucial in providing proper treatment for the infected and in taking appropriate preventive measures for the non-infected. Present preliminary diagnosis of malaria in the field depends on the clinical symptoms of the patients and there is a need for rapid diagnosis of malaria in the field. The presence of drug-resistant strains of the Plasmodium species in the region also increases the urgency of finding a quick and sensitive way of identifying the different strains. This study evaluated current methods available for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax. The dipstick assays, the ParaSight F test and the OptiMAL malaria rapid test were compared with the methods of microscopic examination of blood film and polymerase chain reaction (PCR). On comparison to the blood film and PCR methods, the ParaSight F test has specificity of 98.6% and sensitivity of 91% for P. falciparum detection. The OptiMAL malaria rapid test has a specificity of 100% and 98.6% and sensitivity of 92.8% and 92.6% for P. vivax and P. falciparum detection respectively. We conclude that both tests are suitable for use for rapid malaria diagnosis in the field but the OptiMAL rapid malaria test, which can detect both vivax and falciparum malaria, would be more useful.Point-of-care testing for malaria outbreak management.A rapid antigen assay for malaria was performed on blood samples collected during a simultaneous outbreak of falciparum malaria and vivax malaria on a remote island in the Indonesian archipelago. During the outbreak, a total of 89 patients (4.3% of the population) were diagnosed with malaria within a week. Microscopic examination revealed 78 malaria slide-positive cases, of whom 49 (62.8%) were identified as P. falciparum, 7 (9.0%) as P. vivax and 22 (28.2%) as mixed P. falciparum and P. vivax infections. The rapid malaria assay showed excellent correlation with expert-confirmed routine microscopy for P. falciparum and P. vivax monoinfections and mixed infections with a parasite density >50 parasites/microl. Several slide-negative blood samples collected from febrile patients with clinical malaria tested positive in the rapid test. The estimated sensitivity calculated for the rapid test (91.0%) was slightly higher than that of microscopy (87.6%). The result indicates that rapid antigen detection for malaria could be a useful alternative to microscopy to reduce the workload during emergency outbreak situations.Plasmodium falciparum parasite infection prevalence from a household survey in Zambia using microscopy and a rapid diagnostic test: implications for monitoring and evaluation.This paper presents estimates of P. falciparum infection prevalence in children under 5 years old in the context of a population-based household survey in Luangwa District (Lusaka Province), Zambia, an area where greater than 75% of households possess at least one insecticide-treated mosquito net (ITN). The sensitivity and specificity of an HRP-2 rapid diagnostic test (RDT) (ICT Malaria Pf((R))) compared to microscopy, as well as factors associated with discordant diagnostic results are also presented. P. falciparum infection prevalence was estimated at 7.0% (95% CI 4.9-9.0%) using microscopy. Using microscopy as the gold standard, the sensitivity of the HRP-2 RDT was 100% and specificity was 91.5%; positive predictive value was estimated to be 46.7% (95% CI 36.3-57.4%). RDT discordance, or HRP-2 false positivity, was highest among older children, those in the northern part of Luangwa District, and those with a reported history of antimalarial treatment. These data suggest microscopy should remain the gold standard for estimating malaria parasite point prevalence from household surveys for monitoring and evaluation purposes.Plasmodium vivax aldolase-specific monoclonal antibodies and its application in clinical diagnosis of malaria infections in China.Most rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) currently used for malaria diagnosis cannot distinguish the various Plasmodium infections. The development of a Plasmodium vivax specific RDTs with high sensitivity to sufficiently differentiate the two most common Plasmodium infections would be very crucial for disease treatment and control.Plasmodium vivax aldolase gene (PvALDO) was amplified from the extracted genomic DNA and constructed into pET30a vector. Plasmodium vivax aldolase protein was successfully expressed in Escherichia coli in soluble form and the overall purity was over 95% after one-step affinity chromatography purification. The purified products were used for the immunization of mice and rabbits. Rabbit polyclonal antibodies generated were deployed to develop a novel antibody-capture ELISA for hybridoma screening.Three PvALDO specific mAbs (14C7, 15F1 and 5H7) with high affinities were selected and used in immunochromatographic test strips. Clinical blood samples (n=190) collected from Yunnan (China) were used for evaluation and the RDT's sensitivity for P. vivax was 98.33% (95% Confidence Interval (CI): 91.03% to 99.72%) compared with microscopic examination. There was specificity of 99.23% (95% CI: 95.77% to 99.87%) for P. vivax. Only one Plasmodium falciparum sample was detected among the P. falciparum samples (n=20). All Plasmodium malariae samples (n=2) as well as healthy uninfected samples (n=108) were negative. Overall performance of this RDT was excellent with positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) of 98.33% and 99.23%, respectively, at 95% CI and a very good correlation with microscopic observations (kappa value, K=0.9757). Test strips show high sensitivity even at 6.25 ng/ml of recombinant P. vivax aldolase (rPvALDO).This study further elucidates the possibility of developing aldolase-specific RDTs which can differentiate the different Plasmodium infections and improve accurate diagnosis of malaria. This RDT could adequately differentiate between P. vivax and P. falciparum infections. The novel mAb screening method developed here could find application in the screening of highly specific antibodies against other antigens.Diagnostic performance characteristics of rapid dipstick test for Plasmodium vivax malaria.We compared the diagnostic performance characteristics of newly developed method, the rapid dipstick test, which provides colorimetric determination by developing antibody to the lactate dehydrogenase enzyme of parasites, with conventional standard thick-blood film examination. For the rapid test, OptiMAL commercial kits were used. The results were also evaluated with clinical findings from patients. The parasites were determined by microscopic examination of thick-blood films from 81 patients with vivax malaria from southeastern Anatolia, Turkey. The OptiMAL test results were found to be negative in five patients who were diagnosed clinically and through thick-film testing as having vivax malaria. There was no false positivity observed with the OptiMAL test. We concluded that this rapid malaria test has a lower level of sensitivity than the classical thick-blood-film test for malaria, but that these methods have equal specificity.[Diagnosis of malaria with immunochromatographic test The Novara experience].Microscopic detection of parasites has been the reference standard for malaria diagnosis for decades. Recently rapid antigen assays provide an effective tool for the detection of malaria in symptomatic patients. In Novara Maggiore della Carità Hospital we evaluated the efficacy of the ParaSight F test in patients with malaria.[Evaluation of two rapid diagnostic tests, NOW ICT Malaria Pf/Pv and OptiMAL, for diagnosis of malaria].To increase the accessibility of malaria diagnosis, the Instituto Nacional de Salud de Colombia undertook a field trial to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of two rapid diagnostic tests.The sensitivity, specificity and concordance was compared for two rapid diagnostic tests for malaria, NOW ICT Malaria Pf/Pv and OptiMAL.A descriptive and concordance study was performed with 214 patients in the southwestern coastal city of Tumaco, Colombia, each of whom presented at least one of the symptoms of the classical malaria triad. Two strategies were applied for patient recruitment-one by passive search and a second through local health brigades.NOW ICT showed a general sensitivity of 98.4% (95%CI: 90.3-99.9), and a general specificity of 98.0% (95%CI: 93.9-99.5). For Plasmodium falciparum, the sensitivity was 98.2% (95%CI: 89.4-99.9) and the specificity 98.1% (95%CI: 94.1-99.5). The sensitivity was lower (80.0%) when parasitemia ranged from 200 to 4,000 parasites/microl. The sensitivity and specificity of the NOW ICT for P. vivax malaria were 100%. The sensitivity for this test was not affected for the established ranges of parasitemia for P. vivax. The overall figures for OptiMAL were 95.2% (95%CI: 85.8-98.8) sensitivity and 99.3% (95%CI: 95.8-100.0) specificity. For P. falciparum malaria OptiMAL showed 94.7% (95%CI: 84.5-98.6) sensitivity and 99.4% (95%CI: 96.0-100.0) specificity. The sensitivity was lower (60.0%) when samples with 200-4,000 parasites/microl were tested. For P. vivax, OptiMAL presented a 66.7% (95%CI: 24.1-94.0) sensitivity, which diminished to 50% with a parasitemia between 300-2.500 parasites/microL.Good results for sensitivity and specificity were obtained for malaria diagnosis using NOW ICT and OptiMAL, with NOW ICT showing higher sensitivity and specificity values than OptiMAL.[Establishment and evaluation of colloid gold labeled immunochromatographic strip test for rapid diagnosis of malaria].To establish and evaluate a gold immunochromatographic strip test for detection and differentiation of Plasmodium vivax and P. falciparum.The monoclonal antibodies, F4H12, G4C9 and D8F7, were conjugated with colloid gold as detecting reagent; monoclonal antibody B2G10 (against P. vivax/ P. falciparum) and D6A7 (only against P. falciparum) were immobilized on nitrocellulose in proper position. Blood samples from 107 febrile patients from endemic area of malaria and 17 patients with visceral leishmaniasis were used for evaluating the specificity. Blood samples of malaria patients (110 with P. vivax and 54 with P. falciparum) were used for evaluating the sensitivity.5 samples out of 107 febrile patients and 17 patients with visceral leishmaniasis showed false positive reaction with a specificity of 96.0% (119/124), all the 17 samples from patients with visceral leishmaniasis were negative. 164 blood samples of malaria patients showed a sensitivity of 92.3% (153/164), 92.7% (102/110)and 94.4% (51/ 54) for patients infected with P. vivax or P. falciparum, respectively.The immunochromatographic strip test based on antigen-capturing is a sensitive, specific, simple and rapid assay for malaria diagnosis.Accuracy of malaria rapid diagnosis test Optimal-IT(®) in Kinshasa, the Democratic Republic of Congo.Despite some problems related to accuracy and applicability, malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs), are currently considered the best option in areas with limited laboratory services for improving case management and reducing over-treatment. However, their performance must be established taking into the account the particularities of each endemic area. In the Democratic Republic of Congo, the validity of Optimal-IT(®) and Paracheck-Pf(®), respectively based on the detection of lactate dehydrogenase and histidine-rich protein-2, was assessed at primary health care level (PHC).This was a two-stage cluster randomized survey, conducted in one health centre in 12 health zones in Kinshasa city. All patients with malaria presumptive diagnosis were eligible. Gold standard was microscopy performed by experts from the parasitology unit, Kinshasa University.624 patients were enrolled. 53.4% (95% CI: 49.4-57.3) owed a bed net, obtained in 74.5% of cases (95% CI: 69.4-79.1) through community-based distribution by the National Malaria Control Programme. Microscopy expert reading confirmed 123 malaria cases (19.7%; 95% CI: 16.7-23.1). Overall sensitivity were 79.7% (95% CI: 72.4-86.8), 87.8% (95% CI: 81.9-93.6) and 86.2% (95% CI: 79.9-92.3), respectively, for Optimal-IT(®), Paracheck-Pf(®) and microscopy performed at PHC. Specificity was 97.0% (95% CI: 95.5-98.5), 91.6% (95% CI: 89.1-94.0) and 49.1% (95% CI: 44.7-53.4). The proportion of confirmed cases seemed similar in under-fives compared to others. Any treatment prior to the current visit was a predictor for malaria (AOR: 2.3; 95% CI: 1.5-3.5), but not malaria treatment (AOR: 0.87; 95% CI: 0.4-1.8). Bed net ownership tended to protect against malaria (AOR: 0.67; 95% CI: 0.45-0.99).Although microscopy is considered as the "gold standard" for malaria diagnosis at point of care level, this study showed that its accuracy may not always be satisfactory when performed in health centres.[Usefulness of the "OptiMAL Rapid Malaria test" for rapid detection of malaria imported to Poland].In this survey the use of OptiMAL test for rapid diagnosis of malaria was evaluated. It was proved that this test allowed to diagnose the Plasmodium sp. antigen in 72% of examined blood specimens, 82% for P. falciparum infection and 69% for P. vivax, whereas P. ovale was not detected at all. The test sensitivity depended on the parasitemia level. It showed a sensitivity of 100% for parasitemia density exceeded 1%, 95.4% with the parasitemia ranging from 0.1-0.99%. For lower parasite density, the test's sensitivity was of 32 and 60%. The OptiMAL test showed a 99.1% specificity thus it revealed to be significantly high.Performance of an immunochromatographic test for the rapid diagnosis of malaria.The immunochromatographic test (ICT) for the rapid diagnosis of malaria has been marketed for several years. In a study in which three Centres of Tropical Medicine participated and data were pooled, performance of the test varied considerably when comparing the results between each centre. The sensitivity of ICT in 2,343 patients tested in our services was 100% and the specificity 99.74%. Moreover, two patients with a positive ICT would initially have been missed by expert microscopy, with Plasmodium falciparum malaria being confirmed microscopically some hours later. The principal reasons for the better performance of the test in our series appear to be blood collection in EDTA vials and considerable experience with handling and interpreting the ICT test.Use of rapid diagnostic tests for diagnosis of malaria in the UK.Malaria is currently diagnosed almost exclusively by microscopy in clinical laboratories. The introduction of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) may be useful in achieving rapid detection of malaria parasites, especially in situations where malaria is not often seen or where staff are inexperienced.To explore the use of RDT in UK laboratories.The current use of RDTs was surveyed in UK laboratories subscribing to the United Kingdom National External Quality Assessment Scheme blood parasitology and haematology schemes.An overall survey response rate of 60.3% was seen. RDTs were found to be the preferred choice, either alone or in conjunction with microscopy in 31.2% of the samples examined during normal working hours and in 44.3% of the specimens examined on call.During on-call hours, the use of RDTs was observed to increase and RDTs changed the diagnosis in 12% of laboratories. No established protocol for RDT use was, however, observed in the UK. A protocol that needs to be validated in the laboratory setting is suggested.Non-microscopic method for malaria diagnosis using OptiMAL IT, a second-generation dipstick for malaria pLDH antigen detection.Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria are now a commonly used procedure for malaria diagnosis. New or improved devices need to be evaluated against a recognised gold-standard procedure and subjected to conditions of temperature and humidity that may affect their performance. The OptiMAL 48 RDT has now been available commercially for several years and a second-generation OptiMAL IT test is now coming onto the market. In this study the problems associated with the routine use of OptiMAL 48 is investigated and its performance compared with a second-generation individual test, OptiMAL IT. Sensitivity and specificity for detection of all malaria species for both tests were comparable but loss of sensitivity of the test strips due to humidity or temperature found with the routine use of OptiMAL 48 was not seen with the individual OptiMAL IT. False-positive results for Plasmodium falciparum, seen in two negative blood samples, were attributed to the presence of high levels of heterophile antibodies.Diagnosis of malaria parasitemia in children using a rapid diagnostic test.This cross-sectional study was conducted to evaluate the diagnostic performance of a new rapid immunochromatographic test named "Paracheck pf" in the diagnosis of malaria in Nigerian children.A total of 380 Nigerian children aged between 6 and 59 months who presented at the University of Nigeria Teaching Hospital (UNTH) Enugu with fever and no obvious focus of any other infection were consecutively recruited. Malaria parasitemia was determined using simple microscopy and "Paracheck pf"."Paracheck pf" has the following diagnostic performance characteristics: Sensitivity of 82%, specificity of 91.5%, negative predictive value of 91.5%, positive predictive value of 82%, a strong positive correlation between parasite density and test sensitivity, and a detection limit of 397 parasites/μl.The test is, therefore, recommended for the use in Nigerian children aged between 6 and 59 months in Enugu for the diagnosis of malaria, but negative results should be cautiously interpreted in infants because symptomatic malaria may occur in these children at parasite densities as low as 100/μl.Role of ICT malaria immunochromatographic test for rapid diagnosis of malaria.To evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of immunochromatographic test (ICT) malaria p.f/p.v using microscopy as the gold standard diagnosis.Five hundred and sixty patients of both sexes and all age groups with clinical suspicion of malaria were studied. Venous blood was collected for microscopy and ICT. Thick and thin films prepared and stained with Leishman's stain were examined. ICT malaria test was performed and interpreted according to manufacturer's instructions. Data was analyzed using Epi-6.A total of 560 cases were studied, 339 males and 221 females with age ranges between 2 to 73 years. Seventy two (12.85%) cases had parasitaemia (with or without sexual forms). On microscopy 65 (11.6%) cases had asexual-stage parasitaemia and 7 (1.25%) cases had P. falciparum gametocytes only. Thirty two cases were infected with P. falciparum, 29 with P. vivax and 4 had mixed infection. For P. falciparum the ICT was 97.0% sensitive, 98.3% specific, with positive predictive value (PPV) of 78.0% and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 99.8%. For P. vivax the sensitivity was only 89.7%, specificity 97.9%, PPV was 70.3% and NPV 99.4%.Our results are in concordance with previous studies. Rapid tests though expensive are simple to perform and effective diagnostic tools of malaria. They can be used selectively, though microscopy remains the gold standard diagnosis, economical and accurate if performed by skilled technologists.Effect of malaria rapid diagnostic tests on the management of uncomplicated malaria with artemether-lumefantrine in Kenya: a cluster randomized trial.Shortly after Kenya introduced artemether-lumefantrine (AL) for first-line treatment of uncomplicated malaria, we conducted a pre-post cluster randomized controlled trial to assess the effect of providing malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) on recommended treatment (patients with malaria prescribed AL) and overtreatment (patients without malaria prescribed AL) in outpatients >/= 5 years old. Sixty health facilities were randomized to receive either RDTs plus training, guidelines, and supervision (TGS) or TGS alone. Of 1,540 patients included in the analysis, 7% had uncomplicated malaria. The provision of RDTs coupled with TGS emphasizing AL use only after laboratory confirmation of malaria reduced recommended treatment by 63%-points (P = 0.04), because diagnostic test use did not change (-2%-points), but health workers significantly reduced presumptive treatment with AL for patients with a clinical diagnosis of malaria who did not undergo testing (-36%-points; P = 0.03). Health workers generally adhered to RDT results when prescribing AL: 88% of RDT-positive and 9% of RDT-negative patients were treated with AL, respectively. Overtreatment was low in both arms and was not significantly reduced by the provision of RDTs (-12%-points, P = 0.30). RDTs could potentially improve malaria case management, but we urgently need to develop more effective strategies for implementing guidelines before large scale implementation.Evaluation of the OptiMAL test for diagnosis of malaria in Venezuela.We evaluated the OptiMAL rapid dipstick test by comparing it with the conventional standard thick-blood film method, for the detection of malaria in two groups of individuals from different Venezuelan endemic areas. One of the groups consisted of individuals with malaria-like symptoms (n = 113) and the other of asymptomatic individuals (n = 89). The classical microscopy analysis of these populations determined that 67.5% were infected with P. vivax, 31.3% with P. falciparum, and 1.2% with mixed infections. The OptiMAL test showed 96.4% sensitivity, 100% specificity, 100% positive predictive value, 97.5% negative predictive value and optimal concordance (kappa = 0.97), capable of detecting any malaria infection in the evaluated population. However, these parameters were lower when the parasitaemia was < or = 300 parasites/microL. Freezing of the samples did not affect the sensitivity and specificity of the test. We concluded that this rapid malaria test is sensitive and specific for rapid diagnosis of malaria in the field and it is a complement to conventional microscopy.Validity and reliability of RDT for diagnosis of malaria among febrile children in Jimma Town: southwest Ethiopia.Malaria shows variations in its epidemiologic pattern in relation to the local situation. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) have the potential to provide an accurate diagnosis and to determine the prevalence of malaria in ureas.The purpose of the study was to determine the prevalence of malaria and to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of RDT for diagnosis of malaria.A health facility based cross-sectional study was conducted from September to November 2006 among Jebrile children of less than five years of age as part of interventional study to develop and test home management of malaria in Jimma Town. Both thick and thin blood smear microscopy were done by trained laboratory technicians. An RDT was conducted to evaluate its specificity, senstivity and relaibility using blood smear microscopy as a gold standard. Data were analsysed using SPSS12.0.1 and STATA 9.1.A total of 929 febrile children were included in the sunrvey. P. falciparum or/and P. vivax combined together were identified using microscopy in 20.34% offebrile children presented to the health care facility. Forty three (4.63%) febrile children were positive for P. falciparum in their thin blood film microscopy. The sensitivity Iand specificity of RDT was 93.02% and 99.44% where as the positive likelihood ratio was 164.84 and positive predictive value was 88.89%.RDT for malaria had high sensitivity and specificity in the group tested. However, the use of RDT in home management of malaria by community workers should be investigated and the validity and reliability of the RDT should he established before recommending using with home management of malaria.The usefulness of a new rapid diagnostic test, the First Response Malaria Combo (pLDH/HRP2) card test, for malaria diagnosis in the forested belt of central India.Malaria presents a diagnostic challenge in tribal belt of central India where two Plasmodium species, Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax, are prevalent. In these areas, rapid detection of the malaria parasites and early treatment of infection remain the most important goals of disease management. Therefore, the usefulness of a new rapid diagnostic (RDT), the First Response(R) Combo Malaria Ag (pLDH/HRP2) card test was assessed for differential diagnosis between P. falciparum with other Plasmodium species in remote villages of Jabalpur district.A finger prick blood sample was collected to prepare blood smear and for testing with the RDT after taking informed consent. The figures for sensitivity, specificity, accuracy and predictive values were calculated using microscopy as gold standard.Analysis revealed that overall, the RDT was 93% sensitive, 85% specific with a positive predictive value (PPV) of 79%, and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 95%. The accuracy 88% and J-index was 0.74. For P. falciparum, the sensitivity and specificity of the test were 96% and 95% respectively, with a PPV of 85% and a NPV of 99%. The RDT accuracy 95% and J-index was 0.84. For non-falciparum malaria, the sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 83%, 94% and 92% respectively with a PPV of 69% and a NPV of 97%.The RDTs are easy to use, reliable and simple to interpret. RDTs are more suited to health workers in situations where health services are deficient or absent. Therefore, the test can be used as an epidemiological tool for the rapid screening of malaria.Use of dipstick tests for the rapid diagnosis of malaria in nonimmune travelers.Swift diagnosis of falciparum malaria in nonendemic areas is frequently complicated by lack of experience on the side of involved laboratory personnel. Diagnostic tools based on the dipstick principle for the detection of plasmodial histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP-2) (ICT Malaria P.f. (R)) and parasite-specific lactate-dehydrogenase (pLDH) (OptiMal(R)), respectively, have become available for the qualitative detection of falciparum malaria.In order to evaluate currently available assays, a series of studies was conducted: sensitivity and specificity were evaluated by investigation of specimens from 231 febrile returnees from endemic areas, cross reactivity in patients with rheumatoid factor (RF) was assessed among 92 patients from a rheumatology unit, and the quality of dipstick self-use by febrile travelers was tested in Kenya.Whereas the test kit based on the detection of HRP-2 performed with a sensitivity of 92.5% and a specificity of 98.3%, the kit for the detection of pLDH showed a sensitivity of 88.5% and a specificity of 99.4%. Cross-reactions with sera positive for rheumatoid factor occurred in 6.6% with the ICT Malaria P.f.(R), and in 3.3% with the OptiMal(R) test. Only ICT Malaria P.f.(R) was tested for quality of self-use among travelers. This dipstick assay was performed successfully by 67 patients (68.4%), but 31 (31.6%) were unable to obtain a result.Dipstick tests have the potential of enhancing speed and accuracy of the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, especially if nonspecialized laboratories are involved. However, microscopical testing remains mandatory in every single patient with the possible diagnosis of malaria. Self-use of dipstick tests for malaria diagnosis by travelers should only be recommended after appropriate instruction and training, including a successful performance of the test procedure.Evaluation of three rapid tests for diagnosis of P. falciparum and P. vivax malaria in Colombia.The diagnostic capacity of three malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs), NOW-Malaria-ICT, OptiMAL-IT, and Paracheck-Pf, was evaluated against expert microscopy in Colombia. We tested 896 patients, of whom microscopy confirmed 139 P. falciparum, 279 P. vivax, and 13 mixed P.f/P.v infections and 465 negatives. Paracheck-Pf and NOW-malaria-ICT were more accurate in detecting P. falciparum (sensitivities 90.8% and 90.1%, respectively) in comparison with Optimal-IT (83.6%). NOW showed an acceptable Pf detection rate at low densities (< 500/microL), but resulted in a higher proportion of false positives. For P. vivax diagnosis, Optimal-IT had a higher sensitivity than NOW (91.0% and 81.4%, respectively). The choice between the two Pf/Pv detecting RDTs balances P. falciparum and P. vivax detection rates. Considering some degree of P. falciparum overtreatment and failure to detect all P. vivax cases as more acceptable than missing some cases of P. falciparum, we recommend careful implementation of NOW-malaria-ICT in areas where microscopy is lacking. The price is however still a constraint.Rapid malaria diagnostic tests vs. clinical management of malaria in rural Burkina Faso: safety and effect on clinical decisions. A randomized trial.To assess if the clinical outcome of patients treated after performing a Rapid Diagnostic Test for malaria (RDT) is at least equivalent to that of controls (treated presumptively without test) and to determine the impact of the introduction of a malaria RDT on clinical decisions.Randomized, multi-centre, open clinical trial in two arms in 2006 at the end of the dry and of the rainy season in 10 peripheral health centres in Burkina Faso: one arm with use of RDT before treatment decision, one arm managed clinically. Primary endpoint: persistence of fever at day 4. Secondary endpoints: frequency of malaria treatment and of antibiotic treatment.A total of 852 febrile patients were recruited in the dry season and 1317 febrile patients in the rainy season, and randomized either to be submitted to RDT (P_RTD) or to be managed presumptively (P_CLIN). In both seasons, no significant difference was found between the two randomized groups in the frequency of antimalarial treatment, nor of antibiotic prescription. In the dry season, 80.8% and 79.8% of patients with a negative RDT were nevertheless diagnosed and treated for malaria, and so were 85.0% and 82.6% negative patients in the rainy season. In the rainy season only, both diagnosis and treatment of other conditions were significantly less frequent in RDT positive vs. negative patients (48.3% vs. 61.4% and 46.2% vs. 59.9%, P = 0.00 and 0.00, respectively).Our study was inconclusive on RDT safety (clinical outcome in the two randomized groups), because of an exceedingly and unexpectedly low compliance with the negative test result. Further research is needed on best strategies to promote adherence and on the safety of a test based strategy compared with the current, presumptive treatment strategy.Clinical trials of a new immunochromatographic test for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Goa.Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein-2 (PfHRP-2) based immunochromatographic test kit (ICT Malaria Pf) for the rapid diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria was evaluated at the clinic of Malaria Research Centre (Field Station), Goa. Of the 98 febrile patients screened, 22 were ICT positive for P. falciparum. Simultaneous microscopic examination of the blood smears of these ICT positive patients showed that 20 were positive for P. falciparum alone, whereas one had mix infection of both P. vivax and P. falciparum suggesting 100% sensitivity. Only one slide negative patient who had taken 600 mg chloroquine the previous day was positive in the ICT. Out of the remaining 76 blood smears, 41 showed P. vivax infection and none cross-reacted with P. falciparum HRP-2 antigen and were ICT negative except one mix infection case in which P. vivax and P. falciparum infections occurred concomitantly suggesting species specificity of 98.7%. The positive predictive value, negative predictive value and efficacy of the ICT were 95.4, 100 and 98.9% respectively. The band intensity of the ICT positive cases significantly correlated with P. falciparum parasitaemia (p < 0.01). The usefulness and the disadvantages of this diagnostic kit have been discussed in context of prevailing malaria situation in the country.Field evaluation of the ICT malaria P.f/P.v immunochromatographic test for detection of Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax in patients with a presumptive clinical diagnosis of malaria in eastern Indonesia.In areas such as eastern Indonesia where both Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax occur, rapid antigen detection tests for malaria need to be able to detect both species. We evaluated the new combined P. falciparum-P. vivax immunochromatographic test (ICT Malaria P.f/P.v.) in Radamata Primary Health Centre, Sumba, Indonesia, from February to May 1998 with 560 symptomatic adults and children with a presumptive clinical diagnosis of malaria. Blinded microscopy was used as the "gold standard," with all discordant and 20% of concordant results cross-checked blindly. Only 50% of those with a presumptive clinical diagnosis of malaria were parasitemic. The ICT Malaria P.f/P.v immunochromatographic test was sensitive (95. 5%) and specific (89.8%) for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, with a positive predictive value (PPV) and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 88.1 and 96.2%, respectively. HRP2 and panmalarial antigen line intensities were associated with parasitemia density for both species. Although the specificity and NPV for the diagnosis of vivax malaria were 94.8 and 98.2%, respectively, the overall sensitivity (75%) and PPV (50%) for the diagnosis of vivax malaria were less than the desirable levels. The sensitivity for the diagnosis of P. vivax malaria was 96% with parasitemias of >500/microl but only 29% with parasitemias of <500/microl. Nevertheless, compared with the test with HRP2 alone, use of the combined antigen detection test would reduce the rate of undertreatment from 14.7 to 3.6% for microscopy-positive patients, and this would be at the expense of only a modest increase in the rate of overtreatment of microscopy-negative patients from 7.1 to 15. 4%. Cost remains a major obstacle to widespread use in areas of endemicity.Parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection in an endemic area in west Uganda.The measurement of parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) has been presented as an easy and rapid method for the diagnosis of malaria in humans. In order to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of such a test we examined blood samples from 429 Ugandan patients. While pLDH activity was significantly linked to parasitaemia, sensitivity and specificity were found to be rather low at 58.8 and 62.2% respectively. The positive and negative predictive values failed to meet necessary standards. We conclude that the methods of measurement of pLDH activity in malaria infection, although potentially useful for the fast diagnosis of malaria, need to be improved to be of true value in endemic areas.Cost-effectiveness of malaria microscopy and rapid diagnostic tests versus presumptive diagnosis: implications for malaria control in Uganda.Current Uganda National Malaria treatment guidelines recommend parasitological confirmation either by microscopy or rapid diagnostic test (RDT) before treatment with artemether-lumefantrine (AL). However, the cost-effectiveness of these strategies has not been assessed at rural operational primary care centres.Three health centres (HCs) were randomized to three diagnostic arms (microscopy, RDT and presumptive diagnosis) in a district of low and another of high malaria transmission intensities in Uganda. Some 22,052 patients presenting with fever at outpatients departments were enrolled from March 2010 to February 2011. Of these, a random sample of 1,627 was selected to measure additional socio-economic characteristics. Costing was performed following the standard step-down cost allocation and the ingredients approach. Effectiveness was measured as the number and proportion of patients correctly diagnosed and treated. Incremental Cost-Effectiveness Ratios (ICERs) were estimated from the societal perspective (http://Clinicaltrials.gov, NCT00565071).Overall RDT was most cost-effective with lowest ICER US$5.0 compared to microscopy US$9.61 per case correctly diagnosed and treated. In the high transmission setting, ICER was US$4.38 for RDT and US$12.98 for microscopy. The corresponding ICERs in the low transmission setting were US$5.85 and US$7.63 respectively. The difference in ICERs between RDT and microscopy was greater in the high transmission area (US$8.9) than in low transmission setting (US$1.78). At a willingness to pay of US$2.8, RDT remained cost effective up to a threshold value of the cost of treatment of US$4.7.RDT was cost effective in both low and high transmission settings. With a global campaign to reduce the costs of AL and RDT, the Malaria Control Programme and stakeholders need a strategy for malaria diagnosis because as the cost of AL decreases, presumptive treatment is likely to become more attractive.Rapid immunochromatography-based detection of mixed-species malaria infection in Pakistan.We report the identification of mixed Plasmodium infections in four recent patients with malaria clinically refractory to empiric chloroquine therapy using the rapid antigen detection kit, NOW ICT Malaria Pf/Pv. A rapid in vitro immunodiagnostic test, the NOW ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test kit was used for the detection of circulating Plasmodium falciparum (Pf) and Plasmodium vivax (Pv) antigens in whole blood. Peripheral blood microscopy confirmed mixed-species infection in all the cases. Thick and thin peripheral blood films were made and stained with Giemsa stain and examined by both hospital laboratory staff and an experienced parasitologist who was blinded to the results of the rapid malarial antigen tests. Four recent patients (all male; mean age, 24 years) with mixed malarial infection were identified. All the subjects were males working for an oil company in a coastal area of Pakistan, and all had been diagnosed presumptively with malaria based on clinical grounds (without microbiologic confirmation), and were treated empirically with chloroquine without clinical response. Semiquantitative malaria counts via microscopy were as follows: P. vivax, scanty (2 patients) and moderate (2 patients); for P. falciparum--scanty (1 patient), moderate (2 patients), and heavy (1 patient). The present case series, although limited by the small number of patients with proven mixed P. falciparum-P. vivax infection, highlights the usefulness of the rapid antigen test in a highly malarious region of Pakistan where chloroquine resistance is prevalent. Although there was full concordance between the results of blood smear microscopy and rapid antigen testing, these techniques are potentially most useful when there is a discrepancy with microscopy findings. Accurate and rapid diagnosis of parasites, particularly in cases of mixed P. falciparum and P. vivax infection, is of immense importance for individual patient management and in reducing the burden of disease, especially in regions of chloroquine resistance.Field evaluation of malaria rapid diagnostic tests for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and non-P. falciparum infections.The objective of this study was to evaluate various malaria rapid diagnostic tests as a tool in the detection of P. falciparum and non-P. falciparum infections in field conditions. Four field surveys were conducted in malaria-endemic areas of Palawan and Davao del Norte, Philippines to validate the various rapid diagnostic tests, namely Diamed OptiMAL 48 (DiaMed AG, Switzerland), ParaHIT f (Span Diagnostics, India), Orchid OptiMAL, and Paracheck Pf (both from Orchid Biomedical Systems, India). The results of the various rapid diagnostic tests were compared to those of microscopy. Sensitivity, specificity and detection rates according to the level of parasitemia were used as parameters to describe the performance of the various rapid diagnostic tests in the field. Practical and operational assessments were also done. The results of the study show that the sensitivity and detection rates were generally lower than previously reported, with sensitivities ranging from 4.8% to 20.6%, except for Diamed OptiMAL 48, which had sensitivities of 78.8% to 96.8%, and detection rates of 50.0% to 96.8%. The rest had detection rates ranging from 0.0% to 50.0%. All the specificities ranged from 18.2% to 100.0%. Improper conditions at the time of manufacturing, storage, transport, and utilization may affect the validity of the results. Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria provide practical means of detecting malarial infections, especially in endemic areas. However, issues regarding variability in performance must to be addressed before they can be used as mainstream diagnostic tools.Use of a histidine-rich protein 2-based rapid diagnostic test for malaria by health personnel during routine consultation of febrile outpatients in a peripheral health facility in Yaounde, Cameroon.The role of a rapid diagnostic test (RDT) in the case management of Plasmodium falciparum malaria infections has not been determined in Africa. Our study was conducted during November 2007-January 2008 to assess test accuracy of an RDT in the management of febrile outpatients in a peripheral urban health facility in Cameroon. We found the overall sensitivity to be 71.4% and a specificity of 82.2%; the positive predictive value and negative predictive value were 73.8% and 80.4%, respectively. False-negative and false-positive cases represented 11.8% and 10.5% of all febrile patients. Malaria alone (31.3%) was the first cause of fever; 33.5% of fever cases were of unknown origin. Acute respiratory infections were common among children 0-2 years of age (25.5%) and decreased with age. The risk of having a clinical failure with the presumptive treatment of febrile children was seven times greater than that of the RDT-oriented management (relative risk = 6.8, 95% confidence interval = 0.88-53.4, P = 0.03) because of the delay of appropriate treatment of non-malarial febrile illness. Our results suggest that the RDT may be of limited utility for children greater than five years of age and adults and that diagnosis based on microscopic examination of blood smears should be recommended for these patient populations, as well as in areas of low transmission.Performance of OptiMAL(R) in the diagnosis of Plasmodium vivax and Plasmodium falciparum infections in a malaria referral center in Colombia.Alternative, non-microscopic methods for the diagnosis of malaria have recently become available. Among these, rapid dipstick methods stand out. One such test, OptiMAL(R), is based on the immunochromatographic detection of Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) and has the capacity to detect and distinguish infections caused by P. falciparum and Plasmodium sp. This capacity is particularly important in countries where different species of Plasmodium co-exist. In this study we evaluated the performance of OptiMAL(R) in an urban referral center for malaria diagnosis. Two sets of patients were included: one (n = 112) having predetermined infections with P. falciparum or P. vivax and individuals with negative blood smears; and another consisting of all eligible consecutive patients (n = 80) consulting for diagnosis at the referral center during one month. The overall diagnostic efficiency of OptiMAL(R) for both sets of patients was 96.9%. Efficiency was higher for P. vivax (98.1%) than for P. falciparum (94.9%). These results corroborate the diagnostic utility of OptiMAL(R) in settings where P. vivax and P. falciparum co-exist and support its implementation where microscopic diagnosis is unavailable and in circumstances that exceed the capacity of the local microscopic diagnosis facility.Malaria overdiagnosis and burden of malaria misdiagnosis in the suburbs of central Sudan: special emphasis on artemisinin-based combination therapy era.Accuracy of diagnosis is central for malaria control. Although microscopy is gold standard in malaria diagnosis, its reliability is largely dependent on user skill. In this study, we evaluated practitioners' clinical and microscopists' technical skills in diagnosis of malaria in central Sudan. In a retrospective study, 3203 blood smears from 95 peripheral health facilities (each represented by a general practitioner [GP] and general microscopist [GM]) were reexamined by expert microscopist. Furthermore, in a prospective study, 410 patients had their malaria diagnosis rechecked by rapid diagnostic test for validation of the microscopic diagnosis. Results showed that the rate of false-positive diagnosis of malaria was 75.6% and false-negative diagnosis was 0.01%. The study disclosed poor skills of the GPs and GMs in malaria diagnosis because 43% of the GPs and 44% of the GMs failed to make a single true-positive malaria diagnosis. The false-positive malaria diagnosis showed bias toward adult females. Economically, the calculated cost of diagnosis and treatment of malaria in Sudan in year 2000 is US$100 million, whereas the calculated cost of true malaria is approximately US$14 million. In conclusion, malaria overdiagnosis was widely recognized in central Sudan, with high economic burden during the era of artemisinin-based combination therapy. Finally, different scenarios were suggested for improvement of malaria diagnosis.The diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection using a new antigen detection system.With the widespread emergence of drug-resistant Plasmodium falciparum infection, febrile patients in the tropics can no longer be empirically treated with inexpensive yet effective antimalarials. The substitution of newer and more costly drugs brings with it the need for rapid, accurate, and inexpensive diagnostic procedures so that directed therapy can be used. We report a field trial comparing standard microscopic malaria diagnosis and quantitative buffy coat analysis to a new P. falciparum antigen detection system. The ParaSight F test (PFT) was found to be easy to learn, rapid to perform, and highly accurate. If confirmed, the use of the PFT in endemic areas may aid in the identification of patients requiring therapy for drug-resistant malaria.Evaluation of the performance of CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo rapid diagnostic test for the diagnosis of malaria in Jimma, southwestern Ethiopia.To evaluate the diagnostic performance of CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test relative to microscopy, for the diagnosis of falciparum and vivax malaria in Ethiopia.Two hundred and forty febrile patients visiting the Serbo health center in Jimma zone, southwestern Ethiopia, were involved in this study in 2008. Giemsa-stained thin and thick blood smears were prepared and microscopically examined under a 100x oil immersion microscope objective for Plasmodium species identification and determination of parasitemia respectively. CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test was performed as per the manufacturers' instruction.The validity of CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium was very good with a sensitivity of 95.8%, specificity of 100%, positive predictive value of 100% and negative predictive value of 96%. The test performed equally well for the identification of Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax. The diagnostic performance of this CareStart test is comparable to light microscopy of thin and thick blood smears.Although CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test and blood microscopy have comparable diagnostic performance for Plasmodium detection, the CareStart test has the added advantage of being simple to interpret, cost-efficient, and hence it is preferable to use this rapid diagnostic test for malaria diagnosis in areas where microscopy is not accessible and during times of malaria epidemics that are observed approximately every 4-5 years in Ethiopia.Reliability of rapid diagnostic tests in diagnosing pregnancy-associated malaria in north-eastern Tanzania.Accurate diagnosis and prompt treatment of pregnancy-associated malaria (PAM) are key aspects in averting adverse pregnancy outcomes. Microscopy is the gold standard in malaria diagnosis, but it has limited detection and availability. When used appropriately, rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) could be an ideal diagnostic complement to microscopy, due to their ease of use and adequate sensitivity in detecting even sub-microscopic infections. Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) is even more sensitive, but it is mainly used for research purposes. The accuracy and reliability of RDTs in diagnosing PAM was evaluated using microscopy and PCR.A cohort of pregnant women in north-eastern Tanzania was followed throughout pregnancy for detection of plasmodial infection using venous and placental blood samples evaluated by histidine rich protein 2 (HRP-2) and parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) based RDTs (Parascreen™) or HRP-2 only (Paracheck Pf® and ParaHIT®f), microscopy and nested Plasmodium species diagnostic PCR.From a cohort of 924 pregnant women who completed the follow up, complete RDT and microscopy data was available for 5,555 blood samples and of these 442 samples were analysed by PCR. Of the 5,555 blood samples, 49 ((proportion and 95% confidence interval) 0.9% [0.7 -1.1]) samples were positive by microscopy and 91 (1.6% [1.3-2.0]) by RDT. Forty-six (50.5% [40.5 - 60.6]) and 45 (49.5% [39.4 - 59.5]) of the RDT positive samples were positive and negative by microscopy, respectively, whereas nineteen (42.2% [29.0 - 56.7]) of the microscopy negative, but RDT positive, samples were positive by PCR. Three (0.05% [0.02 - 0.2]) samples were positive by microscopy but negative by RDT. 351 of the 5,461 samples negative by both RDT and microscopy were tested by PCR and found negative. There was no statistically significant difference between the performances of the different RDTs.Microscopy underestimated the real burden of malaria during pregnancy and RDTs performed better than microscopy in diagnosing PAM. In areas where intermittent preventive treatment during pregnancy may be abandoned due to low and decreasing malaria risk and instead replaced with active case management, screening with RDT is likely to identify most infections in pregnant women and out-performs microscopy as a diagnostic tool.A rapid dipstick antigen capture assay for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria. WHO Informal Consultation on Recent Advances in Diagnostic Techniques and Vaccines for Malaria.Recent advances in the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infections have made it possible to consider supplementing light microscopy with a standardized dipstick antigen capture assay based on the detection of a parasite-specific protein, which is secreted by the asexual blood stages and immature gametocytes but not by the other stages. Field trials indicate that this dipstick assay provides consistently reproducible results, with a threshold of detection of P. falciparum parasitaemia similar to that obtained by high quality routine malaria microscopy and a specificity and sensitivity of around 90% compared with standard thick blood film microscopy. The stability, reproducibility, and ease of use of the assay clearly indicate that it has potential for application in the management of malaria, particularly at the peripheral health care level, provided its accuracy can be assured and that it can be made affordable. Consideration should be given to its wider use where operational requirements and resources so justify, and where decisions are based on adequate evaluation of the existing health delivery systems.Real-time PCR assay and rapid diagnostic tests for the diagnosis of clinically suspected malaria patients in Bangladesh.More than 95% of total malaria cases in Bangladesh are reported from the 13 high endemic districts. Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax are the two most abundant malaria parasites in the country. To improve the detection and management of malaria patients, the National Malaria Control Programme (NMCP) has been using rapid diagnostic test (RDT) in the endemic areas. A study was conducted to establish a SYBR Green-based modified real-time PCR assay as a gold standard to evaluate the performance of four commercially-available malaria RDTs, along with the classical gold standard- microscopy.Blood samples were collected from 338 febrile patients referred for the diagnosis of malaria by the attending physician at MatirangaUpazila Health Complex (UHC) from May 2009 to August 2010. Paracheck RDT and microscopy were performed at the UHC. The blood samples were preserved in EDTA tubes. A SYBR Green-based real-time PCR assay was performed and evaluated. The performances of the remaining three RDTs (Falcivax, Onsite Pf and Onsite Pf/Pv) were also evaluated against microscopy and real-time PCR using the stored blood samples.In total, 338 febrile patients were enrolled in the study. Malaria parasites were detected in 189 (55.9%) and 188 (55.6%) patients by microscopy and real-time PCR respectively. Among the RDTs, the highest sensitivity for the detection of P. falciparum (including mixed infection) was obtained by Paracheck [98.8%, 95% confidence interval (CI) 95.8-99.9] and Falcivax (97.6%, 95% CI 94.1-99.4) compared to microscopy and real-time PCR respectively. Paracheck and Onsite Pf/Pv gave the highest specificity (98.8%, 95% CI 95.7-99.9) compared to microscopy and Onsite Pf/Pv (98.8, 95% CI 95.8-99.9) compared to real-time PCR respectively for the detection of P. falciparum. On the other hand Falcivax and Onsite Pf/Pv had equal sensitivity (90.5%, 95% CI 69.6-98.8) and almost 100% specificity compared to microscopy for the detection of P. vivax. However, compared to real-time PCR assay RDTs and microscopy gave low sensitivity (76.9%, 95% CI 56.4-91) in detecting of P. vivax although a very high specificity was obtained (99-100%).The results of this study suggest that the SYBR Green-based real-time PCR assay could be used as an alternative gold standard method in a reference setting. Commercially-available RDTs used in the study are quite sensitive and specific in detecting P. falciparum, although their sensitivity in detecting P. vivax was not satisfactory compared to the real-time PCR assay.Feasibility of a rapid dipstick antigen-capture assay for self-testing of travellers' malaria.This open comparative study sought to determine whether, and with what level of instruction, travellers can successfully use and interpret the rapid whole blood malaria diagnostic test, ParaSight F. 160 visitors to the Zürich University Travel Clinic took part in the study. One group received written instructions only, while another group was given combined oral and written instructions on how to test their own blood for malaria infection and interpret a series of 5 prepared test strips. Each volunteer also completed a questionnaire targeted at assessing performance in using the diagnostic, interpretation of the results and acceptability of the concept of self-testing for malaria infection. The main outcome measures were successful performance of the test, correct interpretation of prepared test strips and acceptability of the test. In the group which received only written instructions, 60/80 (75%) were successful, whilst in the group which received written and oral instructions, 72/80 (90%) successfully performed the test (P < 0.02). Overall, 565 (70.6%) test strips were correctly and 165 (20.6%) incorrectly interpreted with 113 (14.1%) false negative interpretations. No prepared test strip was interpreted as false positive. Seventy (8.8%) test strips were not interpreted. Some 91. 9% of all candidates would use such a test if it were available. While it is possible for lay persons to successfully perform the test, interpretation of results poses a problem. In particular, the proportion of false negative interpretations is unacceptable. A combination of written and oral instructions leads to a significantly higher level of successful test performance. If such a test is to be made available to the general public, written instructions must be made concise and foolproof and the test endpoint clearly defined, as the currently available test is more suitable for trained laboratory personnel. In the meantime other candidate diagnostics have become available and these should now be assessed for their suitability in the context of travellers' malaria.Comparison of HRP2- and pLDH-based rapid diagnostic tests for malaria with longitudinal follow-up in Kampala, Uganda.Presumptive treatment of malaria results in significant overuse of antimalarials. Malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) may offer a reliable alternative for case management, but the optimal RDT strategy is uncertain. We compared the diagnostic accuracy of histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2)- and plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH)-based RDTs, using expert microscopy as the gold standard, in a longitudinal study of 918 fever episodes over an 8-month period in a cohort of children in Kampala, Uganda. Sensitivity was 92% for HRP2 and 85% for pLDH, with differences primarily due to better detection with HRP2 at low parasite densities. Specificity was 93% for HRP2 and 100% for pLDH, with differences primarily due to rapid clearance of pLDH antigenemia after treatment of a previous malaria episode. RDTs may provide an effective strategy for improving rational delivery of antimalarial therapy; in Kampala, either test could dramatically decrease inappropriate presumptive treatments.[Assessment of a rapid diagnostic test for malaria in rural health care facilities in Senegal].The aim of the study was to determine the accuracy of a rapid diagnostic test in confirming presumptive malaria diagnosis in a rural zone of Senegal. Thick blood smear was used as the reference technique for comparison. METHOHDOLOGY: Testing was conducted on children between the ages of 1 and 14 years at three health care facilities located in the Niakhar are from August 2006 to June 2007. If malaria was suspected by the nurse based on clinical findings, two thick smears and one rapid diagnostic test (Core Malaria Pf) were performed. Blood slides were stained in Niakhar and read in Dakar.A total of 474 patients were examined. Three-fourths (75%) of these patients were seen during the rainy season. Malaria was suspected in 335 patients (71%). Rapid tests and thick smears were obtained in 330 of these patients with positive results in 194 (59%) and 180 (55%) respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the rapid test were 96%, 87%, 90% and 95% respectively.Our data show that the rapid diagnostic test used in this study exhibits good sensitivity and positive predictive value. Despite its cost this test could be helpful in confirming malaria diagnosis in outlying health care facilities without the necessary resources to perform blood smears. Confirmation is necessary to avoid unwarranted prescription of malaria treatment due to inaccurate clinical diagnosisPerformance of a rapid antigen test for the diagnosis of congenital malaria.To assess the performance of OptiMAL, a rapid malaria antigen capture dipstick, in diagnosing congenital malaria.Live newborns aged 0-3 days, delivered at Olabisi Onabanjo University Teaching Hospital, Sagamu, Nigeria between August 2004 and January 2005, were screened for malaria parasitaemia with an immunochromatographic test (OptiMAL) and blood film microscopy. OptiMAL detects plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH).Twenty-one of 192 newborns (10.9%) were diagnosed with congenital malaria by blood film microscopy. The OptiMAL test was negative in all infants.OptiMAL rapid malaria antigen capture dipstick might not be useful for diagnosing malaria parasitaemia in newborns. Blood film microscopy remains the gold standard for the diagnosis of congenital malaria.Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria at sites of varying transmission intensity in Uganda.In Africa, fever is often treated presumptively as malaria, resulting in misdiagnosis and the overuse of antimalarial drugs. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria may allow improved fever management.We compared RDTs based on histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) and RDTs based on Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) with expert microscopy and PCR-corrected microscopy for 7000 patients at sites of varying malaria transmission intensity across Uganda.When all sites were considered, the sensitivity of the HRP2-based test was 97% when compared with microscopy and 98% when corrected by PCR; the sensitivity of the pLDH-based test was 88% when compared with microscopy and 77% when corrected by PCR. The specificity of the HRP2-based test was 71% when compared with microscopy and 88% when corrected by PCR; the specificity of the pLDH-based test was 92% when compared with microscopy and >98% when corrected by PCR. Based on Plasmodium falciparum PCR-corrected microscopy, the positive predictive value (PPV) of the HRP2-based test was high (93%) at all but the site with the lowest transmission rate; the pLDH-based test and expert microscopy offered excellent PPVs (98%) for all sites. The negative predictive value (NPV) of the HRP2-based test was consistently high (>97%); in contrast, the NPV for the pLDH-based test dropped significantly (from 98% to 66%) as transmission intensity increased, and the NPV for expert microscopy decreased significantly (99% to 54%) because of increasing failure to detect subpatent parasitemia.Based on the high PPV and NPV, HRP2-based RDTs are likely to be the best diagnostic choice for areas with medium-to-high malaria transmission rates in Africa.Genetic deletion of HRP2 and HRP3 in Indian Plasmodium falciparum population and false negative malaria rapid diagnostic test.Genetic polymorphisms in diagnostic antigens are important factors responsible for variable performance of rapid diagnostic tests. Additionally, the failure of antigen expression due to gene deletion may also contribute to variable performance. We report Indian Plasmodium falciparum field isolates lacking both Pfhrp2 and Pfhrp3 genes leading to false negative results of rapid diagnostic tests. The study highlights need to determine the prevalence of P. falciparum isolates lacking these genes in larger field populations in India.[Efficacy of a rapid test to diagnose Plasmodium vivax in symptomatic patients of Chiapas, Mexico].To evaluate, under laboratory conditions, the sensitivity and specificity of a rapid diagnostic test (OptiMAL), based on immunoreactive strips, to detect Plasmodium vivax infection in febrile patients in Southern Chiapas, Mexico.The presence of parasites in blood samples of 893 patients was investigated by Giemsa-stained thick blood smear microscopic examination (gold standard). A blood drop from the same sample was smeared on immunoreactive strips to investigate the presence of the parasite pLDH. Discordant results were resolved by PCR amplification of the parasite's 18S SSU rRNA, to discard infection.OptiMAL had an overall sensitivity of 93.3% and its specificity was 99.5%. Its positive and negative predictive values were 96.5% and 98.9%, respectively. Signal intensity in OptiMAL strips correlated well with the parasitemia density in the blood samples (r = 0.601, p = 0.0001).This rapid test had acceptable sensitivity and specificity to detect P. vivax under laboratory conditions and could be useful for malaria diagnosis in field operations in Mexico.Evaluation of the Clearview® Malaria pLDH Malaria Rapid Diagnostic Test in a non-endemic setting.Malaria Rapid Diagnostic Tests (RDTs) are widely used to diagnose malaria. The present study evaluated a new RDT, the Clearview® Malaria pLDH test targeting the pan-Plasmodium antigen lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH).The Clearview® Malaria pLDH test was evaluated on fresh samples obtained in returned international travellers using microscopy corrected by PCR as the reference method. Included samples were Plasmodium falciparum (139), Plasmodium vivax (22), Plasmodium ovale (20), Plasmodium malariae (7), and 102 negative.Overall sensitivity for the detection of Plasmodium spp was 93.2%. For P. falciparum, the sensitivity was 98.6%; for P. vivax, P. ovale and P. malariae, overall sensitivities were 90.9%, 60.0% and 85.7% respectively. For P. falciparum and for P. vivax, the sensitivities increased to 100% at parasite densities above 100/μl. The specificity was 100%. The test was easily to perform and the result was stable for at least 1 hour.The Clearview® Malaria pLDH was efficient for the diagnosis of malaria. The test was very sensitive for P. falciparum and P. vivax detection. The sensitivities for P. ovale and P. malariae were better than other RDTs.Accuracy and reliability of malaria diagnostic techniques for guiding febrile outpatient treatment in malaria-endemic countries.The main purpose of this study was to assess the accuracy of various techniques available for diagnosis of malaria. Blood samples were collected from 313 patients with clinical suspicion of uncomplicated malaria in 2 primary health centers in Madagascar. The presence of Plasmodium parasites was assessed by conventional microscopy, 2 rapid diagnostic tests (one HRP2-based test, PALUTOP(+4), and one pLDH-based test, OptiMAL-IT), and real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR), which is used as the "gold standard" method. The degree of agreement observed was very high for microscopy (0.99) and the HRP2-based test (0.93) and high for the pLDH-based test (0.82). Public-health implications are also discussed in this paper.Study and evaluation of Wondfo rapid diagnostic kit based on nano-gold immunochromatography assay for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum.Malaria has been recognized as a human disease for thousands of years and remains one of the most common diseases affecting humans worldwide. Therefore, a method for rapidly detecting Plasmodium falciparum is necessary and useful. We have developed Wondfo rapid diagnostic kit based on nano-gold immunochromatography assay for the detection of P. falciparum in patient specimen. In the present study, we demonstrated the sensitivity and specificity of the rapid diagnostic kit in which nano-gold labeling techniques and the monoclonal antibodies against histidine-rich protein-2 of P. falciparum were used to establish two-antibody sandwich immunochromatographic assay for detecting P. falciparum. By using microscopic examination of blood smears as control, the sensitivity, specificity, and feasibility of Wondfo rapid diagnostic kit was determined in the prompt and accurate diagnosis of malaria. In this study, 1,558 blood samples were collected from outpatient clinics in China and detected by both Wondfo kit and microscopic examination. The Wondfo kit did not show cross-reaction with microfilaria, Toxoplasma gondii, and other parasites in the blood. The patient samples positive for rheumatoid factor, HIV, tuberculosis, and syphilis did not show false positivity when testing with Wondfo kit. The detection sensitivity and specificity of Wondfo rapid diagnostic kit were 95.49% and 99.53%, respectively. These results indicate that our rapid diagnostic assay may be useful for detecting P. falciparum in patient specimen.Cost-effectiveness of malaria diagnostic methods in sub-Saharan Africa in an era of combination therapy.To evaluate the relative cost-effectiveness in different sub-Saharan African settings of presumptive treatment, field-standard microscopy and rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) to diagnose malaria.We used a decision tree model and probabilistic sensitivity analysis applied to outpatients presenting at rural health facilities with suspected malaria. Costs and effects encompassed those for both patients positive on RDT (assuming artemisinin-based combination therapy) and febrile patients negative on RDT (assuming antibiotic treatment). Interventions were defined as cost-effective if they were less costly and more effective or had an incremental cost per disability-adjusted life year averted of less than US$ 150. Data were drawn from published and unpublished sources, supplemented with expert opinion.RDTs were cost-effective compared with presumptive treatment up to high prevalences of Plasmodium falciparum parasitaemia. Decision-makers can be at least 50% confident of this result below 81% malaria prevalence, and 95% confident below 62% prevalence, a level seldom exceeded in practice. RDTs were more than 50% likely to be cost-saving below 58% prevalence. Relative to microscopy, RDTs were more than 85% likely to be cost-effective across all prevalence levels, reflecting their expected better accuracy under real-life conditions. Results were robust to extensive sensitivity analysis. The cost-effectiveness of RDTs mainly reflected improved treatment and health outcomes for non-malarial febrile illness, plus savings in antimalarial drug costs. Results were dependent on the assumption that prescribers used test results to guide treatment decisions.RDTs have the potential to be cost-effective in most parts of sub-Saharan Africa. Appropriate management of malaria and non-malarial febrile illnesses is required to reap the full benefits of these tests.A comparison of three diagnostic techniques for malaria: a rapid diagnostic test (NOW Malaria), PCR and microscopy.Malaria is a common, life-threatening infection in endemic tropical areas and one that presents a diagnostic challenge to laboratories in most non-endemic countries. A rapid and accurate diagnosis is a prerequisite for effective treatment, especially for the potentially fatal cases of Plasmodium falciparum infection. In the present, multi-centre study, the performances of a rapid diagnostic test (NOW) Malaria) and several, commercial, PCR-based assays (AMS61, AMS42, AMS43, AMS4 and AMS45) were compared against the results of microscopical examination of bloodsmears (the current 'gold standard'). The subjects were either non-European immigrants (N=135) or international travellers (N=171). There was good concordance between the results of all the detection methods, with kappa values of >0.8. Although the NOW Malaria rapid test was both sensitive (100%) and specific (100%) in detecting P. falciparum infections, it was less specific (93.1%) and sensitive (90.7%) in identifying the other Plasmodium species. The results from the AMS61 assay, designed to detect any malarial infection, generally parallelled those of the microscopy (kappa = 0.89), giving a specificity of 98.2% and a sensitivity of 91.0%. Although the use of species-specific molecular primers to identify pure infections with P. falciparum and P. vivax gave results that were in good agreement with those of the microscopy, the subjects who had apparently pure infections with P. ovale or P. malariae were always found PCR-negative. Compared with the standard microscopy, both the NOW Malaria test and the PCR-based assays were therefore poor at identifying mixed infections. The NOW Malaria test and the PCR-based assays clearly need to be improved, particularly for the correct identification of infections with Plasmodium spp. other than P. falciparum, including mixed infections. For now, expert microscopy must remain the mainstay of the laboratory diagnosis of malaria.Evaluation of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria case management in Gabon.A laboratory-confirmed diagnosis is the basis of malaria case management. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) create new opportunities for improved care in endemic areas. Diagnostic performance of OptiMAL-IT and Acon was assessed in comparison with microscopy at 2 sites in Gabon. Between February 2008 and January 2009, 2125 febrile children under 11 years old were diagnosed using microscopy and RDTs. Plasmodial infection was detected more frequently using Acon (27%) and OptiMAL-IT (27%) compared to microscopy (20%) (P < 0.01). Among the samples diagnosed positive by OptiMAL-IT, 78% were infected by Plasmodium falciparum, whereas 99% of positive blood smears were P. falciparum infections, 0.5% Plasmodium malariae, and 0.5% Plasmodium ovale. Both RDTs had similar sensitivity (Se) (94.0%; 95% confidence interval [CI], 92-96), which varied depending on the site. When parasite density was >100 p/microL, the Se of the 2 tests was >98% (95% CI, 96-100). Likewise, the negative predictive values were high and comparable (>98%). Overtreatment with antimalarial drugs was 12%. These tests should be considered as a good alternative to microscopy, allowing not only an efficient and rapid diagnosis of malaria in primary health facilities but also to aid in promoting changes for antimalarial prescription behavior.Evaluation of a malaria rapid diagnostic test for assessing the burden of malaria during pregnancy.Plasmodium falciparum infection during pregnancy may cause placental malaria and subsequently low birth weight, primarily through the placental sequestration of infected red blood cells. Measuring the burden of malaria during pregnancy usually involves determining the prevalence of placental malaria infection through microscopic examination of placental blood films, a difficult and error-prone process. A number of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria have been developed, most of them immunochromatographic dipstick assays. However, none have been tested for the direct determination of malaria antigen in placental blood. We undertook an evaluation of the Malaria Rapid Test (MAKROmed in determining placental malaria infection. The prevalence of placental parasitemia was 22.6% by microscopy, 51.0% by a polymerase chain reaction (PCR), and 43.1% by RDT. When the PCR was used as the gold standard, RDTs had a sensitivity of 89% and a specificity of 76%. The MAKROmed RDT was highly sensitive in the detection of placental malaria, but had lower than expected specificity.Comparison of the Paracheck-Pf test with microscopy, for the confirmation of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Tanzania.Paracheck-Pf is a rapid, qualitative immuno-assay for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein-2 in samples of human blood. The assay has now been evaluated, against the usual 'gold standard', microscopy, using blood samples from 1655 individuals in five districts of Tanzania, four of which experience frequent malaria outbreaks. The aim was to verify whether Paracheck-Pf could be a reliable tool for the confirmation of malaria outbreaks in such areas. The overall measurements of the assay's performance were good, with a sensitivity of 90.0%, a specificity of 96.6%, a positive predictive value of 88.9%, and a negative predictive value of 97.0% (with an estimated malaria prevalence of 23.3%). There was, however, marked variation between the study districts, the assay's performance being relatively poor where the test had been stored for 12 months at room temperature (23.5+/-3.5 degrees C). The assay was easy to perform in the field and could clearly be a valuable tool in remote areas and in emergency situations, such as the early detection of malaria outbreaks. The cost of the assay (U.S.$0.62/test at the time of the present study) is sufficiently low that its routine use in the confirmation of P. falciparum malaria might also be cost-effective, particularly in areas where there are no facilities for microscopy and/or where the first-line treatment of malaria is based on relatively expensive artemisinin-based combinations.Field evaluation of the ICT malaria P.f/P.v immunochromatographic test for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and P.vivax infection in forest villages of Chhindwara, central India.A rapid new immunochromatographic test (ICT malaria P.f/P.v) for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and P.vivax was evaluated against thick blood smears in forest villages of Chhindwara, Madhya Pradesh, where both Plasmodium falciparum and P.vivax are prevalent. 344 symptomatic patients (Gond ethnic tribe) in five villages were screened by field staff of the Malaria Research Centre in October 1999. For P.falciparum, the ICT was 97.5% sensitive and 88% specific, with a positive predictive value (PPV) of 87.6% and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 97.6%. For P.vivax the sensitivity was only 72%, the specificity 99%, with a PPV of 92% and an NPV of 96%. Although a negative test result was inadequate to exclude parasitaemia < or = 300/microl for P.falciparum and < or = 1500/microl for P.vivax, the test is potentially useful in remote areas.Field evaluation of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria in Yaounde, Cameroon.Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) are affordable, alternative diagnostic tools. The present study aimed to evaluate RDTs available in Cameroon and compare their characteristics to follow the parasitological response of patients for 28 days. Malaria diagnosis was assessed in 179 febrile patients using conventional microscopy as the reference method. Parascreen detects both Plasmodium falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein 2 (Pf HRP-2) and Pan-specific plasmodial lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) in all four human Plasmodium spp. Diaspot is based on the detection of Pf HRP-2. OptiMAL-IT (pLDH specific for P. falciparum and pLDH for all four human Plasmodium spp.) was assessed for comparison. The reliability of RDTs was evaluated by calculating the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, false-positive rate, false-negative rate, and likelihood ratio. The clinical outcome of 18 children treated with atovaquone-proguanil and followed for 28 days was evaluated using microscopy and RDTs. Of 179 samples, 133 (74.3%) were pure P. falciparum-positive smears, 4 (2.2%) pure P. malariae-positive smears, and 42 (23.5%) negative smears. Parascreen and Diaspot had high sensitivity (>92%) and positive predictive values (>94%). The specificities for Parascreen and Diaspot were 81.0% and 90.5%, respectively. The false-positive rates and the false-negative rates were 19.0% and 4.5% for Parascreen and 9.5% and 8.3% for Diaspot, respectively. Most false-negatives occurred in samples with low parasitaemia (<500 asexual parasites/μL). The performance of RDTs was better at higher parasitaemia (>500 asexual parasites/μL). Four pure P. malariae were only detected by the pan-Plasmodium bands of Parascreen and OptiMAL-IT. In blood samples from patients treated and followed-up for 28 days, HRP2-based RDTs remained positive in most samples until Day 28. Despite negative smears, OptiMAL-IT remained positive in several patients until Day 7 but was negative in all patients from Day 14 onwards. RDTs can improve the management of febrile patients. The validity, ease of use, and cost of HRP2-based tests were comparable. However, one of the current weaknesses of the RDT-based strategy using the tests available in Cameroon is inadequate sensitivity for low parasitaemia. In some cases, RDT results may require correct interpretation based on clinical history, clinical examination, and microscopic diagnosis.Evaluation of rapid diagnostic tests: malaria.Comparison of Parascreen Pan/Pf, Paracheck Pf and light microscopy for detection of malaria among febrile patients, Northwest Ethiopia.Two malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDT), Parascreen Pan/Pf and Paracheck Pf, were tested in rural health centres in Ethiopia against independent expert microscopy (the gold standard). Participants (n =1997) presented with presumptive malaria to ten health centers in Amhara Regional State during the 2007 peak malaria season (October to December). By microscopy, 475 (23.8%) suspected malaria cases were positive, of which 57.7% were P. falciparum; 24.6% P. vivax and 17.7% mixed infections. Parascreen and Paracheck were positive for 442 (22.1%) and 277 (13.9%) febrile patients, respectively. For Parascreen, P. falciparum sensitivity was 79.6%, specificity 97.4%, positive predictive value (PPV) 86.9%, and negative predictive value (NPV) 95.6%. For Parascreen, P. vivax sensitivity was 74.4%, specificity 98.6%, PPV 76.3% and NPV 98.4%. For Paracheck, P. falciparum sensitivity was 73.7%, specificity 99.2%, PPV 95.3%, NPV 94.5%. Sensitivity was significantly higher for both tests (P<0.05) when parasite density was >100/microl of blood; in these cases Parascreen was 90.7% and 91.5% sensitive for P. falciparum and P. vivax, respectively, while Paracheck was 87.9% sensitive for P. falciparum. Parascreen thus performed adequately for both P. falciparum and P. vivax compared to expert microscopy and is more useful than Paracheck where microscopy is unavailable.Utility of a point-of-care malaria rapid diagnostic test for excluding malaria as the cause of fever among HIV-positive adults in rural Rakai, Uganda.We compared results of a malaria rapid diagnostic test (Binax Now Malaria, Binax-M, Inverness Medical Innovations, Inc., Waltham, MA) performed at rural mobile clinics in Uganda by clinicians evaluating febrile adult HIV patients to thick smear evaluated at a central laboratory by trained microscopists. Two hundred forty-six samples were analyzed, including 14 (5.7%) which were thick-smear positive for falciparum malaria. Sensitivity of Binax-M compared with thick smear was 85.7% (95% CI: 57.2-98.2), specificity 97.8% (95% CI: 94.9-99.3), positive and negative predictive values were 70.6% (95% CI: 44.0-89.7) and 99.1% (95% CI: 96.8-99.9), respectively. The rapid diagnostic test accurately ruled malaria "in or out" at the point-of-care, facilitating appropriate clinical management and averting unnecessary anti-malarial therapy.Quality assurance of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria in routine patient care in rural Tanzania.Histidine-rich protein II (HRP2)-based malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) have shown high sensitivity and specificity for detecting Plasmodium falciparum malaria in a variety of study settings. However, RDTs are susceptible to heat and humidity and variation in individual performance, which may affect their use in field settings. We evaluated sensitivity and specificity of RDTs during routine use for malaria case management in peripheral health facilities. From December 2007 to October 2008, HRP2-based ParaHIT-f RDTs were introduced in 12 facilities without available microscopy in Rufiji District, Tanzania. Health workers received a single day of instruction on how to perform an RDT and thick blood smear. Job aids, Integrated Management of Childhood Illness guidelines, and national malaria treatment algorithms were reviewed. For quality assurance (QA), thick blood smears for reference microscopy were collected for 2 to 3 days per week from patients receiving RDTs; microscopy was not routinely performed at the health facilities. Slides were stained and read centrally within 72 hours of collection by a reference microscopist. When RDT and blood smear results were discordant, blood smears were read by additional reference microscopists blinded to earlier results. Facilities were supervised monthly by the district laboratory supervisor or a member of the study team. Ten thousand six hundred fifty (10,650) patients were tested with RDTs, and 51.5% (5,488/10,650) had a positive test result. Blood smear results were available for 3,914 patients, of whom 40.1% (1,577/3,914) were positive for P. falciparum malaria. Overall RDT sensitivity was 90.7% (range by facility 85.7-96.5%) and specificity was 73.5% (range 50.0-84.3%). Sensitivity increased with increasing parasite density. Successful implementation of RDTs was achieved in peripheral health facilities with adequate training and supervision. Quality assurance is essential to the adequate performance of any laboratory test. Centralized staining and reading of blood smears provided useful monitoring of RDT performance. However, this level of QA may not be sustainable nationwide.Rapid diagnostic tests as a source of DNA for Plasmodium species-specific real-time PCR.This study describes the use of malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) as a source of DNA for Plasmodium species-specific real-time PCR.First, the best method to recover DNA from RDTs was investigated and then the applicability of this DNA extraction method was assessed on 12 different RDT brands. Finally, two RDT brands (OptiMAL Rapid Malaria Test and SDFK60 malaria Ag Plasmodium falciparum/Pan test) were comprehensively evaluated on a panel of clinical samples submitted for routine malaria diagnosis at ITM. DNA amplification was done with the 18S rRNA real-time PCR targeting the four Plasmodium species. Results of PCR on RDT were compared to those obtained by PCR on whole blood samples.Best results were obtained by isolating DNA from the proximal part of the nitrocellulose component of the RDT strip with a simple DNA elution method. The PCR on RDT showed a detection limit of 0.02 asexual parasites/μl, which was identical to the same PCR on whole blood. For all 12 RDT brands tested, DNA was detected except for one brand when a low parasite density sample was applied. In RDTs with a plastic seal covering the nitrocellulose strip, DNA extraction was hampered. PCR analysis on clinical RDT samples demonstrated correct identification for single species infections for all RDT samples with asexual parasites of P. falciparum (n = 60), Plasmodium vivax (n = 10), Plasmodium ovale (n = 10) and Plasmodium malariae (n = 10). Samples with only gametocytes were detected in all OptiMAL and in 10 of the 11 SDFK60 tests. None of the negative samples (n = 20) gave a signal by PCR on RDT. With PCR on RDT, higher Ct-values were observed than with PCR on whole blood, with a mean difference of 2.68 for OptiMAL and 3.53 for SDFK60. Mixed infections were correctly identified with PCR on RDT in 4/5 OptiMAL tests and 2/5 SDFK60 tests.RDTs are a reliable source of DNA for Plasmodium real-time PCR. This study demonstrates the best method of RDT fragment sampling for a wide range of RDT brands in combination with a simple and low cost extraction method, allowing RDT quality control.[Evaluation of the Optimal-IT and ICT P.f./P.v. rapid dipstick tests for diagnosing malaria within primary healthcare in the municipality of Manaus, Amazonas].Malaria is routinely diagnosed using the thick blood smear test. However, this technique requires the training of microscopists and may be time-consuming. A concordance study was conducted on two dipstick tests (Optimal-IT and ICT P.f./P.v.) and the thick blood smear test, within primary healthcare in Manaus.Performance of a prototype malaria rapid diagnostic test versus thick film microscopy among HIV-positive subjects in rural Rakai, Uganda.In this study, we report the performance of a prototype malaria rapid diagnostic test, Malaria F-test (MFT), compared with thick blood films from HIV-positive Ugandans undergoing malaria testing. In total, 21/154 samples (13.6%) were concordantly positive by both thick film and MFT and 129/154 samples (83.8%) were concordantly negative; 1 sample (0.6%) was thick film-positive but MFT-negative and 3 samples (1.9%) were thick film-negative but MFT-positive. The sensitivity of MFT was 95.5% (95% CI 77.2-99.9%) compared with thick film microscopy and the specificity was 97.7% (95% CI 93.5-99.5%). MFT was simple, rapid and effective for detection of Plasmodium falciparum among HIV-positive subjects in a rural, malaria-endemic African setting.A comparison of thick smears, QBC malaria, PCR and PATH falciparum malaria test trip in Plasmodium falciparum diagnosis.Blood samples from 182 patients presenting at the out-patient clinic in Richard-Toll. Senegal were analysed by Thick smear microscopy, the QBC, PCR and the new dipstick PATH Malaria assay which detects the histidine rich protein II antigen of Plasmodium falciparum. Thick smear microscopy was used as the reference method. Sensitivity, specificity, predictive positive and negative values were 100%, 83.6%, 93.4% and 100% QBC respectively; 100%, 72.7%, 89.4% and 100% for PCR; 96%, 92.7%, 96.8% and 91% for the PATH assay. PATH assay failed to detect one positive sample with Plasmodium malariae. Assays were also compared with regard to the expense of equipment and reagents and speed and ease of use. The rapid PATH assay can be performed with minimal training and may be specially useful in areas where P. falciparum is the predominant malaria species, in epidemic malaria regions, and where skilled microscopy is not readily available.[Value of rapid diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum using indirect monoclonal immunofluorescence].Development and use of murine specific monoclonal antibodies associated with an indirect immunofluorescent assay allows a rapid detection of P. falciparum antigens. This work compares the results obtained by interpretation of Giemsa staining technique on blood smears, to the use of a commercial reagent (Monofluo Kit P. falciparum). This monoclonal indirect immunofluorescent assay (I.F.I.M.) provides the clinician with a precious aid to diagnosis as well by its specificity and sensitivity, better than conventional staining techniques; particularly in pauciparasitaemia induced by prime-infestation or partial anti-malarial drug resistance.Malaria diagnosis and treatment under the strategy of the integrated management of childhood illness (IMCI): relevance of laboratory support from the rapid immunochromatographic tests of ICT Malaria P.f/P.v and OptiMal.The algorithm developed for the integrated management of childhood illness (IMCI) provides guidelines for the treatment of paediatric malaria. In areas where malaria is endemic, for example, the IMCI strategy may indicate that children who present with fever, a recent history of fever and/or pallor should receive antimalarial chemotherapy. In many holo-endemic areas, it is unclear whether laboratory tests to confirm that such signs are the result of malaria would be very relevant or useful. Children from a holo-endemic region of Tanzania were therefore checked for malarial parasites by microscopy and by using two rapid immunochromatographic tests (RIT) for the diagnosis of malaria (ICT Malaria P.f/P.v and OptiMal. At the time they were tested, each of these children had been targeted for antimalarial treatment (following the IMCI strategy) because of fever and/or pallor. Only 70% of the 395 children classified to receive antimalarial drugs by the IMCI algorithm had malarial parasitaemias (68.4% had Plasmodium falciparum trophozoites, 1.3% only P. falciparum gametocytes, 0.3% P. ovale and 0.3% P. malariae). As indicators of P. falciparum trophozoites in the peripheral blood, fever had a sensitivity of 93.0% and a specificity of 15.5% whereas pallor had a sensitivity of 72.2% and a specificity of 50.8%. The RIT both had very high corresponding sensitivities (of 100.0% for the ICT and 94.0% for OptiMal) but the specificity of the ICT (74.0%) was significantly lower than that for OptiMal (100.0%). Fever and pallor were significantly associated with the P. falciparum asexual parasitaemias that equalled or exceeded the threshold intensity (2000/microl) that has the optimum sensitivity and specificity for the definition of a malarial episode. Diagnostic likelihood ratios (DLR) showed that a positive result in the OptiMal test (DLR = infinity) was a better indication of malaria than a positive result in the ICT (DLR = 3.85). In fact, OptiMal had diagnostic reliability (0.93) which approached that of an ideal test and, since it only detects live parasites, OptiMal is superior to the ICT in monitoring therapeutic responses. Although the RIT may seem attractive for use in primary health facilities because relatively inexperienced staff can perform them, the high cost of these tests is prohibitive. In holo-endemic areas, use of RIT or microscopical examination of bloodsmears may only be relevant when malaria needs to be excluded as a cause of illness (e.g. prior to treatment with toxic or expensive drugs, or during malaria epidemics). Wherever the effective drugs for the first-line treatment of malaria are cheap (e.g. chloroquine and Fansidar), treatment based on clinical diagnosis alone should prove cost-saving in health facilities without microscopy.Low quality of routine microscopy for malaria at different levels of the health system in Dar es Salaam.Laboratory capacity to confirm malaria cases in Tanzania is low and presumptive treatment of malaria is being practiced widely. In malaria endemic areas WHO now recommends systematic laboratory testing when suspecting malaria. Currently, the use of Rapid Diagnostic Tests (RDTs) is recommended for the diagnosis of malaria in lower level peripheral facilities, but not in health centres and hospitals. In this study, the following parameters were evaluated: (1) the quality of routine microscopy, and (2) the effects of RDT implementation on the positivity rate of malaria test results at three levels of the health system in Dar es Salaam, Tanzania.During a baseline cross-sectional survey, routine blood slides were randomly picked from 12 urban public health facilities in Dar es Salaam, Tanzania. Sensitivity and specificity of routine slides were assessed against expert microscopy. In March 2007, following training of health workers, RDTs were introduced in nine public health facilities (three hospitals, three health centres and three dispensaries) in a near-to-programmatic way, while three control health facilities continued using microscopy. The monthly malaria positivity rates (PR) recorded in health statistics registers were collected before (routine microscopy) and after (routine RDTs) the intervention in all facilities.At baseline, 53% of blood slides were reported as positive by the routine laboratories, whereas only 2% were positive by expert microscopy. Sensitivity of routine microscopy was 71.4% and specificity was 47.3%. Positive and negative predictive values were 2.8% and 98.7%, respectively. Median parasitaemia was only three parasites per 200 white blood cells (WBC) by routine microscopy compared to 1226 parasites per 200 WBC by expert microscopy. Before RDT implementation, the mean test positivity rates using routine microscopy were 43% in hospitals, 62% in health centres and 58% in dispensaries. After RDT implementation, mean positivity rates using routine RDTs were 6%, 7% and 8%, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of RDTs using expert microscopy as reference were 97.0% and 96.8%. The positivity rate of routine microscopy remained the same in the three control facilities: 71% before versus 72% after. Two cross-sectional health facility surveys confirmed that the parasite rate in febrile patients was low in Dar es Salaam during both the rainy season (13.6%) and the dry season (3.3%).The quality of routine microscopy was poor in all health facilities, regardless of their level. Over-diagnosis was massive, with many false positive results reported as very low parasitaemia (1 to 5 parasites per 200 WBC). RDTs should replace microscopy as first-line diagnostic tool for malaria in all settings, especially in hospitals where the potential for saving lives is greatest.Comparison of a parasite lactate dehydrogenase-based immunochromatographic antigen detection assay (OptiMAL) with microscopy for the detection of malaria parasites in human blood samples.Microscopic examination of blood smears remains the gold standard for malaria diagnosis, but is labor-intensive and requires skilled operators. Rapid dipstick technology provides a potential alternative. A study was conducted in The Gambia to compare the performance of OptiMAL, an immunochromatographic antigen detection assay for the diagnosis of malaria using parasite lactate dehydrogenase, against standard microscopy in patients with suspected malaria. For initial diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum, irrespective of stage, this assay had a sensitivity of 91.3%, a specificity of 92%, a positive predictive value of 87.2%, and a negative predictive value of 94.7%. The sensitivity of the test decreased markedly at parasitemias < 0.01%. This assay can be used for the diagnosis of malaria in areas where microscopy is not available and for urgent malaria diagnosis at night and at weekends, when routine laboratories are closed and when relatively inexperienced microscopists may be on duty.Comparison of different diagnostic techniques in Plasmodium falciparum cerebral malaria.Plasmodium falciparum cerebral malaria remains a major health problem in India. The efficacy of treatment of cerebral malaria lies in its early diagnosis through rapid diagnostic methods. ParaSights-F test detects HRP-2 antigen secreted by parasitised red blood cells and quantitative buffy coat assay (QBC) is examination of buffy coat for the presence of malarial parasite stained with acridine orange. This study was performed to evaluate the effectiveness of ParaSight-F test and QBC assay as diagnostic methods in the patients of cerebral malaria.Fifty clinically diagnosed patients of cerebral malaria were included in the study. ParaSight-F test, QBC and conventional blood smear examination was done. Patients who were in coma and there were no obvious features of bacterial or viral etiology were investigated for cerebral malaria by these diagnostic methods.ParaSight-F test, QBC and peripheral blood smears were examined. Patients were followed-up for signs of clinical recovery. ParaSight-F test was positive in 47 patients, QBC in 46 while blood smear examination was positive in 28 cases.Sensitivity and specificity of ParaSight-F test were found to be 96.6 and 94% while QBC showed 97.8 and 100% respectively. ParaSight-F test and QBC were found to be novel methods for diagnosis of cerebral malaria especially in the cases where diagnosis can not be made by conventional blood smear examination due to low parasitaemia. These rapid diagnostic methods help in early therapeutic intervention.Evaluation of different methods for diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria.Rapid diagnosis is a prerequisite for institution of effective treatment and reducing the mortality and morbidity of falciparum malaria. This study was taken up to compare the efficacy of various rapid methods viz, acridine orange, Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein II antigen detection and Field's stain with traditional microscopy i.e, Leishman stain for diagnosing falciparum malaria. Thick and thin blood films of 443 consecutive patients with history of fever with chills and rigors were examined by Leishman and Field's method. Acridine orange stained wet mounts of blood were examined under fluorescence microscopy. All films were examined by two independent microbiologists. Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein II antigen was detected using commercially available kit, Paracheck Pf. Out of the 443 subjects examined for P.falciparum 18.28% were detected by Leishman stain, 6.32% by Field's stain, 18.28% by acridine orange and 18.1% by antigen based technique. Field's stain missed 53 (65.4%), while Paracheck Pf was negative in 6(7.4%) of the Leishman positive samples. All Field's stain and acridine orange positives were positive by Leishman, but five Paracheck Pf positives were negative. Leishman stain is cost effective but if facilities are available one should use acridine orange for screening. The antigen detection kits are rapid, simple and are useful but to rule out false negatives in clinically suspected cases, Leishman stain is reliable.[Can the thick drop/smear examination for malaria be replaced by a rapid diagnostic test in first intention? The Mayotte experience].Malaria is a public health problem in the French island of Mayotte (160,000 inhabitants) in the Indian Ocean. In the late 1990, resistance to chloroquine greatly increased, and so did the number of malaria cases, so that a new health policy had to be adopted. Since 2001, the initial smear/thick drop examination, the results of which took too long to obtain, has systematically been replaced by a rapid diagnosis test (Optimal IT Diamed) in all hospitals and public health centers.Epidemiological data of malaria on the island was collected and a prospective study was made from March 2005 to February 2006, on two sites (the emergency department of the main hospital and a rural health centre) on all patients presenting with malaria (104 and 139 cases respectively).The first Optimal IT test diagnosed the condition accurately in 88 and 96% of the cases, respectively. Every time symptoms would persist after negative test results and an Optimal IT test was repeated within three days, the parasitemia level was low (0.08 to 0.66%). Very low parasitemia level was very likely to account for a false negative (test result).These results concerning malaria (and its epidemiological data) in Mayotte show that the initial use of an Optimal IT test instead of the thin/thick blood smear results in a faster management of patients with malaria, although the Optimal IT test is slightly less sensitive and requires training/practice.Preliminary enquiry into the availability, price and quality of malaria rapid diagnostic tests in the private health sector of six malaria-endemic countries.This enquiry aimed to provide a snap-shot of availability, price and quality of malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) in private health facilities at selected sites in six malaria-endemic countries in Africa, South East Asia and South America.In each study site, data collectors surveyed private healthcare facilities which were selected based on accessibility from their home institution. Using a questionnaire, information was recorded about the facility itself and the malaria RDT(s) available. Where possible, a small number of RDTs were procured and quality control tested using a standardized procedure.Of the 324 private healthcare facilities visited, 35 outlets (mainly private clinics and hospitals) were found to supply 10 different types of RDTs products. RDT prices across the six countries ranged from US$1.00 to $16.81. Five of the 14 malaria RDTs collected failed quality control testing.In the private outlets sampled, the availability of RDTs was limited. Some of the RDTs whose quality we tested demonstrated inadequate sensitivity. This presents a number of risks. Given the more widespread distribution of antimalarials currently planned for private sector facilities, parasite-based diagnosis in this sector will be essential to adhere to the WHO guidelines for effective case management of malaria. Considerable regulation and quality control are also necessary to assure the availability of accurate and reliable RDTs, as well as adequate case management and provider adherence to RDT results. Public sector engagement is likely to be essential in this process.Paracheck-Pf: a new, inexpensive and reliable rapid test for P. falciparum malaria.We compared the performance of Paracheck-Pf, a new and cheap rapid malaria test, with ICT-Pf/PvR and microscopy in two malaria surveys in Thai villages on the Thai-Burmese border. The specificity, sensitivity, predictive positive and negative values of the Paracheck-PfR and ICT-PfR tests were calculated taking microscopy results as the gold standard. The 294 ICT-Pf/Pv tests resulted in two invalid (no control line) and 11 doubtful results. Both the ICT-Pf/PvR and Paracheck-PfR tests reliably detected P. falciparum infections. However, Paracheck-PfR failed to detect three P. falciparum cases and likewise, ICT-Pf/PvR failed to detect the same three cases and an additional four cases. These seven cases were detected by microscopy and had a parasitaemia under 150 parasites/microl. At a cost of c. US $1.00, the Paracheck-PfR test, based on the detection of the P. falciparum specific HRP-2 protein, is a reliable, easy to use and affordable tool for the diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria.Sensitivity and specificity of dipstick tests for rapid diagnosis of malaria in nonimmune travelers.Swift diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in areas where the disease is not endemic is frequently complicated by the lack of experience on the side of involved laboratory personal. Diagnostic tools based on the dipstick principle for the detection of plasmodial histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP-2) and parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH), respectively, have become available for the qualitative detection of P. falciparum malaria. In order to evaluate two of the currently available assays, specimens from 231 patients were screened during a prospective multicenter study. Among the screened specimens, samples from 53 patients (22.9%) were positive for P. falciparum malaria by microscopy and/or PCR. While the test kit based on the detection of HRP-2 performed with a sensitivity of 92.5% and a specificity of 98.3%, the kit for the detection of pLDH showed a sensitivity of 88.5% and a specificity of 99.4%. Dipstick tests have the potential of enhancing speed and accuracy of the diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria, especially if nonspecialized laboratories are involved.Diagnosis of malaria in a remote area of the Philippines: comparison of techniques and their acceptance by health workers and the community.To compare the efficacies of remote symptom-based diagnosis of malaria, rapid diagnostic tests and microscopy in an area of low endemicity in the Philippines.In Trial I, 350 symptomatic patients were tested within their villages using malaria Plasmodium falciparum (Pf)/Plasmodium vivax (Pv) immunochromatographic tests (ICT tests) and blood films stored and read under local conditions. The slides were later restained and read. In Trial II, unsupervised volunteer barangay health workers prepared ICT tests and slides after brief training. These slides were read at rural health units. Twenty-seven barangay health workers and 72 community members were later questioned about the three diagnostic strategies.A history of fever alone was sensitive (95.4%) but poorly specific (16.5%) for predicting parasitaemia. The inclusion of other symptoms reduced the sensitivity to below 85%, while specificity remained low. The axillary temperature was poorly predictive. ICT tests achieved high sensitivity (97.9%) but many cases indicated as positive by ICT tests were negative by microscopy. Further analysis of these cases in Trial I indicated that ICT tests were detecting low-level parasitaemias missed by microscopy, and that local microscopy had poor accuracy. ICT tests were well accepted and accurately performed by barangay health workers.These tests meet a strong desire in the community for blood-based diagnosis and may increase the compliance and treatment-seeking behaviour of patients.A comparison of two rapid field immunochromatographic tests to expert microscopy in the diagnosis of malaria.In Myanmar, we tested two rapid malaria immunochromatographic kits: the OptiMAL assay for the detection of parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH), and the ICT Malaria P.f./P.v. test for histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP2) and panmalarial antigens. A total of 229 patients were examined, of whom 133 were found to be malaria positive by Giemsa microscopy. Both OptiMAL and ICT gave lower sensitivities than previously reported. ICT sensitivity for Plasmodium falciparum and non-falciparum parasites were 86.2 and 2.9%, respectively; specificity was 76.9 and 100%, respectively. OptiMAL sensitivity for P. falciparum and non-falciparum parasites were 42.6 and 47.1%, respectively; specificity was 97.0 and 96.9%, respectively. The sensitivity of both tests for the detection of both P. falciparum and non-falciparum parasites increased with parasite density. Several explanations for these results are explored. Our results raise particular concern over batch quality variations of malaria rapid diagnostic devices (MRDDs).Evaluation of a rapid antigen capture assay for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria.A study was carried out to evaluate the accuracy of a dipstick antigen capture assay for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein II antigen (Pf HRP-II) in peripheral blood to diagnose P. falciparum malaria. The sensitivity and specificity of the test was found to be 97 and 100 per cent respectively. The persistence of the antigen varied from 5 to 15 days after initiation of antimalarial therapy. The assay was simple to perform, rapid and easy to interpret. However, infection due to other species of human malaria parasites cannot be detected by this dipstick assay. Use of more sensitive technique like polymerase chain reaction (PCR) would help in diagnosing cases with low parasitaemia and infection due to other plasmodial species.An assessment of early diagnosis and treatment of malaria by village health volunteers in the Lao PDR.Early diagnosis and treatment (EDAT) is crucial to reducing the burden of malaria in low-income countries. In the Lao PDR, this strategy was introduced in 2004-2005 and an assessment was performed at the community level in January 2007.EDAT with malaria rapid diagnostic test (MRDT) and artemisinin combination therapy (ACT) was prospectively assessed among 36 randomized village health volunteers (VHVs) and 720 patients in six malaria-endemic provinces of Laos (three pilot provinces (PP), and three non-pilots provinces (NPP)). ACT was also retrospectively assessed among 2188 patients within the same areas from June to November 2006. Two checklists were used and scores were calculated.EDAT performance of the VHVs was rated better in PP than in NPP (16.67% versus 38.89%, respectively, p = 0.004). Nearly all VHVs could diagnose malaria but only 16 (44%) could describe the symptoms of severe malaria. In January 2007, 31/720 (4%) patients tested positive using the Paracheck test, 35 (5%) with microscopy (sensibility: 74.3%, specificity 99.3%, positive and negative predictive values: 83.9% and 98.7%, respectively). Patients from June to November were at higher risk of malaria: 35.19% of 2,188 febrile patients were positive (OR: 10.6, 95%CI: 7.4-15.5, p < 0.000). VHVs reported the MRDT easy to use, and yielded a satisfactory performance score. EDAT performance was rated as poor despite satisfactory results regarding ACT treatment, duration and dosages. Pre-referral treatment of severe malaria was infrequent and often inadequate, with 20% of these patients dying. Results suggest a higher mortality from severe malaria than officially reported. Shortage of ACT was frequent.MRDT and ACT are useful and efficient and can be used by VHVs. VHVs' global EDAT performance is enhanced through training and monitoring. Persistent gaps in knowledge, care of patients and wrong treatment have to be addressed.Evaluation of the SD FK70 malaria Ag Plasmodium vivax rapid diagnostic test in a non-endemic setting.For clinical and epidemiological reasons, it is interesting to diagnose non-falciparum malaria to the species level. This retrospective study assessed the performance of the SD BIOLINE Malaria Antigen Pv test (FK70), a two-band immunochromatographic test detecting Plasmodium vivax-specific lactate dehydrogenase, on samples of international travellers in a non-endemic setting.Stored blood samples from international travellers suspected of malaria were used, with microscopy corrected by PCR as the reference method. Samples infected by Plasmodium vivax (n = 100), Plasmodium falciparum (n = 75), Plasmodium ovale (n = 75) and Plasmodium malariae (n = 25) were included, as well as 100 malaria-negative samples. End points were sensitivity, specificity, inter-reader reliability and reproducibility.The overall sensitivity of the FK70 for the diagnosis of P. vivax was 88.0% (95% confidence interval (CI): 83.6% - 90.3%). For parasite densities > 500/microl, a sensitivity of 97.2% (CI: 92.6% - 99.1%) was obtained. Specificity was 98.5%, with 4 out of 75 P. falciparum samples testing positive. None of the P. ovale samples tested positive. Nearly two-thirds (57/88, 64.7%) of positive P. vivax samples showed faint or weak line intensities, with stronger line intensities at higher parasite densities. The test showed excellent reproducibility and reliability for test results and line intensities (kappa values exceeding 0.98 and 0.87 respectively).The FK70 test performed well in diagnosing P. vivax infections in a non-endemic reference setting. It can be of added value to microscopy in species differentiation of malaria infections, especially at parasite densities > 500/microl.Assessment of three new parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pan-pLDH) tests for diagnosis of uncomplicated malaria.A study to assess the diagnostic capabilities of three parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pan-pLDH) tests, Vistapan), Carestart and Parabank), was conducted in Uganda. An HRP2 test, Paracheck-Pf), and a Giemsa-stained blood film were performed with the pLDH tests for outpatients with suspected malaria. In total, 460 subjects were recruited: 248 with positive blood films and 212 with negative blood films. Plasmodium falciparum was present in 95% of infections. Sensitivity above 90% was shown by two pLDH tests, Carestart (95.6%) and Vistapan (91.9%), and specificity above 90% by Parabank (94.3%) and Carestart (91.5%). Sensitivity decreased with low parasitaemia (chi(2) trend, P<0.001); however, all tests achieved sensitivity >90% with parasitaemia > or =100/microl. All tests had good inter-reader reliability (kappa>0.95). Two weeks after diagnosis, 4-10% of pLDH tests were still positive compared with 69.7% of the HRP2 tests. All tests had similar ease of use. In conclusion, two pLDH tests performed well in diagnosing P. falciparum malaria, and all pLDH tests became negative after treatment more quickly than the HRP2. Therefore the rapid test of choice for use with artemisinin-combination therapies in this area would be one of these new pLDH tests.The sensitivity of the OptiMAL rapid diagnostic test to the presence of Plasmodium falciparum gametocytes compromises its ability to monitor treatment outcomes in an area of Papua New Guinea in which malaria is endemic.Using in vivo samples from treatment failure malaria cases, we demonstrate the high sensitivity of the parasite lactase dehydrogenase (pLDH)-based OptiMAL rapid diagnostic test in the detection of P. falciparum gametocytes. This high sensitivity limits the use of pLDH-based tests in the monitoring of treatment outcomes in circumstances where gametocytemia is common.Malaria diagnostics: a comparative study of blood microscopy, a rapid diagnostic test and polymerase chain reaction in the diagnosis of malaria.Field evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test (Parascreen) for malaria diagnosis in the Peruvian Amazon.The rapid diagnostic tests for malaria (RDT) constitute a fast and opportune alternative for non-complicated malaria diagnosis in areas where microscopy is not available. The objective of this study was to validate a RDT named Parascreen under field conditions in Iquitos, department of Loreto, Peru. Parascreen is a RDT that detects the histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) antigen from Plasmodium falciparum and lactate deshydrogenase from all Plasmodium species.Parascreen was compared with microscopy performed by experts (EM) and polymerase chain reaction (PCR) using the following indicators: sensitivity (Se), specificity (Sp), positive (PV+) and negative predictive values (PV-), positive (LR+) and negative likehood ratio (LR-).332 patients with suspected non-complicated malaria who attended to the MOH health centres were enrolled between October and December 2006. For P. falciparum malaria, Parascreen in comparison with EM, had Se: 53.5%, Sp: 98.7%, PV+: 66.7%, PV-: 97.8%, LR+: 42.27 and LR-: 0.47; and for non-P. falciparum malaria, Se: 77.1%, Sp: 97.6%, PV+: 91.4%, PV-: 92.7%, LR+: 32.0 and LR-: 0.22. The comparison of Parascreen with PCR showed, for P. falciparum malaria, Se: 81.8%, Sp: 99.1%, PV+: 75%, PV-: 99.4, LR+: 87.27 and LR-: 0.18; and for non-P. falciparum malaria Se: 76.1%, Sp: 99.2%, PV+: 97.1%, PV-: 92.0%, LR+: 92.51 and LR-: 0.24.The study results indicate that Parascreen is not a valid and acceptable test for malaria diagnosis under the field conditions found in the Peruvian Amazon. The relative proportion of Plasmodium species, in addition to the genetic characteristics of the parasites in the area, must be considered before applying any RDT, especially after the finding of P. falciparum malaria parasites lacking pfhrp2 gene in this region.A rapid malaria appraisal in the Venezuelan Amazon.While the federal state of Amazonas bears the highest risk for malaria in Venezuela (2007: 68.4 cases/1000 inhabitants), little comprehensive information about the malaria situation is available from this area. The purpose of this rapid malaria appraisal (RMA) was to provide baseline data about malaria and malaria control in Amazonas.The RMA methodology corresponds to a rapid health impact assessment (HIA) as described in the 1999 Gothenburg consensus. In conjunction with the actors of the malaria surveillance system, all useful data and information, which were accessible within a limited time-frame of five visits to Amazonas, were collected, analysed and interpreted.Mortality from malaria is low (< 1 in 105) and slide positivity rates have stayed at the same level for the last two decades (15% +/- 6% (SD)). Active case detection accounts for ca. 40% of slides taken. The coverage of the censured population with malaria notification points (NPs) has been achieved in recent years. The main parasite is Plasmodium vivax (84% of cases). The proportion of Plasmodium falciparum is on the decline, possibly driven by the introduction of cost-free artemisinin-based combination therapy (ACT) (1988: 33.4%; 2007: 15.4%). Monitoring and documentation is complete, systematic and consistent, but poorly digitalized. Malaria transmission displayed a visible lag behind rainfall in the capital municipality of Atures, but not in the other municipalities. In comparison to reference microscopy, quality of field microscopy and rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) is suboptimal (kappa < 0.75). Hot spots of malaria risk were seen in some indigenous ethnic groups. Conflicting strategies in respect of training of community health workers (CHW) and the introduction of new diagnostic tools (RDTs) were observed.Malaria control is possible, even in tropical rain forest areas, if the health system is working adequately. Interventions have to be carefully designed and the features of the particular local Latin American context considered.Evaluation of three parasite lactate dehydrogenase-based rapid diagnostic tests for the diagnosis of falciparum and vivax malaria.In areas where non-falciparum malaria is common rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) capable of distinguishing malaria species reliably are needed. Such tests are often based on the detection of parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH).In Dawei, southern Myanmar, three pLDH based RDTs (CareStart Malaria pLDH (Pan), CareStart Malaria pLDH (Pan, Pf) and OptiMAL-IT)were evaluated in patients presenting with clinically suspected malaria. Each RDT was read independently by two readers. A subset of patients with microscopically confirmed malaria had their RDTs repeated on days 2, 7 and then weekly until negative. At the end of the study, samples of study batches were sent for heat stability testing.Between August and November 2007, 1004 patients aged between 1 and 93 years were enrolled in the study. Slide microscopy (the reference standard) diagnosed 213 Plasmodium vivax (Pv) monoinfections, 98 Plasmodium falciparum (Pf) mono-infections and no malaria in 650 cases. The sensitivities (sens) and specificities (spec), of the RDTs for the detection of malaria were- CareStart Malaria pLDH (Pan) test: sens 89.1% [CI95 84.2-92.6], spec 97.6% [CI95 96.5-98.4]. OptiMal-IT: Pf+/- other species detection: sens 95.2% [CI95 87.5-98.2], spec 94.7% [CI95 93.3-95.8]; non-Pf detection alone: sens 89.6% [CI95 83.6-93.6], spec 96.5% [CI95 94.8-97.7]. CareStart Malaria pLDH (Pan, Pf): Pf+/- other species: sens 93.5% [CI95 85.4-97.3], spec 97.4% [95.9-98.3]; non-Pf: sens 78.5% [CI95 71.1-84.4], spec 97.8% [CI95 96.3-98.7]. Inter-observer agreement was excellent for all tests (kappa > 0.9). The median time for the RDTs to become negative was two days for the CareStart Malaria tests and seven days for OptiMAL-IT. Tests were heat stable up to 90 days except for OptiMAL-IT (Pf specific pLDH stable to day 20 at 35 degrees C).None of the pLDH-based RDTs evaluated was able to detect non-falciparum malaria with high sensitivity, particularly at low parasitaemias. OptiMAL-IT performed best overall and would perform best in an area of high malaria prevalence among screened fever cases. However, heat stability was unacceptable and the number of steps to perform this test is a significant drawback in the field. A reliable, heat-stable, highly sensitive RDT, capable of diagnosing all Plasmodium species has yet to be identified.A review of malaria diagnostic tools: microscopy and rapid diagnostic test (RDT).The absolute necessity for rational therapy in the face of rampant drug resistance places increasing importance on the accuracy of malaria diagnosis. Giemsa microscopy and rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) represent the two diagnostics most likely to have the largest impact on malaria control today. These two methods, each with characteristic strengths and limitations, together represent the best hope for accurate diagnosis as a key component of successful malaria control. This review addresses the quality issues with current malaria diagnostics and presents data from recent rapid diagnostic test trials. Reduction of malaria morbidity and drug resistance intensity plus the associated economic loss of these two factors require urgent scaling up of the quality of parasite-based diagnostic methods. An investment in anti-malarial drug development or malaria vaccine development should be accompanied by a parallel commitment to improve diagnostic tools and their availability to people living in malarious areas.Comparison of the OptiMAL rapid antigen test with field microscopy for the detection of Plasmodium vivax and P. falciparum: considerations for the application of the rapid test in Afghanistan.To establish the sensitivity and specificity of a batch of 'OptiMAL 48' rapid antigen tests procured by the World Health Organization in Afghanistan, a sample was tested, in parallel with routine, microscopical diagnosis, at basic health units (BHU) within Afghan refugee camps in Pakistan. The results of both methods of field diagnosis were compared with those of cross-checking microscopy at a reference laboratory, which were taken as the 'gold standard'. Out of 499 patients examined, 36% were diagnosed as malaria cases by field microscopy and 34% by the rapid test. For the OptiMAL 48 test, cross-checking of the corresponding smears at the reference laboratory gave a sensitivity of 79.3% and a specificity of 99.7% for Plasmodium falciparum and corresponding values of 86.1% and 98.7% for P. vivax infections. The performance of the field microscopy was better, with a sensitivity and specificity of 85.2% and 99.7% for P. falciparum, and 90.4% and 98.7% for P. vivax, respectively. These results show that the performance of OptiMAL 48 is adequate for acute- and post-emergency situations when the alternative is just clinical diagnosis. However, in the developing health system of Afghanistan, the main focus should be on the expansion of the existing network for microscopical diagnosis and quality control, to meet the needs of a stable situation. Rapid antigen tests are more suited to investigations of outbreaks in remote situations, where health services are deficient or absent.Management of uncomplicated malaria in febrile under five-year-old children by community health workers in Madagascar: reliability of malaria rapid diagnostic tests.Early diagnosis, as well as prompt and effective treatment of uncomplicated malaria, are essential components of the anti-malaria strategy in Madagascar to prevent severe malaria, reduce mortality and limit malaria transmission. The purpose of this study was to assess the performance of the malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) used by community health workers (CHWs) by comparing RDT results with two reference methods (microscopy and Polymerase Chain Reaction, PCR).Eight CHWs in two districts, each with a different level of endemic malaria transmission, were trained to use RDTs in the management of febrile children under five years of age. RDTs were performed by CHWs in all febrile children who consulted for fever. In parallel, retrospective parasitological diagnoses were made by microscopy and PCR. The results of these different diagnostic methods were analysed to evaluate the diagnostic performance of the RDTs administered by the CHWs. The stability of the RDTs stored by CHWs was also evaluated.Among 190 febrile children with suspected malaria who visited CHWs between February 2009 and February 2010, 89.5% were found to be positive for malaria parasites by PCR, 51.6% were positive by microscopy and 55.8% were positive by RDT. The performance accuracy of the RDTs used by CHWs in terms of sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values was greater than 85%. Concordance between microscopy and RDT, estimated by the Kappa value was 0.83 (95% CI: 0.75-0.91). RDTs stored by CHWs for 24 months were capable of detecting Plasmodium falciparum in blood at a level of 200 parasites/μl.Introduction of easy-to-use diagnostic tools, such as RDTs, at the community level appears to be an effective strategy for improving febrile patient management and for reducing excessive use of anti-malarial drugs.Performance of two malaria rapid diagnostic tests in febrile adult patients with and without human immunodeficiency virus-1 infection in Blantyre, Malawi.The performance of two histidine-rich protein type-2-based malaria rapid diagnostic tests (mRDTs) was examined in a rural area with a high prevalence of malaria and human immunodeficiency virus type-1 (HIV-1) infection in 113 and 445 febrile patients ≥ 15 years of age with and without HIV-1 infection, respectively. Patients were tested for HIV-1 infection by using a standard assay and for Plasmodium falciparum by using two mRDTs and microscopy. When microscopy was used as the gold standard, both mRDTs performed similarly in patients with and without HIV-1 infection: Bioline SD Malaria Antigen P.f, sensitivity 94.4% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 81.3-99.3%) versus 97.1% (95% CI:92.8-99.2%) and specificity 50.6% (95% CI: 39.0-62.2%) versus 47.2% (95% CI: 41.4-53.1%); and ICT diagnostics Malaria Pf, sensitivity 94.4% (95% CI: 81.3-99.3%) versus 97.1% (95% CI: 92.8-99.2%) and specificity 50.6% (95% CI:39.0-62.2%) versus 50.3% (95% CI: 44.4-56.1%). Infection with HIV-1 does not appear to affect the performance of these histidine-rich protein type-2 (HRP-2)-based mRDTs.False-negative rapid diagnostic tests for malaria and deletion of the histidine-rich repeat region of the hrp2 gene.We identified 480 persons with positive thick smears for asexual Plasmodium falciparum parasites, of whom 454 had positive rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for the histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) product of the hrp2 gene and 26 had negative tests. Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) amplification for the histidine-rich repeat region of that gene was negative in one-half (10/22) of false-negative specimens available, consistent with spontaneous deletion. False-negative RDTs were found only in persons with asymptomatic infections, and multiplicities of infection (MOIs) were lower in persons with false-negative RDTs (both P < 0.001). These results show that parasites that fail to produce HRP2 can cause patent bloodstream infections and false-negative RDT results. The importance of these observations is likely to increase as malaria control improves, because lower MOIs are associated with false-negative RDTs and false-negative RDTs are more frequent in persons with asymptomatic infections. These findings suggest that the use of HRP2-based RDTs should be reconsidered.Comparison of three antigen detection methods for diagnosis and therapeutic monitoring of malaria: a field study from southern Vietnam.To compare the sensitivity, specificity and post-treatment persistence of three commonly used rapid antigen detection methods.We studied 252 Vietnamese patients aged from 4 to 60 years, 157 with falciparum and 95 with vivax malaria and 160 healthy volunteers. An initial blood sample was taken for microscopy, and OptiMAL, immunochromatographic test (ICT) malaria P.f./P.v. and Paracheck-Pf tests. Patients with falciparum malaria were treated with an artesunate-based combination regimen and those with vivax malaria received chloroquine. Eighty-seven patients with falciparum malaria who were initially positive for one of the antigen tests and who remained blood smear-negative underwent follow-up testing over 28 days.Paracheck-Pf was the most sensitive test for Plasmodium falciparum (95.8% vs. 82.6% for ICT malaria P.f./P.v. and 49.7% for OptiMAL). Specificities were all 100%. For vivax malaria, OptiMAL performed better than ICT malaria P.f./P.v. (sensitivities 73.7% and 20.0%, respectively), with 100% specificity in both cases. All tests had low sensitivities (< or = 75.0%) at parasitaemias < 1000/microl regardless of malaria species. During follow-up, Paracheck-Pf remained positive in the greatest proportion of patients, especially at higher parasitaemias (> 10,000/microl). Residual OptiMAL positivity occurred only in a relatively small proportion of patients (< 10%) with parasitaemias > 10,000/microl during the first 2 weeks after treatment.Although microscopy remains the gold standard for malaria diagnosis, Paracheck-Pf may prove a useful adjunctive test in uncomplicated falciparum malaria in southern Vietnam. OptiMAL had the lowest sensitivity for P. falciparum but it might have a use in the diagnosis of vivax malaria and perhaps to monitor efficacy of treatment for falciparum malaria where microscopy is unavailable.Comparison of the ParaSight-F test and the ICT Malaria Pf test with the polymerase chain reaction for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in travellers.Rapid and accurate methods are needed for the diagnosis of imported malaria. The ParaSight-F test and the ICT Malaria Pf test are commercially available kits marketed for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria. Both tests are antigen-capture assays based on the detection of P. falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 in peripheral blood. Using microscopy and a polymerase chain reaction (PCR)-based method as reference standards, we performed a 'blinded' comparison of these assays for the detection of P. falciparum infection in 200 febrile travellers returning from malaria-endemic areas. As determined by PCR and microscopy, 148 travellers had malaria and, of these patients, 54.7% (81/148) were infected with P. vivax only, 31.1% (46/148) with P. falciparum only, 9.5% (14/148) with P. ovale, 0.7% (1/148) with P. malariae, and 4.1% (6/148) had mixed infections. Compared to PCR, the ParaSight-F and ICT Malaria Pf tests had initial sensitivities of 94% and 90% and specificities of 95% and 97%, respectively, for the detection of P. falciparum malaria. When discrepant samples were retested with day 0 and day 1 bloods, the sensitivities improved to 96% and 94%, respectively. The 2 remaining false negative results with the Para-Sight-F test and 2 of the 3 false negative results with the ICT Malaria Pf test occurred in samples with < 100 parasites/microL. The performance of these kits was not significantly different (P = 0.75) and both are simple, rapid, and accurate tests for the detection of P. falciparum infection in the returned traveller.Diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria using ParaSight F, ICT malaria PF and malaria IgG CELISA assays.A battery of sixty-six blood samples from Senegal was analysed by the ParaSight F test, the ICT Malaria PF and the Malaria IgG CELISA. These three assays detect the histidine rich protein 2 antigen of Plasmodium falciparum. Thick smear microscopy was used as the reference method. Sensitivity, specificity, predictive positive and negative values were respectively 89%, 100%, 100%, 88% for the ICT; 86%, 93%, 94%, 85% for the paraSight and 88%, 87%, 88%, 87% for the Malaria IgG CELISA. The three assays failed to detect two positive samples with P. ovale and P. malariae. Assays were also compared with regard to the expense of equipment and reagents and speed and ease of use. The rapid ICT and ParaSight F test can be performed with minimal training and may be specially useful in areas where P. falciparum is the predominant malaria species, in epidemic malaria regions, and where skilled microscopy is not readily available.End-user errors in applying two malaria rapid diagnostic tests in a remote area of Sudan.We assessed end-user practice for numerous procedural steps of two types of RDTs: Core Malaria Pf (the cassette format) and OptiMAL IT (the dipstick format). Two types of errors occurred: generic errors common to both types of test and specific errors caused by the test design and manufacturer's instructions. End-user errors were more frequent with OptiMAL IT than Core Pf tests. To improve malaria diagnosis with rapid tests, users require training and better manufacturer's instructions that take into account local conditions.Paracheck Pf compared with microscopy for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria among children in Tanga City, north-eastern Tanzania.Malaria is a major public health problem particularly in rural Sub-Saharan Africa. In most urban areas, malaria transmission intensity is low thus monitoring trends using reliable tools is crucial to provide vital information for future management of the disease. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) such as Paracheck Pf are now increasingly adopted for Plasmodium falciparum malaria diagnosis and are advantageous and cost effective alternative to microscopy. This cross sectional survey was carried out during June 2005 to determine the prevalence of malaria in an urban setting and compare microscopy diagnosis versus Paracheck Pf for detecting Plasmodium falciparum. Blood samples from a total of 301 children (< 10 years) attending outpatient clinic at Makorora Health Centre, in Tanga, Tanzania were examined for the presence of malaria. Twenty-nine (9.6%) of the children were positive to malaria by microscopy while 30 (10.0%) were positive by Paracheck test. Three out of 30 positive cases detected by Paracheck were negative by microscopy; thus considered to be false positive results. For the 271 Paracheck Pf negative cases, 2 were positive by microscopy; yielding 2 false negative results. Paracheck Pf sensitivity and specificity were 93.1% and 98.9%, respectively. P. falciparum was the only malarial species observed among the 29 microscopy positive cases. The prevalence of anaemia among the children was 53.16%. These findings indicate a low prevalence of malaria in Tanga City and that Paracheck Pf can be an effective tool for malaria diagnosis.Diagnosis of imported malaria by Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) and histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP-2)-based immunocapture assays.This study was conducted to evaluate the performance of two rapid non-microscopic assays: Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) assay (OptiMAL) and Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP-2) assay (ICT Malaria). The assays were used to detect malaria infection in 515 immigrants living in Kuwait. The performance of both assays was compared to that of microscopy of Giemsa-stained thick blood films and to each other. Of the 515 patients tested, 163 were positive for malaria parasites by microscopy of thick blood film. Of these, 87 were infected with Plasmodium vivax parasites, 63 with P. falciparum, 1 with Plasmodium malariae, and 12 had mixed infections of P. falciparum and P. vivax. The PfHRP-2 assay detected 53 P. falciparum infections and, as expected, failed to detect all but one case of P. vivax. Three cases of mixed infections were also not detected by this assay. The pLDH assay detected 56 P. falciparum cases and 77 P. vivax infections but failed to detect 4 cases of mixed infections. Compared to microscopy, the performance of both the assays to diagnose P. falciparum infection was comparable. The sensitivity for the PfHRP-2 assay was 82% with a specificity of 99.0% and for the pLDH assay the sensitivity was 89% with a specificity of 99.5%. The PfHRP-2 assay detected 4 false positive cases, 2 of which were also detected by the pLDH assay. These patients reported treatment with chloroquine in the last 2-5 weeks. Though the immunocapture diagnostic assays may be helpful in certain situations, microscopy of thick blood film is still the method of choice in diagnosing imported malaria.Rapid diagnosis of Falciparum malaria by using the ParaSight F test in travellers returning to the United Kingdom: prospective study.Assessing the economic impact of a rapid on-site malaria diagnostic test.A set of three models has been developed for assessing the economic impact of existing and new malaria diagnostic technology, specifically microscopy of blood slides and rapid on-site diagnostic tests (RDT). The models allow for phased introduction of the new technology in targeted areas. The derived computer software program facilitates evaluation of costs to the supplier, to the consumer and aggregate costs, with comparison among the three models to give relative costs of progressive transition from blood slides to RDT technology. The models and the related software program can assist planners in the health sector in determining costs of current programs and assessing the potential economic impact of introducing rapid on-site diagnosis. Details of the models and the operational software program are available on request.Which malaria rapid test for Madagascar? Field and laboratory evaluation of three tests and expert microscopy of samples from suspected malaria patients in Madagascar.Field and laboratory studies were carried out in October and November 2005 to provide a comparative evaluation of the performance of three rapid malaria detection tests, two of which were recently introduced (the CareStart Malaria test and the SD Malaria Antigen Bioline test) and the well-known OptiMAL-IT test. Compared with microscopy, the sensitivity of the three tests to detect Plasmodium falciparum malaria was 97% for the CareStart Malaria test, 89.4% for the SD Malaria Antigen Bioline test, and 92.6% for the OptiMAL-IT test. The three tests were less sensitive in detecting non-P. falciparum infections, and the sensitivity decreased at levels of parasitemia<or=500 parasites/microL for P. falciparum and<or=5,000 parasites/microL for other Plasmodium spp. On the basis of World Health Organization recommendations, only the CareStart Malaria test and the OptiMAL-IT test had sensitivities greater than 95% for samples with parasitemias>or=100 parasites/microL.Comparative study of sensitivity of rapid diagnostic (hexagon) test with calculated malarial parasitic density in peripheral blood.Different diagnostic test kits are used for rapid diagnosis of malaria. Most are based on antigen detection (pLDH, Pan Aldolase, HRP-2). In context of Nepal the diagnostic reliability and sensitivity of these tests is unknown. Hexagon Malaria Combi™ is one of the most commonly used test kit in Nepal for rapid diagnosis of malaria. The aim of the present study is to evaluate the sensitivity of the Hexagon malaria Combi test in comparison with parasitic density by microscopy technique.A Cross sectional prospective study was conducted in three districts of Nepal from September to November 2009. Blood samples were collected from the suspected cases of malaria. Thick and thin smear were prepared from all the samples and Giemsa stain was done. Simultaneously RDT (hexagon) for malaria was done. When RDT was found to be positive, blood was serially diluted in 6 tubes as 1:2, 1:4, 1:8, 1:16, 1:32 and 1:64. RDT was done on diluted blood till RDT test gave negative result. Parasitic density was calculated for undiluted and diluted blood samples and sensitivity of RDT in various parasitic densities was calculated.Hexagon malaria combi test is sensitive (86%) when malarial parasitic density is >500/μl. Sensitivity was found to be directly related to parasitic density. Its sensitivity is very low (2.9%) when parasitic density is less than 500/ μl.The sensitivity of rapid diagnostic test (hexagon Combi test detecting malarial pLDH antigen) is high only if the parasitic density is more than 500/μl.Multicenter study to evaluate the OptiMAL test for rapid diagnosis of malaria in U.S. hospitals.More than 1,000 cases of malaria are diagnosed each year in the United States. Reported numbers, however, may be artificially low because many clinicians fail to consider the diagnosis on presentation, U.S. hospital laboratory technologists have very limited experience in detecting and identifying malaria parasites, and reporting of malaria to state health departments is sporadic in many states. In this study, a rapid malaria diagnostic test, the OptiMAL test (DiaMed; under license from Flow Inc., Portland, Oreg.) was evaluated in six U.S. hospitals and compared with results of microscopy. The OptiMAL test is a 15-min rapid immunochromatographic test that both identifies and differentiates Plasmodium falciparum from non-P. falciparum malaria parasites on the basis of the detection of parasite lactate dehydrogenase in a drop of patient blood. A total of 216 specimens from patients suspected of having malaria were tested. Results indicated that 43 samples (20%) were positive for malaria parasites by microscopy (32 P. falciparum, 11 non-P. falciparum) while 42 (19%) were positive by OptiMAL (31 P. falciparum, 11 non-P. falciparum). The sensitivity of the OptiMAL test was 98%; its specificity was 100%, with positive and negative predictive values of 100 and 99%, respectively. Participating hospital physicians and laboratory directors independently reported that the OptiMAL rapid malaria test was accurate, easy to use, and well accepted by those working in their diagnostic laboratories. The overall conclusion was that integration of the OptiMAL rapid malaria test into the U.S. health care infrastructure would provide an important and easy-to-use tool for the timely diagnosis of malaria.Evaluation of the sensitivity of a pLDH-based and an aldolase-based rapid diagnostic test for diagnosis of uncomplicated and severe malaria caused by PCR-confirmed Plasmodium knowlesi, Plasmodium falciparum, and Plasmodium vivax.Plasmodium knowlesi can cause severe and fatal human malaria in Southeast Asia. Rapid diagnosis of all Plasmodium species is essential for initiation of effective treatment. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) are sensitive for detection of uncomplicated and severe falciparum malaria but have not been systematically evaluated in knowlesi malaria. At a tertiary referral hospital in Sabah, Malaysia, we prospectively evaluated the sensitivity of two combination RDTs for the diagnosis of uncomplicated and severe malaria from all three potentially fatal Plasmodium species, using a pan-Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH)-P. falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP2) RDT (First Response) and a pan-Plasmodium aldolase-PfHRP2 RDT (ParaHIT). Among 293 hospitalized adults with PCR-confirmed Plasmodium monoinfection, the sensitivity of the pLDH component of the pLDH-PfHRP2 RDT was 74% (95/129; 95% confidence interval [CI], 65 to 80%), 91% (110/121; 95% CI, 84 to 95%), and 95% (41/43; 95% CI, 85 to 99%) for PCR-confirmed P. knowlesi, P. falciparum, and P. vivax infections, respectively, and 88% (30/34; 95% CI, 73 to 95%), 90% (38/42; 95% CI, 78 to 96%), and 100% (12/12; 95% CI, 76 to 100%) among patients tested before antimalarial treatment was begun. Sensitivity in severe malaria was 95% (36/38; 95% CI, 83 to 99), 100% (13/13; 95% CI, 77 to 100), and 100% (7/7; 95% CI, 65 to 100%), respectively. The aldolase component of the aldolase-PfHRP2 RDT performed poorly in all Plasmodium species. The pLDH-based RDT was highly sensitive for the diagnosis of severe malaria from all species; however, neither the pLDH- nor aldolase-based RDT demonstrated sufficiently high overall sensitivity for P. knowlesi. More sensitive RDTs are needed in regions of P. knowlesi endemicity.Comparative evaluation of bivalent malaria rapid diagnostic tests versus traditional methods in field with special reference to heat stability testing in Central India.Malaria presents a diagnostic challenge in areas where both Plasmodium falciparum and P.vivax are co-endemic. Bivalent Rapid Diagnostic tests (RDTs) showed promise as diagnostic tools for P.falciparum and P.vivax. To assist national malaria control programme in the selection of RDTs, commercially available seven malaria RDTs were evaluated in terms of their performance with special reference to heat stability.This study was undertaken in four forested districts of central India (July, 2011- March, 2012). All RDTs were tested simultaneously in field along with microscopy as gold standard. These RDTs were stored in their original packing at 25°C before transport to the field or they were stored at 35°C and 45°C upto 100 days for testing the performance of RDTs at high temperature. In all 2841 patients with fever were screened for malaria of which 26% were positive for P.falciparum, and 17% for P.vivax. The highest sensitivity of any RDT for P.falciparum was 98% (95% CI; 95.9-98.8) and lowest sensitivity was 76% (95% CI; 71.7-79.6). For P.vivax highest and lowest sensitivity for any RDT was 80% (95% CI; 94.9 - 83.9) and 20% (95% CI; 15.6-24.5) respectively. Heat stability experiments showed that most RDTs for P.falciparum showed high sensitivity at 45°C upto 90 days. While for P.vivax only two RDTs maintained good sensitivity upto day 90 when compared with RDTs kept at room temperature. Agreement between observers was excellent for positive and negative readings for both P.falciparum and P.vivax (Kappa >0.6-0.9).This is first field evaluation of RDTs regarding their temperature stability. Although RDTs are useful as diagnostic tool for P.falciparum and P.vivax even at high temperature, the quality of RDTs should be regulated and monitored more closely.Application of the ParaSight-F dipstick test for malaria diagnosis in a district control program.A rapid test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infections based on the detection of histidine-rich-protein II, the ParaSight-F test, was evaluated after introduction in a district malaria control program in Uganda. Suspected treatment failures, pregnant women and infants with clinical malaria and general fever cases were tested at health facilities in malaria hypo-, meso- and holoendemic areas. A total of 1326 tests were carried out by health unit staff, cross read by experienced laboratory staff and results compared with thick film microscopy as the standard. Rater agreement in reading the dipstick result between health unit staff and laboratory staff was high, kappa index 0.94 (0.88-0.99). Sensitivity was 99.6% (99.0-100) for parasite densities above 500/microl, 98.6% (97.7-99.6) for densities above 50/microl and 22.2% (8.6-42.3) for densities below 10/microl. With the applied testing strategies no differences were found between endemicity levels or patient categories. Specificity was 86.2% (83.3-88.8) overall, but significantly higher in general fever cases (92.7%) compared to the other patient groups (84.3%, P=0.009). At the given prevalences positive predictive values (ppv) were above 80% and negative predictive values (npv) above 90% in all cases except in pregnant women (ppv: 77.8%). We conclude that in certain situations this test is an alternative to microscopy to improve diagnostic facilities for case management in malaria control programs in endemic African countries.Operational trial of ParaSight-F (dipstick) in the diagnosis of falciparum malaria at the primary health care level.The rapid manual ParaSight-F test of Plasmodium falciparum malaria, an antigen capture test for detecting trophozoite-derived histidine rich protein-2 (PF HRP-2), is simple to perform and provides a definite diagnosis within 10 minutes. During an operational trial at health centers and mobile malaria units where microscopical diagnosis is not available and using defined symptom screening criteria, 3,361 subjects were tested yielding 618 positives (18.4%) for PF-HRP-2 by ParaSight-F. Microscopic examination of the same subjects by thick blood film examined 7 days later at a malaria clinic showed 578 falciparum, and 349 vivax and mixed infection (F+V) 41. The technology proved highly effective in detecting falciparum malaria at the peripheral levels where access to malaria laboratory services are difficult, thus allowing immediate administration of a complete course of treatment in the absence of a microscopic examination.Evaluation of a rapid whole blood immunochromatographic assay for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax malaria.Microscopic examination of blood smears is the 'gold standard' for malaria diagnosis, but is labour intensive and requires skilled operators. Plasmodium vivax malaria accounts for up to 70% of infections in Sri Lanka. The objective of this study was to determine the effectiveness of an immunochromatographic test which can detect both the species of Plasmodium, P. vivax and P. falciparum, present in Sri Lanka.Prospective study from May 2001 to March 2002.All persons above 5 years of age who presented to the Malaria Research Station, Kataragama or the Anti-malaria Clinic, Kurunegala, with a history of fever were recruited to the study. Thick and thin blood smears were examined for malarial parasites. The rapid diagnostic test (RDT), ICT Malaria P.f/P.v (AMRAD ICT, Australia) was performed simultaneously by an independent investigator. The severity of clinical disease of all patients was evaluated.The study sample comprised 328 individuals of whom 126 (38%) were infected, 102 with P. vivax (31.1%) and 24 with P. falciparum (7.3%). The RDT was found to be highly sensitive (100%) and specific (100%) for the diagnosis of P. falciparum when compared with field microscopy. The sensitivity for the diagnosis of P. vivax malaria was only 70%. When P. vivax parasitaemia was greater than 5000 parasites/microL the RDT was 96.2% sensitive. A significant association was noted between the band intensity on the dipstick and both peripheral blood parasitaemia (p < 0.001) and clinical severity of disease with P. vivax (p = 0.011).The ICT Malaria P.f/P.v test can be used in Sri Lanka in the absence of microscopists.Influence of rapid malaria diagnostic tests on treatment and health outcome in fever patients, Zanzibar: a crossover validation study.The use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for Plasmodium falciparum malaria is being suggested to improve diagnostic efficiency in peripheral health care settings in Africa. Such improved diagnostics are critical to minimize overuse and thereby delay development of resistance to artemisinin-based combination therapies (ACTs). Our objective was to study the influence of RDT-aided malaria diagnosis on drug prescriptions, health outcomes, and costs in primary health care settings.We conducted a cross-over validation clinical trial in four primary health care units in Zanzibar. Patients of all ages with reported fever in the previous 48 hours were eligible and allocated alternate weeks to RDT-aided malaria diagnosis or symptom-based clinical diagnosis (CD) alone. Follow-up was 14 days. ACT was to be prescribed to patients diagnosed with malaria in both groups. Statistical analyses with multilevel modelling were performed. A total of 1,887 patients were enrolled February through August 2005. RDT was associated with lower prescription rates of antimalarial treatment than CD alone, 361/1005 (36%) compared with 752/882 (85%) (odds ratio [OR] 0.04, 95% confidence interval [CI] 0.03-0.05, p<0.001). Prescriptions of antibiotics were higher after RDT than CD alone, i.e., 372/1005 (37%) and 235/882 (27%) (OR 1.8, 95%CI 1.5-2.2, p<0.001), respectively. Reattendance due to perceived unsuccessful clinical cure was lower after RDT 25/1005 (2.5%), than CD alone 43/882 (4.9%) (OR 0.5, 95% CI 0.3-0.9, p = 0.005). Total average cost per patient was similar: USD 2.47 and 2.37 after RDT and CD alone, respectively.RDTs resulted in improved adequate treatment and health outcomes without increased cost per patient. RDTs may represent a tool for improved management of patients with fever in peripheral health care settings.(Clinicaltrials.gov) NCT00549003.Evaluation of a rapid dipstick test, Malar-Check, for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Brazil.The present study was carried out to evaluate the Malar-Check trade mark Pf test, an immunochromatographic assay that detects Plasmodium falciparum Histidine Rich Protein II, does not require equipment, and is easy and rapid to perform. In dilution assays performed to test sensitivity against known parasite density, Malar-Check were compared with thick blood smear (TBS), the gold standard for diagnosis. Palo Alto isolate or P. falciparum blood from patients with different parasitemias was used. The average cut-off points for each technique in three independent experiments were 12 and 71 parasites/mm3 (TBS and Malar-Check, respectively). In the field assays, samples were collected from patients with fever who visited endemic regions. Compared to TBS, Malar-Check yielded true-positive results in 38 patients, false-positive results in 3, true-negative results in 23, and false-negative result in 1. Malar-Check performed with samples from falciparum-infected patients after treatment showed persistence of antigen up to 30 days. Malar-Check should aid the diagnosis of P. falciparum in remote areas and improve routine diagnosis even when microscopy is available. Previous P. falciparum infection, which can determine a false-positive test in cured individuals, should be considered. The prompt results obtained with the Malar-Check for early diagnosis could avoid disease evolution to severe cases.Comparison of clinical, microscopic and rapid diagnostic test methods in the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Enugu, Nigeria.To compare the use of clinical, microscopic and immunochromato-graphic methods in the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria.Children with history of fever were consecutively recruited. Information on personal characteristics, and clinical features were obtained with the parental consent before enrolment. Malaria parasite density was done with quantitative microscopy, as well as specie identification in both local and reference laboratories. Rapid diagnostic test (RDT) kits were also used for parasite detection.Eighty three children had clinical diagnosis of malaria, while the remaining 6 had other diagnoses. On microscopy 89 and 26 patients had parasitaemia by the local and reference laboratories respectively. With the RDT, 15 patients had parasitaemia with corresponding minimum densities of 1200 and 716 parasites per ul from the local and reference laboratories. The sensitivity and specificity of the RDT to the reference laboratory were 42.31% and 93.65% respectively, while concordance was 57.69% for RDT, 30.49% for clinical diagnosis (all symptoms), 43.75% for clinical diagnosis (fever alone), and 29.21% for local laboratory.There was a significant deficiency in malaria diagnosis using any of the methods alone. For reliable diagnosis of malaria a combination of the methods of diagnosis is recommended. Degradation of the RDTs might have contributed to its low sensitivity. Training and better quality assurance should be established for the medical and laboratory workers in order to improve malaria diagnosis.Evaluation of the ICT malaria P.f/P.v and the OptiMal rapid diagnostic tests for malaria in febrile returned travellers.Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) are less reliant on expert microscopy and have the potential to reduce errors in malaria diagnosis but have not been extensively evaluated in nonimmune persons or in countries where infection is not endemic. We evaluated the ICT P.f/P.v (ICT-Amrad, Sydney, Australia) and OptiMal (Flow Inc., Portland, Oreg.) assays prospectively for the diagnosis of malaria in 158 specimens from 144 febrile returned travellers in Australia by using expert microscopy and PCR as reference standards. Malaria was diagnosed in 93 specimens from 87 patients by expert microscopy, with 3 additional specimens from recently treated patients testing positive for Plasmodium falciparum by PCR. For the diagnosis of asexual-stage P. falciparum malaria, the sensitivity and specificity of the ICT P.f/P.v assay were 97 and 90%, respectively, and those of the OptiMal assay were 85 and 96%, respectively. The ICT P.f/P.v assay missed one infection with a density of 45 parasites/ micro l, whereas the OptiMal assay missed infections up to 2,500/ micro l; below 1,000/ micro l, its sensitivity was only 43%. For the diagnosis of P. vivax malaria, the sensitivity and specificity of the ICT P.f/P.v assay were 44 and 100%, respectively, and those of the OptiMal assay were 80 and 97%, respectively. Both assays missed infections with parasite densities over 5,000/ micro l: up to 10,000/ micro l with the former and 5,300/ micro l with the latter. Despite the high sensitivity of the ICT P.f/P.v assay for P. falciparum malaria, caution is warranted before RDTs are widely adopted for the diagnosis of malaria in nonimmune patients or in countries where malaria is not endemic.Comparison of the OptiMAL rapid test and microscopy for detection of malaria in pregnant women in Nigeria.Malaria during pregnancy causes anaemia in pregnant women and low birthweight in infants. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the OptiMAL rapid malaria test in comparison with standard microscopy for malaria diagnosis in 268 pregnant women attending antenatal clinics at the Jos University Teaching Hospital and the Federal Medical Centre-Gombe in Nigeria. Positive results by either method were confirmed using a polymerase chain reaction assay for malaria. Although the OptiMAL assay did not detect malaria in the blood of pregnant women with low levels of parasitaemia, it may be useful for the detection of placental malaria which predisposes to low birthweight infants.Field evaluation of the OptiMAL rapid malaria diagnostic test during anti-malarial therapy in Guyana.Rapid diagnostic modalities for malaria.Short report: Field evaluation of posttreatment sensitivity for monitoring parasite clearance of Plasmodium falciparum malaria by use of the Determine Malaria pf test in central India.The posttreatment performance of the Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein rapid diagnostic test Determine Malaria pf (Abbott Laboratories, Tokyo, Japan) was assessed in 70 patients in central India with uncomplicated falciparum malaria who were treated with chloroquine, sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine, and arteether. Data were compared with those of microscopy. Results revealed that the sensitivity for predicting recrudescence by means of the Determine test after treatment with chloroquine on Day 14 was 75%, with 50% specificity. However, antigenemia was detected in 16% of patients as late as Day 21 in sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine-treated subjects with a drug-sensitive response. Clearance of parasitemia in thick blood smear and clearance of antigenemia appeared to parallel each other only in arteether-treated subjects. The observed diagnostic trends therefore mean that the potential of the Determine test to detect recrudescent infection is limited.Rapid diagnostic testing for malaria.Malaria rapid diagnostic devices (MRDD) have been developed with the hope that they would offer accurate, reliable, rapid, cheap and easily available alternatives to traditional methods of malaria diagnosis. The results from early malaria rapid diagnostic studies were quite promising, especially for detecting Plasmodium falciparum at densities of more than 100-500 parasites/microl. Despite the introduction of these devices over a decade ago, only a few target antigens have been introduced. Of greater concern, these devices have shown limitations in sensitivity, ability to differentiate species and robustness under field conditions in the tropics. Recent trials have revealed wide variability in sensitivity both within and between products. We review the recent trials assessing MRDD use for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and non-P. falciparum infections in endemic and non-endemic countries and describe the various aspects of these devices which need further improvement. High quality, accurate, rapid and affordable diagnostic tools are urgently needed now that new antimalarial regimens, characterized by higher cost and increased toxicity, have been introduced more widely in response to emerging multi-drug resistance.Field trial of the RTM dipstick method for the rapid diagnosis of malaria based on the detection of Plasmodium falciparum HRP-2 antigen in whole blood.The performance of the Quorum RapidTest Malaria (RTM) dipstick method that detects Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein-2 (PfHRP-2) antigen in whole blood was evaluated in a malaria endemic area. Results were compared with conventional Giemsa-stained blood films. Of 306 people tested 37.9% (116/306) were found to be parasitaemic; of these 66.4% (77/116) were P. vivax and 32.8% (38/116) were P. falciparum infections. There was only one (0.9%) mixed P. falciparum plus P. vivax infection. The RTM test was positive in 35/36 patients with P. falciparum identified on blood smear examination, resulting in a sensitivity of 97.2% [95% confidence interval (CI): 91.6-102.8%]. Specificity was 96.3% (95% CI: 93.9-98.6%). The RTM test had a positive predictive value of 77.8% (95% CI: 65.7-89.9%) and a negative predictive value of 99.6% (95% CI: 98.4-100.8%). Of the 10 false positives, seven reported recent malaria episode and treatment, indicating persistence of antigenaemia. If these were assumed truly infected, the positive predictive value is increased to 93.3% (95% CI: 85.8-100.8%). The RTM test was positive in all seven P. falciparum infections with gametocytes and one mixed infection, but was negative in all falciparum gametocytes and relapsing fever cases. All but one P. vivax infection gave negative result on the RTM test. The RTM test missed one patient with parasitaemia. The test is highly sensitive and specific requiring no instrument or trained personnel. It appears to be a very useful tool for rapid diagnosis of malaria, especially in the rural health institutions with limited diagnostic facilities.Seasonal performance of a malaria rapid diagnosis test at community health clinics in a malaria-hyperendemic region of Burkina Faso.Treatment of confirmed malaria patients with Artemisinin-based Combination Therapy (ACT) at remote areas is the goal of many anti-malaria programs. Introduction of effective and affordable malaria Rapid Diagnosis Test (RDT) in remote areas could be an alternative tool for malaria case management. This study aimed to assess performance of the OptiMAL dipstick for rapid malaria diagnosis in children under five.Malaria symptomatic and asymptomatic children were recruited in a passive manner in two community clinics (CCs). Malaria diagnosis by microscopy and RDT were performed. Performance of the tests was determined.RDT showed similar ability (61.2%) to accurately diagnose malaria as microscopy (61.1%). OptiMAL showed a high level of sensitivity and specificity, compared with microscopy, during both transmission seasons (high & low), with a sensitivity of 92.9% vs. 74.9% and a specificity of 77.2% vs. 87.5%.By improving the performance of the test through accurate and continuous quality control of the device in the field, OptiMAL could be suitable for use at CCs for the management and control of malaria.Comparison of different methods for delayed post-mortem diagnosis of falciparum malaria.Between 10,000 and 12,000 cases of imported malaria are notified in the European Union each year. Despite an excellent health care system, fatalities do occur. In case of advanced autolysis, the post-mortem diagnostic is impaired. Quicker diagnosis could be achieved by using rapid diagnostic malaria tests.In order to evaluate different methods for the post-mortem diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in non-immunes, a study was performed on the basis of forensic autopsies of corpses examined at variable intervals after death in five cases of fatal malaria (with an interval of four hours to five days), and in 20 cases of deaths unrelated to malaria. Detection of parasite DNA by PCR and an immunochromatographic test (ICT) based upon the detection of P. falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP2) were compared with the results of microscopic examination of smears from cadaveric blood, histopathological findings, and autopsy results.In all cases of fatal malaria, post-mortem findings were unsuspicious for the final diagnosis, and autoptic investigations, including histopathology, were only performed because of additional information by police officers and neighbours. Macroscopic findings during autopsy were unspecific. Histopathology confirmed sequestration of erythrocytes and pigment in macrophages in most organs in four patients (not evaluable in one patient due to autolysis). Microscopy of cadaveric blood smears revealed remnants of intraerythrocytic parasites, and was compromised or impossible due to autolysis in two cases. PCR and ICT performed with cadaveric blood were positive in all malaria patients and negative in all controls.In non-immune fatalities with unclear anamnesis, ICT can be recommended as a sensitive and specific tool for post-mortem malaria diagnosis, which is easier and faster than microscopy, and also applicable when microscopic examination is impossible due to autolysis. PCR is more expensive and time-consuming, but may be used as confirmatory test. In highly endemic areas where asymptomatic parasitaemia is common, confirmation of the diagnosis of malaria as the cause of death has to rely on histopathological findings.[Malaria diagnosis and treatment in a rural Health Centre in Mayotte (Comoro archipelago, 2002)].With a marked increase in both morbidity and mortality, as well as a high level of resistance to chloroquine (CQ), malaria is once again a major public health problem in Mayotte, a French overseas territory in the Comoro archipelago. The object of this study is to assess the contribution in the field of two new antimalarial fight steps taken in 2001-2002: The use of the rapid diagnostic test (RDT) for malaria OptiMAL in the rural health centres and the drop of the CQ alone for the simultaneous administration of CQ and sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine (SP) as the first-line treatment for uncomplicated malaria. All 581 suspected malaria attacks, diagnosed by RDT during the year 2002 in a rural health centre of the island, were registered. The good positive predictive value of the RDT used (97.2%) calculated during the study has permitted an important reduction of the rate of wrongly administer antimalarial treatment. Before RDT was used, through lack of emergency microscopic diagnosis, the antimalarial treatment was presumptive in the isolated health centres and that rate was superior to 90%. It is now below 3%. Before the introduction of the new protocol, in the middle of the year 2002, the rate of therapeutic failures with CQ used alone was 40.2% (33/82). With the simultaneous administration of CQ and SP as a first-line treatment, this rate fell down to 1.8% (6/337). For the time being, this new treatment policy is acceptable in Mayotte. But the experience of the countries who have adopted this therapeutic policy shows that the effectiveness of the association CQ-SP is likely to be temporary. It is necessary to set up a "durable long-term" therapy strategy in Mayotte as soon as possible by adopting as first-line treatment for uncomplicated malaria a combination therapy according to the recommendations of the World Health Organization. It could be the artemether-lumefantrine combination which has already been the subject of an efficacy survey in the island.Rapid testing for malaria in settings where microscopy is available and peripheral clinics where only presumptive treatment is available: a randomised controlled trial in Ghana.To test in West Africa the impact of rapid diagnostic tests on the prescription of antimalarials and antibiotics both where microscopy is used for the diagnosis of malaria and in clinical (peripheral) settings that rely on clinical diagnosis.Randomised, controlled, open label clinical trial.Four clinics in the rural Dangme West district of southern Ghana, one in which microscopy is used for diagnosis of malaria ("microscopy setting") and three where microscopy is not available and diagnosis of malaria is made on the basis of clinical symptoms ("clinical setting").Patients with suspected malaria. Interventions Patients were randomly assigned to either a rapid diagnostic test or the current diagnostic method at the clinic (microscopy or clinical diagnosis). A blood sample for a research microscopy slide was taken for all patients.The primary outcome was the prescription of antimalarials to patients of any age whose double read research slide was negative for malaria. The major secondary outcomes were the correct prescription of antimalarials, the impact of test results on antibiotic prescription, and the correct prescription of antimalarials in children under 5 years.Of the 9236 patients screened, 3452 were randomised in the clinical setting and 3811 in the microscopy setting. Follow-up to 28 days was 97.6% (7088/7263). In the microscopy setting, 722 (51.6%) of the 1400 patients with negative research slides in the rapid diagnostic test arm were treated for malaria compared with 764 (55.0%) of the 1389 patients in the microscopy arm (adjusted odds ratio 0.87, 95% CI 0.71 to 1.1; P=0.16). In the clinical setting, 578 (53.9%) of the 1072 patients in the rapid diagnostic test arm with negative research slides were treated for malaria compared with 982 (90.1%) of the 1090 patients with negative slides in the clinical diagnosis arm (odds ratio 0.12, 95% CI 0.04 to 0.38; P=0.001). The use of rapid diagnostic tests led to better targeting of antimalarials and antibiotics in the clinical but not the microscopy setting, in both children and adults. There were no deaths in children under 5 years at 28 days follow-up in either arm.Where microscopy already exists, introducing rapid diagnostic tests had limited impact on prescriber behaviour. In settings where microscopy was not available, however, using rapid diagnostic tests led to a significant reduction in the overprescription of antimalarials, without any evidence of clinical harm, and to better targeting of antibiotics. Trial registration ClinicalTrials.gov NCT00493922.Comparison of optimal malarial test with light microscopy for the diagnosis of malaria.To evaluate the efficacy of a parasite lactate dehydrogenase-based immunochromatographic antigen detection assay (optimal) against conventional light microscopy in the diagnosis of malaria at Military Hospital, Rawalpindi and Department of Pathology Army Medical College Rawalpindi from August to October 2002 in patients reporting sick with history suggestive of malaria.The blood samples were collected from 215 patients reporting with symptoms suggestive of malaria. Thick and thin blood films were prepared, stained with Leishman's stain and examined by light microscopy for the presence of malarial parasites. Parasitaemia was estimated on all positive slides. All samples were tested for presence of malarial parasite by optimal dipstick method according to the manufacturer's instructions.A total of 215 cases were studied. Malarial parasites were visualized in 98 (45.5%) cases with light microscopy. Optimal test revealed 93 (43.2%) of these samples as positive. Microscopy showed 61 out of 98 positive cases to be P. vivax and 37 P. falciparum. The Optimal dipstick method revealed that 58 out of 93 were positive for P. vivax and 35 positive for P. falciparum. These results demonstrated that Optimal had sensitivities of 95% and 94.5% for P. vivax and P. falciparum respectively. It has 100% specificity for both malarial species, when compared to conventional microscopy.Optimal test showed excellent correlation with microscopy in the diagnosis of P. vivax and P. falciparum. It is expensive but it has an advantage of being simple, rapid and effective test in the diagnosis of malaria especially where well trained microscopists are not available or work load is too high.Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2-based immunocapture diagnostic assay for malaria: cross-reactivity with rheumatoid factors.Recently introduced rapid nonmicroscopic immunocapture assays for the diagnosis of malaria infection are being evaluated for their sensitivity and specificity in various epidemiological settings. A Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP-2)-based assay (ICT) and a Plasmodium-specific lactate dehydrogenase test (OptiMAL) were evaluated for their specificities in different groups of patients who tested negative for malaria infection by microscopy. The patients were selected from different disease groups: rheumatoid arthritis, hepatitis C, toxoplasmosis, schistosomiasis, and hydatid disease. One hundred thirty-three of the 225 patients were positive for rheumatoid factor. Thirty-five of the 133 (26%) rheumatoid factor-positive patients gave a false-positive reaction with the ICT assay, but only 4 of these gave false-positive reactions with the OptiMAL test. Thirty-three of the 35 false-positive specimens became negative when repeat tested with the ICT assay after absorbing out the rheumatoid factor activity. Our study shows that the PfHRP-2-based ICT assay gave a false-positive reaction in 26% of the patients who had rheumatoid factors, but were negative for malaria by microscopy.Comparison of a rapid field immunochromatographic test to expert microscopy for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum asexual parasitemia in Thailand.We assessed a rapid, Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein 2 (PfHRP2)-based immunochromatographic test (ICT Malaria Pf Test), for detection of asexual P. falciparum parasitemia in 551 subjects in three groups: (1) symptomatic patients self-referring for diagnosis, (2) villagers in a screening survey, and (3) patients recently treated for P. falciparum malaria. Expert light microscopy was the reference standard. ICT test performance was similar for diagnostic and screening modes. Four findings emerged: (1) test sensitivity correlated directly with parasite density, (2) test band intensity correlated directly with parasite density, (3) persistent test positivity after parasite clearance precludes its use for monitoring early therapeutic responses, and (4) a false negative test at 18,000 parasites/microl is unexplained. We conclude that a strong positive ICT test is highly predictive of falciparum asexual parasitemia for the diagnosis of new cases of falciparum malaria in Thailand, but a negative test result is inadequate to exclude parasitemia < 300/microl, and in some instances, even a higher parasitemia.The ParaSight-F rapid dipstick antigen capture assay for monitoring parasite clearance after drug treatment of Plasmodium falciparum malaria.Three methods for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum infection in peripheral blood were compared during antimalarial treatment and follow-up in 32 Burundian patients: dipstick antigen capture assay, standard (TBF) and prolonged thick blood film examination (PTBF) (3 x 5 min and 3 x 20 min examination respectively). Parasitaemia was determined daily by comparison with total white blood cell counts (determined by Coulter counter) until no parasite was detected on 2 consecutive days by PTBF. Cumulatively, 231 observations were made with each assay: 64 were negative and 167 positive by PTBF (59 had parasite counts < or = 100/microL). Compared to PTBF, the sensitivities of TBF and the dipstick assay were 1.0 for parasite counts > 100/microL and 0.458 and 0.966 respectively for counts < or = 100/microL. Overall, the dipstick assay was significantly more sensitive (0.988 vs. 0.808; P < 0.001) but less specific (P = 0.013) than TBF. The dipstick assay is of potential use for monitoring response to drug treatment and for detecting low parasitaemias.Malaria diagnosis by field workers using an immunochromatographic test.A rapid immunodiagnostic test (ICT Malaria PfTest) has been developed by ICT Diagnostics (Sydney, Australia) for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection. The test is an antigen capture assay based on the detection of P. falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 in peripheral blood. This study was undertaken to assess the performance and usefulness of the test as a diagnostic method in highly malarious, inaccessible forested villages of Mandla district, central India. In all, 353 patients with fever were scanned by the test in parallel with thick blood film examination. The sensitivity and specificity were 100% and 84.5%, respectively. The whole test took about 5 min. The test results became negative in most cases (70%) within 7 d after initiation of curative chemotherapy. The test is simple, easy to learn and accurate, and may prove to be an important tool in the battle against falciparum malaria.Use of malaria rapid diagnostic test to identify Plasmodium knowlesi infection.Reports of human infection with Plasmodium knowlesi, a monkey malaria, suggest that it and other nonhuman malaria species may be an emerging health problem. We report the use of a rapid test to supplement microscopic analysis in distinguishing the 5 malaria species that infect humans.[Malaria diagnosis: thickdrop and bloodsmear examination, and rapid test].Evaluation of a rapid and inexpensive dipstick assay for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria.Rapid, accurate and affordable methods are needed for the diagnosis of malaria. Reported here is an evaluation of a new immunochromatographic strip, the PATH Falciparum Malaria IC Strip, which is impregnated with an immobilized IgM monoclonal antibody that binds to the HRP-II antigen of Plasmodium falciparum. In contrast to other commercially available kits marketed for the rapid diagnosis of falciparum malaria, this kit should be affordable in the malaria-endemic world. Using microscopy and polymerase chain reaction (PCR)-based methods as reference standards, we compared two versions of the PATH test for the detection of P. falciparum infection in 200 febrile travellers. As determined by PCR and microscopy, 148 travellers had malaria, 50 of whom (33.8%) were infected with P. falciparum. Compared with PCR, the two versions of the PATH test had initial sensitivities of 90% and 88% and specificities of 97% and 96%, respectively, for the detection of falciparum malaria. When discrepant samples were retested blindly with a modified procedure (increased sample volume and longer washing step) the sensitivity and specificity of both kits improved to 96% and 99%, respectively. The two remaining false negatives occurred in samples with < 100 parasites per microliter of blood. The accuracy, simplicity and predicted low cost may make this test a useful diagnostic tool in malaria-endemic areas.Cross-reactivity in rapid diagnostic tests between human malaria and zoonotic simian malaria parasite Plasmodium knowlesi infections.Plasmodium knowlesi has a relatively broad host range extending to humans, in whom it causes zoonotic malaria. Recent studies have shown that human infection with P. knowlesi is widely distributed in forested areas of Southeast Asia. In the present study, we evaluated commercial rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for human malaria to assess their reactivity and sensitivity in detecting P. knowlesi parasites using blood samples obtained from infected monkeys. The blood samples were assayed using two commercial RDTs based on immunochromatographic assays: (i) the OptiMAL-IT, designed to detect parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) of both P. falciparum and other plasmodia, and (ii) the Entebe Malaria Cassette (MC), designed to detect P. falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP2) and P. vivax-specific pLDH. Interestingly, when the P. knowlesi-infected blood samples were examined with the RDTs, OptiMAL test results were interpreted as falciparum malaria-positive, while Entebe MC test results were interpreted as vivax malaria-positive. The sensitivities of both tests in detecting P. knowlesi parasite were similar to those for P. falciparum and higher than P. vivax. Thus, commercial RDTs based on detection of pLDH should be used with great caution, and should not replace conventional microscopy in the diagnosis of suspected cases of P. knowlesi malaria.Cost-effectiveness analysis of rapid diagnostic test, microscopy and syndromic approach in the diagnosis of malaria in Nigeria: implications for scaling-up deployment of ACT.The diagnosis and treatment of malaria is often based on syndromic presentation (presumptive treatment) and microscopic examination of blood films. Treatment based on syndromic approach has been found to be costly, and contributes to the development of drug resistance, while microscopic diagnosis of malaria is time-consuming and labour-intensive. Also, there is lack of trained microscopists and reliable equipment especially in rural areas of Nigeria. However, although rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) have improved the ease of appropriate diagnosis of malaria diagnosis, the cost-effectiveness of RDTs in case management of malaria has not been evaluated in Nigeria. The study hence compares the cost-effectiveness of RDT versus syndromic diagnosis and microscopy.A total of 638 patients with fever, clinically diagnosed as malaria (presumptive malaria) by health workers, were selected for examination with both RDT and microscopy. Patients positive on RDT received artemisinin-based combination therapy (ACT) and febrile patients negative on RDT received an antibiotic treatment. Using a decision tree model for a hypothetical cohort of 100,000 patients, the diagnostic alternatives considered were presumptive treatment (base strategy), RDT and microscopy. Costs were based on a consumer and provider perspective while the outcome measure was deaths averted. Information on costs and malaria epidemiology were locally generated, and along with available data on effectiveness of diagnostic tests, adherence level to drugs for treatment, and drug efficacy levels, cost-effectiveness estimates were computed using TreeAge programme. Results were reported based on costs and effects per strategy, and incremental cost-effectiveness ratios.The cost-effectiveness analysis at 43.1% prevalence level showed an incremental cost effectiveness ratio (ICER) of 221 per deaths averted between RDT and presumptive treatment, while microscopy is dominated at that level. There was also a lesser cost of RDT ($0.34 million) compared to presumptive treatment ($0.37 million) and microscopy ($0.39 million), with effectiveness values of 99,862, 99,735 and 99,851 for RDT, presumptive treatment and microscopy, respectively. Cost-effectiveness was affected by malaria prevalence level, ACT adherence level, cost of ACT, proportion of non-malaria febrile illness cases that were bacterial, and microscopy and RDT sensitivity.RDT is cost-effective when compared to other diagnostic strategies for malaria treatment at malaria prevalence of 43.1% and, therefore, a very good strategy for diagnosis of malaria in Nigeria. There is opportunity for cost savings if rapid diagnostic tests are introduced in health facilities in Nigeria for case management of malaria.Laboratory diagnosis of malaria by village health workers using the rapid manual ParaSight-F test.Rapid immunochromatographic malarial antigen detection unreliable for detecting Plasmodium malariae and Plasmodium ovale.In order to determine the reliability of two commercial tests for the rapid detection of plasmodial antigen in cases of infection with Plasmodium ovale and Plasmodium malariae, the products were evaluated in four centers and a search of the relevant literature was performed. The results of the present and previous studies were compared. With overall sensitivities ranging between 18.8% and 47.6% for Plasmodium malariae and between 20% and 31.3% for Plasmodium ovale, it is evident that neither test is reliable for the detection of Plasmodium ovale and Plasmodium malariae infections.Comparison of two rapid, HRP2-based diagnostic tests for Plasmodium falciparum.Comparison of three antigen detection tests for diagnosis and follow-up of falciparum malaria in travellers returning to Berlin, Germany.We determined the sensitivity and specificity of three rapid immunochromatographic malarial antigen detection test systems (RDTs) for the detection of Plasmodium falciparumand assessed the quality of follow-up results. ParaSight-F and ICT Malaria detect histidine-rich protein-2 (HRP-2), whereas OptiMal detects plasmodial lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH). ParaSight-F performed with 95.1% sensitivity and 97.1% specificity (554 patients tested of whom 144 had falciparum malaria). ICT Malaria performed with 95.7% sensitivity and 99.2% specificity (718 patients tested of whom 184 had falciparum malaria). OptiMal performed with 76.2% sensitivity and 99.7% specificity (539 patients tested of whom 130 had falciparum malaria). In follow-up investigations, HRP-2 did not appear to be a useful antigen due to its long half-life, whereas pLDH offers a reasonable correlation with the presence of viable parasites in those cases initially detected. We therefore conclude that a combination of both antigens might be the best option for creating a reliable RDT for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria.[Rapid diagnostic test for malaria: preliminary study in Madagascar in 2003].This study was conducted in 2003 as part of the training of laboratory technicians in the use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria and to evaluate these tests in Madagascar in field conditions for the first time. Two types of RDT were used separately. The dipstick (Optimal-I) that detects circulating pLDH was tested in 168 patients with clinically suspected malaria (fever or recent history of fever) at primary health centers. Microscopy confirmed malaria in 93/168 (55.4%) cases. Monoparasitic P. falciparum infection was identified in 86/93, P. malariae in 3/93, P. vivax in 3/93 and P. ovale in 1/93. A positive Optimal-I test was a highly sensitive indicator of P. falciparum infection with parasitemia exceeding 500 trophozoites/mul (sensitivity of 97.2%; with a specificity of 100%); it also confirmed 6/7 cases of non-P. falciparum malaria. A community malaria survey used the Malaria Hexagon dipstick (detecting P. falciparum-specific HRP2) for 273 patients: 17 (6.2%) RDT tests were positive, and 16 (5.9%) microscopic tests. Although this dipstick did not detect the only case of infection with P. vivax, its specificity was 100% for detection of P. falciparum infection. Installing microscopes and qualified microscopists in the health centers of the one hundred and eleven districts in Madagascar would be extremely difficult, but our results show that RDT is an effective alternative diagnostic tool for daily use as well as for sporadic malaria epidemics. The revised antimalarial treatment policy, involving a drug ten to twenty times more expensive than chloroquine, demonstrates the need to improve malaria diagnosis: presumptive treatment has become prohibitively expensive. RDT can be used to improve malaria case management at the primary heath centers in Madagascar. We discuss the choice of RDTs.Evaluation of the Binax NOW ICT test versus polymerase chain reaction and microscopy for the detection of malaria in returned travelers.Microscopic detection of Plasmodium species has been the reference standard for the diagnosis of malaria for more than a century. However, maintaining a sufficient level of expertise in microscopic diagnosis can be challenging, particularly in non-endemic countries. The objective of this study was to compare a new rapid malaria diagnostic device (NOW ICT Malaria Test; Binax, Inc., Portland, ME) to polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and expert microscopy for the diagnosis of malaria in 256 febrile returned travelers. Compared with PCR, the NOW ICT test showed a sensitivity of 94% for the detection of P. falciparum malaria (96% for pure P. falciparum infection) and 84% for non-P. falciparum infections (87% for pure P. vivax infections and 62% for pure P. ovale and P. malariae infections), with an overall specificity of 99%. The Binax NOW ICT may represent a useful adjunct for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and P. vivax malaria in febrile returned travelers.Low sensitivity of ParaHIT-f rapid malaria test among patients with fever in rural health centers, Northern Tanzania.Several rapid diagnostic tools for malaria are currently available in local markets. However, diagnostic accuracy varies widely. The present study was conducted to evaluate a cheaply and easily available rapid diagnostic malaria test (ParaHIT-f) in rural Tanzania.Participants presenting with fever at health centers in the Kilimanjaro and Manyara regions were eligible. Parasitological thin and thick smears were examined from finger-prick blood samples and compared to ParaHIT-f test results. Sensitivity, specificity and predictive values were calculated using microscopic parasitological examination as the gold standard.In total, 236/743 (31.8%) individuals had a positive malaria microscopy, and 25/715 (3.4%) were positive in the rapid diagnostic test. The sensitivity of ParaHIT-f was 10.7% (95% CI, 6.7-14.7) and specificity was 100% (95% CI, 97.4-102), with positive and negative predictive values (PPV and NPV) of 100% (95% CI, 99.1-100.2) and 70.9% (95% CI, 66.9-74.9) respectively. Sensitivity of ParaHIT-f increased with increasing P. falciparum density (P > 0.003) from 5.8% (95% CI, 0-12.9) at < 100 parasites/µl to 20.5% (95% CI, 13.5-27) at ≥ 100 parasites/µl.Sensitivity of the ParaHIT-f rapid test was very low in this setting, therefore concomitant use of rapid diagnostic tests and microscopy is recommended. In the case of positive test results, confirmation by parasitological techniques is not necessary. Further monitoring of ParaHIT-f in various epidemiological settings in Tanzania is warranted. Paracheck-Pf accuracy and recently treated Plasmodium falciparum infections: is there a risk of over-diagnosis?An assessment of the accuracy of Paracheck Pf, a malaria rapid diagnostic test (RDT) detecting histidine rich protein 2 was undertaken amongst children aged 6-59 months in eastern Democratic Republic of Congo.This RDT assessment occurred in conjunction with an ACT efficacy trial. Febrile children were simultaneously screened with both RDT and high quality microscopy and those meeting inclusion criteria were followed for 35 days.358 febrile children were screened with 180 children recruited for five weeks follow-up. On screening, the RDT accurately diagnosed all 235 true malaria cases, indicating 100% RDT sensitivity. Of the 123 negative slides, the RDT gave 59 false-positive results, indicating 52.0% (64/123) RDT specificity. During follow-up after treatment with an artemisinin-based combination therapy, 98.2% (110/112), 94.6% (106/112), 92.0% (103/112) and 73.5% (50/68) of effectively treated children were still false-positive by RDT at days 14, 21, 28 and 35, respectively.Results show that though the use of Paracheck-Pf is as sensitive as microscopy in detecting true malaria cases, a low specificity did present a high frequency of false-positive RDT results. What's more, a duration of RDT false-positivity was found that significantly surpassed the 'fortnight' after effective treatment reported by its manufacturer. Though further research is needed in assessing RDT accuracy, study results showing the presence of frequent false positivity should be taken into consideration to avoid clinicians inappropriately focusing on malaria, not identifying the true cause of illness, and providing unnecessary treatment.Evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test for assessing the burden of malaria at delivery in India.All pregnant women who came for delivery at a district hospital in Mandla and a civil hospital in Maihar were screened for Plasmodium falciparum (placental parasitemia using a rapid test and microscopy and peripheral and umbilical cord parasitemia using microscopy alone). Two rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs), Paracheck Pf and ParaHITf, were used. At Mandla, the sensitivity and specificity of the Paracheck Pf for P. falciparum were 93% and 84%, respectively. The positive predictive values (PPVs) and negative predictive values (NPVs) were 50% and 99%, respectively. At Maihar, the sensitivity and specificity of the ParaHITf for P. falciparum were 87.5% and 97%, respectively. The PPVs and NPVs were 75.4% and 98.7%, respectively. Placental infection was significantly associated with low birth weight. The RDTs for the identification of P. falciparum were more sensitive in placental blood than the placental blood smear by microscopy. Thus, the RDTs should be useful for rapid assessment of malaria at delivery.Relative utility of dipsticks for diagnosis of malaria in mesoendemic area for Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax in northeastern India.For diagnosis of malaria, popular brands of rapid test kits collectively termed as "dipsticks" were subject to field evaluation in northeastern India for their comparative sensitivity and specificity vis-à-vis conventional microscopic results. Dipsticks based on Plasmodium falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein (Pf HRP-2) antigen capture assay revealed 100% sensitivity and high specificity (94-100%); thus, they were concluded to be reliable tools for confirmed diagnosis of malarial infection. However, an advanced version of the same kit, having incorporated additional pan-malarial monoclonal antibody, was found to be less sensitive (71%) for non-falciparum infections. Besides, Pf HRP-2-based kits continued to show positive results up to day 7, even after clearance of parasitemia on account of persistent antigenemia. This very limitation seemed to have been overcome by parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) enzyme-based kit. This kit was observed to have high sensitivity (81-89%) and specificity (100%) for both falciparum and non-falciparum malaria, but cannot distinguish mono-infection from mixed infections. It is concluded that the rational use of these kits would accord health benefits in terms of early detection and prompt treatment, reduce drug pressure, and possibly delay the emergence and spread of multi-drug-resistant strains of malarial parasites.Role of immunochromatographic test for rapid diagnosis of malaria.The study was conducted to compare among the different diagnostic procedures for malaria in the department of Microbiology, Mymensingh Medical College, Mymensingh during the period from July 2005 to June 2006. In this study a total of 98 malaria patients were included as cases. Another 30 age and sex matched healthy people were included as controls. Blood sample from each of the case and control was collected and examined for malarial parasite by microscopic examination of peripheral blood film. Subsequently antigen and antibody were detected by immuno-chromatographic test (ICT). Out of 98 clinically suspected cases 59(60.20%) were positive for malarial parasite by microscopic examination of peripheral blood film, 57(58.16%) were positive by ICT for antigen and 58(59.19%) were positive by ICT for antibody. Sensitivity and specificity of ICT for antigen were 93.22% and 94.87% respectively. For antibody, sensitivity and specificity were 89.83% and 87.17% respectively. From this study, sensitivity and specificity of ICT for malaria was found quite satisfactory, so it is suggested that ICT for malaria could be an alternative to peripheral blood film for the diagnosis of malaria where parasite could not be detected in peripheral blood film.[Rapid methods for the diagnosis of tropical malaria].Evaluation of the malaria rapid diagnostic test VIKIA malaria Ag Pf/Pan™ in endemic and non-endemic settings.Malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) are a useful tool in endemic malaria countries, where light microscopy is not feasible. In non-endemic countries they can be used as complementary tests to provide timely results in case of microscopy inexperience. This study aims to compare the new VIKIA Malaria Ag Pf/Pan™ RDT with PCR-corrected microscopy results and the commonly used CareStart™ RDT to diagnose falciparum and non-falciparum malaria in the endemic setting of Bamako, Mali and the non-endemic setting of Lyon, France.Blood samples were collected during a 12-months and six-months period in 2011 from patients suspected to have malaria in Lyon and Bamako respectively. The samples were examined by light microscopy, the VIKIA Malaria Ag Pf/Pan™ test and in Bamako additionally with the CareStart™ RDT. Discordant results were corrected by real-time PCR. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were used to evaluate test performance.Samples of 877 patients from both sites were included. The VIKIA Malaria Ag Pf/Pan™ had a sensitivity of 98% and 96% for Plasmodium falciparum in Lyon and Bamako, respectively, performing similar to PCR-corrected microscopy.The VIKIA Malaria Ag Pf/Pan™ performs similar to PCR-corrected microscopy for the detection of P. falciparum, making it a valuable tool in malaria endemic and non-endemic regions.Rapid diagnosis of falciparum malaria by detection of Plasmodium falciparum HRP-2 antigen.Malaria is a resurging problem all over the country and rapid diagnosis is mandatory to decrease the morbidity and mortality and for control of malaria. In the current study the aim was to evaluate the usefulness of rapid Plasmodium falciparum antigen detection and to compare its utility over conventional peripheral thick and thin smear examination.Three hundred fifty seven randomly selected patients with pyrexia and or atypical presentations of malaria, found initially negative for malaria were subjected to thick and thin smear examination and Plasmodium falciparum antigen detection test by using commercially available Parasight F. kit.54.6% of cases presented with pyrexia, while other presentations of falciparum malaria were less frequently encountered (162/357). Eighty five patients (23.8%) were diagnosed as having falciparum malaria based on smear/Parasight F. Test. Eighty- four of these patients were positive for Parasight F. test and only 34.51% of these cases were also positive on smear examination.The antigen detection test for Plasmodium falciparum is useful for rapid diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria. It could detect 65.5% cases of falciparum malaria which were initially negative by peripheral smear examination. Hence, this technique is superior to peripheral smear staining and helps early diagnosis.A comparison of three malaria diagnostic tests, under field conditions in North-west Thailand.A hospital-based trial to compare the clinical diagnosis of malaria; microscopy, and a rapid diagnostic antigen capture detection dipstick (ParaSight-F) was conducted in North-west Thailand. 301 people who presented themselves at the hospital were selected. 204 (68%) were presumptively diagnosed as having malaria by the triage nurses; 64 (21.3%) were P. falciparum parasite positive, and 94 (32%) tested positive for P. falciparum with the ParaSight-F test strips. There was no association between hemoglobin levels (<10g/dl and > or = 10g/dl) and malaria, and although there was a good statistical association between temperature and malaria the specificity, sensitivity and positive predictive values were all low, indicating that temperature alone is a poor indicator of the disease. Based on the microscopy results, we found that a presumptive clinical diagnosis dramatically over-diagnosed malaria, and similarly there were a large number of false positives using the ParaSight-F test. We believe that many of the patients had received some form of malaria treatment prior to presentation at the hospital, and that the high number of false positives are explained by persistent antigenemia and the possibility of there being sequestered parasites following incomplete chemotherapy.Field and laboratory comparative evaluation of rapid malaria diagnostic tests versus traditional and molecular techniques in India.Malaria presents a diagnostic challenge in most tropical countries. Microscopy remains the gold standard for diagnosing malaria infections in clinical practice and research. However, microscopy is labour intensive, requires significant skills and time, which causes therapeutic delays. The objective of obtaining result quickly from the examination of blood samples from patients with suspected malaria is now made possible with the introduction of rapid malaria diagnostic tests (RDTs). Several RDTs are available, which are fast, reliable and simple to use and can detect Plasmodium falciparum and non-falciparum infections or both. A study was conducted in tribal areas of central India to measure the overall performance of several RDTs for diagnosis of P. falciparum and non-falciparum infections in comparison with traditional and molecular techniques. Such data will be used to guide procurement decisions of policy makers and programme managers.Five commercially available RDTs were tested simultaneously in field in parallel with peripheral blood smears in outbreak-affected areas. The evaluation is designed to provide comparative data on the performance of each RDT. In addition, molecular method i.e. polymerase chain reaction (PCR) was also carried out to compare all three methods.A total of 372 patients with a clinical suspicion of malaria from Bajag Primary Health Centre (PHC) of district Dindori and Satanwada PHC of district Shivpuri attending the field clinics of Regional Medical Research Centre were included in the study. The analysis revealed that the First Response Malaria Antigen pLDH/HRP2 combo test was 94.7% sensitive (95% CI 89.5-97.7) and 69.9% specific (95% CI 63.6-75.6) for P. falciparum. However, for non-falciparum infections (Plasmodium vivax) the test was 84.2% sensitive (95% CI 72.1-92.5) and 96.5% specific (95% CI 93.8-98.2). The Parascreen represented a good alternative. All other RDTs were relatively less sensitive for both P. falciparum and non-falciparum infections.The results in this study show comparative performance between microscopy, various RDTs and PCR. Despite some inherent limitation in the five RDTs tested, First Response clearly has an advantage over other RDTs. The results suggest that RDTs could play and will play an important role in malaria diagnosis.Trial of the ParaSight-F test for malaria diagnosis in the primary health care system, Zimbabwe.Rapid diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria remains one of the main limitations to prompt treatment. Diagnosis based on clinical symptoms is decidedly unreliable, especially in areas of seasonal transmission like Zimbabwe. In view of this, the Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein (HRP-II) antigen detection assay (ParaSight-F test) was tried at 10 health centres in 3 malaria endemicity zones of Zimbabwe, as a malaria diagnostic tool for primary health care. Parasitological evaluations were conducted using thick and thin film microscopy as gold standard, and ease of test operation and practicability to nurses were ascertained by questionnaire. The sensitivity of the test did not vary substantially by endemicity zone and was approximately 93%. Specificities were 85, 72 and 92% in the hyperendemic, mesoendemic and hypoendemic zones, respectively. Positive predictive values varied considerably with endemicity, the lowest being in the hypoendemic zone (56%). However, negative predictive values did not change significantly, with a mean of 94%. It was found that the ParaSight-F test reduced mistreatment for malaria, relative to clinical diagnosis, by up to 81%, especially in the hypoendemic region. Test acceptability evaluations were good.Laboratory evaluation on the sensitivity and specificity of a novel and rapid detection method for malaria diagnosis based on magneto-optical technology (MOT).This study describes the laboratory evaluation of a novel diagnostic platform for malaria. The Magneto Optical Test (MOT) is based on the bio-physical detection of haemozoin in clinical samples. Having an assay time of around one minute, it offers the potential of high throughput screening.Blood samples of confirmed malaria patients from different regions of Africa, patients with other diseases and healthy non-endemic controls were used in the present study. The samples were analysed with two reference tests, i.e. an histidine rich protein-2 based rapid diagnostic test (RDT) and a conventional Pan-Plasmodium PCR, and the MOT as index test. Data were entered in 2 x 2 tables and analysed for sensitivity and specificity. The agreement between microscopy, RDT and PCR and the MOT assay was determined by calculating Kappa values with a 95% confidence interval.The observed sensitivity/specificity of the MOT test in comparison with clinical description, RDT or PCR ranged from 77.2 - 78.8% (sensitivity) and from 72.5 - 74.6% (specificity). In general, the agreement between MOT and the other assays is around 0.5 indicating a moderate agreement between the reference and the index test. However, when RDT and PCR are compared to each other, an almost perfect agreement can be observed (k = 0.97) with a sensitivity and specificity of >95%.Although MOT sensitivity and specificity are currently not yet at a competing level compared to other diagnostic test, such as PCR and RDTs, it has a potential to rapidly screen patients for malaria in endemic as well as non-endemic countries.False-positive results of a Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2-detecting malaria rapid diagnostic test due to high sensitivity in a community with fluctuating low parasite density.The persistence of parasite histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) in the circulation after parasite clearance has been considered a drawback for rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) targeting HRP2 and a major cause of false-positive results. This paper reports results of a study into whether a proportion of RDT HRP2 false-positive cases carried parasites using polymerase chain reaction analysis as the gold standard rather than microscopy. The high rate of RDT false-positive parasitemia results in comparison with microscopy was shown to predominantly represent cases that had a parasite density below the threshold for detection by microscopy. Despite the generally low disease-endemic prevalence of malaria in the area, there was a high prevalence of chronic infections with low, fluctuating, parasite densities that were better detected by RDT. Our results suggest that in areas known to have low-density parasitemias, RDTs targeting HRP2 may increase diagnostic sensitivity in comparison with microscopy. While microscopy remains the standard for comparison of malaria diagnostic accuracy, the limitations of microscopy, and the possibility that RDTs may have superior accuracy in some circumstances, should be taken into account when interpreting results of diagnostic trials.Evaluation of a dipstick test for the rapid diagnosis of imported malaria among patients presenting within the network TropNetEurop.Lack of experience on the part of involved laboratory personnel frequently complicates swift diagnosis of imported falciparum malaria in non-endemic areas. Diagnostic tools based on the dipstick principle for the detection of plasmodial histidine-rich protein 2 have been marketed for several years and have been extensively evaluated. Recently, a test kit capable of detecting antigen of Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax has been introduced. In order to evaluate this newly available tool, specimens from 664 patients were screened during the course of a prospective multicentre study within the European Network on Imported Infectious Disease Surveillance (TropNetEurop). Among the screened specimens, samples from 82 patients (12.3%) were positive for falciparum malaria using expert microscopy. A further 17 samples were positive for vivax malaria. The evaluated test kit performed with a sensitivity of 87.8% and a specificity of 99% for detection of falciparum malaria. Respective values for vivax malaria were 76.5% and 100%. Dipstick tests have the potential of improving the speed and accuracy of the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, especially if non-specialized laboratories are involved. However, decreased values of sensitivity and specificity, in comparison with expert microscopy, still impose a clear limit on the usefulness of the currently available kits.Short communication: An assessment of the use of malaria rapid tests by village health volunteers in rural Laos.Rapid malaria diagnosis, a key component of malaria control strategies, is hampered by the expense and training requirements of reliable microscopy. Rapid malaria antigen tests may improve the diagnosis of malaria in the rural tropics. After 1 h training 64 village health volunteers (VHVs) from rural Laos, with no previous laboratory experience, performed two malaria rapid diagnostic tests (ParacheckPf and OptiMAL) accurately. The reliability of six VHVs was assessed longitudinally, over 10 months with different frequencies of retraining. Compared with microscopy, error rates in dipstick interpretation were low (<2%) for both tests and were not associated with retraining frequency (P>0.2). Previously untrained Lao VHVs performed malaria rapid tests reliably with high sensitivity and specificity after minimal training.Feasibility and acceptability of home-based management of malaria strategy adapted to Sudan's conditions using artemisinin-based combination therapy and rapid diagnostic test.Malaria remains a major public health problem especially in sub-Saharan Africa. Despite the efforts exerted to provide effective anti-malarial drugs, still some communities suffer from getting access to these services due to many barriers. This research aimed to assess the feasibility and acceptability of home-based management of malaria (HMM) strategy using artemisinin-based combination therapy (ACT) for treatment and rapid diagnostic test (RDT) for diagnosis.This is a study conducted in 20 villages in Um Adara area, South Kordofan state, Sudan. Two-thirds (66%) of the study community were seeking treatment from heath facilities, which were more than 5 km far from their villages with marked inaccessibility during rainy season. Volunteers (one per village) were trained on using RDTs for diagnosis and artesunate plus sulphadoxine-pyrimethamine for treating malaria patients, as well as referral of severe and non-malaria cases. A system for supply and monitoring was established based on the rural health centre, which acted as a link between the volunteers and the health system. Advocacy for the policy was done through different tools. Volunteers worked on non-monetary incentives but only a consultation fee of One Sudanese Pound (equivalent to US$0.5).Pre- and post-intervention assessment was done using household survey, focus group discussion with the community leaders, structured interview with the volunteers, and records and reports analysis.The overall adherence of volunteers to the project protocol in treating and referring cases was accepted that was only one of the 20 volunteers did not comply with the study guidelines. Although the use of RDTs seemed to have improved the level of accuracy and trust in the diagnosis, 30% of volunteers did not rely on the negative RDT results when treating fever cases. Almost all (94.7%) the volunteers felt that they were satisfied with the spiritual outcome of their new tasks. As well, volunteers have initiated advocacy campaigns supported by their village health committees which were found to have a positive role to play in the project that proved their acceptability of the HMM design. The planned system for supply was found to be effective. The project was found to improve the accessibility to ACTs from 25% to 64.7% and the treatment seeking behaviour from 83.3% to 100% before- and after the HMM implementation respectively.The evaluation of the project identified the feasibility of the planned model in Sudan's condition. Moreover, the communities as well as the volunteers found to be satisfied with and supportive to the system and the outcome. The problem of treating other febrile cases when diagnosis is not malaria and other non-fever cases needs to be addressed as well.Out with the old, in with the new: the utility of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria diagnosis in Africa.After many years of development, rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria are now being rolled out in many African countries to support the introduction of artemisinin-based combination therapies (ACT). RDTs create new opportunities both for improved care and as research tools, but it is important that the research agenda continues to address the many challenges, both operational and technical, that still need to be met. Here we review what is known and what new evidence is needed to maximise the utility of RDTs in Africa.Malarigen malaria Pf/Pv antigen rapid test: a simple and effective tool for diagnosis of malaria in the far-flung hilly areas of Bangladesh.Microscopic visualization of malarial parasites on thick and/or thin film is considered as "Gold Standard" for diagnosis of malaria. But it needs skilled microscopist as well as good laboratory set up, which are scarce in Chittagong Hill Tracts (CHT) in Bangladesh. A study was carried out to evaluate the efficacy of a newly introduced Rapid Diagnostic Test (RDT) device based on immunochromatographic test (ICT) format, for malarial parasite. This study was carried out at Balipara, a remote village 64 km away from Bandarban Hill District headquarters, during January 2007 to September 2007. A total 271 patients who reported to Sickbay of 37 Rifle Battalion, Balipara were tested by MALARIAGEN MALARIA Pf/Pv Antigen Rapid Test kit on the spot. Thick & thin blood films were prepared and stained by laboratory technician at the sick bay, properly labeled, preserved and sent to pathologist working at Armed Forces Medical College, Dhaka Cantonment, Dhaka for microscopy. Three (1.11%) cases were excluded as control band of RDT were negative or test band appeared after long incubation. Six (2.22%) were excluded for poor quality of staining blood film. Among 262 cases malarial parasites were detected in 74(28.24%). Of these 62(83.78%) were Plasmodium falciparum and 12(16.22%) were Plasmodium vivax. Parasite count ranged from 2500/mµL to 527500/mµL with mean 67400/mµL (+/-93400). Among 262 cases, 97(37.02%) were positive for malarial antigen(s) in RDT. Of these 74(76.29%) were P. falciparum and 23(23.71%) were P. vivax. Overall sensitivity and specificity of RDT for detection of malarial antigen(s) irrespective of their species were 95.95% and 86.71% respectively with positive and negative predictive value 73% & 98% respectively. Relative to microscopy, the device has shown sensitivity 94.6% and specificity 88.52% for detection of P. falciparum with positive and negative predictive value 72% and 98% respectively. The device sensitivity and specificity for detection of P. vivax were 100% and 93.1% with respective positive and negative predictive value 47% and 100%. Malariagen Malaria Pf/Pv Antigen Rapid Test (RDT) performs as a better sensor and discriminator of malarial parasites and their species and appears to be an acceptable tool for diagnosis of malaria in symptomatic patient.Parasight F test compared with the polymerase chain reaction and microscopy for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in travelers.Imported malaria is an increasing problem worldwide. A rapid and accurate test for Plasmodium falciparum infection would facilitate the diagnosis of malaria in the returned traveler. The ParaSight F antigen capture assay (dipstick test) is a new diagnostic test for P. falciparum based on detection of circulating histidine-rich protein-2 antigen. We performed a blinded evaluation of this assay compared with microscopy and the polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for the detection of P. falciparum infection in 151 febrile travelers. Compared with the PCR, the dipstick test had a sensitivity of 88% and a specificity of 97%. The ability of the dipstick test to detect P. falciparum was similar with that of microscopy (88% versus 83%) since the species of Plasmodium in 14 of 133 malaria-infected patients could not be determined by microscopy due to low parasite numbers. The dipstick test was 40% sensitive for infections with < 50 parasites/microliter, 89% with 50-100 parasites/microliter, and > or = 93% with > 100 parasites/microliter. Circulating antigen was detectable in 68% of the patients seven days after initiation of treatment and in 27% at day 28. The dipstick test represents a simple and accurate test for the diagnosis of P. falciparum infection in the returned traveler.Performance of three multi-species rapid diagnostic tests for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax malaria in Oromia Regional State, Ethiopia.Malaria transmission in Ethiopia is unstable and variable, caused by both Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax. The Federal Ministry of Health (FMoH) is scaling up parasitological diagnosis of malaria at all levels of the health system; at peripheral health facilities this will be through use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs). The present study compared three RDT products to provide the FMoH with evidence to guide appropriate product selection.Performance of three multi-species (pf-HRP2/pan-pLDH and pf-HRP2/aldolase) RDTs (CareStart, ParaScreen and ICT Combo) was compared with 'gold standard' microscopy at three health centres in Jimma zone, Oromia Regional State. Ease of RDT use by health extension workers was assessed at community health posts. RDT heat stability was tested in a controlled laboratory setting according to WHO procedures.A total of 2,383 patients with suspected malaria were enrolled between May and July 2009, 23.2% of whom were found to be infected with Plasmodium parasites by microscopy. All three RDTs were equally sensitive in detecting P. falciparum or mixed infection: 85.6% (95% confidence interval 81.2-89.4). RDT specificity was similar for detection of P. falciparum or mixed infection at around 92%. For detecting P. vivax infection, all three RDTs had similar sensitivity in the range of 82.5 to 85.0%. CareStart had higher specificity in detecting P. vivax (97.2%) than both ParaScreen and ICT Combo (p < 0.001 and p = 0.05, respectively). Health extension workers preferred CareStart and ParaScreen to ICT Combo due to the clear labelling of bands on the cassette, while the 'lab in a pack' style of CareStart was the preferred design. ParaScreen and CareStart passed all heat stability testing, while ICT Combo did not perform as well.CareStart appeared to be the most appropriate option for use at health posts in Ethiopia, considering the combination of quantitative performance, ease of use and heat stability. When new products become available, the choice of multi-species RDT for Ethiopia should be regularly re-evaluated, as it would be desirable to identify a test with higher sensitivity than the ones evaluated here.Parasight-F dipstick antigen test in the diagnosis of falciparum malaria in Ethiopia.To determine the shelf life, rapidity and diagnostic performance of ParaSight-F.Prospective randomised study.Malaria diagnostic and treatment posts and health centres in central-southern part of the Ethiopian Rift Valley.Three hundred and eighty two subjects randomly selected.Double blind evaluation of the sensitivity, specificity and predictive values of PFT versus CBF.The point prevalence was found to be 29.7% with species dominance of P. falciparum to P. vivax in the ratio of 4:1. The ParaSight-F test showed, considering P. falciparum only, a sensitivity of 92.5% and specificity of 93%. A remarkably high positive predictive value (PPV) of 82% as well as a negative predictive value (NPV) of 99% was obtained. Considering all species of Plasmodium, sensitivity was 78.6% and specificity 93%, with PPV and NPV of 82% and 91% respectively. Moreover, PFT was found to be rapid with a batch of ten-strips--a rack completed in 30 to 50 minutes, which was five to six times faster than CBF reading. In shelf-life studies, after one year of storage at room temperature, results were found similar to the original readings, indicating the stability and long durability of the test strips.In their durability and high diagnostic performances, both the microscopic slide readings and PFT were found comparable and interchangeable, and advantage in endemic areas where laboratory facilities are not available. The rapidity of PFT may be of greater value during malaria epidemics. But during non-epidemic seasons, the inability of PFT not to detect all forms of malaria remains a draw back.Evaluation of the Makromed dipstick assay versus PCR for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in returned travelers.Microscopy has been the traditional reference standard for malaria diagnosis. However, difficulty in maintaining the required technical skills, particularly in areas where malaria is not endemic, has prompted the development of rapid nonmicroscopic diagnostic assays based on the detection of malaria parasite antigen in whole blood. In this study, we evaluated the performance of one such device, the Makromed dipstick test, blindly compared to PCR and microscopy for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in 200 febrile returned travelers. The Makromed assay detects the presence of P. falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein II with an antigen capture immunochromatographic strip format. Compared to PCR as the reference standard, the dipstick assay had a sensitivity of 97.0% and a specificity of 96.0%. The positive and negative predictive values were 81.2% and 99.5%, respectively. Rapid malaria diagnostic devices may provide a useful diagnostic adjunct in a clinical setting.Evaluation of the KAT-Quick Malaria Rapid Test for rapid diagnosis of falciparum malaria in Thailand.In recent years, several rapid diagnostic tests for falciparum malaria have been developed. KAT test results were compared with microscopy on 90 consecutive patients hospitalized at the Hospital for Tropical Diseases, Bangkok, Thailand. Fifty-one patients had P. falciparum infections while 49 had malaria due to other plasmodium species. For a geometric mean +/-SD (Min;Max;range) parasitemia of 11,481 +/- 5.0 (88;713,838;713,750), the sensitivity of the KAT test was 96% (95% CI = 86-99.5), the specificity was 92% (95% CI = 80-99), the accuracy was 94% and the reliability was 85%. These findings suggest that the KAT test is of potential interest in the diagnosis of falciparum malaria in Thailand.Modeling the financial and clinical implications of malaria rapid diagnostic tests in the case-management of older children and adults in Kenya.Using data on clinical practices for outpatients 5 years and older, test accuracy, and malaria prevalence, we model financial and clinical implications of malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) under the new artemether-lumefantrine (AL) treatment policy in one high and one low malaria prevalence district in Kenya. In the high transmission district, RDTs as actually used would improve malaria treatment (61% less over-treatment but 8% more under-treatment) and lower costs (21% less). Nonetheless, the majority of patients with malaria would not be correctly treated with AL. In the low transmission district, especially because the treatment policy was new and AL was not widely used, RDTs as actually used would yield a minor reduction in under-treatment errors (36% less but the base is small) with 41% higher costs. In both districts, adherence to revised clinical practices with RDTs has the potential to further decrease treatment errors with acceptable costs.Invalid result of Plasmodium falciparum malaria detection with the BinaxNOW Malaria rapid diagnostic test.Evaluation of the RealArt Malaria LC real-time PCR assay for malaria diagnosis.PCR-based methods have advantages over traditional microscopic methods for the diagnosis of malaria, especially in cases of low parasitemia and mixed infections. However, current PCR-based assays are often labor-intensive and not readily quantifiable and have the potential for contamination due to a requirement for postamplification sample handling. Real-time PCR can address these limitations. This study evaluated the performance characteristics of a commercial malaria real-time PCR assay (RealArt Malaria LC Assay; Artus GmbH, Hamburg, Germany) on the LightCycler platform for the detection of malaria parasites in 259 febrile returned travelers. Compared to nested PCR as the reference standard, the real-time assay had a sensitivity of 99.5%, specificity of 100%, positive predictive value of 100%, and negative predictive value of 99.6% for the detection of malaria. Our results indicate that the RealArt assay is a rapid (<45 min), sensitive, and specific method for the detection of malaria in returned travelers.Evaluation of a rapid immunochromatographic card test for Plasmodium falciparum in Ibadan, Nigeria.This short report describes the results of a rapid, simple and cost effective immunodiagnostic test for malaria in Ibadan, Nigeria. A total of 77% patients presenting at the children outpatient clinic, University College Hospital with malaria symptoms were screened for malaria parasites by microscopy using Giemsa stain and by the immunochromatographic card test. The immunodiagnostic test had a sensitivity of 93.1% and a specificity of 95.8%, making a good alternative for malaria diagnosis especially in rural areas without electricity, where microscopy is not possible, and a decision is to be made on when to start treatment.PfHRP2 and PfLDH antigen detection for monitoring the efficacy of artemisinin-based combination therapy (ACT) in the treatment of uncomplicated falciparum malaria.An assessment of the accuracy of two malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP2) or Pf lactate dehydrogenase (PfLDH) was undertaken in children aged between six and 59 months included in an anti-malarial efficacy study in Benin.In Allada (Benin), 205 children aged 6-59 months with falciparum malaria received either artesunate-amodiaquine (ASAQ), artemether-lumefantrine (AL), or sulphadoxine-pyrimethamine (SP). Children included in the study were simultaneously followed by both RDT and high-quality microscopy for up to 42 days.At the time of inclusion, PfHRP2-based tests were positive in 203 children (99%) and PfLDH-based tests were positive in 204 (99.5%). During follow-up, independent of the treatment received, only 17.3% (28/162) of children effectively cured were negative with the PfHRP2 RDT at day 3, with a gradual increase in specificity until day 42. The specificity of antigen detection with the PfLDH test was 87% (141/162) on day 3, and between 92% and 100% on days 7 to 42. A statistical difference was observed between the persistence of PfHRP2 and PfLDH antigenaemia during follow-up in children treated with artemisinin-based combination therapy (ACT) but not with SP.Although both RDTs are as sensitive as microscopy in detecting true malaria cases, the PfHRP2 RDT had very low specificity during follow-up until day 28. On the other hand, the PfLDH test could be used to detect failures and, therefore, to assess anti-malarial efficacy.Evaluation of four rapid diagnostic tests for the diagnosis of Plasmodium vivax in Korea.To evaluate 4 rapid malaria diagnostic kits (RDTs) in Korea: OptiMAL test, SD BIOLINE Malaria Ag P.f/Pan test, Humasis Malaria P.f/Pan antigen test and CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test.Hundred malaria patients with Plasmodium vivax (P. vivax) and 100 healthy volunteers were recruited. The results from earlier four RDTs were compared with the reference standard, the Giemsa-stained traditional microscopic diagnosis.Compared with the reference standard, the sensitivity and specificity for Plasmodium vivax were 92.7 and 100% for SD BIOLINE Malaria Ag P.f/Pan; and 94.6% and 100% for OptiMAL; 95.5% and 100% for both Humasis Malaria P.f/Pan antigen test and CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test.The performances of all four malaria RDT kits were acceptable, although Humasis Malaria P.f/Pan antigen test and CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test gave superior performances with ROK isolates.Operational response to malaria epidemics: are rapid diagnostic tests cost-effective?To compare the cost-effectiveness of malaria treatment based on presumptive diagnosis with that of malaria treatment based on rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs).We calculated direct costs (based on experience from Ethiopia and southern Sudan) and effectiveness (in terms of reduced over-treatment) of a free, decentralised treatment programme using artesunate plus amodiaquine (AS + AQ) or artemether-lumefantrine (ART-LUM) in a Plasmodium falciparum epidemic. Our main cost-effectiveness measure was the incremental cost per false positive treatment averted by RDTs.As malaria prevalence increases, the difference in cost between presumptive and RDT-based treatment rises. The threshold prevalence above which the RDT-based strategy becomes more expensive is 21% in the AS + AQ scenario and 55% in the ART-LUM scenario, but these thresholds increase to 58 and 70%, respectively, if the financing body tolerates an incremental cost of 1 euro per false positive averted. However, even at a high (90%) prevalence of malaria consistent with an epidemic peak, an RDT-based strategy would only cost moderately more than the presumptive strategy: +29.9% in the AS + AQ scenario and +19.4% in the ART-LUM scenario. The treatment comparison is insensitive to the age and pregnancy distribution of febrile cases, but is strongly affected by variation in non-biomedical costs. If their unit price were halved, RDTs would be more cost-effective at a malaria prevalence up to 45% in case of AS + AQ treatment and at a prevalence up to 68% in case of ART-LUM treatment.In most epidemic prevalence scenarios, RDTs would considerably reduce over-treatment for only a moderate increase in costs over presumptive diagnosis. A substantial decrease in RDT unit price would greatly increase their cost-effectiveness, and should thus be advocated. A tolerated incremental cost of 1 euro is probably justified given overall public health and financial benefits. The RDTs should be considered for malaria epidemics if logistics and human resources allow.Antigen capture immuno-chromatographic strip format in detecting parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase to diagnose malaria in nonimmune patients.Several rapid diagnostic test devices (RDT) based on detection of malaria antigen in the whole blood were developed. OptiMal test the presence of parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase (LDH) enzyme using three monoclonal antibodies was used. Two monoclonal antibodies were pan-specific and recognized all malaria species. The third one was specific only for Plasmodium falciparum. The parasite antigens were detected using an antigen-capture immunochromatographic strip format. One hundred-nine malaria positive and 730 malaria negative cases diagnosed by microscopy were included. 75/109 were P. falciparum 26 as P. vivax, 3 P. malariae and 5 mixed infection of P. falciparum & P. vivax. The RDT showed a low sensitivity (85%, 95% Confidence Interval [CI], 79-92%) with a much lower sensitivity in detecting species other than P. falciparum as well as in mixed infections. The sensitivity was 50% for less than 200 parasites/micro. The sensitivity of OptiMal for P. falciparum was 87% (95% CI, 79-94), 81% (95% CI, 66-96) for P. vivax, and failed with P. malariae. Mixed infections were misdiagnosed as Pfalciparum. The sensitivity of OptiMal was quite good in detecting both P. falciparum & P. vivax (98%; 95% CI, 97-99 & 100%; 95% CI, 100-100 respectively) and 99% (95% CI, 98-99) for all species. The positive and negative ratio for all malaria species was: (+LR = 62.3, -LR = 0.01); for P. falciparum (+LR = 38.9, -LR = 0.01) and for P. vivax (+LR = 0.8077/0, -LR = 0.2). The test value to assess drug resistance in post treatment days was discussed.The diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection in Gambian children, by field staff using the rapid, manual, ParaSight-F test.A rapid immunodiagnostic test for Plasmodium falciparum, the ParaSight-F test, was evaluated in the diagnosis of malaria in 139 children with uncomplicated malaria, who presented at the Medical Research Council's clinic at Basse in Upper River division, The Gambia. The aim was to evaluate the performance and usefulness of the test as a diagnostic method in a malaria-endemic area, when performed by a field worker. Compared with microscopy, the test had a sensitivity of 96.5%, a specificity of 90.5%, a negative predictive value of 94.2% and a positive predictive value of 94.3%. Because of its sensitivity, specificity and simplicity, the ParaSight-F test will be of value in situations where microscopy is not possible.Evaluation of the OnSite (Pf/Pan) rapid diagnostic test for diagnosis of clinical malaria.Accurate diagnosis of malaria is an essential prerequisite for proper treatment and drug resistance monitoring. Microscopy is considered the gold standard for malaria diagnosis but has limitations. ELISA, PCR, and Real Time PCR are also used to diagnose malaria in reference laboratories, although their application at the field level is currently not feasible. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) however, have been brought into field operation and widely adopted in recent days. This study evaluates OnSite (Pf/Pan) antigen test, a new RDT introduced by CTK Biotech Inc, USA for malaria diagnosis in a reference setting.Blood samples were collected from febrile patients referred for malaria diagnosis by clinicians. Subjects were included in this study from two different Upazila Health Complexes (UHCs) situated in two malaria endemic districts of Bangladesh. Microscopy and nested PCR were considered the gold standard in this study. OnSite (Pf/Pan) RDT was performed on preserved whole blood samples.In total, 372 febrile subjects were included in this study. Of these subjects, 229 (61.6%) tested positive for Plasmodium infection detected by microscopy and nested PCR. OnSite (Pf/Pan) RDT was 94.2% sensitive (95% CI, 89.3-97.3) and 99.5% specific (95% CI, 97.4-00.0) for Plasmodium falciparum diagnosis and 97.3% sensitive (95% CI, 90.5-99.7) and 98.7% specific (95% CI, 96.6-99.6) for Plasmodium vivax diagnosis. Sensitivity varied with differential parasite count for both P. falciparum and P. vivax. The highest sensitivity was observed in febrile patients with parasitaemia that ranged from 501-1,000 parasites/μL regardless of the Plasmodium species.The new OnSite (Pf/Pan) RDT is both sensitive and specific for symptomatic malaria diagnosis in standard laboratory conditions.Operational accuracy and comparative persistent antigenicity of HRP2 rapid diagnostic tests for Plasmodium falciparum malaria in a hyperendemic region of Uganda.Parasite-based diagnosis of malaria by microscopy requires laboratory skills that are generally unavailable at peripheral health facilities. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) require less expertise, but accuracy under operational conditions has not been fully evaluated in Uganda. There are also concerns about RDTs that use the antigen histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) to detect Plasmodium falciparum, because this antigen can persist after effective treatment, giving false positive test results in the absence of infection. An assessment of the accuracy of Malaria Pf immuno-chromatographic test (ICT) and description of persistent antigenicity of HRP2 RDTs was undertaken in a hyperendemic area of Uganda.Using a cross-sectional design, a total of 357 febrile patients of all ages were tested using ICT, and compared to microscopy as the gold standard reference. Two independent RDT readings were used to assess accuracy and inter-observer reliability. With a longitudinal design to describe persistent antigenicity of ICT and Paracheck, 224 children aged 6-59 months were followed up at 7-day intervals until the HRP2 antigens where undetectable by the RDTs.Of the 357 patients tested during the cross-sectional component, 40% (139) had positive blood smears for asexual forms of P. falciparum. ICT had an overall sensitivity of 98%, a specificity of 72%, a negative predictive value (NPV) of 98% and a positive predictive value (PPV) of 69%. ICT showed a high inter-observer reliability under operational conditions, with 95% of readings having assigned the same results (kappa statistics 0.921, p < 0.001). In children followed up after successful antimalaria treatment, the mean duration of persistent antigenicity was 32 days, and this duration varied significantly depending on pre-treatment parasitaemia. In patients with parasite density >50,000/microl, the mean duration of persistent antigenicity was 37 days compared to 26 days for parasitaemia less than 1,000/microl (log rank 21.9, p < 0.001).ICT is an accurate and appropriate test for operational use as a diagnostic tool where microscopy is unavailable. However, persistent antigenicity reduces the accuracy of this and other HRP2-based RDTs. The low specificity continues to be of concern, especially in children below five years of age. These pose limitations that need consideration, such as their use for diagnosis of patients returning with symptoms within two to four weeks of treatment. Good clinical skills are essential to interpret test results.A field trial of the ParaSight-F test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection.The rapid manual ParaSight-F test for Plasmodium falciparum is an antigen capture test detecting trophozoite-derived histidine rich protein II, is simple and provides a definitive diagnosis within 10 min. Compared with 913 thick blood film examinations, the ParaSight-F test had 93.4% sensitivity and 98.2% specificity. Compared with 520 blood samples within the same study examined with the aid of the polymerase chain reaction, the ParaSight-F test had 91.6% sensitivity and 99.4% specificity. The ParaSight-F test could be a valuable diagnostic tool for falciparum malaria in any situation requiring rapid diagnosis in the absence of microscopical examination.Comparison of methods for the rapid laboratory assessment of children with malaria.Rapid diagnosis and accurate quantification of Plasmodium falciparum parasitemia are important for the management of malaria. The assessment of disease severity also depends on evaluation of metabolic indexes such as blood glucose and lactate concentrations. Here we describe an accurate and rapid alternative to conventional thick film examination (Lambaréné method). We also assess near-patient methods for measuring blood glucose (OneTouch) and lactate (Accusport). The accuracy of the Lambaréné method is similar to that of thin films. Results from the OneTouch glucose meter also are in good agreement with a YSI 2300 reference meter. Overall, the Accusport lactate meter agrees poorly with the YSI 2300 reference meter. However, the sensitivity and specificity to detect hyperlactatemia (blood lactate > or = 5 mmol/L) are 0.94 and 0.98, respectively.Detection of histidine rich protein 2 and panmalarial ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test antigens after chloroquine treatment of uncomplicated falciparum malaria does not reliably predict treatment outcome in eastern Indonesia.In regions with drug-resistant malaria, the ability to rapidly detect or predict treatment failure (TF) soon after a course of standard therapy for Plasmodium falciparum malaria would facilitate the prompt institution of second-line therapy. We thus evaluated longitudinally the ability of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv immunochromatographic test to predict treatment outcome. Sixty-six Sumbanese Indonesians with uncomplicated falciparum malaria were treated with chloroquine and followed for 28 days by use of 1997 World Health Organization criteria for assessment of therapeutic efficacy of antimalarial drugs. The ICT Pf/Pv testing could be compared with microscopy in approximately half of the patients on each day of follow-up. Although strongly positive histidine rich protein 2 (HRP2) line intensities (equal to or greater than the control band) in convalescence were highly predictive of TF, any degree of positivity for the HRP2 and panmalarial antigens in convalescence was only moderately predictive of TE Positive predictive values of the HRP2 and panmalarial antigens for TF were 76.9% and 87.0%, respectively, on Day 3, 82.4% and 87.5% on Day 7, and 78.9% and 78.9% on Day 14. Negative HRP2 and panmalarial antigen results in convalescence were even less predictive of an adequate clinical response, and false-negative HRP2 and panmalarial antigen test results were found in one-sixth (6 of 37) of recrudescent infections diagnosed by microscopy among patients with late treatment failure. To reliably predict treatment outcome with rapid antigen tests, further development appears necessary to improve sensitivity for viable asexual parasites while avoiding detection of both gametocytes and persistent antigen in convalescence.Co-reactivity of plasmodial histidine-rich protein 2 and aldolase on a combined immuno-chromographic-malaria dipstick (ICT) as a potential semi-quantitative marker of high Plasmodium falciparum parasitaemia.The combined immuno-chromographic-malaria dipstick (ICT) for the rapid diagnosis of malaria detects both Plasmodium falciparum (P.f.)-specific, histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP-2) and a plasmodial aldolase expressed by all Plasmodium species pathogenic to humans. ICT was applied in 674 febrile returnees from malaria-endemic regions attending our Tropical Diseases Unit. Microscopy confirmed malaria in 69/674 cases, of whom 67/69 had returned from Africa or Madagascar, and 2/69 from the Caribbean. Monoparasitic P.f. infection occurred in 52/69, mixed infection was due to P.f.+ P. ovale (P.o.) in 3/69, and P.f.+P. malariae (P.m.) in 1/69 cases. Monoparasitic P. vivax (P.v.) infection occurred in 8/69 , P.o. in 3/69, and P.m. in 2/69 cases . Whereas a positive HRP-2 band on the test was a highly sensitive indicator for P.f. infection (52/52 patients; sensitivity 100%), this was not the case for a positive aldolase band (25/52 patients; sensitivity 48.1%). Sensitivity of aldolase band for non-falciparum plasmodia was even lower: aldolase was positive in only 3/8 (37.5%) of patients with vivax malaria, and in 0/5 cases with P.o.- or P.m. infection. Co-reaction of both bands occurred more frequently in patients with P.f. parasitaemia of > or =40,000/microl (20/25, 80.0%) as compared to patients with P.f. parasitaemia <40,000/microl (5/27, 18.5%; P<0.00005), and to patients with mixed infection (P.f.+ P.o., P.f.+ P.m.: 2/4, 50.0%; diff. n.s.). In our series, co-reaction of HRP-2 and aldolase indicated monoparasitic falciparum malaria with high P.f. parasitaemia, rather than mixed infection. Whereas the aldolase band is not a reliable qualitative marker for malaria, co-reaction of HRP-2 and aldolase band may have a potential for indicating high parasitaemia in falciparum malaria.Rapid diagnostic tests for the home-based management of malaria, in a high-transmission area.Rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) are sometimes recommended to improve the home-based management of malaria. The accuracy of an RDT for the detection of clinical malaria and the presence of malarial parasites has recently been evaluated in a high-transmission area of southern Mali. During the same study, the cost-effectiveness of a 'test-and-treat' strategy for the home-based management of malaria (based on an artemisinin-combination therapy) was compared with that of a 'treat-all' strategy. Overall, 301 patients, of all ages, each of whom had been considered a presumptive case of uncomplicated malaria by a village healthworker, were checked with a commercial RDT (Paracheck-Pf). The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of this test, compared with the results of microscopy and two different definitions of clinical malaria, were then determined. The RDT was found to be 82.9% sensitive (with a 95% confidence interval of 78.0%-87.1%) and 78.9% (63.9%-89.7%) specific compared with the detection of parasites by microscopy. In the detection of clinical malaria, it was 95.2% (91.3%-97.6%) sensitive and 57.4% (48.2%-66.2%) specific compared with a general practitioner's diagnosis of the disease, and 100.0% (94.5%-100.0%) sensitive but only 30.2% (24.8%-36.2%) specific when compared against the fulfillment of the World Health Organization's (2003) research criteria for uncomplicated malaria. Among children aged 0-5 years, the cost of the 'test-and-treat' strategy, per episode, was about twice that of the 'treat-all' (U.S.$1.0. v. U.S.$0.5). In older subjects, however, the two strategies were equally costly (approximately U.S.$2/episode). In conclusion, for children aged 0-5 years in a high-transmission area of sub-Saharan Africa, use of the RDT was not cost-effective compared with the presumptive treatment of malaria with an ACT. In older patients, use of the RDT did not reduce costs. The question remains whether either of the strategies investigated can be made affordable for the affected population.Comparative performance of the ParaSight F test for detection of Plasmodium falciparum in malaria-immune and nonimmune populations in Irian Jaya, Indonesia.A comparison was made of the performance of the ParaSight F test (F test) for detection of Plasmodium falciparum in blood from malaria-immune (410 native Irianese) and nonimmune (369 new transmigrants) populations in Irian Jaya, Indonesia, where malaria is hyperendemic and all four species of human malaria occur. There were highly significant differences between populations in the sensitivity (Irianese, 60% versus transmigrants, 84%; P < 0.001) and specificity (Irianese, 97% versus transmigrants, 84%; P < 0.001) of the F test. The test had comparably high levels of sensitivity for Irianese children aged < or = 10 years, both age groups of transmigrants (76-85%), but low sensitivity for Irianese aged > 10 years (40%), among whom only 7% of parasitaemias < 120 per microliter and 69% of those > 120 per microliter were detected. Specificity was comparably high for transmigrant children aged < or = 10 years and both age groups of Irianese (93-98%). The low specificity for transmigrants aged > 10 years (79%) was due to a preponderance of false positives, frequently identified by microscopy as P. vivax. The results suggest that comparison based on microscopy underestimated the performance of the ParaSight F test and that malaria immune status, irrespective of P. falciparum density, may influence the test's sensitivity.The ParaSight F test uses a nonmicroscopic dipstick approach to the rapid detection of Plasmodium falciparum in blood. The performance of this test was assessed in serum samples collected in Irian Jaya, Indonesia, from 410 native Irianese (malaria-immune) and 369 new transmigrants (nonimmune). Of particular interest was the capability of the F test to detect P. falciparum prevalence among children, whose immunity is less than that of adults. There were highly significant differences by population in the F test's sensitivity (60% for Irianese vs. 84% for transmigrants) and specificity (97% for Irianese vs. 84% for transmigrants). The test had high sensitivity levels (76-85%) for Irianese children 10 years of age and under and both child and adult transmigrants, but low sensitivity (40%) for Irianese over 10 years of age. Specificity was comparably high (93-98%) for transmigrant children and both age groups of Irianese. The low specificity (79%) for transmigrants over 10 years of age reflected a preponderance of false positives, frequently identified by microscopy as P. vivax. These findings suggest that microscopy comparisons underestimate the performance of the ParaSight F test and that malaria immune status, regardless of P. falciparum density, may influence the test's sensitivity.Evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test specific for Plasmodium vivax.Plasmodium vivax is the only human malaria indigenous to the Republic of Korea (ROK). A rapid and sensitive diagnostic test (RDT) that detects P. vivax is appropriate for evaluating suspected malaria patients with no travel history abroad. The RDTs, SD Malaria Antigen P.v (SD diagnostic, Kyonggi, ROK) specific for P. vivax and the well documented OptiMAL (DiaMed, Cressier, Switzerland) were compared among 282 volunteers for specificity and sensitivity of P. vivax and Plasmodium falciparum malaria infections against Giemsa-stained blood smears read by an experienced microscopist. A total of 137 volunteers were diagnosed with P. vivax, 45 cases (returned travellers from overseas) were diagnosed with P. falciparum and 100 healthy volunteers were diagnosed as negative for malaria. Correspondingly, the SD Malaria Antigen P.v test identified P. vivax infections in 128/137 malaria patients (93.4%) and 0/100 (0%) healthy volunteers. Three patients identified with P. falciparum also were interpreted as P. vivax by the SD Malaria Antigen P.v test; however, these patients were later confirmed as mixed infections of P. vivax and P. falciparum by polymerase chain reaction. OptiMAL interpreted the three mixed infections only as P. falciparum and detected 130/137 (94.9%) patients with P. vivax. The sensitivity of the SD Malaria Antigen P.v test decreased from 100% (>5000 parasite/microl) to 81.3% (1-100 parasites/microl) as parasitaemia levels declined. For the regions where P. vivax is the primary malaria parasite, the SD P. vivax-specific rapid diagnostic test may be useful for screening suspected malaria patients when sufficient material and human resources (e.g. trained microscopists) are unavailable for malaria diagnosis.Comparative field performance and adherence to test results of four malaria rapid diagnostic tests among febrile patients more than five years of age in Blantyre, Malawi.Malaria rapid diagnostics tests (RDTs) can increase availability of laboratory-based diagnosis and improve the overall management of febrile patients in malaria endemic areas. In preparation to scale-up RDTs in health facilities in Malawi, an evaluation of four RDTs to help guide national-level decision-making was conducted.A cross sectional study of four histidine rich-protein-type-2- (HRP2) based RDTs at four health centres in Blantyre, Malawi, was undertaken to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of RDTs, assess prescriber adherence to RDT test results and explore operational issues regarding RDT implementation. Three RDTs were evaluated in only one health centre each and one RDT was evaluated in two health centres. Light microscopy in a reference laboratory was used as the gold standard.A total of 2,576 patients were included in the analysis. All of the RDTs tested had relatively high sensitivity for detecting any parasitaemia [Bioline SD (97%), First response malaria (92%), Paracheck (91%), ICT diagnostics (90%)], but low specificity [Bioline SD (39%), First response malaria (42%), Paracheck (68%), ICT diagnostics (54%)]. Specificity was significantly lower in patients who self-treated with an anti-malarial in the previous two weeks (odds ratio (OR) 0.5; p-value < 0.001), patients 5-15 years old versus patients > 15 years old (OR 0.4, p-value < 0.001) and when the RDT was performed by a community health worker versus a laboratory technician (OR 0.4; p-value < 0.001). Health workers correctly prescribed anti-malarials for patients with positive RDT results, but ignored negative RDT results with 58% of patients with a negative RDT result treated with an anti-malarial.The results of this evaluation, combined with other published data and global recommendations, have been used to select RDTs for national scale-up. In addition, the study identified some key issues that need to be further delineated: the low field specificity of RDTs, variable RDT performance by different cadres of health workers and the need for a robust quality assurance system. Close monitoring of RDT scale-up will be needed to ensure that RDTs truly improve malaria case management.Diagnosis of malaria by detection of Plasmodium falciparum HRP-2 antigen with a rapid dipstick antigen-capture assay.Two field studies in Kenya and an experimental challenge study in the USA were done to assess the accuracy of a dipstick antigen-capture assay based on qualitative detection of Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP-2) in peripheral blood for diagnosis of P falciparum infection. In these studies, the assay was 96.5-100% sensitive for detection of greater than 60 P falciparum asexual parasites/microL blood, 70-81% sensitive for 11-60 parasites/microL blood, and 11-67% sensitive for 10 parasites or less/microL blood. Specificity was 95% (95% CI 85-105%; n = 20) among naive American volunteers, 98% (96-101%; n = 112) among volunteers exposed to the bite of P falciparum-infected mosquitoes, and 88% (84-92%; n = 285) among Kenyans living in an area with holoendemic malaria. Our results also indicated that PfHRP-2 antigen was not detectable in blood 6 days after initiation of curative chemotherapy, and suggest that such circulating antigens rarely lead to false-positive tests. The dipstick assay's sensitivity, specificity, simplicity, and speed may make it an important tool in the battle against malaria.Development and evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test for Plasmodium falciparum, P. vivax, and mixed-species malaria antigens.Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax malaria are endemic to many parts of the world and humans can be co-infected with both species. Because each Plasmodium species has different biological and clinical characteristics, accurate differentiation of the infecting species is essential for effective treatment. Therefore, we produced three monoclonal antibodies that recognize the lactate dehydrogenase of P. falciparum, P. vivax, or both to develop the first P. falciparum, P. vivax, and mixed-species infections malaria antigen detection kit. The detection limits of this kit were 150 and 250 parasites/μL for P. falciparum and P. vivax, respectively, and the kit was able to detect mixed-species infections. The sensitivity and specificity of this kit was assessed with 722 clinical specimens. Our results showed that its sensitivities for P. falciparum, P. vivax, and mixed-species infection were 96.5%, 95.3%, and 85.7%, respectively. In addition, its specificity was high (99.4%).Diagnostic and prognostic utility of rapid strip (OptiMal and Paracheck) versus conventional smear microscopy in adult patients of acute, uncomplicated P. falciparum malaria in Mumbai, India.The present study compared the diagnostic and prognostic utility of two rapid tests the (Paracheck and OptiMal) versus conventional smear microscopy.Using two independent microscopists we carried out the three tests in 31 adult cases of smear positive, acute, uncomplicated Plasmodium falciparum malaria. All three tests were done pretreatment, and on Days 8, 15 and 29.Compared to microscopy, the Paracheck had a sensitivity of 100%, while the OptiMal had a sensitivity of 83.7%. The lower sensitivity of OptiMal resulted from misidentification by both microscopists of 6/31 cases as Plasmodium vivax. As a follow up tool, the OptiMal was better than Paracheck, due to the earlier disappearance of the parasite LDH. Also in the Paracheck, between microscopists, there was a significant difference in reading the tests, on Days 8 and 15.Our study reiterates, the continued utility of conventional smear microscopy.Dispensary level pilot implementation of rapid diagnostic tests: an evaluation of RDT acceptance and usage by providers and patients--Tanzania, 2005.Malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) may assist in diagnosis, improve prescribing practices and reduce potential drug resistance development. Without understanding operational issues or acceptance and usage by providers and patients, the costs of these tests may not be justified.To evaluate the impact of RDTs on prescribing behaviours, assess prescribers' and patients' perceptions, and identify operational issues during implementation.Baseline data were collected at six Tanzanian public dispensaries. RDTs were implemented for eight weeks and data collected on frequency of RDT use, results, malaria diagnoses and the prescription of antimalarials. Patients referred for RDTs completed a standardised exit interview. Qualitative methods assessed attitudes toward and satisfaction with RDTs, perceptions about the test and operational issues related to implementation.Of 595 patients at baseline, 200 (33%) were diagnosed clinically with malaria but had a negative RDT. Among the 2519 RDTs performed during implementation, 289 (11.5%) had a negative result and antimalarials prescribed. The proportion of "over-prescriptions" at baseline was 54.8% (198/365). At weeks four and eight this decreased to 16.1% (27/168) and 16.4% (42/256) respectively.A total of 355 patient or parent/caregiver and 21 prescriber individual interviews and 12 focus group discussions (FGDs) were conducted. Patients, caregivers and providers trusted RDT results, agreed that use of RDTs was feasible at dispensary level, and perceived that RDTs improved clinical diagnosis. Negative concerns included community suspicion and fear that RDTs were HIV tests, the need for additional supervision in interpreting the results, and increased work loads without added compensation.Overprescriptions decreased over the study period. There was a high degree of patient/caregiver and provider acceptance of and satisfaction with RDTs. Implementation should include community education, sufficient levels of training and supervision and consideration of the need for additional staff.Comparison of the novel Partec rapid malaria test to the conventional Giemsa stain and the gold standard real-time PCR.Malaria remains the single most frequent cause of death in Africa, killing one child every 30 s, but treatment decisions are often made only on clinical diagnosis, as laboratory techniques to confirm the clinical suspicion are labor intensive and costly. In this study, we evaluated the recently developed Partec rapid malaria test (PM) for the detection of Plasmodium spp. in human blood from patients in an area where malaria is endemic and compared the results with those of thick blood film Giemsa stain (GS) in terms of its performance and operational characteristics, using real-time (RT) PCR as the gold standard. The sensitivities of the PM and the GS were 62.2% (95% CI, 56.3 to 67.8) and 61.8% (95% CI, 55.9 to 67.4), respectively, while the specificities were 96.0% (95% CI, 92.3 to 98.3) and 98% (95% CI, 95.0 to 99.5), respectively. There was an excellent agreement between the results for the PM and those of the GS (k [level of agreement] = 0.96; P < 0.001). The results for the PM were obtained more quickly and at less cost than those for the GS. The performance characteristics of the PM were almost equal to those of the GS, but the operational characteristics were better, and the PM can therefore be considered as an alternative method for GS.The role of rapid diagnostic tests in managing malaria.Assessment of the prozone effect in malaria rapid diagnostic tests.The prozone effect (or high doses-hook phenomenon) consists of false-negative or false-low results in immunological tests, due to an excess of either antigens or antibodies. Although frequently cited as a cause of false-negative results in malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs), especially at high parasite densities of Plasmodium falciparum, it has been poorly documented. In this study, a panel of malaria RDTs was challenged with clinical samples with P. falciparum hyperparasitaemia (> 5% infected red blood cells).Twenty-two RDT brands were tested with seven samples, both undiluted and upon 10 x, 50 x and 100 x dilutions in NaCl 0.9%. The P. falciparum targets included histidine-rich protein-2 (HRP-2, n = 17) and P. falciparum-specific parasite lactate dehydrogenase (Pf-pLDH, n = 5). Test lines intensities were recorded in the following categories: negative, faint, weak, medium or strong. The prozone effect was defined as an increase in test line intensity of at least one category after dilution, if observed upon duplicate testing and by two readers.Sixteen of the 17 HRP-2 based RDTs were affected by prozone: the prozone effect was observed in at least one RDT sample/brand combination for 16/17 HRP-2 based RDTs in 6/7 samples, but not for any of the Pf-pLDH tests. The HRP-2 line intensities of the undiluted sample/brand combinations with prozone effect (n = 51) included a single negative (1.9%) and 29 faint and weak readings (56.9%). The other target lens (P. vivax-pLDH, pan-specific pLDH and aldolase) did not show a prozone effect.This study confirms the prozone effect as a cause of false-negative HRP-2 RDTs in samples with hyperparasitaemia.Multiplex real-time quantitative PCR, microscopy and rapid diagnostic immuno-chromatographic tests for the detection of Plasmodium spp: performance, limit of detection analysis and quality assurance.Accurate laboratory diagnosis of malaria species in returning travelers is paramount in the treatment of this potentially fatal infectious disease.A total of 466 blood specimens from returning travelers to Africa, Asia, and South/Central America with suspected malaria infection were collected between 2007 and 2009 at the reference public health laboratory. These specimens were assessed by reference microscopy, multipex real-time quantitative polymerase chain reaction (QPCR), and two rapid diagnostic immuno-chromatographic tests (ICT) in a blinded manner. Key clinical laboratory parameters such as limit of detection (LOD) analysis on clinical specimens by parasite stage, inter-reader variability of ICTs, staffing implications, quality assurance and cost analysis were evaluated.QPCR is the most analytically sensitive method (sensitivity 99.41%), followed by CARESTART (sensitivity 88.24%), and BINAXNOW (sensitivity 86.47%) for the diagnosis of malaria in returning travelers when compared to reference microscopy. However, microscopy was unable to specifically identify Plasmodia spp. in 18 out of 170 positive samples by QPCR. Moreover, the 17 samples that were negative by microscopy and positive by QPCR were also positive by ICTs. Quality assurance was achieved for QPCR by exchanging a blinded proficiency panel with another reference laboratory. The Kappa value of inter-reader variability among three readers for BINAXNOW and CARESTART was calculated to be 0.872 and 0.898 respectively. Serial dilution studies demonstrated that the QPCR cycle threshold correlates linearly with parasitemia (R(2) = 0.9746) in a clinically relevant dynamic range and retains a LOD of 11 rDNA copies/microl for P. falciparum, which was several log lower than reference microscopy and ICTs. LOD for QPCR is affected not only by parasitemia but the parasite stage distribution of each clinical specimen. QPCR was approximately 6-fold more costly than reference microscopy.These data suggest that multiplex QPCR although more costly confers a significant diagnostic advantage in terms of LOD compared to reference microscopy and ICTs for all four species. Quality assurance of QPCR is essential to the maintenance of proficiency in the clinical laboratory. ICTs showed good concordance between readers however lacked sensitivity for non-falciparum species due to antigenic differences and low parasitemia.Multiplex QPCR but not ICTs is an essential adjunct to microscopy in the reference laboratory detection of malaria species specifically due to the superior LOD. ICTs are better suited to the non-reference laboratory where lower specimen volumes challenge microscopy proficiency in the non-endemic setting.Informed decision-making before changing to RDT: a comparison of microscopy, rapid diagnostic test and molecular techniques for the diagnosis and identification of malaria parasites in Kassala, eastern Sudan.Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) are promoted for the diagnosis of malaria in many countries. The question arises whether laboratories where the current method of diagnosis is microscopy should also switch to RDT. This problem was studied in Kassala, Sudan where the issue of switching to RDT is under discussion.Two hundred and three blood samples were collected from febrile patients suspected of having malaria. These were subsequently analysed with microscopy, RDT (SD Bioline P.f/P.v) and PCR for the detection and identification of Plasmodium parasites.Malaria parasites were detected in 36 blood samples when examined microscopically, 54 (26.6%) samples were found positive for malaria parasites by RDT, and 44 samples were positive by PCR. Further analysis showed that the RDT used in our study resulted in a relatively high number of false positive samples. When microscopy was compared with PCR, an agreement of 96.1% and k = 0.88 (sensitivity 85.7% and specificity 100%) was found. However, when RDT was compared with PCR, an agreement of only 81.2 and k = 0.48 (sensitivity 69% and specificity 84%) was found.PCR has proven to be one of the most specific and sensitive diagnostic methods, particularly for malaria cases with low parasitaemia. However, this technique has limitations in its routine use under resource-limited conditions, such as our study location. At present, based on these results, microscopy remains the best option for routine diagnosis of malaria in Kassala, eastern Sudan.Comparative evaluation of two rapid field tests for malaria diagnosis: Partec Rapid Malaria Test® and Binax Now® Malaria Rapid Diagnostic Test.About 90% of all malaria deaths in sub-Saharan Africa occur in children under five years. Fast and reliable diagnosis of malaria requires confirmation of the presence of malaria parasites in the blood of patients with fever or history suggestive of malaria; hence a prompt and accurate diagnosis of malaria is the key to effective disease management. Confirmation of malaria infection requires the availability of a rapid, sensitive, and specific testing at an affordable cost. We compared two recent methods (the novel Partec Rapid Malaria Test® (PT) and the Binax Now® Malaria Rapid Diagnostic Test (BN RDT) with the conventional Giemsa stain microscopy (GM) for the diagnosis of malaria among children in a clinical laboratory of a hospital in a rural endemic area of Ghana.Blood samples were collected from 263 children admitted with fever or a history of fever to the pediatric clinic of the Agogo Presbyterian Hospital. The three different test methods PT, BN RDT and GM were performed independently by well trained and competent laboratory staff to assess the presence of malaria parasites. Results were analyzed and compared using GM as the reference standard.In 107 (40.7%) of 263 study participants, Plasmodium sp. was detected by GM. PT and BN RDT showed positive results in 111 (42.2%) and 114 (43.4%), respectively. Compared to GM reference standard, the sensitivities of the PT and BN RDT were 100% (95% CI: 96.6-100) and 97.2% (95% CI: 92.0-99.4), respectively, specificities were 97.4% (95% CI: 93.6-99.3) and 93.6% (95% CI: 88.5-96.9), respectively. There was a strong agreement (kappa) between the applied test methods (GM vs PT: 0.97; p < 0.001 and GM vs BN RDT: 0.90; p < 0.001). The average turnaround time per tests was 17 minutes.In this study two rapid malaria tests, PT and BN RDT, demonstrated a good quality of their performance compared to conventional GM. Both methods require little training, have short turnaround times, are applicable as well as affordable and can therefore be considered as alternative diagnostic tools in malaria endemic areas. The species of Plasmodium cannot be identified.Performance of malaria rapid diagnostic tests as part of routine malaria case management in Kenya.Data on malaria rapid diagnostic test (RDT) performance under routine program conditions are limited. We assessed the attributes of RDTs performed by study and health facility (HF) staffs as part of routine malaria case management of patients > or = 5 years of age in Kenya. Expert microscopy was used as our gold standard. A total of 1,827 patients were enrolled; 191 (11.6%) were parasitemic by expert microscopy. Sensitivity and specificity of RDTs performed by study staff were 86.6% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 79.8-93.5%) and 95.4% (95% CI: 93.9-96.9%), respectively. Among tests performed by HF staff, RDTs were 91.7% (95% CI: 80.8-100.0%) sensitive and 96.7% (95% CI: 92.8-100.0%) specific, whereas microscopy was 52.5% (95% CI: 33.2-71.9%) sensitive and 77.0% (95% CI: 67.9-86.2%) specific. Our findings suggest that RDTs perform better than microscopy under routine conditions. Further efforts are needed to maintain this high RDT performance over time.Evaluation of diagnostic methods of re-emerging malaria in Korean patients.Malaria is one of the most important parasitic diseases especially in tropical areas. Over 300 million people are affected and the condition causes 1-3 million deaths each year. It is transmitted by the bite of infected Anopheles mosquitoes. Although Korea was declared to be free of Malaria by the WHO in 1979, malaria re-emergence has been apparent since 1993 amongst soldiers located near the De-Militarized Zone (DMZ) in the northern part of the country. Conventional microscopic examination of thin and thick blood films demonstrates the presence of the parasite and thus this method has been used to confirm the diagnosis of malaria, but it is a labor-intensive procedure and relies upon subjective interpretation. To overcome these limitations, fast and reliable methods for malaria detection have been recently introduced. In this study, we compared three kinds of antibody detection kits and one biochemical test kit that determines the presence of Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) with conventional peripheral blood smears. The antibody detection methods examined were, two rapid test pack format methods and a single microplate format enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) kit, as manufactured by Korean companies. The sensitivities of the three commercial antibody detection kits in the early stage of malaria were 70.8%, 77.4%, and 63.6%, their corresponding specificities 90.5%, 91.8%, and 80.9%, and their accuracies 87.6%, 87.0%, and 76.7%. The sensitivity and specificity of the pLDH assay were 100% apiece and the results were in 100% concordance with the microscopy of thick blood films. Thus, the pLDH assay may be used as an alternative for conventional microscopic blood film examination, especially in emergency situations when prompt treatment is necessary.Over-diagnosis of malaria by microscopy in the Kilombero Valley, Southern Tanzania: an evaluation of the utility and cost-effectiveness of rapid diagnostic tests.Early and accurate diagnosis of febrile patients is essential to treat uncomplicated malaria cases properly, prevent severe malaria, and avert unnecessary anti-malarial treatments. Improper use of anti-malarials increases the risk of adverse drug reaction and the evolution of drug/parasite resistance. While microscopy is the most common form of malaria diagnosis, concerns over its accuracy have prompted the incorporation of malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) into many national malaria control programmes.Over a three-month period, a direct comparison between microscopy and RDTs was made in a rural, private dispensary in the Kilombero Valley, Morogoro District, southern Tanzania, with the aim of estimating the extent of malaria over-diagnosis and over-treatment with anti-malarials. The study cohort was made up of patients referred by the dispensary's clinician for malaria testing. One hundred percent of patients approached agreed to participate in this study and were then tested using both microscopy and RDTs. Using the results from the comparison of the two tests at this dispensary, the potential cost effectiveness of introducing RDTs to a neighbouring public health centre was estimated on the basis of this centre's past malaria records spanning December 2007 to August 2011.At the private dispensary, the apparent prevalence of malaria was 78% based on microscopy whereas the true prevalence, calculated using RDTs as the gold standard, was estimated at 14%. This discrepancy indicates that when using microscopy as the sole diagnostic test, malaria is being over-diagnosed by approximately a factor of five in this setting. At the public clinic, apparent malaria prevalence based on microscopy was 74%. If similar rates of over-diagnosis are assumed, 5,285 patients of the 6,769 patients positively diagnosed with malaria using microscopy were likely given unnecessary anti-malarials, and their true cause of illness was not addressed. The introduction of RDTs to the public clinic would be highly cost-efficient, with an estimated net saving of over 96 USD/month.Compared with RDTs, microscopy led to almost four out of five patients being over-diagnosed with malaria in this rural part of Tanzania. A policy that encompasses both the private and public sectors of health care is needed to ensure quality diagnostic testing for febrile patients. With estimated prevalence at 14%, RDT introduction is recommended given WHO findings that RDTs are predicted to be cost-effective in prevalence areas of less than 20%. The use of RDTs in malaria diagnosis would not only reduce government spending but would prove beneficial to ensuring appropriate care and treatment of febrile illness.Determinants of the accuracy of rapid diagnostic tests in malaria case management: evidence from low and moderate transmission settings in the East African highlands.The accuracy of malaria diagnosis has received renewed interest in recent years due to changes in treatment policies in favour of relatively high-cost artemisinin-based combination therapies. The use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) based on histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) synthesized by Plasmodium falciparum has been widely advocated to save costs and to minimize inappropriate treatment of non-malarial febrile illnesses. HRP2-based RDTs are highly sensitive and stable; however, their specificity is a cause for concern, particularly in areas of intense malaria transmission due to persistence of HRP2 antigens from previous infections.In this study, 78,454 clinically diagnosed malaria patients were tested using HRP2-based RDTs over a period of approximately four years in four highland sites in Kenya and Uganda representing hypoendemic to mesoendemic settings. In addition, the utility of the tests was evaluated in comparison with expert microscopy for disease management in 2,241 subjects in two sites with different endemicity levels over four months.RDT positivity rates varied by season and year, indicating temporal changes in accuracy of clinical diagnosis. Compared to expert microscopy, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the RDTs in a hypoendemic site were 90.0%, 99.9%, 90.0% and 99.9%, respectively. Corresponding measures at a mesoendemic site were 91.0%, 65.0%, 71.6% and 88.1%. Although sensitivities at the two sites were broadly comparable, levels of specificity varied considerably between the sites as well as according to month of test, age of patient, and presence or absence of fever during consultation. Specificity was relatively high in older age groups and increased towards the end of the transmission season, indicating the role played by anti-HRP2 antibodies. Patients with high parasite densities were more likely to test positive with RDTs than those with low density infections.RDTs may be effective when used in low endemicity situations, but high false positive error rates may occur in areas with moderately high transmission. Reports on specificity of RDTs and cost-effectiveness analyses on their use should be interpreted with caution as there may be wide variations in these measurements depending upon endemicity, season and the age group of patients studied.Assessment of malaria in pregnancy using rapid diagnostic tests and its association with HIV infection and hematologic parameters in South-Eastern Nigeria.P. falciparum malaria in pregnancy was evaluated using histidine-rich proteins-2 RDT and related to HIV infection and hematologic parameters. Prevalence of malaria, HIV and anemia were 19.7%, 3.1% and 17.2% respectively. Primigravidae were significantly more infected with malaria. Malaria was not significantly associated with anemia, blood group, genotype and HIV infection.Comparison of rapid diagnostic tests for the detection of Plasmodium vivax malaria in South Korea.South Korea is one of many countries with endemic Plasmodium vivax malaria. Here we report the evaluation of four rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for diagnosis of this disease. A total of 253 subjects were enrolled in the study. The sensitivities, specificities and agreement frequencies were estimated by comparing the four RDTs against the standard of nested-PCR and microscopic examination. The CareStart(TM) and SD Bioline had higher test sensitivities (99.4 and 98.8%, respectively) compared with the NanoSign and Asan Easy tests (93.0 and 94.7%, respectively). The CareStart(TM) and SD Bioline tests could detect P. vivax in samples with parasite densities <150/μl, which was a slightly better performance than the other two RDTs. The quantitative accuracy of the four RDTs was also estimated by comparing results with P. vivax counts from blood samples. Lower test price would result in increased use of these RDTs in the field. The results of this study contribute valuable information that will aid in the selection of a diagnostic method for the detection of malaria.The use of a dipstick antigen-capture assay for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection in a remote forested area of central India.A study was carried out in a highly malarious forested belt of central India (Madhya Pradesh) to evaluate the usefulness of a dipstick antigen-capture assay (ParaSight F) as a diagnostic method for Plasmodium falciparum appropriate for field use. In all, 1,231 patients with fever were screened in parallel with the taking of thick blood smears. The sensitivity and specificity of the dipstick test for detection of P. falciparum were 93% and 92.5%, respectively. Results also indicate that the dipstick test result became negative within seven days after initiation of curative chemotherapy in the majority of cases (95%). Tribal populations in remote forested areas are important reservoirs of P. falciparum that are mostly resistant to standard antimalarial drugs and a source of malaria to the rest of the country. Control of malaria is limited by inaccessibility, lack of medical services, public ignorance of the disease, and other technical problems. In this population, the dipstick assay was found to be highly accurate, simple, and rapid, suggesting that it may be used in remote forested areas without the need for microscopic examination. The simplicity of the dipstick test enabled administration of more effective and expensive antimalarials preventing further buildup and dissemination of resistant parasites and a return of symptoms.ParaSight-F rapid manual diagnostic test of Plasmodium falciparum infection.The ParaSight(R)-F test is a qualitative diagnostic test of Plasmodium falciparum, which is based on the detection by a monoclonal antibody of a species-specific soluble antigen (histidine-rich protein (HRP-II)) in whole blood and which can be performed without special equipment. A visual reading is given by a polyclonal antibody coupled with dye-loaded liposomes; when positive, a pink line appears. The test has been compared with microscopic examination of thin blood smears and with Quantitative Buffy Coat malaria test (QBC(R) in a single-blind study. A total of 358 patients who had returned to France from malarial areas and consulted their doctor with symptoms or for a routine examination were enrolled in the study; 33 of them were found to have a falciparum malaria infection by the diagnostic test. On the day of consultation, the specificity of the ParaSight(R)-F test was 99% and its sensitivity 94%. The follow-up of infected patients after treatment showed that the test became negative later than the other reference tests. There was no correlation between antigen persistence and the intensity of the ParaSight(R)-F signal or circulating parasitaemia. No cross-reaction was noted for seven malaria cases due to other Plasmodium species. The test was performed quickly (10 tests in 20 minutes), was easy to read, and required minimal space. For cases of imported malaria, the test's specificity and low threshold for detection could make it a valuable adjunct test. However, in its present form, it cannot replace microscopic techniques which are species-specific and quantitative. In endemic areas, the test seems to be very promising by its results and ease of use according to published field studies.Field evaluation of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv immunochromatographic test for the detection of asymptomatic malaria in a Plasmodium falciparum/vivax endemic area in Thailand.Rapid antigen assays provide an effective tool for the detection of malaria in symptomatic patients. However, the efficacy of these devices for detecting asymptomatic malaria, where parasite levels are normally significantly lower than in symptomatic patients, is less well established. We evaluated the efficacy of a new combined Plasmodium falciparum-Plasmodim vivax immunochromatographic test (ICT Malaria Pf/Pv) in a cross-sectional malaria survey of the village of Ban Kong Mong Tha, Kanchanaburi Provice, Thailand, from August to December 2000. A total of 1,976 bleeds were made from 559 individuals over the course of the study. Blinded microscopy of thick and thin blood films was used as the gold standard; all discordant and 10% of concordant results were cross-checked. Of 1,976 ICT Malaria Pf/Pv dipsticks tested, 98.3% (n = 1,943) performed as expected, as evidenced by the appearance of the control line. The ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test was both sensitive (100.0%) and specific (99.7 %) for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria with parasitemias of > or = 500 trophozoites/microL; however, only 15.9% (13/82) of infected individuals had parasitemia rates this high. When P. falciparum parasitemia rates were < 500/microL, the sensitivity of the diagnosis was only 23.3%, with a positive predictive value (PPV) and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 76.2 and 97.2%, respectively. The ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test was specific, but not sensitive, for the diagnosis of vivax malaria with parasite rates of > or = 500 trophozoites/microl, with sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV of 66.7%, 99.9%, 66.7%, and 99.9%, respectively. At parasite rates of < 500/microL, corresponding values were 0.0%, 99.9%, 0%, and 95.1%. Because of the relatively high cost of these assays, low parasite rates found in the majority of asymptomatic individuals, and low sensitivity of this assay with rates of < 500/microl, use of this assay as a tool for active case detection is of limited value in western Thailand.Comparison of CareStart™ HRP2/pLDH COMBO rapid malaria test with light microscopy in north-west Ethiopia.In Ethiopia, light microscopy is the gold standard for malaria diagnosis although it is not available in most peripheral health facilities. It is time consuming, requires trained personnel and needs careful preparation and application of reagents to ensure quality results. This study was aimed at testing the diagnostic performance of CareStart™ malaria rapid diagnostic test (RDT) with reference to light microscopy for the diagnosis of falciparum and vivax malaria in Ethiopia.Blood samples were collected from 254 patients suspected to have malaria at Kola Diba Health Center in the late malaria transmission peak season from November 2011 to December 2011. The samples were examined immediately by light microscopy and the RDT (CareStart™ Malaria HRP2/pLDH COMBO Test kit). Statistical analysis was performed using SPSS version 16 and the JavaStat two-way contingency table analysis.The overall sensitivity and specificity of CareStartTM RDT was found to be 95% (90-97.9%, 95% CI) and 94.2% (90.9-96%, 95% CI), respectively. The sensitivity of the CareStartTM RDT for Plasmodium falciparum or mixed infection was calculated to be 92.9% (82.5-98%, 95%CI) while a sensitivity of 90.9% (74.1-98.4%, 95%CI) was found for non-falciparum species. The specificity for P. falciparum or mixed infections was found to be 95.4% (92.5-96.8%, 95%CI) while it was 97.3% (94.8-98.4%, 95%CI) for non-falciparum species. There was an excellent agreement between the two tests with a kappa value of 0.918.The CareStartTM RDT test showed good sensitivity and specificity with an excellent agreement to the reference light microscopy. The RDT could therefore be used in place of light microscopy, which in poor set-ups cannot be used routinely.Rapid diagnosis of malaria--a new approach.Should countries implementing an artemisinin-based combination malaria treatment policy also introduce rapid diagnostic tests?Within the context of increasing antimalarial costs and or decreasing malaria transmission, the importance of limiting antimalarial treatment to only those confirmed as having malaria parasites becomes paramount. This motivates for this assessment of the cost-effectiveness of routine use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) as an integral part of deploying artemisinin-based combination therapies (ACTs).The costs and cost-effectiveness of using RDTs to limit the use of ACTs to those who actually have Plasmodium falciparum parasitaemia in two districts in southern Mozambique were assessed. To evaluate the potential impact of introducing definitive diagnosis using RDTs (costing $0.95), five scenarios were considered, assuming that the use of definitive diagnosis would find that between 25% and 75% of the clinically diagnosed malaria patients are confirmed to be parasitaemic. The base analysis compared two ACTs, artesunate plus sulfadoxine/pyrimethamine (AS+SP) costing $1.77 per adult treatment and artemether-lumefantrine (AL) costing $2.40 per adult treatment, as well as the option of restricting RDT use to only those older than six years. Sensitivity analyses considered lower cost ACTs and RDTs and different population age distributions.Compared to treating patients on the basis of clinical diagnosis, the use of RDTs in all clinically diagnosed malaria cases results in cost savings only when 29% and 52% or less of all suspected malaria cases test positive for malaria and are treated with AS+SP and AL, respectively. These cut-off points increase to 41.5% (for AS+SP) and to 74% (for AL) when the use of RDTs is restricted to only those older than six years of age. When 25% of clinically diagnosed patients are RDT positive and treated using AL, there are cost savings per malaria positive patient treated of up to $2.12. When more than 29% of clinically diagnosed cases are malaria test positive, the incremental cost per malaria positive patient treated is less than US$1. When relatively less expensive ACTs are introduced (e.g. current WHO preferential price for AL of $1.44 per adult treatment), the RDT price to the healthcare provider should be $0.65 or lower for RDTs to be cost saving in populations with between 30 and 52% of clinically diagnosed malaria cases being malaria test positive.While the use of RDTs in all suspected cases has been shown to be cost-saving when parasite prevalence among clinically diagnosed malaria cases is low to moderate, findings show that targeting RDTs at the group older than six years and treating children less than six years on the basis of clinical diagnosis is even more cost-saving. In semi-immune populations, young children carry the highest risk of severe malaria and many healthcare providers would find it harder to deny antimalarials to those who test negative in this age group.Prevalence and density-related concordance of three diagnostic tests for malaria in a region of Tanzania with hypoendemic malaria.Accurate malaria diagnosis has dual roles in identification of symptomatic persons for effective malaria treatment and also enumeration of asymptomatic persons who contribute to the epidemiologic determinants of transmission. Three currently used diagnostic tests, microscopy, rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs), and real-time PCR, all have different sensitivities and specificities, which are parasite density dependent. Here, we compare their concordance among 451 febrile episodes in a cohort of 2,058 children and adults followed over 6 months in a region in central Tanzania with hypoendemic malaria. Microscopy, a histidine-rich protein-based RDT, and two different real-time PCR gene probes detected Plasmodium falciparum in 20, 54, 41, and 78 episodes of fever, respectively. They had complete concordance in only 9 episodes. Real-time PCR with an 18S probe was more sensitive than with a mitochondrial probe for cytochrome b despite higher copy numbers of mitochondrial DNA. Both PCR yields were increased 4-fold by glycogen/acetate precipitation with low-speed centrifugation. Duplicate PCR increases low-density malaria detection. RDT had the highest number of unique positives, presumably from persistent antigen despite the absence of parasites, although RDT did not detect 3 parasitemias with over 1,000 parasites/μl. In a latent class analysis, real-time PCR had significantly higher sensitivity than did microscopy or RDT. Agreement between real-time PCR, RDT, and microscopy was highest in March and April, when both the P. falciparum parasite rate and parasite densities are highest. Real-time PCR is more sensitive and specific than RDT and microscopy in low-prevalence, low-parasite-density settings.[Concordance between thick blood smear, immunochromatography and polymerase chain reaction for malaria diagnosis].The rapid and effective diagnosis of malaria is the determining condition for an appropriate treatment and control of the disease.The sensitivity, specificity and the positive and negative predictive values were evaluated in cases of suspected malaria in Colombia in a comparison of a rapid diagnostic test. the PCR test and the thick blood smear-the traditional gold standard.A group of 100 patients with symptoms compatible with malaria, were included in the study. They were selected from the following Colombian regions: Urabá, Córdoba, lower Cauca, and relatively fewer from other malaria endemic areas of Colombia including the provinces of Valle, Chocó in the central west of Colombia and Vichada to the east. To each patient the following three tests were performed: the rapid OptiMAL test, the PCR identification and the thick blood smear. The PCR amplified specific DNA sequences with primers designed to identify the genus Plasmodium, and the two species present in Colombia, P. falciparum and P. vivax.The sensitivity of the rapid test versus the thick smear, for the diagnosis of both species of Plasmodium was 93.9% (95% CI: 87-100%) and the specificity was 94.3% (95% CI:.253 85-100%). The PCR compared with the thick smear showed a sensitivity of 100% (95% CI: 99-100%) and a specificity of 97.1% (95% CI: 90-100%).The sensitivity and specificity of the three tests did not present statistically significant differences. However, the thick blood smear was recommended as the standard test, mainly due to its low cost.Field studies on the sensitivity and specificity of an immunochromatographic test for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in tribal areas of Orissa.A rapid immunodiagnostic test developed by an Australian Biotechnology company for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum in the peripheral blood has been evaluated in the field for its sensitivity, specificity and efficacy in comparison to microscopic examination. The results showed that the tests sensitivity, specificity and efficacy were 98.2, 96.9 and 97.5 per cent respectively. The positive and negative predictive values of the test were 96.4 and 98.4 per cent respectively. The test when compared to the conventional microscopy did not show any statistically significant difference suggesting that the two diagnostic methods are equally good. The test performed did not show cross-reactions with other parasite species. It is a simple and rapid field diagnostic method, which does not require any expensive laboratory equipment or skilled personnel.Reliability of rapid diagnostic test for diagnosing peripheral and placental malaria in an area of unstable malaria transmission in Eastern Sudan.Diagnosing Plasmodium falciparum malaria during pregnancy is a great challenge for clinicians because of the low density of parasites in the peripheral blood and parasite sequestration in the placenta. Nevertheless, few data on the use of malaria rapid diagnostic test (RDT) during pregnancy have been published.P. falciparum infections were assessed in 156 febrile pregnant women by microscopic examination of their blood smears and by RDT and polymerase chain reactions (PCR). In addition, 150 women were assessed at the time of delivery by microscopy, RDT, PCR and placental histology investigations. The study was conducted at the Gadarif Hospital, Eastern Sudan. The SD Bioline P. f / P. v (Bio Standard Diagnostics, Gurgaon, Korea) RDT kit was evaluated in this study.Among the febrile pregnant women, 17 (11.0%), 26 (16.7%) and 18 (11.5%) positive cases of P. falciparum were detected by microscopy, RDT, and PCR, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of the microscopy was 94.4% and 100%, respectively. The corresponding values for RDT evaluation were 83.3% and 92.0%, as compared with PCR as the gold standard.While there were no detected cases of malaria by microscopic examination of blood smears, 27 (18.0%), 21(14.0%) and 46 (30.7%) out of the 150 placentae investigated had P. falciparum as determined by RDT, PCR, and histology, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity for RDT was 17.4% and 81.7%, respectively. The corresponding values for PCR were 6.5% and 82.7%, where histology was used as the gold standard.The RDT kit used in this study has poor performance for peripheral and placental P. falciparum malaria detection in this setting.The virtual slide(s) for this article can be found here: http://www.diagnosticpathology.diagnomx.eu/vs/1092363465928479.Evaluation of Paracheck-Pf(TM) rapid malaria diagnostic test for the diagnosis of malaria among HIV-positive patients in Ibadan, south-western Nigeria.Febrile illnesses occur frequently among HIV positive patients and these are often treated presumptively as malaria in endemic areas. Parasite-based diagnosis of malaria will eliminate unnecessary treatment, reduce drug-drug interactions and the chances for the emergence of drug resistant Plasmodium. We evaluated finger prick blood samples from 387 people living with HIV (PLWHIV) and suspected of having malaria by expert microscopy and Paracheck-Pf(TM) - a histidine-rich protein-II based malaria rapid diagnostic test. The study was conducted at the PEPFAR supported AIDS Prevention Initiative in Nigeria (APIN) Clinic of the University College Hospital Ibadan, southwest Nigeria. Outcome parameters were prevalence of malaria parasitemia, sensitivity and specificity of Paracheck-Pf as well as the positive and negative predictive values for Paracheck-Pf using microscopy of Giemsa-stained blood film as gold standard. Malaria parasites were detected in 19·1% (74/387) of enrollees by microscopy and 19·3% (74/383) by Paracheck-Pf. Geometric mean parasite density was 501/μl (range 39-749 202/μl). Sensitivity and specificity of Paracheck-Pf at all parasite densities were 55·4% and 89·3% while corresponding figures at parasite densities ≥200/μl were 90·9% and 90·3%. Sensitivity and specificity at parasite densities ≥500/μl was 97·6% and 90·3%. Positive and negative predictive values for parasite density ≥200/μl were 55·4% and 98·7%, respectively. Paracheck-Pf was found to be a useful malaria diagnostic tool at parasite densities ≥200/μl facilitating appropriate clinical management.Comparative diagnostic performance of two commercial rapid tests for malaria in a non-endemic area.In the study reported here, the diagnostic performance of two new rapid tests for the diagnosis of malaria was evaluated in symptomatic patients in a non-endemic area. Of 557 consecutive patients, 109 (19.6%) had documented malaria. For the NOW ICT MALARIA P.f./P.v. (Binax, Portland, ME, USA) and OptiMAL IT (Diamed, Cressier, Switzerland) tests, respectively, sensitivity values were 96.3% and 79.8% (P-value, 0.0001), and specificity values were 98.8% and 98.4%. The NOW ICT test did not detect two of 80 Plasmodium falciparum infections, and it generated false-positive results for five patients. The OptiMAL IT test failed to detect ten of the P. falciparum infections, and it generated seven false-positive results. The results suggest that these rapid diagnostic tests for malaria may be useful, but they cannot replace microscopic examination of blood films.Evaluation of a new Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase assay (OptiMAL-IT) for the detection of malaria.The new OptiMAL-IT(R) rapid diagnostic test for malaria was evaluated in 271 patients in Thailand with uncomplicated malaria between June and July 2002. The sensitivity and specificity for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum parasites were 88% and 92%, respectively. For species other than P. falciparum, the sensitivity was 65% and specificity was 99%. The performance of the new test decreased markedly at low levels of parasitaemia.[Tests for rapid diagnosis of malaria].Evaluation of two new immunochromatographic assays for diagnosis of malaria.We assessed the performance of two new commercially available rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria (SD Bioline Malaria Ag Pf test and Ag Pf/Pan test) in 200 patients with uncomplicated malaria between August and October 2007 in Madagascar. Results of the two RDTs were compared with those obtained by microscopy and real-time polymerase chain reaction. The sensitivity and specificity for detection of Plasmodium falciparum were 93% and 98.9%, respectively, for the SD Bioline Malaria Ag Pf test and 92.9% and 98.9% for the SD Bioline Malaria Ag Pf/Pan test. The sensitivity of the SD Bioline Malaria Ag Pf/Pan test was much lower for detection of other species (63.6%). The sensitivity of the two new assays decreased to 77.3% at parasitemia levels < 100 parasites/microL for detection of P. falciparum.Evaluation of the Palutop+4 malaria rapid diagnostic test in a non-endemic setting.Palutop+4 (All. Diag, Strasbourg, France), a four-band malaria rapid diagnostic test (malaria RDT) targeting the histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP-2), Plasmodium vivax-specific parasite lactate dehydrogenase (Pv-pLDH) and pan Plasmodium-specific pLDH (pan-pLDH) was evaluated in a non-endemic setting on stored whole blood samples from international travellers suspected of malaria.Microscopy corrected by PCR was the reference method. Samples include those infected by Plasmodium falciparum (n = 323), Plasmodium vivax (n = 97), Plasmodium ovale (n = 73) and Plasmodium malariae (n = 25) and 95 malaria negative samples.The sensitivities for the diagnosis of P. falciparum, P. vivax, P. malariae and P. ovale were 85.1%, 66.0%, 32.0% and 5.5%. Sensitivities increased at higher parasite densities and reached 90.0% for P. falciparum >100/microl and 83.8% for P. vivax > 500/microl. Fourteen P. falciparum samples reacted with the Pv-pLDH line, one P. vivax sample with the HRP-2 line, and respectively two and four P. ovale and P. malariae samples reacted with the HRP-2 line. Two negative samples gave a signal with the HRP-2 line. Faint and weak line intensities were observed for 129/289 (44.6%) HRP-2 lines in P. falciparum samples, for 50/64 (78.1%) Pv-pLDH lines in P. vivax samples and for 9/13 (69.2%) pan-pLDH lines in P. ovale and P. malariae samples combined. Inter-observer reliabilities for positive and negative readings were excellent for the HRP-2 and Pv-pLDH lines (overall agreement > 92.0% and kappa-values for each pair of readers >or= 0.88), and good for the pan-pLDH line (85.5% overall agreement and kappa-values >or= 0.74).Palutop+4 performed moderately for the detection of P. falciparum and P. vivax, but sensitivities were lower than those of three-band malaria RDTs.Comparison of two commercial assays with expert microscopy for confirmation of symptomatically diagnosed malaria.Conventional light microscopy has been the established method for malaria diagnosis. However, recently several nonmicroscopic rapid diagnostic tests have been developed for situations in which reliable microscopy may not be available. This study was conducted to evaluate the diagnostic performance of a recently introduced ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test. This assay detects Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 antigen (PfHRP-2) for P. falciparum diagnosis and pan-malarial antigen for P. vivax diagnosis. In this study we compared the performance of ICT Malaria Pf/Pv with microscopy of Giemsa-stained blood films and with an OptiMAL test that detects Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) antigen. A total of 750 clinically suspected malaria patients were examined at local health centers in Kuwait. Both the antigen tests had a high degree of specificity (>98%) for detection of malaria infection. However, they were less sensitive than microscopy. Compared with microscopy the ICT Malaria PF/pf test failed to detect malaria infection in 93 (34%) of 271 malaria patients (11% of patients with P. falciparum and 37% of patients with P. vivax) and the OptiMAL test failed to detect malaria infection in 41 (15%) of 271 malaria patients (7% of patients with P. falciparum and 13% of patients with P. vivax). The sensitivities of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv and OptiMAL tests for detection of P. falciparum infection were 81 and 87%, and those for detecting P. vivax were 58 to 79%, respectively. The sensitivity of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv and OptiMAL tests decreased significantly to 23 and 44%, respectively, at parasite densities of <500/ micro l. Both of the tests also produced a number of false-positive results. Overall, the performance of the OptiMAL test was better than that of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test. However, our results raise particular concern over the sensitivity of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test for detection of P. vivax infection. Further developments appear necessary to improve the performance of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test.The ICT Malaria Pf: a simple, rapid dipstick test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria at the Thai-Myanmar border.The ICT Malaria Pf test for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum infection was evaluated in the diagnosis of 305 patients with fever who were admitted to a hospital located on the Thai-Myanmar border. All patients were admitted for at least one week to exclude reinfection. The test was performed using admission blood samples collected into ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid. The sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of the test were 92.7%, 95.1% and 94.7% respectively, compared to standard microscopic diagnosis. The ICT Malaria Pf test is an accurate method for the diagnosis of P. falciparum infection. Its simplicity and rapidity make it particularly appropriate for use in remote areas where microscopic examination of blood films is unavailable.Use of a pLDH-based dipstick in the diagnostic and therapeutic follow-up of malaria patients in Mali.Malaria is a major public health problem in Mali and diagnosis is typically based on microscopy. Microscopy requires a well trained technician, a reliable power source, a functioning microscope and adequate supplies. The scarcity of resources of community health centres (CHC) does not allow for such a significant investment in only one aspect of malaria control. In this context, Rapid Diagnostic Tests (RDTs) may improve case management particularly in remote areas.This multicentre study included 725 patients simultaneously screened with OptiMal-IT test and thick smears for malaria parasite detection. While evaluating the therapeutic efficacy of choroquine in 2 study sites, we compared the diagnostic values of thick smear microscopy to OptiMal-IT test applying the WHO 14 days follow-up scheme using samples collected from 344 patients.The sensitivity and the specificity of OptiMal-IT compared to thick smear was 97.2% and 95.4%, whereas the positive and negative predictive values were 96.7 and 96.1%, respectively. The percent agreement between the two diagnostic tests was 0.93. The two tests were comparable in detecting malaria at day 0, day 3 and day 14. The only difference was observed at day 7 due to high gametocytemia. Subjectively, health care providers found OptiMal-IT easier to use and store under field conditions.OptiMal-IT test revealed similar results when compared to microscopy which is considered the gold standard for malaria diagnostics. The test was found to have a short processing time and was easier to use. These advantages may improve malaria case management by providing a diagnostic and drug efficacy follow-up tool to peripheral health centres with limited resources.[Rapid immunochromatographic tests for detection of malaria: principles and strategies for use].Malaria is a parasitological emergency requiring safe quick accurate diagnosis so that appropriate therapy can be implemented. A number of rapid diagnostic tests based on detection of HRP2 Ag, enzymes, LDH or aldolase are now available. However the use of these tests is restricted to trained, experienced staff in special situations. The purpose of this report is to describe the different tests on the market and clarify the limitations for their use.MalaQuick versus ParaSight F as a diagnostic aid in travellers' malaria.In this study we assessed whether travellers can perform malaria rapid tests, following the provided information leaflet, and correctly interpret performed and pre-prepared test strips. Two Plasmodium falciparum testing systems, namely MalaQuick (ICT) and ParaSight F were used. Test performance and test interpretation of pre-prepared tests were compared. There was no significant difference in test performance between the 2 tests. Interpretation of prepared test strips in both test systems was very reliable in blood parasite densities between 0.1% and 2%, but major problems were encountered at low parasitaemia (< 0.1% blood parasites) and also in ParaSight F test strips showing high parasitaemia (> 2% blood parasites). Low parasitaemia ParaSight F test strips were correctly interpreted by 52.1% compared with 10.8% correct interpretations with MalaQuick (P < 0.0001). Correct interpretation of highly positive (> 2% blood parasites) pre-prepared test strips was higher with MalaQuick (96.8%) than with ParaSight F (33.8%), P < 0.0001. Both tests were associated with high levels of false-negative interpretations which render them unsuitable as self-diagnostic kits. Efforts must be made to assist lay individuals in test performance by technical test improvement, by equiping the test strips with an additional reading aid for interpretation, and by providing instruction by a skilled person.Diagnostic methods of malaria in Eastern Nepal: a comparative study of traditional and two rapid diagnostic tests.This study compared the diagnostic accuracy of Quantitative Buffy Coat (QBC) a fluorescent microscopy test and OptiMAL, an immunochromatographic dip stick test against conventional microscopy for the detection of malaria at a tertiary teaching hospital situated in Eastern Nepal. 100 clinically suspected malaria patients with positive and negative parasitemia were assessed under conventional microscopy. The blood samples withdrawn from these subjects were further evaluated by the QBC Method and OptiMAL dipstick test. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and diagnostic accuracy of QBC and OptiMAL tests as compared with microscopy were 100%, 100%, 100%, 100%, 1 and 96%, 100%, 100%, 96.15% and 0.98 respectively. In Nepal, thick and thin blood smears remain the gold standard for malaria species diagnosis in routine diagnostic laboratories. In this study the efficacy of newer malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) surpassed the diagnostic efficacy of clinical microscopy and hence these RDT's will have a greater role in clinical practice. The cost of QBC technique may impose limitations on its use in Nepal but the OptiMAL test is likely to play an important part in urgent malaria diagnosis.Estimation of parasite load using Rapid diagnostic test ICT Now Malaria P.f/P.v in Plasmodium falciparum malaria.Rapid tests such as ICT Malaria are an effective field tool in determining the presence of malarial parasites but do not provide an estimate of parasite load. We have evaluated the utility of ICT for providing semi-quantitative estimates of parasite load. Circulating parasite load in the blood of patients with malaria (n =54), were compared with the circulating HRP2 protein levels. Blood was serially diluted and analysed by a rapid diagnostic test (ICT(R) Now P.f/P.v) for assessment of endpoint PfHRP2 antigen titres. Significant correlation was observed between parasite load and PfHRP2 antigen titres (Spearman rank; rho = 0.821; p<0.001) with plasma dilutions > 1:16 corresponding to a parasite load of 0.1% parasitaemia. Variability in haematological parameters had no effect on the antibody titres obtained with the ICT test. Rapid semi-quantitative assessment of parasite load in conjunction with the Plasmodium speciation may provide a useful bedside and field aid in the diagnosis of malaria.Malaria rapid diagnostic devices: performance characteristics of the ParaSight F device determined in a multisite field study.Microscopic detection of parasites has been the reference standard for malaria diagnosis for decades. However, difficulty in maintaining required technical skills and infrastructure has spurred the development of several nonmicroscopic malaria rapid diagnostic devices based on the detection of malaria parasite antigen in whole blood. The ParaSight F test is one such device. It detects the presence of Plasmodium falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein 2 by using an antigen-capture immunochromatographic strip format. The present study was conducted at outpatient malaria clinics in Iquitos, Peru, and Maesod, Thailand. Duplicate, blinded, expert microscopy was employed as the reference standard for evaluating device performance. Of 2,988 eligible patients, microscopy showed that 547 (18%) had P. falciparum, 658 (22%) had P. vivax, 2 (0.07%) had P. malariae, and 1,750 (59%) were negative for Plasmodium. Mixed infections (P. falciparum and P. vivax) were identified in 31 patients (1%). The overall sensitivity of ParaSight F for P. falciparum was 95%. When stratified by magnitude of parasitemia (no. of asexual parasites per microliter of whole blood), sensitivities were 83% (>0 to 500 parasites/microl), 87% (501 to 1,000/microl), 98% (1,001 to 5,000/microl), and 98% (>5,000/microl). Device specificity was 86%.Prozone in malaria rapid diagnostics tests: how many cases are missed?Prozone means false-negative or false-low results in antigen-antibody reactions, due to an excess of either antigen or antibody. The present study prospectively assessed its frequency for malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) and Plasmodium falciparum samples in an endemic field setting.From January to April 2010, blood samples with P. falciparum high parasitaemia (≥ 4% red blood cells infected) were obtained from patients presenting at the Provincial Hospital of Tete (Mozambique). Samples were tested undiluted and 10-fold diluted in saline with a panel of RDTs and results were scored for line intensity (no line visible, faint, weak, medium and strong). Prozone was defined as a sample which showed no visible test line or a faint or weak test line when tested undiluted, and a visible test line of higher intensity when tested 10-fold diluted, as observed by two blinded observers and upon duplicate testing.A total of 873/7,543 (11.6%) samples showed P. falciparum, 92 (10.5%) had high parasitaemia and 76 were available for prozone testing. None of the two Pf-pLDH RDTs, but all six HRP-2 RDTs showed prozone, at frequencies between 6.7% and 38.2%. Negative and faint HRP-2 lines accounted for four (3.8%) and 15 (14.4%) of the 104 prozone results in two RDT brands. For the most affected brand, the proportions of prozone with no visible or faint HRP-2 lines were 10.9% (CI: 5.34-19.08), 1.2% (CI: 0.55-2.10) and 0.1% (CI: 0.06-0.24) among samples with high parasitaemia, all positive samples and all submitted samples respectively. Prozone occurred mainly, but not exclusively, among young children.Prozone occurs at different frequency and intensity in HRP-2 RDTs and may decrease diagnostic accuracy in the most affected RDTs.[Evaluation of ICT malaria immunochromatographic Binax NOW ICT P.f/P.v test for rapid diagnosis of malaria in a Colombian endemic area].One of the strategies to reduce malarial morbidity and mortality is to make an early diagnosis, using simple rapid tests which are highly sensitive and specific. Furthermore, the tests must be easy to perform and understand by local people in such a way that a suitable and prompt antimalarial treatment is guaranteed.The sensitivity and specificity was determined for the immuno-chromographic malaria dipstick (ICT Pf/Pv) test for the rapid diagnosis of malaria in Turbo, Antioquia.The sample consisted of 171 patients distributed into two groups: the first group was 118 patients with acute febrile syndrome compatible with malaria to which ICT Pf/Pv and thick smears were applied simultaneously; a second group was 53 patients with positive diagnosis by thick smear, with follow-up on the 4th and 7th days after beginning treatment.Sensitivity and specificity of the ICT Pf/Pv test for Plasmodium falciparum infections were 54.2% (95%CI: 52.0-53.4%) and 93.6% (95%CI: 93.1-94.2%), respectively. In addition, for Plasmodium vivax the sensitivity and specificity were 80% (95%CI: 77.9-82.1%) and 100% (95%CI: 99.5-100%); there was a 21.4% loss of sensitivity for P. falciparum 21.4% and a 33% loss for P. vivax malaria with parasitaemias under 500 parasites/ul. For the confirmatory test, ICT Pf/Pv showed a global sensitivity of 71.6% with 20.7% false positive and 5.6% false negative results. During follow-up, ICT showed 36% and 34% false positive results for day 4 and 7, respectively.The ICT Pf/Pv test has a poor sensitivity for P. falciparum malaria and its capacity to detect parasitemias under 500 parasites/ul is minimal. As a confirmatory test, the ICT Pf/Pv has a good sensitivity for P. falciparum. Its use for patient follow-up is not recommended.Performance of the Now Malaria rapid diagnostic test with returned travellers: a 2-year retrospective study in a French teaching hospital.Malaria caused by Plasmodium falciparum remains the major life-threatening parasitic infection in the world. The number of cases in non-endemic countries continues to increase, and it is important that misdiagnosis of malaria should not occur, especially in non-immune travellers, because of the high risk of a fatal outcome. In a retrospective study of 399 sera, the Now Malaria rapid test was compared with the quantitative buffy coat (QBC) test and microbiological examination of thin blood films. Compared with the QBC test and thin blood films, the Now Malaria test had sensitivity and specificity values of 96.4% and 97%, respectively, for the detection of pure P. falciparum infection. A negative predictive value of 99.4% allows this test to be included in diagnostic strategies for patients presenting with clinical suspicion of malaria. Two false-negative results were associated with low levels of parasitaemia in the specimens. Thus, use of the Now Malaria test alone to detect P. falciparum infection in non-endemic countries could lead to misdiagnosis of malaria. This rapid diagnostic test should therefore be performed in association with another prompt traditional method such as examination of thin blood films.Low sensitivity of malaria rapid diagnostic tests stored at room temperature in the Brazilian Amazon Region.In remote areas of the Amazon Region, diagnosis of malaria by microscopy is practically impossible. This study aimed to evaluate the performance of two rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) targeting different malaria antigens stored at room temperature in the Brazilian Amazon Region.Performance of the OptiMal Pf/Pan test and ICT-Now Pf/Pan test was analyzed retrospectively in 1,627 and 1,602 blood samples, respectively. Tests were performed over a 15-month period. Kits were stored at room temperature in five community health centres located in the Brazilian Amazon Region. RDT results were compared with thick blood smear (TBS) results to determine sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of the RDT.The sensitivities of the OptiMal Pf/Pan test were 79.7% for Plasmodium falciparum malaria diagnosis and 85.7% for non-P. falciparum infections. The results showed a crude agreement of 88.5% for P. falciparum, and 88.3% for non-P. falciparum infections (Kappa index = 0.74 and 0.75, respectively). For the ICT-Now Pf/Pan test (CI 95%), the sensitivities were 87.9% for P. falciparum malaria diagnosis and 72.5% for non-P. falciparum infection. Crude agreement between the ICT-Now Pf/Pan test and TBS was 91.4% for P. falciparum and 79.7% for non-P. falciparum infection. The Kappa index was 0.81 and 0.59 for the final diagnosis of P. falciparum and non-P. falciparum, respectively. Higher levels of parasitaemia were associated with higher crude agreement between RDT and TBS.The sensitivities of RDTs stored at room temperature over a 15-month period and performed in field conditions were lower than those previously reported.Evaluation of the OptiMAL test for rapid diagnosis of Plasmodium vivax and Plasmodium falciparum malaria.The development of rapid and specific diagnostic tests to identify individuals infected with malaria is of paramount importance in efforts to control the severe public health impact of this disease. This study evaluated the ability of a newly developed rapid malaria diagnostic test, OptiMAL (Flow Inc., Portland, Oreg.), to detect Plasmodium vivax and Plasmodium falciparum malaria during an outbreak in Honduras. OptiMAL is a rapid (10-min) malaria detection test which utilizes a dipstick coated with monoclonal antibodies against the intracellular metabolic enzyme parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH). Differentiation of malaria parasites is based on antigenic differences between the pLDH isoforms. Since pLDH is produced only by live Plasmodium parasites, this test has the ability to differentiate live from dead organisms. Results from the OptiMAL test were compared to those obtained by reading 100 fields of traditional Giemsa-stained thick-smear blood films. Whole-blood samples were obtained from 202 patients suspected of having malaria. A total of 96 samples (48%) were positive by blood films, while 91 (45%) were positive by the OptiMAL test. The blood films indicated that 82% (79 of 96) of the patients were positive for P. vivax and 18% (17 of 96) were infected with P. falciparum. The OptiMAL test showed that 81% (74 of 91) were positive for P. vivax and 19% (17 of 91) were positive for P. falciparum. These results demonstrated that the OptiMAL test had sensitivities of 94 and 88% and specificities of 100 and 99%, respectively, when compared to traditional blood films for the detection of P. vivax and P. falciparum malaria. Blood samples not identified by OptiMAL as malaria positive normally contained parasites at concentrations of less than 100/microl of blood. Samples found to contain P. falciparum were further tested by two other commercially available rapid malaria diagnostic tests, ParaSight-F (Becton Dickinson, Cockeysville, Md.) and ICT Malaria P.f. (ICT Diagnostics, Sydney, Australia), both of which detect only P. falciparum. Only 11 of the 17 (65%) P. falciparum-positive blood samples were identified by the ICT and ParaSight-F tests. Thus, OptiMAL correctly identified P. falciparum malaria parasites in patient blood samples more often than did the other two commercially available diagnostic tests and showed an excellent correlation with traditional blood films in the identification of both P. vivax malaria and P. falciparum malaria. We conclude that the OptiMAL test is an effective tool for the rapid diagnosis of malaria.[Interpreteation of immunochromatographic tests with HRP-2 antigen in children under 5 years in an area of high risk of malaria transmission in Papua New Guinea].The immunochromatographic tests with HRP-2 antigen (histidine-rich protein) Vision Biotech Pf Rapid Malaria Test was performed in 291 children under 5 years presenting fever or history of fever (malaria presumptive cases) admitted to Children Out-Patient Department of the Modilon Hospital in Madang, in a high malaria risk area of Papua New Guinea. The results of the tests were compared to the results of the parasitic examination of the peripheral blood with light microscopy (thick and thin smears). The HRP-2 test showed very high sensitivity (95.4%) and specificity (94.1%) for Plasmodiumfalciparum parasitaemia and none or very low sensitivity and specificity for other malaria species. The HRP-2 test detected both asexual and sexual stages of the Plasmodium falciparum parasites. The test did not show significant changes in detection of different levels of parasitaemia. These findings enable to conclude that the HRP-2 immunochromatographic assay can be very helpful to diagnose Plasmodium falciparum malaria when microscopy examination is not available, but as qualitative tests can be difficult for interpretation especially in high malaria risk areas. Therefore it can require re-examination of blood with microscopy to confirm species and development stages of Plasmodium spp. and to assess parasite load.Use and limitations of malaria rapid diagnostic testing by community health workers in war-torn Democratic Republic of Congo.Accurate and practical malaria diagnostics, such as immunochromatographic rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs), have the potential to avert unnecessary treatments and save lives. Volunteer community health workers (CHWs) represent a potentially valuable human resource for expanding this technology to where it is most needed, remote rural communities in sub-Saharan Africa with limited health facilities and personnel. This study reports on a training programme for CHWs to incorporate RDTs into their management strategy for febrile children in the Democratic Republic of Congo, a tropical African setting ravaged by human conflict.Prospective cohort study, satisfaction questionnaire and decision analysis.Twelve CHWs were trained to safely and accurately perform and interpret RDTs, then successfully implemented rapid diagnostic testing in their remote community in a cohort of 357 febrile children. CHWs were uniformly positive in evaluating RDTs for their utility and ease of use. However, high malaria prevalence in this cohort (93% by RDTs, 88% by light microscopy) limited the cost-effectiveness of RDTs compared to presumptive treatment of all febrile children, as evidenced by findings from a simplified decision analysis.CHWs can safely and effectively use RDTs in their management of febrile children; however, cost-effectiveness of RDTs is limited in zones of high malaria prevalence.Test characteristics of the SD FK80 Plasmodium falciparum/Plasmodium vivax malaria rapid diagnostic test in a non-endemic setting.The SD FK80 P.f/P.v Malaria Antigen Rapid Test (Standard Diagnostics, Korea) (FK80) is a three-band malaria rapid diagnostic test detecting Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein-2 (HRP-2) and Plasmodium vivax-specific lactate dehydrogenase (Pv-pLDH). The present study assessed its performance in a non-endemic setting.Stored blood samples (n = 416) from international travellers suspected of malaria were used, with microscopy corrected by PCR as the reference method. Samples infected by Plasmodium falciparum (n = 178), Plasmodium vivax (n = 99), Plasmodium ovale (n = 75) and Plasmodium malariae (n = 24) were included, as well as 40 malaria negative samples.Overall sensitivities for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and P. vivax were 91.6% (95% confidence interval (CI): 86.2% - 95.0%) and 75.8% (65.9% - 83.6%). For P. falciparum, sensitivity at parasite densities >or= 100/microl was 94.6% (88.8% - 97.6%); for P. vivax, sensitivity at parasite densities >or= 500/microl was 86.8% (75.4% - 93.4%). Four P. falciparum samples showed a Pv-pLDH line, three of them had parasite densities exceeding 50.000/microl. Two P. vivax samples, one P. ovale and one P. malariae sample showed a HRP-2 line. For the HRP-2 and Pv-pLDH lines, respectively 81.4% (136/167) and 55.8% (43/77) of the true positive results were read as medium or strong line intensities. The FK80 showed good reproducibility and reliability for test results and line intensities (kappa values for both exceeding 0.80).The FK80 test performed satisfactorily in diagnosing P. falciparum and P. vivax infections in a non-endemic setting.Limited level of accuracy provided by available rapid diagnosis tests for malaria enhances the need for PCR-based reference laboratories.The rise of imported malaria cases and the high fatality rate in Europe make the search for new and easy diagnostic methods necessary. Rapid diagnosis tests (RDTs) are, in part, developed to cover the lack of diagnosis experience. Unfortunately, our data suggest that the accuracy of RDTs is insufficient and could increase the number of incorrect malaria diagnoses.Usefulness of a rapid on-site Plasmodium falciparum diagnosis (Paracheck PF) in forest migrants and among the indigenous population at the site of their occupational activities in central India.Logistic, economic, and technical factors limit rapid access to microscopic confirmation of malaria in many tropical countries, including India. The occurrence of high-grade fever and three deaths during the hot summer months in some forest migrants created an emergency situation in Jabalpur in central India. A cheap and rapid malaria test, Paracheck Pf, was tested in this group of migrants in parallel with microscopy. The indigenous population at the site of occupational activities of these migrants approximately 250 km from Jabalpur was also screened by both methods. The results of this field investigation are very encouraging. Among migrants, the test had a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 67%. The positive and negative predictive values were 94% and 100%, respectively. Among indigenous population, the corresponding values were 100%, 97.3%, 98.4%, and 100%, respectively, indicating the usefulness of test as a diagnostic tool for providing on-site confirmation of symptomatic diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria.Sequence variation does not confound the measurement of plasma PfHRP2 concentration in African children presenting with severe malaria.Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein PFHRP2 measurement is used widely for diagnosis, and more recently for severity assessment in falciparum malaria. The Pfhrp2 gene is highly polymorphic, with deletion of the entire gene reported in both laboratory and field isolates. These issues potentially confound the interpretation of PFHRP2 measurements.Studies designed to detect deletion of Pfhrp2 and its paralog Pfhrp3 were undertaken with samples from patients in seven countries contributing to the largest hospital-based severe malaria trial (AQUAMAT). The quantitative relationship between sequence polymorphism and PFHRP2 plasma concentration was examined in samples from selected sites in Mozambique and Tanzania.There was no evidence for deletion of either Pfhrp2 or Pfhrp3 in the 77 samples with lowest PFHRP2 plasma concentrations across the seven countries. Pfhrp2 sequence diversity was very high with no haplotypes shared among 66 samples sequenced. There was no correlation between Pfhrp2 sequence length or repeat type and PFHRP2 plasma concentration.These findings indicate that sequence polymorphism is not a significant cause of variation in PFHRP2 concentration in plasma samples from African children. This justifies the further development of plasma PFHRP2 concentration as a method for assessing African children who may have severe falciparum malaria. The data also add to the existing evidence base supporting the use of rapid diagnostic tests based on PFHRP2 detection.An exploratory study of factors that affect the performance and usage of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria in the Limpopo Province, South Africa.Malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) are relatively simple to perform and provide results quickly for making treatment decisions. However, the accuracy and application of RDT results depends on several factors such as quality of the RDT, storage, transport and end user performance. A cross sectional survey to explore factors that affect the performance and use of RDTs was conducted in the primary care facilities in South Africa.This study was conducted in three malaria risk sub-districts of the Limpopo Province, in South Africa. Twenty nurses were randomly selected from 17 primary health care facilities, three nurses from hospitals serving the study area and 10 other key informants, representing the managers of the malaria control programmes, routine and research laboratories, were interviewed, using semi-structured questionnaires.There was a high degree of efficiency in ordering and distribution of RDTs, however only 13/20 (65%) of the health facilities had appropriate air-conditioning and monitoring of room temperatures. Sixty percent (12/20) of the nurses did not receive any external training on conducting and interpreting RDT. Fifty percent of nurses (10/20) reported RDT stock-outs. Only 3/20 nurses mentioned that they periodically checked quality of RDT. Fifteen percent of nurses reported giving antimalarial drugs even if the RDT was negative.Storage, quality assurance, end user training and use of RDT results for clinical decision making in primary care facilities in South Africa need to be improved. Further studies of the factors influencing the quality control of RDTs, their performance of RDTs and the ways to improve their use of RDTs are needed.Evaluation of rapid immunocapture assays for diagnosis of Plasmodium vivax in Korea.The rapid immunocapture assays, OptiMal and ICT, were evaluated from 87 individuals for the diagnosis of malaria infections directly from whole blood. A total of 87 individuals was examined for malaria parasites by microscopic examination of Giemsa-stained blood smears, and 65 cases were positive for Plasmodium vivax by microscopy. Correspondingly, the OptiMal test identified malaria infection in 45 cases (69.2%) of microscopy positive cases. Of these, two cases were misinterpreted as Plasmodium falciparum, whereas ICT detected P. vivax infection in 29 (44.6%) patients. We would like to propose that rapid immuno capture assays are an easy method that can serve as a useful tool in addition to microscopy for the diagnosis of malaria, but sensitivity is not yet satisfactory for diagnosis of P. vivax in Korea.Field trial of three different Plasmodium vivax-detecting rapid diagnostic tests with and without evaporative cool box storage in Afghanistan.Accurate parasitological diagnosis of malaria is essential for targeting treatment where more than one species coexist. In this study, three rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) (AccessBio CareStart (CSPfPan), CareStart PfPv (CSPfPv) and Standard Diagnostics Bioline (SDBPfPv)) were evaluated for their ability to detect natural Plasmodium vivax infections in a basic clinic setting. The potential for locally made evaporative cooling boxes (ECB) to protect the tests from heat damage in high summer temperatures was also investigated.Venous blood was drawn from P. vivax positive patients in Jalalabad, Afghanistan and tested against a panel of six RDTs. The panel comprised two of each test type; one group was stored at room temperature and the other in an ECB. RDT results were evaluated against a consensus gold standard based on two double-read reference slides and PCR. The sensitivity, specificity and a measure of global performance for each test were determined and stratified by parasitaemia level and storage condition.In total, 306 patients were recruited, of which 284 were positive for P. vivax, one for Plasmodium malariae and none for Plasmodium falciparum; 21 were negative. All three RDTs were specific for malaria. The sensitivity and global performance index for each test were as follows: CSPfPan [98.6%, 95.1%], CSPfPv [91.9%, 90.5%] and SDBPfPv [96.5%, 82.9%], respectively. CSPfPv was 16% less sensitive to a parasitaemia below 5,000/μL. Room temperature storage of SDBPfPv led to a high proportion of invalid results (17%), which reduced to 10% in the ECB. Throughout the testing period, the ECB maintained ~8°C reduction over ambient temperatures and never exceeded 30°C.Of the three RDTs, the CSPfPan test was the most consistent and reliable, rendering it appropriate for this P. vivax predominant region. The CSPfPv test proved unsuitable owing to its reduced sensitivity at a parasitaemia below 5,000/μL (affecting 43% of study samples). Although the SDBPfPv device was more sensitive than the CSPfPv test, its invalid rate was unacceptably high. ECB storage reduced the proportion of invalid results for the SDBPfPv test, but surprisingly had no impact on RDT sensitivity at low parasitaemia.Rapid malaria tests: where do we go after 20 years?Great advances have been made in developing rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for diagnosing malaria. To date, RDTs present an exceedingly practical format for malaria diagnosis that outperforms traditional microscopy and more experimental next generation devices in the development pipeline. However, although use of such tests is accepted in principle, their actual use has lagged. Furthermore, study of how these tests perform, what their limitations are, and how to work with these limitations to still use them effectively has stagnated. We propose that the study and implementation of such RDTs should be aggressively advanced and propose a series of questions that can guide efforts.Genetic variation in histidine rich proteins among Indian Plasmodium falciparum population: possible cause of variable sensitivity of malaria rapid diagnostic tests.Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) have revolutionized the diagnosis of malaria. Among the various factors affecting RDTs sensitivity is genetic variation of the antigen used. The genetic variation in PfHRP2 and PfHRP3 proteins was studied among the Indian Plasmodium falciparum isolates.One hundred and forty isolates of P. falciparum were collected from six geographical regions of India. Target genes encoding PfHRP2 and PfHRP3 antigens were sequenced to study genetic polymorphism. Minimum detection limit giving a positive rapid diagnostic test was also determined.Extensive variations were observed in amino acid repeat types of PfHRP2 and PfHRP3. PfHRP2 exhibited more polymorphism than PfHRP3. Significant relation was observed between type 2 and type 7 repeats and RDT detection rate as higher number of these repeats showed better sensitivity with RDTs.The results provide insights into the genetic diversity of Pfhrp2 and Pfhrp3 genes among Indian P. falciparum population and its relation to RDT sensitivity.Use of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria in an emergency situation after the flood disaster in Mozambique.To determine how diagnosis of malaria may be improved by combining the use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for Plasmodium falciparum malaria with clinical diagnosis by the presence or history of fever compared with clinical diagnosis alone in emergency situations with flood-affected displaced populations in Mozambique.A cross-sectional study conducted at the emergency outpatient clinic in a village in the Chòkwè district of Gaza Province, 3 weeks after Cyclone Eline hit Mozambique in February 2000.A hundred and thirty children aged less than 15 years with clinical malaria were selected for examination by RDT and fluorescent microscopy using acridine orange as a reference test. The diagnosis of clinical malaria was made by a history of fever in the last three days or axillary temperature above 37.0 degrees C at the time of attending the emergency outpatient clinic. Two positive predictive values were calculated; RDTs combined with clinical diagnosis and clinical diagnosis alone.Positive predictive values of RDTs combined with clinical diagnosis by the presence of fever or history of fever were 87.6% (92/105) (95% confidence interval (CI) 80.8-92.8) compared with 74.6% (97/130) (95% CI 66.2-81.8) for clinical diagnosis alone. Five patients were diagnosed false negative.RDTs combined with clinical diagnosis has sufficient positive predictive value to be used in emergency situations, while RDTs could result in increasing failure to treat when they are used for decisions of treatment compared with clinical diagnosis alone.Rapid diagnostic tests compared with malaria microscopy for guiding outpatient treatment of febrile illness in Tanzania: randomised trial.To compare rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria with routine microscopy in guiding treatment decisions for febrile patients.Randomised trial.Outpatient departments in northeast Tanzania at varying levels of malaria transmission.2416 patients for whom a malaria test was requested.Staff received training on rapid diagnostic tests; patients sent for malaria tests were randomised to rapid diagnostic test or routine microscopyProportion of patients with a negative test prescribed an antimalarial drug.Of 7589 outpatient consultations, 2425 (32%) had a malaria test requested. Of 1204 patients randomised to microscopy, 1030 (86%) tested negative for malaria; 523 (51%) of these were treated with an antimalarial drug. Of 1193 patients randomised to rapid diagnostic test, 1005 (84%) tested negative; 540 (54%) of these were treated for malaria (odds ratio 1.13, 95% confidence interval 0.95 to 1.34; P=0.18). Children aged under 5 with negative rapid diagnostic tests were more likely to be prescribed an antimalarial drug than were those with negative slides (P=0.003). Patients with a negative test by any method were more likely to be prescribed an antibiotic (odds ratio 6.42, 4.72 to 8.75; P<0.001). More than 90% of prescriptions for antimalarial drugs in low-moderate transmission settings were for patients for whom a test requested by a clinician was negative for malaria.Although many cases of malaria are missed outside the formal sector, within it malaria is massively over-diagnosed. This threatens the sustainability of deployment of artemisinin combination treatment, and treatable bacterial diseases are likely to be missed. Use of rapid diagnostic tests, with basic training for clinical staff, did not in itself lead to any reduction in over-treatment for malaria. Interventions to improve clinicians' management of febrile illness are essential but will not be easy.Clinical trials NCT00146796 [ClinicalTrials.gov].Accuracy of malaria diagnosis by microscopy, rapid diagnostic test, and PCR methods and evidence of antimalarial overprescription in non-severe febrile patients in two Tanzanian hospitals.The study was aimed to evaluate the malaria over/underdiagnosis and over/underprescription of antimalarial drugs. Between February and March 2007 blood samples were collected from 336 non-severe febrile outpatients attended in two peripheral Tanzanian hospitals. Microscopy and a rapid diagnostic test (RDT) were done locally and the accuracy evaluated by qualitative polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for Plasmodium spp. The testing was performed at National Institute for Infectious Diseases Lazzaro Spallanzani (INMI), Rome, Italy. As a result of PCR, we identified 26 malaria cases out of 336 (7.7%) patients. Microscopy and RDT accuracies were 93.5% and 97.6%, respectively. Overprescription and underdiagnosis rates were 29.3% and 30.8%, respectively. On-field training, clinical management of febrile illness, and malaria microscopy in remote settings should be considered.Short report: Failure of the OptiMAL rapid malaria test as a tool for the detection of asymptomatic malaria in an area of Thailand endemic for Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax.We evaluated the efficacy of the OptiMAL assay in a cross-sectional malaria survey in western Thailand from April to August 2001. Expert microscopy of Giemsa-stained thick and thin blood films was used as the gold standard. Positive control lines were evident in 99% (1,128 of 1,137) of the assays tested. However, 34% (384 of 1,128) of assays produced an aberrant result (a positive P. falciparum-specific line and a negative panmalarial line). False-positive panmalarial and Plasmodium falciparum-specific lines occurred in 25.9% (270 of 1,042) and 60.3% (628 of 1,042) of microscopy-negative samples, respectively. Due to the preponderance of false-positive test results, it was necessary to develop subjective criteria for test positivity based on line intensity. For determination of assay performance during this study, we therefore considered all test lines that were scored as intermediate or strong as positive and lines that were faint as negative. Using these criteria, we determined that the sensitivity of the OptiMAL assay for P. falciparum was 25% with > 500 parasites/microl and 10.5% with > 100 parasites/microl, while for P. vivax, the sensitivity at the same parasite rates was 100% and 41.7%, respectively. Further studies are required to determine whether the problems we identified are limited to this particular lot of OptiMAL assays.Evaluation of CareStart™ malaria Pf/Pv combo test for Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax malaria diagnosis in Butajira area, south-central Ethiopia.Malaria is a major public health problem in Ethiopia. Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax co-exist and malaria rapid diagnostic test (RDTs) is vital in rendering parasite-confirmed treatment especially in areas where microscopy from 2008 to 2010 is not available. CareStartTM Malaria Pf/Pv combo test was evaluated compared to microscopy in Butajira area, south-central Ethiopia. This RDT detects histidine-rich protein-2 (HRP2) found in P. falciparum, and Plasmodium enzyme lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) for diagnosis of P. vivax. The standard for the reporting of diagnostic accuracy studies was complied. Among 2,394 participants enrolled, 10.9% (n=87) were Plasmodium infected (household survey) and 24.5% (n=392) health facility-based using microscopy. In the household surveys, the highest positivity was caused by P. vivax (83.9%, n=73), P. falciparum (15.0%, n=13), and the rest due to mixed infections of both (1.1%, n=1). In health facility, P. vivax caused 78.6% (n=308), P. falciparum caused 20.4% (n=80), and the rest caused by mixed infections 1.0% (n=4). RDT missed 9.1% (n=8) in household and 4.3% (n=17) in health facility-based surveys among Plasmodium positive confirmed by microscopy while 3.3% (n=24) in household and 17.2% (n=208) in health facility-based surveys were detected false positive. RDT showed agreement with microscopy in detecting 79 positives in household surveys (n=796) and 375 positives in health centre survey (n=1,598).RDT performance varied in both survey settings, lowest PPV (64.3%) for Plasmodium and P. falciparum (77.2%) in health centres; and Plasmodium (76.7%) and P. falciparum (87.5%) in household surveys. NPV was low in P. vivax in health centres (77.2%) and household (87.5%) surveys. Seasonally varying RDT precision of as low as 14.3% PPV (Dec. 2009), and 38.5% NPV (Nov. 2008) in health centre surveys; and 40-63.6% PPV was observed in household surveys. But the influence of age and parasite density on RDT performance was not ascertained. Establishing quality control of malaria RDT in the health system in areas with low endemic and where P. falciparum and P. vivax co-exist is recommendable. CareStartTM RDT might be employed for epidemiological studies that require interpreting the results cautiously. Future RDT field evaluation against microscopy should be PCR corrected. Challenges in diagnosing paediatric malaria in Dar es Salaam, Tanzania.Malaria is a major cause of paediatric morbidity and mortality. As no clinical features clearly differentiate malaria from other febrile illnesses, and malaria diagnosis is challenged by often lacking laboratory equipment and expertise, overdiagnosis and overtreatment is common.Children admitted with fever at the general paediatric wards at Muhimbili National Hospital (MNH), Dar es Salaam, Tanzania from January to June 2009 were recruited consecutively and prospectively. Demographic and clinical features were registered. Routine thick blood smear microscopy at MNH was compared to results of subsequent thin blood smear microscopy, and rapid diagnostics tests (RDTs). Genus-specific PCR of Plasmodium mitochondrial DNA was performed on DNA extracted from whole blood and species-specific PCR was done on positive samples.Among 304 included children, 62.6% had received anti-malarials during the last four weeks prior to admission and 65.1% during the hospital stay. Routine thick blood smears, research blood smears, PCR and RDT detected malaria in 13.2%, 6.6%, 25.0% and 13.5%, respectively. Positive routine microscopy was confirmed in only 43% (17/40), 45% (18/40) and 53% (21/40), by research microscopy, RDTs and PCR, respectively. Eighteen percent (56/304) had positive PCR but negative research microscopy. Reported low parasitaemia on routine microscopy was associated with negative research blood slide and PCR. RDT-positive cases were associated with signs of severe malaria. Palmar pallor, low haemoglobin and low platelet count were significantly associated with positive PCR, research microscopy and RDT.The true morbidity attributable to malaria in the study population remains uncertain due to the discrepancies in results among the diagnostic methods. The current routine microscopy appears to result in overdiagnosis of malaria and, consequently, overuse of anti-malarials. Conversely, children with a false positive malaria diagnosis may die because they do not receive treatment for the true cause of their illness. RDTs appear to have the potential to improve routine diagnostics, but the clinical implication of the many RDT-negative, PCR-positive samples needs to be elucidated.Is molecular biology the best alternative for diagnosis of malaria to microscopy? A comparison between microscopy, antigen detection and molecular tests in rural Kenya and urban Tanzania.To assess the agreement of different diagnostic methods for the diagnosis and confirmation of the clinical suspicion of Plasmodium infection in children in Tanzania and Kenya.Blood samples were collected by the finger prick method from 338 children. Blood samples were collected from 338 children with the clinical suspicion of uncomplicated malaria in health clinics in Tanzania and Kenya. The presence of Plasmodium parasites was assessed with microscopy, rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) and the molecular assays, quantitative nucleic acid sequence based amplification (QT-NASBA) and polymerase chain reaction (PCR). The results were compared and analysed for agreement.There was a high degree of agreement (88.6-100%) between RDTs or molecular tests and microscopy. In rural Kenya, with a high incidence of malaria cases, the correlation coefficient ranged from 0.94 for RDTs to 0.76 for PCR. In urban Tanzania, where there was a low incidence of cases, R for RDTs was 1.0 but only 0.25 for PCR and 0.33 for NASBA.Malaria is overestimated if the diagnosis is based solely on clinical signs. Therefore, laboratory confirmation is essential. Microscopy is a reliable method in rural areas where malaria is prevalent, but RDTs offer a good alternative with the advantage that it is an easy and rapid method. Molecular tests are more sensitive but difficult to implement in rural areas. In areas with lower incidence, molecular tests detect a significantly higher number of Plasmodium infections than RDTs or microscopy. Although implementation of molecular tools can be difficult, the prospect of an easy and cheap detection system makes them promising tools for the near future.Persistent ICT malaria P.f/P.v panmalarial and HRP2 antigen reactivity after treatment of Plasmodium falciparum malaria is associated with gametocytemia and results in false-positive diagnoses of Plasmodium vivax in convalescence.A problem with rapid Plasmodium falciparum-specific antigen histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) detection tests for malaria is the persistence of antigen in blood after the disappearance of asexual-stage parasitemia and clinical symptoms, resulting in false-positive (FP) test results following treatment. The ICT P.f/P.v immunochromatographic test detects both HRP2 and a panmalarial antigen (PMA) found in both P. falciparum and Plasmodium vivax. To examine posttreatment antigen persistence with this test and whether persistent sexual-stage forms (gametocytes) are a cause of FP tests after treatment, we compared serial antigen test results with microscopy results from patients symptomatic with P. falciparum malaria in Indonesia for 28 days following treatment with chloroquine (CQ; n = 66), sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine (SP; n = 36), and artesunate plus sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine (ART + SP; n = 15). Persistent FP antigenemia following SP treatment occurred in 29% (HRP2) and 42% (PMA) of the patients on day 7 and in 10% (HRP2) and 23% (PMA) on day 14. The high rates of persistent HRP2 and PMA antigenemia following CQ and SP treatment were strongly associated with the presence of gametocytemia, with the proportion with gametocytes on day 7 posttreatment being significantly greater in those with FP results than in those with true-negative PMA and HRP2 results. Gametocyte frequency on day 14 post-SP treatment was also greater in those with FP PMA results. Following SP treatment, PMA persisted longer than HRP2, giving an FP diagnosis of P. vivax in up to 16% of patients on day 14, with all FP P. vivax diagnoses having gametocytemia. In contrast, PMA was rapidly cleared following ART + SP treatment in association with rapid clearance of gametocytemia. Gametocytes appear to be an important cause of persistent posttreatment panmalarial antigenemia in areas of endemicity and may also contribute in part to persistent HRP2 antigenemia following treatment.Comparison of two commercial assays and microscopy with PCR for diagnosis of malaria.This study compared conventional PCR with microscopy and 2 rapid detection methods, the pLDH which detected lactic dehydrogenase enzyme produced by actively metabolizing organisms and the malaria antibody tests. The sensitivity of PCR was 1 parasite/microl, i.e.: 50 times more sensitive than microscopy. When PCR was compared with microscopy, the sensitivity and specificity were 90% & 100% respectively. The sensitivity recorded was pLDH test in comparison to PCR (95%). The malaria antibody test recorded the least sensitivity (68%) PCR proved as the gold standard for evaluation of applied tests and the newly introduced ones. In absence of an expert microscopist, the pLDH test could substitute for microscopy. The test proved valuable to assess clinical cure, and predict drug resistance. Its advantage over microscopy was the ability to diagnose infection with low parasitemic patients. Antibody rapid tests might be not valuable in acute cases, but still accepted as a tool in epidemiological studies and in screening patients in blood banks in malaria endemic areas.Laboratory diagnosis of malaria: conventional and rapid diagnostic methods.The global control of malaria is more challenging than that of many other infectious diseases: malaria is vector borne, it is caused by 5 species of Plasmodium with different geographic distributions, infection is widespread in many regions, drug resistance is common, and the disease overlaps clinically with other infectious diseases. Therefore, malaria control programs, in addition to diagnosis and testing, must also target limiting spread of the disease through vector control. Although malaria control efforts have been successful in some regions, malaria remains one of the most important causes of death in sub-Saharan Africa, particularly in women and children.To review the current literature regarding diagnostic methods available to detect clinical malaria, with an emphasis on comparing the strengths and limitations of each method.Current World Health Organization malaria control report and other information, recent meta-analyses of diagnostic tests, primary literature concerning the performance characteristics of different tests, and primary literature concerning how diagnostic tests are used in daily practice.The most commonly used method for identifying cases of malaria remains microscopic examination of peripheral blood, but there is growing use of malaria rapid diagnostic tests in many regions. One of the most important findings in the recent literature is that despite the widespread use of diagnostic tests, treatment is too often based on clinical findings rather than on results of diagnostic tests.[Imported malaria: diagnostic traps and rapid tests].Imported malaria is a disease prevalent in France: 6,000 to 8,000 cases a year, of which 15% are pediatric cases. Despite this high incidence, the diagnosis is often delayed. The patient may then evolve to a severe form. This diagnostic delay is due to non-specific clinical symptoms in children. The most common symptoms are fever and digestive disorders (diarrhea, vomiting). In the absence of thrombocytopenia, the laboratory tests are not very useful for diagnosis. Parasitological examinations are dependent on the experience of the biologist, particularly in cases of low parasitemia as those observed in children who have received partial chemoprophylaxis. The recent introduction of rapid tests based on the detection of Plasmodium proteins, allows emergency remedy to this problem. The blood smears remains the gold standard and has to be used to confirm the results of rapid tests. If rapid tests improve the detection of Plasmodium in 2009, it remains mandatory to evoke the diagnosis of malaria in any febrile child coming from an endemic area.Accuracy of malaria rapid diagnostic tests in community studies and their impact on treatment of malaria in an area with declining malaria burden in north-eastern Tanzania.Despite some problems related to accuracy and applicability of malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs), they are currently the best option in areas with limited laboratory services for improving case management through parasitological diagnosis and reducing over-treatment. This study was conducted in areas with declining malaria burden to assess; 1) the accuracy of RDTs when used at different community settings, 2) the impact of using RDTs on anti-malarial dispensing by community-owned resource persons (CORPs) and 3) adherence of CORPs to treatment guidelines by providing treatment based on RDT results.Data were obtained from: 1) a longitudinal study of passive case detection of fevers using CORPs in six villages in Korogwe; and 2) cross-sectional surveys (CSS) in six villages of Korogwe and Muheza districts, north-eastern, Tanzania. Performance of RDTs was compared with microscopy as a gold standard, and factors affecting their accuracy were explored using a multivariate logistic regression model.Overall sensitivity and specificity of RDTs in the longitudinal study (of 23,793 febrile cases; 18,154 with microscopy and RDTs results) were 88.6% and 88.2%, respectively. In the CSS, the sensitivity was significantly lower (63.4%; χ2=367.7, p<0.001), while the specificity was significantly higher (94.3%; χ2=143.1, p<0.001) when compared to the longitudinal study. As determinants of sensitivity of RDTs in both studies, parasite density of<200 asexual parasites/μl was significantly associated with high risk of false negative RDTs (OR≥16.60, p<0.001), while the risk of false negative test was significantly lower among cases with fever (axillary temperature ≥37.5 °C) (OR≤0.63, p≤0.027). The risk of false positive RDT (as a determinant of specificity) was significantly higher in cases with fever compared to afebrile cases (OR≥2.40, p<0.001). Using RDTs reduced anti-malarials dispensing from 98.9% to 32.1% in cases aged ≥5 years.Although RDTs had low sensitivity and specificity, which varied widely depending on fever and parasite density, using RDTs reduced over-treatment with anti-malarials significantly. Thus, with declining malaria prevalence, RDTs will potentially identify majority of febrile cases with parasites and lead to improved management of malaria and non-malaria fevers.Diagnostic performance of rapid diagnostic tests versus blood smears for malaria in US clinical practice.Approximately 4 million US travelers to developing countries are ill enough to seek health care, with 1500 malaria cases reported in the United States annually. The diagnosis of malaria is frequently delayed because of the time required to prepare malaria blood films and lack of technical expertise. An easy, reliable rapid diagnostic test (RDT) with high sensitivity and negative predictive value (NPV), particularly for Plasmodium falciparum, would be clinically useful. The objective of this study was to determine the diagnostic performance of a RDT approved by the US Food and Drug Administration compared with traditional thick and thin blood smears for malaria diagnosis.This prospective study tested 852 consecutive blood samples that underwent thick and thin smears and blinded malaria RDTs at 3 hospital laboratories during 2003-2006. Polymerase chain reaction verified positive test results and discordant results.Malaria was noted in 95 (11%) of the 852 samples. The RDT had superior performance than the standard Giemsa thick blood smear (p = .003). The RDT's sensitivity for all malaria was 97% (92 of 95 samples), compared with 85% (81 of 95) for the blood smear, and the RDT had a superior NPV of 99.6%, compared with 98.2% for the blood smear (p = .001). The P. falciparum performance was excellent, with 100% rapid test sensitivity, compared with only 88% (65 of 74) by blood smear (p = .003).This operational study demonstrates that the US Food and Drug Administration-approved RDT for malaria is superior to a single set of blood smears performed under routine US clinical laboratory conditions. The most valuable clinical role of the RDT is in the rapid diagnosis or the exclusion of P. falciparum malaria, which is particularly useful in outpatient settings when evaluating febrile travelers.Performance of local light microscopy and the ParaScreen Pan/Pf rapid diagnostic test to detect malaria in health centers in Northwest Ethiopia.Diagnostic tests are recommended for suspected malaria cases before treatment, but comparative performance of microscopy and rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) at rural health centers has rarely been studied compared to independent expert microscopy.Participants (N = 1997) with presumptive malaria were recruited from ten health centers with a range of transmission intensities in Amhara Regional State, Northwest Ethiopia during October to December 2007. Microscopy and ParaScreen Pan/Pf® RDT were done immediately by health center technicians. Blood slides were re-examined later at a central laboratory by independent expert microscopists.Of 1,997 febrile patients, 475 (23.8%) were positive by expert microscopists, with 57.7% P. falciparum, 24.6% P. vivax and 17.7% mixed infections. Sensitivity of health center microscopists for any malaria species was >90% in five health centers (four of which had the highest prevalence), >70% in nine centers and 44% in one site with lowest prevalence. Specificity for health center microscopy was very good (>95%) in all centers. For ParaScreen RDT, sensitivity was ≥90% in three centers, ≥70% in six and <60% in four centers. Specificity was ≥90% in all centers except one where it was 85%.Health center microscopists performed well in nine of the ten health centers; while for ParaScreen RDT they performed well in only six centers. Overall the accuracy of local microscopy exceeded that of RDT for all outcomes. This study supports the introduction of RDTs only if accompanied by appropriate training, frequent supervision and quality control at all levels. Deficiencies in RDT use at some health centers must be rectified before universal replacement of good routine microscopy with RDTs. Maintenance and strengthening of good quality microscopy remains a priority at health center level.[Efficiency of KAT-quick P.f. test (KAT medical, SAR) among the populations of drug-resistant parasites].The KAT-Quick P.f. test (KAT Medical, South African Republic) is based on the detection of protein HPR II produced by trophozoites and young gametocytes of P. falciparum. This test was conducted by the authors in the distribution areas of P. falciparum strains differing in the spectrum of drug resistance. Five hundred and forty-nine blood samples from febrile patients in Vietnam (n=84), Sierra Leone (n=41), Nigeria (n=14), Tanzania (n=8), Kenya (n=5), and Tadjikistan (n=397) were tested. Microscopy served as a primary control. Detection of P. falciparum DNA, using polymerase chain reaction (PCR) with included primers (nested PCR) of the most sensitive modification of PCR was a final control. The efficiency of the KAT-Quick P.f. test was estimated as a ratio of the number of its positive results to those of PCR. It was equal to 98-95%. The KAT-Quick P.f. test revealed no false-positive case associated with the genome of the parasite. The specificity of the test was determined as a ratio of the number of its negative (no P. falciparum) results to those of PCR. The blood samples from patients with vivax malaria and from those with nonmalarial fever were investigated. There was no cross reaction of the KAT-Quick P.f. test system for P. falciparum with that for P. vivax. The KAT-Quick P.f. test yielded no positive reaction with the blood from patients with non-malarial fever. Drug resistance depending on the spectrum of specific drugs caused its emergence may be determined by one or several mechanisms that are ultimately determined by one, the key mechanism. Thus, the findings suggest that multidrug resistance of P. falciparum does not trigger the occurrence of changes in its surface antigen--HRPII that is responsible for the efficiency of the KAT-Quick P.f. test. These may be also extrapolated to other rapid tests patterned after the same principle.Assessment of routine malaria diagnosis in the Venezuelan Amazon.The quality of routine malaria diagnosis is a crucial topic of malaria control. The aim of this assessment was to monitor and evaluate the quality of routine malaria diagnosis in Amazonas (Venezuela) and to improve the quality control system. The traditional non-blinded quality control system was found to be overburdened with diagnostic samples. A modified sampling system with fewer samples to be tested was proposed. Expert microscopists blindly double-checked 1000 slides and 550 rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) (OptiMAL-IT) from health posts (HP). For Plasmodium vivax, HP microscopy and OptiMAL-IT showed sensitivies of 86% and 63%, respectively. For P. falciparum, HP microscopy and OptiMAL-IT showed sensitivities of 68% and 89%, respectively. Both methods lost accuracy when fewer parasites occurred in the sample. HP microscopists from different municipalities displayed significant differences in diagnostic quality. Overall, quality of routine malaria diagnosis in the Venezuelan Amazon is good but not optimal. The change from the traditional non-blinded quality control system to blinded cross-checking of a minimal selection of samples is - comparatively - a low cost intervention with possibly high impact on the quality of routine malaria diagnosis. The introduction of RDTs should be discussed carefully in order not to displace an existing network of HP microscopists.Evidence behind the WHO guidelines: hospital care for children: what is the precision of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria?The evaluation of a dipstick test for Plasmodium falciparum in mining areas of Venezuela.A field trial comparing a dipstick test, an antigen-capture test detecting trophozoite-derived histidine-rich protein-II, and the quantitative buffer coat (QBC) (acridine orange staining technique) assay for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum was carried out on a population of 1,398 suspected malaria patients in gold mining areas of Venezuela. Sensitivity, specificity, and positive predictive values were higher for the dipstick test than for the acridine orange staining compared with the thick blood smear. The sensitivity for the dipstick method was 86.7% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 82-90%), the specificity was 99.3% (95% CI = 98.5-99.7%), and the positive predictive value was 97.1% (95% CI = 94-98%) as compared with the thick blood smear. The sensitivity for acridine orange staining was 82.2% (95% CI = 77-86%), the specificity was 98.5% (95% CI = 97.6-99.1%), and the positive predictive value was 94.1% (95% CI = 90-97%); with a P. falciparum asexual parasitemia higher than 21 parasites/microliter, the dipstick was 100% sensitive, when parasitemia was 10-20/microliter, sensitivity was 88%, and when parasitemia was less than 10/microliter, it was only 13.4%. The dipstick assay meets the criteria for an appropriate, rapid, and reliable test for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and has advantages over the acridine orange staining method. Nonetheless, its effectiveness seems limited in areas with low prevalence and among patients with low levels of parasitemia.Malaria diagnosis under field conditions in the Venezuelan Amazon.To improve practical, accurate diagnosis of malaria in the Amazon rainforest of Venezuela, two rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) (OptiMAL-IT) and FalciVax) and a laboratory light microscope, used in the field with a battery-operated head lamp as an external light source, were evaluated against the standard laboratory microscope procedure for malaria detection. One hundred and thirty-six Yanomami patients were studied for the presence of malaria parasites. Thirty-three patients (24%) were positive for malaria (Plasmodium falciparum, P. vivax, P. malariae). Twenty-one (64%) of the positive patients had <100 parasites/microl. Both RDTs showed poor sensitivity (24.2% for OptiMAL-IT) and 36.4% for FalciVax) but good specificity (99% both for OptiMAL-IT) and FalciVax). Field and laboratory microscopy showed sensitivities of 94% and 91%, respectively. The kappa coefficient was 0.90, indicating a high agreement between field and laboratory microscopy. We conclude that (i) adequate slide reading cannot be substituted by either of the two RDTs in the Venezuelan Amazon and (ii) the use of a light source such as that described above makes slide reading more feasible than hitherto in remote areas without electricity.[Diagnosis of Falciparum malaria by immunochromatographic test].To evaluate the applicability of rapid immunochromatographic test(ICT) for diagnosing falciparum malaria in outpatient clinics in endemic area.With thick blood smear method as control, ICT was used for the detection of P. falciparum.The sensitivity and specificity of ICT in detecting P. falciparum was 94.7% and 90.3%, respectively. No cross-reaction with P. vivax was found (P > 0.05).ICT is much more rapid and simple than thick blood smear method for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, and can be applied in the outpatient clinics in endemic area.Colorimetric detection of Plasmodium falciparum and direct sequencing of amplified gene fragments using a solid phase method.A rapid colorimetric assay for the detection of DNA from Plasmodium falciparum malaria is described, allowing direct sequencing of amplified fragments in the positive samples. The method is based on amplification by the polymerase chain reaction (PCR), with incorporation of biotin and a lac operator sequence in the amplified target DNA. The PCR product was immobilized on streptavidin-coupled magnetic beads, and detected by the specific binding of an Escherichia coli lac repressor beta-galactosidase fusion protein. Positive samples were subsequently treated with alkali to generate single stranded templates, which were used for solid phase genomic sequencing. As targets for amplification and sequencing we selected a region of the gene for the antigen Pf155/RESA and a region of the parasite dihydrofolate reductase gene (PfDHFR/TS). We show here that both of these gene targets can be used for specific detection of P. falciparum in patient blood samples. Genomic sequencing of five patient isolates revealed no variation in the Pf155/RESA gene fragment. In a comparison of this sequence with conserved protein domains, a marked similarity to the src homology region 3 was detected. A point mutation was found in the PfDHFR/TS gene fragment of one of the clinical samples, replacing Ser108 with Asn. This mutation has earlier been described in pyrimethamine and cycloguanile-resistant strains of P. falciparum.An assessment of the usefulness of a rapid immuno-chromatographic test, "Determine trade mark malaria pf" in evaluation of intervention measures in forest villages of central India.Plasmodium falciparum malaria, is a major health problem in forested tribal belt of central India. Rapid and accurate methods are needed for the diagnosis of P. falciparum. We performed a blinded evaluation of the recently introduced Determine trade mark malaria pf test (Abbott, Laboratories, Japan) compared with microscopy and splenomegaly in children in epidemic prone areas of district Mandla to assess the impact of intervention measures.Children aged 2-10 yrs with and without fever were examined for spleen enlargement by medical specialist by establishing a mobile field clinic. From these children thick blood smears were prepared from finger prick and read by a technician. Simultaneously, rapid tests were performed by a field lab attendant. The figures for specificity, sensitivity and predictive values were calculated using microscopy as gold standard.In all 349 children were examined. The sensitivity and specificity for Determine rapid diagnostic test were 91 and 80% respectively. The positive predictive values (PPV), negative predictive values (NPV) and accuracy of the test were respectively 79, 91 and 85%. On the contrary, the sensitivity and specificity of spleen in detecting malaria infection were 57 and 74 % respectively with PPV of 73%, NPV 59 % and an accuracy of 65%.Determine trade mark malaria rapid diagnostic test is easier and quicker to perform and has other advantages over microscopy in not requiring prior training of personnel or quality control. Thus, highlighting the usefulness of a rapid antigen test in assessing prevailing malaria situation in remote areas.Test characteristics of two rapid antigen detection tests (SD FK50 and SD FK60) for the diagnosis of malaria in returned travellers.Two malaria rapid diagnostic tests were evaluated in a travel clinic setting: the SD FK50 Malaria Ag Plasmodium falciparum test (a two-band test) and the SD FK60 Malaria Ag P. falciparum/Pan test (a three-band test).A panel of stored whole blood samples (n = 452 and n = 614 for FK50 and FK60, respectively) from returned travellers was used. The reference method was microscopy with PCR in case of discordant results.For both tests, overall sensitivity for the detection of P. falciparum was 93.5%, reaching 97.6% and 100% at parasite densities above 100 and 1,000/microl respectively. Overall sensitivities for Plasmodium vivax, Plasmodium ovale and Plasmodium malariae for the FK60 test were 87.5%, 76.3% and 45.2%, but they reached 92.6% and 90.5% for P. vivax and P. ovale at parasite densities above 500/microl. Specificities were above 95% for all species and both tests when corrected by PCR, with visible histidine-rich protein-2 lines for P. malariae (n = 3) and P. vivax and P. ovale (1 sample each). Line intensities were reproducible and correlated to parasite densities. The FK60 tests provided clues to estimate parasite densities for P. falciparum below or above 1,000/microl.Both the FK50 and FK60 performed well for the diagnosis of P. falciparum in the present setting, and the FK60 for the diagnosis of P. vivax and P. ovale at parasite densities > 500/microl. The potential use of the FK60 as a semi-quantitative estimation of parasite density needs to be further explored.Evaluation of a rapid test for histidine rich protein 2 for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection in Cameroonian children.Performance and usefulness of the Hexagon rapid diagnostic test in children with asymptomatic malaria living in the Mount Cameroon region.Rapid and correct diagnosis of malaria is considered an important strategy in the control of the disease. However, it remains to be determined how well these tests can perform in those who harbour the parasite, but are asymptomatic, so that rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) could be used in rapid mass surveillance in malaria control programmes.Microscopic and immunochromatographic diagnosis of malaria were performed on blood samples from the hyperendemic Mount Cameroon region. Thin and thick blood films were stained with Giemsa and examined under light microscopy for malaria parasites. The RDT was performed on the blood samples for the detection of Plasmodium species. In addition, the performance characteristics of the test were determined using microscopy as gold standard.Results revealed 40.32% to be positive for microscopy and 34.41% to be positive for the RDT. Parasites were detected in a greater proportion of samples as the parasite density increase. Plasmodium falciparum was the predominant Plasmodium species detected in the study population either by microscopy or by the RDT. Overall, the test recorded a sensitivity and specificity of 85.33% and 95.05% respectively, and an accuracy of 91.40%. The sensitivity and specificity of the RDT increased as parasite densities increased.The Hexagon Malaria Combi test showed a high sensitivity and specificity in diagnosing malaria in asymptomatic subjects and so could be suitable for use in mass surveillance programmes for the management and control of malaria.Performance appraisal of rapid on-site malaria diagnosis (ICT malaria Pf/Pv test) in relation to human resources at village level in Myanmar.Logistic, economic and technical factors limit rapid access to microscopic confirmation of symptomatic diagnosis of malaria in many rural areas in endemic countries such as Myanmar. A study was conducted to evaluate a rapid on-site immunochromatographic test (ICT Malaria Pf/Pv) for detection of Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax in two villages in the Taikkyi region of Myanmar. The ICT Malaria tests were performed by a volunteer health worker (VHW) in Yae-Aye-San village and by a professionally trained midwife (MW) in Kankone village. A total of 1000 symptomatic patients participated in the study by providing blood samples for an ICT test and for microscopy. The ICT performance indices, relative to microscopy, were better for the trained MW compared with the less experienced VHW. For P. falciparum and/or P. vivax infections, the sensitivities were 82.7% for the VHW compared with 93.7% for the MW. For P. falciparum infections, the sensitivities were 82.2% for the VHW and 91.3% for the MW, while the corresponding values for P. vivax infections were 66.7 and 79%, respectively. Although the test kit appeared to perform better in more experienced hands, this study questions whether this difference is related to the use of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test kit, or related to other factors such as differences in the quality of blood slides prepared by the VHW and MW for microscopic examination. Overall, the results suggest that a rapid diagnostic assay such as the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test kit can be used in rural settings by relatively inexperienced persons, such as VHWs, with a reasonable degree of sensitivity, thus providing on-site confirmation of symptomatic diagnosis of malaria.Rapid diagnostic devices for malaria: field evaluation of a new prototype immunochromatographic assay for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum and non-falciparum Plasmodium.The NOW ICT Malaria P.f./P.v. for Whole Blood (Binax, Inc., Portland, ME) is a new malaria rapid diagnostic device that represents a technical advance over previous assays, such as ICT Malaria P.f./P.v. and ICT Malaria P.f.. We evaluated this device in March 2001 in symptomatic patients at malaria clinics in Maesod, Thailand. Microscopic examination of Giemsa-stained blood smears was the reference standard. In 246 patients, microscopy showed 32 (13.0%) infected with Plasmodium falciparum, 63 (25.6%) with P. vivax, 6 (2.4%) with mixed infections of P. falciparum and P. vivax, 5 (2.0%) with P. malariae, and 140 (56.9%) negative. Sensitivity for P. falciparum was 100% and specificity was 96.2% (200 of 208; 95% confidence interval [CI] = 92-98). For P. vivax, sensitivity was 87.3% (55 of 63; 95% CI = 77-93) and specificity was 97.7% (173 of 177; 95% CI = 95-99), but all the four false-positive results were microscopically positive for P. malariae; thus, specificity for non-falciparum Plasmodium was 100%. These results suggest improved performance over NOW ICT predecessors.Monitoring malaria control in Khammouane province, Laos: an active case detection survey of Plasmodium falciparum malaria using the Paracheck rapid diagnostic test.In Khammouane province, Laos, over 5000 slide-positive malaria cases were reported at local health facilities in 1997. To combat the spread of malaria, insecticide-treated nets (ITNs) and community health education were provided to the people in this province by the Lao Ministry of Health and the Japan International Cooperation Agency. In order to document the current malaria situation, an active case detection (ACD) survey using rapid diagnostic tests was conducted at 23 sites from June to July, the rainy season, in 2005. A total of 1711 villagers from 403 households participated in the survey. The proportion of positive cases was 0.7% (12/1711) with a range in each village of 0-8.2%. The low infection rate observed in this ACD survey was consistent with the decrease in the number of slide-positive malaria cases at local health facilities (from over 5000 cases to 536 cases), indicating the substantial progress made in malaria control. Although the reduction of malaria cases can be attributed to multiple factors, continued promotion of the proper use of ITNs as well as community-based testing and treatment services, especially in remote areas, may lead to a further reduction of malaria cases in the province.Bedside diagnosis of imported malaria using the Binax Now malaria antigen detection test.Malaria may be misdiagnosed in non-endemic countries when the necessary experience for rapid expert microscopy is lacking. Rapid diagnostic tests may improve the diagnosis and may play a role as a bedside diagnostic tool. In a multicentre study we recruited patients suspected of malaria over a period of 14 months. The Binax Now Malaria rapid test was used at the bedside and in the clinical microbiology laboratory. The training of clinical staff was monitored and their experience with the use of the test was recorded. 542 patients were included, 80 of whom had malaria diagnosed by microscopy. The rapid test used at the bedside had a sensitivity of 88% for the detection of P. falciparum compared to 95% when the test was performed in the microbiology laboratory. The risk of technical problems and invalid tests was highest when the test was used at the bedside. The rapid diagnostic test may be useful for the diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria when used by routine laboratory staff, but could lead to misdiagnoses when used at the bedside. Microscopy is still essential in order to identify the few missed diagnoses, to determine the degree of parasitaemia, and to ensure species diagnosis, including mixed infections.Field evaluation of a malaria rapid diagnostic test (ICT Pf).Malaria rapid diagnostic tests (MRDTs) are quick and easy to perform and useful for diagnosing malaria in primary health care settings. In South Africa most malaria infections are due to Plasmodium falciparurrm, and HRPII-based MRDTs have been used since 2001. Previous studies in Africa showed variability in sensitivity and specificity of HRPII-based MRDTs; hence, we conducted a field evaluation in Limpopo province to determine the accuracy of the MRDT currently used in public sector clinics and hospitals.A cross-sectional observational study was conducted to determine the sensitivity and specificity of an ICT Pf MRDT. We tested 405 patients with fever with ICT Pf MRDT and compared the results with blood film microscopy (the gold standard). RESULTS. The overall sensitivity of the ICT Pf MRDT was 99.48% (95% confidence interval (CI) 96.17-100%), while specificity was 96.26% (95% CI 94.7-100%). The positive predictive value of the test was 98.48 (99% CI 98.41-100%), and the negative predictive value was 99.52% (95% CI 96.47-100%).The ICT Pf MRDT is an appropriate test to use in the field in South Africa where laboratory facilities are not available. It has a high degree of sensitivity and acceptable level of specificity in accordance with the World Health Organization criteria. However, sensitivity of MRDT at low levels of parasitaemia (<100 parasites/microl of blood) in field conditions must still be established.Treatment guided by rapid diagnostic tests for malaria in Tanzanian children: safety and alternative bacterial diagnoses.WHO guidelines for the treatment of young children with suspected malaria have recently changed from presumptive treatment to anti-malarial treatment guided by a blood slide or malaria rapid diagnostic test (RDT). However, there is limited evidence of the safety of this policy in routine outpatient settings in Africa.Children 3-59 months of age with a non-severe febrile illness and no obvious cause were enrolled over a period of one year in a malaria endemic area of Tanzania. Treatment was determined by the results of a clinical examination and RDT result, and blood culture and serum lactate were also collected. RDT-negative children were followed up over 14 days.Over the course of one year, 965 children were enrolled; 158 (16.4%) were RDT-positive and treated with artemether-lumefantrine and 807 (83.4%) were RDT-negative and treated with non-anti-malarial medicines. Compared with RDT-positives, RDT-negative children were on average younger with a lower axillary temperature and more likely to have a history of cough or difficulty in breathing. Six (0.6%) children became RDT-positive after enrollment, all of whom were PCR-negative for Plasmodium falciparum DNA at enrollment. In addition, 12 (1.2%) children were admitted to hospital, one with possible malaria, none of whom died. A bacterial pathogen was identified in 9/965 (0.9%) children, eight of whom were RDT-negative and one was RDT-positive, but slide-negative. Excluding three children with Salmonella typhi, all of the children with bacteraemia were ≤ 12 months of age. Compared to double-read research slide results RDTs had a sensitivity of 97.8% (95% CI 96.9-98.7) and specificity of 96.3% (95% CI 96.3-98.4).Use of RDTs to direct the use of anti-malarial drugs in young children did not result in any missed diagnoses of malaria although new infections soon after a consultation with a negative RDT result may undermine confidence in results. Invasive bacterial disease is uncommon in children with non-severe illness and most cases occurred in infants with a current fever.Evaluation of the rapid diagnostic test OptiMAL for diagnosis of malaria due to Plasmodium vivax.To determine the sensitivity and specificity of the rapid diagnostic test OptiMAL for diagnosis of Plasmodium vivax malaria.We included all the patients who sought medical attention in the San Martin Pangoa Hospital, Junin, an area endemic for vivax malaria in Peru, between October and December 1998, who had fever during the previous 72 hours and who were older than 12 months. The gold standard for diagnosis was thick blood film microscopy. We determined the parasitemia rate for each of the positive slides. We calculated sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the test.We included 72 patients; 39 of them were positive for P. vivax by microscopic examination. The sensitivity of the Optimal test was 92.3%, the specificity 100%, the positive predictive value 100% and the negative predictive value 91.6%. The accuracy of the test was 95.8%. The sensitivity of the OptiMAL test progressively decreased when parasitemia was lower than 1,000 parasites/microliter.the OptiMAL test has a high sensitivity and specificity for diagnosis of P. vivax malaria. However, its sensitivity decreased when parasitemia levels were lower. It is a very simple technique, which makes it a good alternative for malaria diagnosis in remote places, although its elevated cost is still a problem.Prevalence of PCR detectable malaria infection among febrile patients with a negative Plasmodium falciparum specific rapid diagnostic test in Zanzibar.We screened for malaria in 594 blood samples from febrile patients who tested negative by a Plasmodium falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein-2-based rapid diagnostic test at 12 health facilities in Zanzibar districts North A and Micheweni, from May to August 2010. Screening was with microscopy, polymerase chain reaction (PCR) targeting the cytochrome b gene (cytbPCR) of the four major human malaria species, and quantitative PCR (qPCR). The prevalence of cytbPCR-detectable malaria infection was 2% (12 of 594), including 8 P. falciparum, 3 Plasmodium malariae, and 1 Plasmodium vivax infections. Microscopy identified 4 of 8 P. falciparum infections. Parasite density as estimated by microscopy or qPCR was > 4,000 parasites/μL in 5 of 8 cytbPCR-detectable P. falciparum infections. The infections that were missed by the rapid diagnostic test represent a particular challenge in malaria elimination settings and highlight the need for more sensitive point-of-care diagnostic tools to improve case detection of all human malaria species in febrile patients.Development and evaluation of an immunochromatographic kit for the detection of antibody to Plasmodium vivax infection in South Korea.Malaria is a major parasitic disease in tropical areas. Three to five hundred million people suffer from the disease and it kill a million people per year. Blood smear observation was developed for the diagnosis of malaria, but the examination needs skilled experts and exact diagnosis is time consuming. A kit based on immunochromatography can be a reliable and rapid method for clinical diagnosis, even in the hands of inexperienced personnel. However, all such currently developed kits can only diagnose P. falciparum malaria. In our previous report, the C-terminal region of P. vivax merozoite surface protein 1 (PvcMSP) was cloned and expressed in E. coli. In the present study, we developed an immunochromatographic kit using this PvcMSP for the diagnosis of specific antibody to P. vivax malaria in serum samples. The kit was used to examine sera from vivax malaria patients and non-malaria- infected person and the test showed 100% sensitivity (78/78) and 98.3% specificity (58/59). This result demonstrated that the immunochromatographic kit for P. vivax antibody detection is applicable for the rapid and precise diagnosis of P. vivax malaria.Devices for rapid diagnosis of Malaria: evaluation of prototype assays that detect Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 and a Plasmodium vivax-specific antigen.The ParaSight F test was developed as a pioneer industry effort in the large-scale, process-controlled production of a device for the rapid diagnosis of malaria. This device performed well in field settings but was limited to the detection of a single malaria species, Plasmodium falciparum. The ParaSight F+V assay advanced upon the ParaSight F test format by incorporating a monoclonal antibody directed against a proprietary Plasmodium vivax-specific antigen, in addition to the antibody directed against P. falciparum histidine-rich protein 2, which was used in the ParaSight F assay. The modified assay was developed to add the capability to detect P. falciparum and P. vivax in a single-test-strip format. The present study evaluated three distinct ParaSight F+V prototypes with samples from symptomatic patients in regions of Thailand and Peru where malaria is endemic. Over a 2-year enrollment period (1998 and 1999), a total of 4,894 patients consented to participation in the study. Compared with the results for duplicate microscopic examinations of Giemsa-stained blood smears as the reference diagnostic standard, each successive prototype showed substantial improvement in performance. The final ParaSight F+V prototype, evaluated in 1999, had an overall sensitivity for detection of asexual P. falciparum parasites of 98%. The sensitivity of the device was 100% for P. falciparum densities of >500 parasites/ micro l, with a sensitivity of 83% for parasite densities of </=500/ micro l. The specificity for the exclusion of P. falciparum was 93%. For P. vivax, the overall sensitivity was 87% for the final 1999 prototype. The sensitivities calculated for different levels of P. vivax parasitemia were 99% for parasite densities of >5,000/ micro l, 92% for parasite densities of 1,001 to 5,000/ micro l, 94% for parasite densities of 501 to 1,000/ micro l, and 55% for parasite densities of 1 to 500/ micro l. The specificity for the exclusion of P. vivax was 87%. The areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves for the diagnostic performance of the assay for the detection of P. falciparum and P. vivax were 0.8907 and 0.8522, respectively. These findings indicate that assays for rapid diagnosis have the potential to enhance diagnostic capabilities in those instances in which skilled microscopy is not readily available.Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria.Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria parasites.Malaria presents a diagnostic challenge to laboratories in most countries. Endemic malaria, population movements, and travelers all contribute to presenting the laboratory with diagnostic problems for which it may have little expertise available. Drug resistance and genetic variation has altered many accepted morphological appearances of malaria species, and new technology has given an opportunity to review available procedures. Concurrently the World Health Organization has opened a dialogue with scientists, clinicians, and manufacturers on the realistic possibilities for developing accurate, sensitive, and cost-effective rapid diagnostic tests for malaria, capable of detecting 100 parasites/microl from all species and with a semiquantitative measurement for monitoring successful drug treatment. New technology has to be compared with an accepted "gold standard" that makes comparisons of sensitivity and specificity between different methods. The majority of malaria is found in countries where cost-effectiveness is an important factor and ease of performance and training is a major consideration. Most new technology for malaria diagnosis incorporates immunochromatographic capture procedures, with conjugated monoclonal antibodies providing the indicator of infection. Preferred targeted antigens are those which are abundant in all asexual and sexual stages of the parasite and are currently centered on detection of HRP-2 from Plasmodium falciparum and parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase or Plasmodium aldolase from the parasite glycolytic pathway found in all species. Clinical studies allow effective comparisons between different formats, and the reality of nonmicroscopic diagnoses of malaria is considered.Accuracy of rapid tests for malaria and treatment outcomes for malaria and non-malaria cases among under-five children in rural Ghana.WHO now recommends test-based management of malaria across all transmission settings. The accuracy of rapid diagnostic test (RDT) and the outcome of treatment based on the result of tests will influence acceptability of and adherence to the new guidelines.We conducted a study at the Kintampo hospital in rural Ghana to evaluate the performance of CareStart, a HRP-2 based RDT, using microscopy as reference. We applied IMCI treatment guidelines, restricted ACT to RDT-positive children and followed-up both RDT-positive (malaria) and RDT-negative (non-malaria) cases over 28 days.436 children were enrolled in the RDT evaluation and 391 (children with haemoglobin >8.0 gm/dl) were followed-up to assess treatment outcomes. Mean age was 25.4 months (s.d. 14.6). Sensitivity and specificity of the RDT were 100.0% and 73.0% respectively. Over the follow-up period, 32 (18.5%) RDT-negative children converted to positive, with 7 (4.0%) of them presenting with fever. More children in the non-malaria group made unscheduled visits than children in the malaria group (13.3% versus 7.7%) On all scheduled follow-up visits, proportion of children having a temperature higher than that recorded on day 0 was higher in the non-malaria group compared to the malaria group. Reports of unfavourable treatment outcomes by caregivers were higher among the non-malaria group than the malaria group.The RDT had good sensitivity and specificity. However a minority of children who will not receive ACT based on RDT results may develop clinical malaria within a short period in high transmission settings. This could undermine caregivers' and health workers' confidence in the new guidelines. Improving the quality of management of non-malarial febrile illnesses should be a priority in the era of test-based management of malaria.ClinicalTrials.gov NCT00832754.ParaSight-F test to diagnose malaria in hypo-endemic and epidemic prone regions of Vietnam.The antigen capture ParaSight-F test was evaluated during a drug sensitivity survey in a hypoendemic region of northern Vietnam. When only asexual blood forms of P. falciparum were considered, sensitivity of ParaSight-F was 100%, specificity 88% (95% CI 95-80%), positive predictive value 68% (95% CI 85-50%) and negative predictive value 100%. ParaSight-F proved very convenient for rapid screening and selection of patients to enrol in a drug sensitivity study. In northern Vietnam, the introduction of the test as a routine diagnostic tool is not justified, considering its high cost, the necessity to carry out the treatment of presumptive Plasmodium vivax cases and the persistence of positive reactions following treatment. However, the test will be a valuable tool in remote areas in emergency situations, where rapid confirmation of a P. falciparum outbreak is required.Field and laboratory comparative evaluation of ten rapid malaria diagnostic tests.The paper reports on a comparative evaluation of 10 rapid malaria tests available in South Africa in 1998: AccuCheck (AC, developmental), Cape Biotech (CB), ICT Malaria Pf (ICT1) and Pf/Pv (ICT2), Kat Medical (KAT), MakroMal (MM), OptiMAL (OP), ParaSight-F (PS), Quorum (Q), Determine-Malaria (DM). In a laboratory study, designed to test absolute detection limits, Plasmodium falciparum-infected blood was diluted with uninfected blood to known parasite concentrations ranging from 500 to 0.1 parasites per microlitre (P/microL). The 50% detection limits were: ICT1, 3.28; ICT2, 4.86; KAT, 6.36; MM, 9.37; CB, 11.42; DM, 12.40; Q, 16.98; PS, 20; AC, 31.15 and OP, 91.16 P/microL. A field study was carried out to test post-treatment specificity. Blood samples from malaria patients were tested with all products (except AC and DM) on the day of treatment and 3 and 7 days thereafter, against a gold standard of microscopy and polymerase chain reaction (PCR). OP and PS produced fewer false-positive results on day 7 (18 and 19%, respectively) than the other rapid tests (38-56%). However, microscopy, PCR, OP and PS disagreed largely as to which individuals remained positive. The tests were further compared with regard to general specificity, particularly cross-reactivity with rheumatoid factor, speed, simplicity, their ability to detect other species, storage requirements and general presentation.Validity, reliability and ease of use in the field of five rapid tests for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Uganda.A study was conducted to measure the overall performance of several rapid diagnostic tests for Plasmodium falciparum infection, in order to select the most appropriate test to be used in the field. A total of 742 patients attending the out-patient department of Mbarara Hospital with a clinical suspicion of malaria were included in the study. For each patient, a thick/thin film and 5 rapid tests based on the detection of histidine-rich protein II (HRP-II) (Paracheck Pf dipstick and device, ParaHIT f, Malaria Rapid and BIO P.F.) were performed. Outcomes were validity, inter-reader reliability and 'ease of use in the field', measured by both the general characteristics of the test and by the opinion of the readers. About half (57%) of the patients were positive for P. falciparum. The Paracheck Pf (dipstick and device) was considered as the most appropriate for the use in the field, being sensitive (97%), moderately specific (88%), reliable (kappa coefficient = 0.97), easy to use and cheap (about US$ 0.5/test). The ParaHIT f represented a good alternative.Reducing malaria misdiagnosis: the importance of correctly interpreting Paracheck Pf® "faint test bands" in a low transmission area of Tanzania.Although malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) have been extensively evaluated since their introduction in the early 1990's, sensitivity and specificity vary widely limiting successful integration into clinical practice. This paper reviews specific issues surrounding RDT use in field settings and presents results of research investigating how to interpret "faint test bands" on ParaCheck Pf® in areas of low transmission in order to reduce malaria misdiagnosis.A multi-phase cross-sectional study was conducted at a remote hospital in the northern Tanzanian highlands. Capillary blood samples were taken from consenting participants (n = 319) for blood smear and ParaCheck Pf® testing. Primary outcome variables were sensitivity, specificity and proportion misdiagnosed by ParaCheck Pf® and local microscopy. ParaCheck Pf® "faint bands" were classified as both true positives or true negatives during evaluation to determine appropriate clinical interpretation. Multivariate logistic regression adjusted for age and gender was conducted to determine odds of misdiagnosis for local microscopy and ParaCheck Pf®.Overall, 23.71% of all ParaCheck Pf® tests resulted in a "faint band" and 94.20% corresponded with true negatives. When ParaCheck Pf® "faint bands" were classified as positive, specificity was 75.5% (95% CI = 70.3%-80.6%) as compared to 98.9% (95% CI = 97.0%-99.8%) when classified as negative. The odds of misdiagnosis by local microscopy for those > 5 years as compared to those ≤ 5 years are 0.370 (95% CI = 0.1733-0.7915, p = 0.010). In contrast, even when ParaCheck Pf® faint bands are considered positive, the odds of misdiagnosis by ParaCheck Pf® for those > 5 years as compared to those ≤ 5 years are 0.837 (95% CI = 0.459-1.547, p = 0.5383).We provide compelling evidence that in areas of low transmission, "faint bands" should be considered a negative test when used to inform clinical decision-making. Correct interpretation of RDT test bands in a clinical setting plays a central role in successful malaria surveillance, appropriate patient management and most importantly reducing misdiagnosis.Performance of OptiMAL-IT compared to microscopy, for malaria detection in Burkina Faso.To compare the performance of OptiMAL-IT, a rapid diagnostic test for malaria, with that of microscopy in Burkina Faso.Finger-prick blood samples of 464 children attending hospital for suspected malaria were tested for malaria by microscopy and OptiMAL-IT.The sensitivity and specificity of OptiMAL-IT were 98.7% (CI 95% = 97.6-99.8) and 96.2% (CI 95% = 94.3-98.1) respectively, with a high positive likelihood ratio (25.97).OptiMAL-IT can be considered a good method to diagnose malaria in Burkina Faso, particularly in remote areas with little or no access to microscopy services.Performance characteristics of a rapid diagnostic test for malaria, when used to confirm cerebral malaria in children and young adults.Evaluation & usefulness of a immunochromatographic test for rapid detection of Plasmodium falciparum infection.Rapid test (Parachek Pf) based on detection of HRP-2 protein specific to Plasmodium falciparum by immunochromatographic technique was evaluated. Prevalence of infection was 8.5%. The test was 100% sensitive & 99.5% specific on comparison with light microscopy. The test is useful for making 'on the spot' diagnosis.Evaluation of a parasite lactate dehydrogenase-based colloid gold-immunochromatography assay for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum.To establish a colloid gold-immunochromatography assay (GICA) for detecting Plasmodium falciparum.The monoclonal antibodies (mAbs) against lactate dehydrogenase of P. falciparum (LDHpf) were screened for preparation of GICA strips. With microscopic examination of the blood smears and PCR test as control, GICA was evaluated for its sensitivity, specificity and stability in the diagnosis of malaria in the outpatient clinics in China.Four hybridoma cell lines against LDHpf were prepared. Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay demonstrated that the 4 mAbs reacted only with P. falciparum, but not with protein of normal human red cell, P. vivax, Toxoplasma gondii, or Schistosoma japonicam. All the 4 mAbs recognized a 33 kD protein designated as LDHpf as shown by Western blot analysis. Compared with the microscopic examination of blood smears and PCR test, GICA had the sensitivities of 88.37% and 86.67% and the specificities of 95.65% and 97.78%, respectively. Concordance between microscopic examination and GICA for P. falciparum infection was 91.55%.GICA established in this study is simple, rapid, sensitive and specific for detecting P. falciparum, and is potentially useful in developing reagent kits for clinical use.Immunocapture diagnostic assays for malaria using Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH).We have developed two diagnostic assays based on the specific detection of Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) activity. These assays exploit a panel of monoclonal antibodies that capture the parasite enzyme and allow for the quantitation and speciation of human malaria infections. An immunocapture pLDH activity assay (ICpLDH) allows for the rapid purification and measurement of pLDH from infected blood using the NAD analog APAD, which reacts specifically with Plasmodium LDH isoforms. An immunochromatographic test (the OptiMAL assay) was also formatted and allowed the detection of parasite infections of approximately 200 parasites/microl of blood. By using a combination of antibodies, both tests can not only detect but differentiate between P. falciparum and non-P. falciparum malaria. Both assays show a sensitivity comparable with other commercial nonmicroscopic tests; importantly, we found very few instances of false-positive samples, especially with samples from patients recently cleared of malaria infection. Furthermore, we find that when one uses the quantitative ICpLDH assay, the levels of pLDH activity closely mirror the levels of parasitemia in both initial diagnosis and while following patient therapy. We conclude that diagnostic tests based on the detection of pLDH are both sensitive and practical for the detection, speciation, and quantitation of all human Plasmodium infections and can also be used to indicate drug-resistant infections.Evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test, 'Determine malaria pf', in epidemic-prone, forest villages of central India (Madhya Pradesh).A rapid, immunochromatographic test for malaria diagnosis, 'Determine malaria pf', was evaluated by a field team in the epidemic-affected, forest setting of Chhindwara district, in Madhya Pradesh, central India. In all, 526 fever cases were screened for Plasmodium falciparum in October or November, 1999. Those found to be infected were treated with sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine and primaquine. Using microscopy as the gold standard, the new test had a sensitivity of 98% and a specificity of 87%. The positive and negative predictive values were 88% and 98%, respectively. Although follow-up of 64 subjects on day 7 post-treatment revealed that 20% of those who then appeared smear-negative were still antigenaemic, 34% of the subjects were still smear-positive, for asexual parasites, at that time. The Determine test was found to be very easy to perform and the results could be read reliably by field workers, without any supervision. The ease of use of the test indicates that it could be useful in the management of malaria, particularly in remote and inaccessible areas, provided that its accuracy can be assured and that it can be made affordable.A rapid immunochromatographic test (ICT) for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum.A field study was conducted to assess the sensitivity and specificity of rapid immunodiagnostic test based on detection of Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein-2 (PfHRP-2) in peripheral blood for diagnosis of P. falciparum infection. Evaluation in 173 patients showed that the assay was 98.59% sensitive and 97.1% specific. There was no cross-reactivity with P. vivax. The test was positive in few patients who were found to be negative by microscopy showing the presence of antigen after curative chemotherapy. The test is a valuable diagnostic tool for falciparum malaria, especially in emergency/field situations requiring rapid diagnosis.Usefulness of an inexpensive, Paracheck test in detecting asymptomatic infectious reservoir of plasmodium falciparum during dry season in an inaccessible terrain in central India.The performance of a new indigenous rapid diagnostic test, Paracheck Pf was evaluated in detection of Plasmodium falciparum in asymptomatic children in remote forest villages of Mandla district, central India to determine the lower limits of sensitivity and specificity of rapid test.A finger prick blood sample was collected to prepare blood smear and for testing with the Paracheck test. The blood smears were read by an experienced technician blinded to the Paracheck results. The figures for specificity, sensitivity, accuracy and predictive values were calculated using microscopy as gold standard.The new diagnostic test had a sensitivity of 94% and a specificity of 89%. The positive and negative predictive values were 71% and 98%, respectively. The J -index was 0.83%.The rapid test was found to be very easy to perform and the result could be read reliably by field workers. The field evaluation with this new inexpensive test, ($0.65/test) indicates that it could be used as an epidemiological tool in the management of malaria particularly in areas where microscopy is not operationally feasible to attain the goal of the roll back malaria initiative.Multicentre study, in patients with imported malaria, on the sensitivity and specificity of a dipstick test (ICT Malaria P.f./P.v.) compared with expert microscopy.A prospective, multicentre study was carried out in Italy to assess the sensitivity and specificity of a rapid dipstick test (ICT Malaria P.f./P.v.) in the diagnosis of imported malaria caused by Plasmodium falciparum and other Plasmodium spp. The test is based on the detection of histidine-rich protein-2 (HRP-2) from P. falciparum and 'panmalarial' antigen in peripheral blood. The 241 subjects were international travellers or immigrants from areas where malaria is endemic. When compared with the microscopical examination of bloodsmears (used as the 'gold standard'), the dipsticks were found to be 94.4% sensitive and 94.5% specific for pure infections with P. falciparum. The performance of the tests when used on patients infected with species other than P. falciparum or more than one Plasmodium spp. showed a high degree of variability. Although the dipsticks represent a very simple, rapid, and valuable diagnostic aid, they should not be considered a complete substitute for direct microscopical diagnosis using stained bloodsmears.Update on rapid diagnostic testing for malaria.To help mitigate the expanding global impact of malaria, with its associated increasing drug resistance, implementation of prompt and accurate diagnosis is needed. Malaria is diagnosed predominantly by using clinical criteria, with microscopy as the current gold standard for detecting parasitemia, even though it is clearly inadequate in many health care settings. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) have been recognized as an ideal method for diagnosing infectious diseases, including malaria, in recent years. There have been a number of RDTs developed and evaluated widely for malaria diagnosis, but a number of issues related to these products have arisen. This review highlights RDTs, including challenges in assessing their performance, internationally available RDTs, their effectiveness in various health care settings, and the selection of RDTs for different health care systems.Rapid diagnostic test for Plasmodium falciparum in 32 Marines medically evacuated from Liberia with a febrile illness.Diagnostic and prognostic utility of an inexpensive rapid on site malaria diagnostic test (ParaHIT f) among ethnic tribal population in areas of high, low and no transmission in central India.Malaria presents a diagnostic challenge in most tropical countries. Rapid detection of the malaria parasite and early treatment of infection still remain the most important goals of disease management. Therefore, performance characteristics of the new indigenous ParaHIT f test (Span diagnostic Ltd, Surat, India) was determined among ethnic tribal population in four districts of different transmission potential in central India to assess whether this rapid diagnostic test (RDT) could be widely applied as a diagnostic tool to control malaria. Beyond diagnosis, the logical utilization of RDTs is to monitor treatment outcome.A finger prick blood sample was collected from each clinically suspected case of malaria to prepare blood smear and for testing with the RDT after taking informed consent. The blood smears were read by an experienced technician blinded to the RDT results and clinical status of the subjects. The figures for specificity, sensitivity, accuracy and predictive values were calculated using microscopy as gold standard.The prevalence of malaria infection estimated by RDT in parallel with microscopy provide evidence of the type of high, low or no transmission in the study area. Analysis revealed (pooled data of all four epidemiological settings) that overall sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of the RDT were >90% in areas of different endemicity. While, RDT is useful to confirm the diagnosis of new symptomatic cases of suspected P. falciparum infection, the persistence of parasite antigen leading to false positives even after clearance of asexual parasitaemia has limited its utility as a prognostic tool.The study showed that the ParaHIT f test was easy to use, reliable and cheap. Thus this RDT is an appropriate test for the use in the field by paramedical staff when laboratory facilities are not available and thus likely to contribute greatly to an effective control of malaria in resource poor countries.Genetic variability in Plasmodium vivax aldolase gene in Korean isolates and the sensitivity of the Binax Now malaria test.Introduction of rapid malaria diagnostic tests (RDT) initiated numerous field evaluations in various epidemiologic settings. But the efficiency of some RTD kits based on aldolase raised reservations for direct implementation of RDT into clinical settings. We performed Binax Now malaria test in 84 Korean Plasmodium vivax isolates and compared it with the traditional Giemsa stain microscopy test as the reference standard. The sensitivity of Binax Now was 62.0% for P. vivax cases (52/84, 95% CI 51.2-71.6%) with 100.0% specificity (50/50, 95% confidence interval 92.9-100%). After the aldolase gene sequence analysis of 84 isolates, two synonymous mutations in aldolase gene were identified in both Binax Now positive and negative samples. No significant association between the mutations and Binax Now malaria tests was found. Thus, the genetic variability would not explain the poor performance of P. vivax RDTs by detecting aldolase in ROK isolates.Detection and species determination of malaria parasites by PCR: comparison with microscopy and with ParaSight-F and ICT malaria Pf tests in a clinical environment.A rapid procedure for the diagnosis of malaria infections directly from dried blood spots by PCR amplification was evaluated with samples from 52 patients. Plasmodium infections were identified with a genus-specific primer set, and species differentiation between Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax was analyzed by multiplex PCR. The PCR test with any of the three primer sets was able to detect as few as four parasites per microliter by gel electrophoresis or by nonisotopic paper hybridization chromatography. The diagnoses obtained by PCR correlated closely with those obtained by Giemsa staining except for two samples observed to have mixed P. falciparum-P. vivax infections. These were initially missed by microscopic analysis. In comparison with antigen-capture assays for P. falciparum, the PCR assays were able to detect three infections that were missed by the ParaSight-F test. The PCR test was negative for nine ParaSight-F-positive samples and one ICT Malaria Pf-positive sample, and these were confirmed to be false-positive results. The PCR thus gave no false-negative or false-positive results. Patients undergoing antimalarial therapy were also monitored by the PCR assay. Four of seven patients who were PCR positive for P. vivax at the time of discharge were later readmitted to the hospital with a recurrence of P. vivax infection. We would like to propose that PCR is a sensitive and easy method that can serve as a useful addition to microscopy for the diagnosis and the clinical monitoring of treatment of malaria.Diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in pregnancy in sub-Saharan Africa: the challenges and public health implications.Plasmodium falciparum malaria in pregnancy is a major public health problem in sub-Saharan Africa and represents enormous diagnostic challenge. The objective of this report was to review scientific data from studies conducted in sub-Saharan Africa on the diagnosis of malaria in pregnancy within the last two decades (1987 to 2007), to highlight the challenges and the public health implications. Using the Medline Entrez-Pubmed search, relevant publications were identified for the review via combinations of key words such as Malaria, Pregnancy, and Sub-Saharan Africa, which yielded 777 entries as of September 2007. The results from the various studies were discordant, due to differences in the techniques of sample collection and analysis, based on the differences in the definition of clinical, peripheral, and placental malaria. Definitions were based on the presence of malaria parasite and/or pigments in blood smear from peripheral/placental blood, on histological placental findings, on the use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) and polymerase chain reaction (PCR). Nonspecific clinical presentation of malaria, lack of efficient diagnostic facilities and trained personnel, and absence of regulatory standards for diagnostic tests, are some of the major diagnostic challenges. Increased allocation of resources to development and application of accurate diagnostics will improve malaria diagnosis in pregnancy.Evaluation of rapid diagnostics for Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax in Mae Sot Malaria endemic area, Thailand.Prompt and accurate diagnosis of malaria is the key to prevent disease morbidity and mortality. This study was carried out to evaluate diagnostic performance of 3 commercial rapid detection tests (RDTs), i.e., Malaria Antigen Pf/Pan™, Malaria Ag-Pf™, and Malaria Ag-Pv™ tests, in comparison with the microscopic and PCR methods. A total of 460 blood samples microscopically positive for Plasmodium falciparum (211 samples), P. vivax (218), mixed with P. falciparum and P. vivax (30), or P. ovale (1), and 124 samples of healthy subjects or patients with other fever-related infections, were collected. The sensitivities of Malaria Ag-Pf™ and Malaria Antigen Pf/Pan™ compared with the microscopic method for P. falciparum or P. vivax detection were 97.6% and 99.0%, or 98.6% and 99.0%, respectively. The specificities of Malaria Ag-Pf™, Malaria Ag-Pv™, and Malaria Antigen Pf/Pan™ were 93.3%, 98.8%, and 94.4%, respectively. The sensitivities of Malaria Ag-Pf™, Malaria Antigen Pf/Pan™, and microscopic method, when PCR was used as a reference method for P. falciparum or P. vivax detection were 91.8%, 100%, and 96.7%, or 91.9%, 92.6%, and 97.3%, respectively. The specificities of Malaria Ag-Pf™, Malaria Ag-Pv™, Malaria Antigen Pf/Pan™, and microscopic method were 66.2%, 92.7%, 73.9%, and 78.2%, respectively. Results indicated that the diagnostic performances of all the commercial RDTs are satisfactory for application to malaria diagnosis.Evaluation of Paracheck pf o and Parascreen pan/pf o tests for the diagnosis of malaria in an endemic area, South Ethiopia.Laboratory diagnosis of malaria is limited in peripheral health care services and mainly depends on non-specific clinical examination until the advent of Rapid Diagnostic Tests.Evaluation of the effectiveness of Paracheck pf and Parascreen pan/pf tests for the diagnosis of malaria.A Health Center based cross-sectional study was conducted in Kella and Bussa Health Centers, Wondo-Genet area, South Ethiopia where malaria is endemic. Microscopy of Giemsa stained thick blood film was used as gold standard.The sensitivity and specificity of Paracheck Pf test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum were 96.7% and 76%, respectively, with positive predictive value of 67.1% and negative predictive value of 97.9%. The sensitivity and specificity of the Parascreen Pan/pf test for the diagnosis of P. falciparum were 100% and 65.1%, respectively, while its positive and negative predictive values were 67.9 and 100% respectively. Its sensitivity and specificity for Plasmodium vivax were 100 and 42.3%, respectively, with a positive predictive value of 33.3% and a negative predictive value of 100%.Although further study is needed to evaluate their specificities, both tests were found to be effective for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria at peripheral health care unit where skilled personnel and laboratory facilities are not available for blood film examination.Rapid diagnostic test-based management of malaria: an effectiveness study in Papua New Guinean infants with Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax malaria.In malaria-endemic areas it is recommended that febrile children be tested for malaria by rapid diagnostic test (RDT) or blood slide (BS) and receive effective malaria treatment only if results are positive. However, RDTs are known to perform less well for Plasmodium vivax. We evaluated the safety of withholding antimalarial drugs from young Papua New Guinean children with negative RDT results in areas with high levels of both Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax infections.Longitudinal prospective study of children aged 3-27 months visiting outpatient clinics for fever. RDT was administered at first visit. RDT and microscopy were performed if children returned because of persistent symptoms. Outcomes were rates of reattendance and occurrence of severe illnesses.Of 5670 febrile episodes, 3942 (70%) involved a negative RDT result. In 133 cases (3.4%), the children reattended the clinic within 7 days for fever, of whom 29 (0.7%) were parasitemic by RDT or microscopy. Of children who reattended, 24 (0.7%) presented with a severe illness: 2 had lower respiratory tract infections (LRTIs) with low-density P. vivax on BS; 2 received a diagnosis of P. vivax malaria on the basis of RDT but BSs were negative; 16 had LRTIs; 3 had alternative diagnoses. Of these 24, 22 were cured at day 28. Two children died of illnesses other than malaria and were RDT and BS negative at the initial and subsequent visits.Treatment for malaria based on RDT results is safe and feasible even in infants living in areas with moderate to high endemicity for both P. falciparum and P. vivax infections.[Efficiency and specificity of the KAT-test for rapid diagnosis of falciparum malaria].A new rapid KAT Quick Malaria test for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, which is based on the detection of a monoclonal antibody-antigen complex of malaria parasites, has been worked out by the KAT Medical CC in South Africa. The efficiency and specificity of the KAT test were compared with those of the microscopic method and with the ICT test for rapid diagnosis of P. falciparum and P. vivax. The polymerase chain reaction was used as a control test. Testing for malaria was performed on 98 blood samples from feverish patients in Vietnam and Tadjikistan and among the persons who had returned to Moscow from endemic regions. The efficiency of the KAT test for falciparum-malaria was found to be 100% versus 90.5% with ICT. The absence of cross-reactions with P. vivax and the presence of pseudopositive results of the KAT test for fever cases of non-malaria origin indicate its high specificity. There was no correlation between the rate of test line colouring and the level of parasitemia. The KAT test yielded positive results only when gametocytes were found in blood specimens.[Evaluation of immunochromatographic test in the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax].To evaluate the effectiveness of immunochromatographic test(ICT) in detecting Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax in malaria endemic areas.ICT was used to detect P. falciparum and P. vivax among patients with fever in the outpatient clinics by comparason with thick blood smear method.The sensitivity of ICT to detect P. falciparum and P. vivax was 96.7% and 90.4%, respectively. The specificity of ICT was 98.6%, and the coincidence rate was 94.7%. There is no cross reaction between P. falciparum and P. vivax.ICT could detect P. falciparum and P. vivax simutaneously, being more rapid and simple than blood smear method.Evaluation of light microscopy and rapid diagnostic test for the detection of malaria under operational field conditions: a household survey in Ethiopia.In most resource-poor settings, malaria is usually diagnosed based on clinical signs and symptoms and not by detection of parasites in the blood using microscopy or rapid diagnostic tests (RDT). In population-based malaria surveys, accurate diagnosis is important: microscopy provides the gold standard, whilst RDTs allow immediate findings and treatment. The concordance between RDTs and microscopy in low or unstable transmission areas has not been evaluated.This study aimed to estimate the prevalence of malaria parasites in randomly selected malarious areas of Amhara, Oromia, and Southern Nations, Nationalities and Peoples' (SNNP) regions of Ethiopia, using microscopy and RDT, and to investigate the agreement between microscopy and RDT under field conditions.A population-based survey was conducted in 224 randomly selected clusters of 25 households each in Amhara, Oromia and SNNP regions, between December 2006 and February 2007. Fingerpick blood samples from all persons living in even-numbered households were tested using two methods: light microscopy of Giemsa-stained blood slides; and RDT (ParaScreen device for Pan/Pf).A total of 13,960 people were eligible for malaria parasite testing of whom 11,504 (82%) were included in the analysis. Overall slide positivity rate was 4.1% (95% confidence interval [CI] 3.4-5.0%) while ParaScreen RDT was positive in 3.3% (95% CI 2.6-4.1%) of those tested. Considering microscopy as the gold standard, ParaScreen RDT exhibited high specificity (98.5%; 95% CI 98.3-98.7) and moderate sensitivity (47.5%; 95% CI 42.8-52.2) with a positive predictive value of 56.8% (95% CI 51.7-61.9) and negative predictive value of 97.6% (95% CI 97.6-98.1%) under field conditions.Blood slide microscopy remains the preferred option for population-based prevalence surveys of malaria parasitaemia. The level of agreement between microscopy and RDT warrants further investigation in different transmission settings and in the clinical situation.Comparison of blood smear microscopy to a rapid diagnostic test for in-vitro testing for P. falciparum malaria in Kenyan school children.To compare the diagnostic performance of microscopy using Giemsa-stained thick and thin blood smears to a rapid malaria dipstick test (RDT) in detecting P. falciparum malaria in Kenyan school children.Randomised, controlled feeding intervention trial from 1998-2001.Rural Embu district, Kenya. The area is considered endemic for malaria, with four rainy seasons per year. Chloroquine resistance was estimated in 80% of patients. Children had a spleen rate of 45%.A sample of 515 rural Kenyan primary school children, aged 7-11 years, who were enrolled in a feeding intervention trial from 1998-2001.Percent positive and negative P. falciparum malaria status, sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values of RDT.For both years, the RDT yielded positive results of 30% in children compared to microscopy (17%). With microscopy as the "gold standard", RDT yielded a sensitivity of 81.3% in 1998 and 79.3% in 2000. Specificity was 81.6% in 1998 and 78.3% in 2000. Positive predictive value was 47.3% in 1998 and 42.6% in 2000, and negative predictive value was 95.6% in 1998 and 94.9% in 2000.Rapid diagnostic testing is a valuable tool for diagnosis and can shorten the interval for starting treatment, particularly where microscopy may not be feasible due to resource and distance limitations.Diagnostic performance of CareStart™ malaria HRP2/pLDH (Pf/pan) combo test versus standard microscopy on falciparum and vivax malaria between China-Myanmar endemic borders.Rapid diagnostic test (RDT) is becoming an alternative way of establishing quickly the diagnosis of malaria infections, by detecting specific malaria antigens in suspected patients' blood between the China-Myanmar endemic borders areas, towards achieving the National Malaria Elimination programme by 2020. The objective of this study is to evaluate the performance of CareStart™ Malaria Pf/Pan RDT kit for the diagnosis of malaria infections in suspected patients. Blood examination by microscopy was taken as gold standard to evaluate CareStart™ kit's sensitivity, specificity and predictive value and corrected with PCR assay.Overall 126 of 241 (52.28%) malaria cases were detected by microscopy compared to 115 of 241(47.72%) CareStart™ kit and 128 of 241 (53.11%) PCR corrected assay. CareStart™ kit's sensitivity and specificity for the diagnosis of malaria were 89.68% and 98.26% respectively, compared to standard microscopy, whereas the sensitivity and specificity for falciparum malaria were 88.52% and 98.26%, and for vivax malaria: 90.77% and 100%. The CareStart™ positive predictive values were 98.26% (93.88-99.52%, 95% CI) compared to 100% (96.77-100%, 95% CI) for PCR-corrected, and the negative predictive values of 89.68% (83.15-93.87%, 95% CI) were the same in microscopy as PCR-corrected. The diagnostic accuracy of CareStart™ kit versus microscopy and PCR were 93.78% (89.99-96.19%, 95% CI) and 94.61% (90.99-96.82%, 95% CI) respectively. The likelihood of diagnostic of malaria positive was almost similar between microscopy and CareStart™ kit, with an entropy reduction of 60.0% compared to a weak likelihood of misdiagnosis of 0.10 (0.09-0.12, 95% CI), with an entropy reduction of 36.01%.The accuracy of CareStart™ kit is comparable to gold standard microscopy in these areas, it is easy to perform and suitable for cross-border diagnosis and monitoring of local or imported malaria patterns by any local health staff in endemic remotes.Rapid diagnosis of vivax malaria by the SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test when thrombocytopenia is present.An easy and reliable diagnostic method for malaria is highly desirable. We examined the recently introduced SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test, which detects Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase, with the additional aid of the presence or absence of thrombocytopenia to diagnose vivax malaria. We enrolled 732 patients with clinically suspected malaria in an area where vivax malaria is endemic. We performed microscopic examination of thin film, applied the SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test, and checked platelet counts. One hundred ninety-five patients were smear positive for vivax malaria. The sensitivity of the SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test was 96.4%, and its specificity was 98.9%. We found that 95.4% of malaria patients had thrombocytopenia, and the proportion with malaria increased as platelet counts decreased. A positive SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test when thrombocytopenia was present showed a 100% positive predictive value for vivax malaria. In conclusion, the SD Bioline Malaria Antigen test is a rapid and accurate diagnostic method for vivax malaria, and a platelet count can facilitate a rapid diagnosis of malaria.A comparison of antigen dipstick assays with polymerase chain reaction (PCR) technique and blood film examination in the rapid diagnosis of malaria.Early diagnosis of malaria for military personnel training in the field is crucial in providing proper treatment for the infected and in taking appropriate preventive measures for the non-infected. Present preliminary diagnosis of malaria in the field depends on the clinical symptoms of the patients and there is a need for rapid diagnosis of malaria in the field. The presence of drug-resistant strains of the Plasmodium species in the region also increases the urgency of finding a quick and sensitive way of identifying the different strains. This study evaluated current methods available for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax. The dipstick assays, the ParaSight F test and the OptiMAL malaria rapid test were compared with the methods of microscopic examination of blood film and polymerase chain reaction (PCR). On comparison to the blood film and PCR methods, the ParaSight F test has specificity of 98.6% and sensitivity of 91% for P. falciparum detection. The OptiMAL malaria rapid test has a specificity of 100% and 98.6% and sensitivity of 92.8% and 92.6% for P. vivax and P. falciparum detection respectively. We conclude that both tests are suitable for use for rapid malaria diagnosis in the field but the OptiMAL rapid malaria test, which can detect both vivax and falciparum malaria, would be more useful.Point-of-care testing for malaria outbreak management.A rapid antigen assay for malaria was performed on blood samples collected during a simultaneous outbreak of falciparum malaria and vivax malaria on a remote island in the Indonesian archipelago. During the outbreak, a total of 89 patients (4.3% of the population) were diagnosed with malaria within a week. Microscopic examination revealed 78 malaria slide-positive cases, of whom 49 (62.8%) were identified as P. falciparum, 7 (9.0%) as P. vivax and 22 (28.2%) as mixed P. falciparum and P. vivax infections. The rapid malaria assay showed excellent correlation with expert-confirmed routine microscopy for P. falciparum and P. vivax monoinfections and mixed infections with a parasite density >50 parasites/microl. Several slide-negative blood samples collected from febrile patients with clinical malaria tested positive in the rapid test. The estimated sensitivity calculated for the rapid test (91.0%) was slightly higher than that of microscopy (87.6%). The result indicates that rapid antigen detection for malaria could be a useful alternative to microscopy to reduce the workload during emergency outbreak situations.Plasmodium falciparum parasite infection prevalence from a household survey in Zambia using microscopy and a rapid diagnostic test: implications for monitoring and evaluation.This paper presents estimates of P. falciparum infection prevalence in children under 5 years old in the context of a population-based household survey in Luangwa District (Lusaka Province), Zambia, an area where greater than 75% of households possess at least one insecticide-treated mosquito net (ITN). The sensitivity and specificity of an HRP-2 rapid diagnostic test (RDT) (ICT Malaria Pf((R))) compared to microscopy, as well as factors associated with discordant diagnostic results are also presented. P. falciparum infection prevalence was estimated at 7.0% (95% CI 4.9-9.0%) using microscopy. Using microscopy as the gold standard, the sensitivity of the HRP-2 RDT was 100% and specificity was 91.5%; positive predictive value was estimated to be 46.7% (95% CI 36.3-57.4%). RDT discordance, or HRP-2 false positivity, was highest among older children, those in the northern part of Luangwa District, and those with a reported history of antimalarial treatment. These data suggest microscopy should remain the gold standard for estimating malaria parasite point prevalence from household surveys for monitoring and evaluation purposes.Plasmodium vivax aldolase-specific monoclonal antibodies and its application in clinical diagnosis of malaria infections in China.Most rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) currently used for malaria diagnosis cannot distinguish the various Plasmodium infections. The development of a Plasmodium vivax specific RDTs with high sensitivity to sufficiently differentiate the two most common Plasmodium infections would be very crucial for disease treatment and control.Plasmodium vivax aldolase gene (PvALDO) was amplified from the extracted genomic DNA and constructed into pET30a vector. Plasmodium vivax aldolase protein was successfully expressed in Escherichia coli in soluble form and the overall purity was over 95% after one-step affinity chromatography purification. The purified products were used for the immunization of mice and rabbits. Rabbit polyclonal antibodies generated were deployed to develop a novel antibody-capture ELISA for hybridoma screening.Three PvALDO specific mAbs (14C7, 15F1 and 5H7) with high affinities were selected and used in immunochromatographic test strips. Clinical blood samples (n=190) collected from Yunnan (China) were used for evaluation and the RDT's sensitivity for P. vivax was 98.33% (95% Confidence Interval (CI): 91.03% to 99.72%) compared with microscopic examination. There was specificity of 99.23% (95% CI: 95.77% to 99.87%) for P. vivax. Only one Plasmodium falciparum sample was detected among the P. falciparum samples (n=20). All Plasmodium malariae samples (n=2) as well as healthy uninfected samples (n=108) were negative. Overall performance of this RDT was excellent with positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) of 98.33% and 99.23%, respectively, at 95% CI and a very good correlation with microscopic observations (kappa value, K=0.9757). Test strips show high sensitivity even at 6.25 ng/ml of recombinant P. vivax aldolase (rPvALDO).This study further elucidates the possibility of developing aldolase-specific RDTs which can differentiate the different Plasmodium infections and improve accurate diagnosis of malaria. This RDT could adequately differentiate between P. vivax and P. falciparum infections. The novel mAb screening method developed here could find application in the screening of highly specific antibodies against other antigens.Diagnostic performance characteristics of rapid dipstick test for Plasmodium vivax malaria.We compared the diagnostic performance characteristics of newly developed method, the rapid dipstick test, which provides colorimetric determination by developing antibody to the lactate dehydrogenase enzyme of parasites, with conventional standard thick-blood film examination. For the rapid test, OptiMAL commercial kits were used. The results were also evaluated with clinical findings from patients. The parasites were determined by microscopic examination of thick-blood films from 81 patients with vivax malaria from southeastern Anatolia, Turkey. The OptiMAL test results were found to be negative in five patients who were diagnosed clinically and through thick-film testing as having vivax malaria. There was no false positivity observed with the OptiMAL test. We concluded that this rapid malaria test has a lower level of sensitivity than the classical thick-blood-film test for malaria, but that these methods have equal specificity.[Diagnosis of malaria with immunochromatographic test The Novara experience].Microscopic detection of parasites has been the reference standard for malaria diagnosis for decades. Recently rapid antigen assays provide an effective tool for the detection of malaria in symptomatic patients. In Novara Maggiore della Carità Hospital we evaluated the efficacy of the ParaSight F test in patients with malaria.[Evaluation of two rapid diagnostic tests, NOW ICT Malaria Pf/Pv and OptiMAL, for diagnosis of malaria].To increase the accessibility of malaria diagnosis, the Instituto Nacional de Salud de Colombia undertook a field trial to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of two rapid diagnostic tests.The sensitivity, specificity and concordance was compared for two rapid diagnostic tests for malaria, NOW ICT Malaria Pf/Pv and OptiMAL.A descriptive and concordance study was performed with 214 patients in the southwestern coastal city of Tumaco, Colombia, each of whom presented at least one of the symptoms of the classical malaria triad. Two strategies were applied for patient recruitment-one by passive search and a second through local health brigades.NOW ICT showed a general sensitivity of 98.4% (95%CI: 90.3-99.9), and a general specificity of 98.0% (95%CI: 93.9-99.5). For Plasmodium falciparum, the sensitivity was 98.2% (95%CI: 89.4-99.9) and the specificity 98.1% (95%CI: 94.1-99.5). The sensitivity was lower (80.0%) when parasitemia ranged from 200 to 4,000 parasites/microl. The sensitivity and specificity of the NOW ICT for P. vivax malaria were 100%. The sensitivity for this test was not affected for the established ranges of parasitemia for P. vivax. The overall figures for OptiMAL were 95.2% (95%CI: 85.8-98.8) sensitivity and 99.3% (95%CI: 95.8-100.0) specificity. For P. falciparum malaria OptiMAL showed 94.7% (95%CI: 84.5-98.6) sensitivity and 99.4% (95%CI: 96.0-100.0) specificity. The sensitivity was lower (60.0%) when samples with 200-4,000 parasites/microl were tested. For P. vivax, OptiMAL presented a 66.7% (95%CI: 24.1-94.0) sensitivity, which diminished to 50% with a parasitemia between 300-2.500 parasites/microL.Good results for sensitivity and specificity were obtained for malaria diagnosis using NOW ICT and OptiMAL, with NOW ICT showing higher sensitivity and specificity values than OptiMAL.[Establishment and evaluation of colloid gold labeled immunochromatographic strip test for rapid diagnosis of malaria].To establish and evaluate a gold immunochromatographic strip test for detection and differentiation of Plasmodium vivax and P. falciparum.The monoclonal antibodies, F4H12, G4C9 and D8F7, were conjugated with colloid gold as detecting reagent; monoclonal antibody B2G10 (against P. vivax/ P. falciparum) and D6A7 (only against P. falciparum) were immobilized on nitrocellulose in proper position. Blood samples from 107 febrile patients from endemic area of malaria and 17 patients with visceral leishmaniasis were used for evaluating the specificity. Blood samples of malaria patients (110 with P. vivax and 54 with P. falciparum) were used for evaluating the sensitivity.5 samples out of 107 febrile patients and 17 patients with visceral leishmaniasis showed false positive reaction with a specificity of 96.0% (119/124), all the 17 samples from patients with visceral leishmaniasis were negative. 164 blood samples of malaria patients showed a sensitivity of 92.3% (153/164), 92.7% (102/110)and 94.4% (51/ 54) for patients infected with P. vivax or P. falciparum, respectively.The immunochromatographic strip test based on antigen-capturing is a sensitive, specific, simple and rapid assay for malaria diagnosis.Accuracy of malaria rapid diagnosis test Optimal-IT(®) in Kinshasa, the Democratic Republic of Congo.Despite some problems related to accuracy and applicability, malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs), are currently considered the best option in areas with limited laboratory services for improving case management and reducing over-treatment. However, their performance must be established taking into the account the particularities of each endemic area. In the Democratic Republic of Congo, the validity of Optimal-IT(®) and Paracheck-Pf(®), respectively based on the detection of lactate dehydrogenase and histidine-rich protein-2, was assessed at primary health care level (PHC).This was a two-stage cluster randomized survey, conducted in one health centre in 12 health zones in Kinshasa city. All patients with malaria presumptive diagnosis were eligible. Gold standard was microscopy performed by experts from the parasitology unit, Kinshasa University.624 patients were enrolled. 53.4% (95% CI: 49.4-57.3) owed a bed net, obtained in 74.5% of cases (95% CI: 69.4-79.1) through community-based distribution by the National Malaria Control Programme. Microscopy expert reading confirmed 123 malaria cases (19.7%; 95% CI: 16.7-23.1). Overall sensitivity were 79.7% (95% CI: 72.4-86.8), 87.8% (95% CI: 81.9-93.6) and 86.2% (95% CI: 79.9-92.3), respectively, for Optimal-IT(®), Paracheck-Pf(®) and microscopy performed at PHC. Specificity was 97.0% (95% CI: 95.5-98.5), 91.6% (95% CI: 89.1-94.0) and 49.1% (95% CI: 44.7-53.4). The proportion of confirmed cases seemed similar in under-fives compared to others. Any treatment prior to the current visit was a predictor for malaria (AOR: 2.3; 95% CI: 1.5-3.5), but not malaria treatment (AOR: 0.87; 95% CI: 0.4-1.8). Bed net ownership tended to protect against malaria (AOR: 0.67; 95% CI: 0.45-0.99).Although microscopy is considered as the "gold standard" for malaria diagnosis at point of care level, this study showed that its accuracy may not always be satisfactory when performed in health centres.[Usefulness of the "OptiMAL Rapid Malaria test" for rapid detection of malaria imported to Poland].In this survey the use of OptiMAL test for rapid diagnosis of malaria was evaluated. It was proved that this test allowed to diagnose the Plasmodium sp. antigen in 72% of examined blood specimens, 82% for P. falciparum infection and 69% for P. vivax, whereas P. ovale was not detected at all. The test sensitivity depended on the parasitemia level. It showed a sensitivity of 100% for parasitemia density exceeded 1%, 95.4% with the parasitemia ranging from 0.1-0.99%. For lower parasite density, the test's sensitivity was of 32 and 60%. The OptiMAL test showed a 99.1% specificity thus it revealed to be significantly high.Performance of an immunochromatographic test for the rapid diagnosis of malaria.The immunochromatographic test (ICT) for the rapid diagnosis of malaria has been marketed for several years. In a study in which three Centres of Tropical Medicine participated and data were pooled, performance of the test varied considerably when comparing the results between each centre. The sensitivity of ICT in 2,343 patients tested in our services was 100% and the specificity 99.74%. Moreover, two patients with a positive ICT would initially have been missed by expert microscopy, with Plasmodium falciparum malaria being confirmed microscopically some hours later. The principal reasons for the better performance of the test in our series appear to be blood collection in EDTA vials and considerable experience with handling and interpreting the ICT test.Use of rapid diagnostic tests for diagnosis of malaria in the UK.Malaria is currently diagnosed almost exclusively by microscopy in clinical laboratories. The introduction of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) may be useful in achieving rapid detection of malaria parasites, especially in situations where malaria is not often seen or where staff are inexperienced.To explore the use of RDT in UK laboratories.The current use of RDTs was surveyed in UK laboratories subscribing to the United Kingdom National External Quality Assessment Scheme blood parasitology and haematology schemes.An overall survey response rate of 60.3% was seen. RDTs were found to be the preferred choice, either alone or in conjunction with microscopy in 31.2% of the samples examined during normal working hours and in 44.3% of the specimens examined on call.During on-call hours, the use of RDTs was observed to increase and RDTs changed the diagnosis in 12% of laboratories. No established protocol for RDT use was, however, observed in the UK. A protocol that needs to be validated in the laboratory setting is suggested.Non-microscopic method for malaria diagnosis using OptiMAL IT, a second-generation dipstick for malaria pLDH antigen detection.Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria are now a commonly used procedure for malaria diagnosis. New or improved devices need to be evaluated against a recognised gold-standard procedure and subjected to conditions of temperature and humidity that may affect their performance. The OptiMAL 48 RDT has now been available commercially for several years and a second-generation OptiMAL IT test is now coming onto the market. In this study the problems associated with the routine use of OptiMAL 48 is investigated and its performance compared with a second-generation individual test, OptiMAL IT. Sensitivity and specificity for detection of all malaria species for both tests were comparable but loss of sensitivity of the test strips due to humidity or temperature found with the routine use of OptiMAL 48 was not seen with the individual OptiMAL IT. False-positive results for Plasmodium falciparum, seen in two negative blood samples, were attributed to the presence of high levels of heterophile antibodies.Diagnosis of malaria parasitemia in children using a rapid diagnostic test.This cross-sectional study was conducted to evaluate the diagnostic performance of a new rapid immunochromatographic test named "Paracheck pf" in the diagnosis of malaria in Nigerian children.A total of 380 Nigerian children aged between 6 and 59 months who presented at the University of Nigeria Teaching Hospital (UNTH) Enugu with fever and no obvious focus of any other infection were consecutively recruited. Malaria parasitemia was determined using simple microscopy and "Paracheck pf"."Paracheck pf" has the following diagnostic performance characteristics: Sensitivity of 82%, specificity of 91.5%, negative predictive value of 91.5%, positive predictive value of 82%, a strong positive correlation between parasite density and test sensitivity, and a detection limit of 397 parasites/μl.The test is, therefore, recommended for the use in Nigerian children aged between 6 and 59 months in Enugu for the diagnosis of malaria, but negative results should be cautiously interpreted in infants because symptomatic malaria may occur in these children at parasite densities as low as 100/μl.Role of ICT malaria immunochromatographic test for rapid diagnosis of malaria.To evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of immunochromatographic test (ICT) malaria p.f/p.v using microscopy as the gold standard diagnosis.Five hundred and sixty patients of both sexes and all age groups with clinical suspicion of malaria were studied. Venous blood was collected for microscopy and ICT. Thick and thin films prepared and stained with Leishman's stain were examined. ICT malaria test was performed and interpreted according to manufacturer's instructions. Data was analyzed using Epi-6.A total of 560 cases were studied, 339 males and 221 females with age ranges between 2 to 73 years. Seventy two (12.85%) cases had parasitaemia (with or without sexual forms). On microscopy 65 (11.6%) cases had asexual-stage parasitaemia and 7 (1.25%) cases had P. falciparum gametocytes only. Thirty two cases were infected with P. falciparum, 29 with P. vivax and 4 had mixed infection. For P. falciparum the ICT was 97.0% sensitive, 98.3% specific, with positive predictive value (PPV) of 78.0% and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 99.8%. For P. vivax the sensitivity was only 89.7%, specificity 97.9%, PPV was 70.3% and NPV 99.4%.Our results are in concordance with previous studies. Rapid tests though expensive are simple to perform and effective diagnostic tools of malaria. They can be used selectively, though microscopy remains the gold standard diagnosis, economical and accurate if performed by skilled technologists.Effect of malaria rapid diagnostic tests on the management of uncomplicated malaria with artemether-lumefantrine in Kenya: a cluster randomized trial.Shortly after Kenya introduced artemether-lumefantrine (AL) for first-line treatment of uncomplicated malaria, we conducted a pre-post cluster randomized controlled trial to assess the effect of providing malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) on recommended treatment (patients with malaria prescribed AL) and overtreatment (patients without malaria prescribed AL) in outpatients >/= 5 years old. Sixty health facilities were randomized to receive either RDTs plus training, guidelines, and supervision (TGS) or TGS alone. Of 1,540 patients included in the analysis, 7% had uncomplicated malaria. The provision of RDTs coupled with TGS emphasizing AL use only after laboratory confirmation of malaria reduced recommended treatment by 63%-points (P = 0.04), because diagnostic test use did not change (-2%-points), but health workers significantly reduced presumptive treatment with AL for patients with a clinical diagnosis of malaria who did not undergo testing (-36%-points; P = 0.03). Health workers generally adhered to RDT results when prescribing AL: 88% of RDT-positive and 9% of RDT-negative patients were treated with AL, respectively. Overtreatment was low in both arms and was not significantly reduced by the provision of RDTs (-12%-points, P = 0.30). RDTs could potentially improve malaria case management, but we urgently need to develop more effective strategies for implementing guidelines before large scale implementation.Evaluation of the OptiMAL test for diagnosis of malaria in Venezuela.We evaluated the OptiMAL rapid dipstick test by comparing it with the conventional standard thick-blood film method, for the detection of malaria in two groups of individuals from different Venezuelan endemic areas. One of the groups consisted of individuals with malaria-like symptoms (n = 113) and the other of asymptomatic individuals (n = 89). The classical microscopy analysis of these populations determined that 67.5% were infected with P. vivax, 31.3% with P. falciparum, and 1.2% with mixed infections. The OptiMAL test showed 96.4% sensitivity, 100% specificity, 100% positive predictive value, 97.5% negative predictive value and optimal concordance (kappa = 0.97), capable of detecting any malaria infection in the evaluated population. However, these parameters were lower when the parasitaemia was < or = 300 parasites/microL. Freezing of the samples did not affect the sensitivity and specificity of the test. We concluded that this rapid malaria test is sensitive and specific for rapid diagnosis of malaria in the field and it is a complement to conventional microscopy.Validity and reliability of RDT for diagnosis of malaria among febrile children in Jimma Town: southwest Ethiopia.Malaria shows variations in its epidemiologic pattern in relation to the local situation. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) have the potential to provide an accurate diagnosis and to determine the prevalence of malaria in ureas.The purpose of the study was to determine the prevalence of malaria and to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of RDT for diagnosis of malaria.A health facility based cross-sectional study was conducted from September to November 2006 among Jebrile children of less than five years of age as part of interventional study to develop and test home management of malaria in Jimma Town. Both thick and thin blood smear microscopy were done by trained laboratory technicians. An RDT was conducted to evaluate its specificity, senstivity and relaibility using blood smear microscopy as a gold standard. Data were analsysed using SPSS12.0.1 and STATA 9.1.A total of 929 febrile children were included in the sunrvey. P. falciparum or/and P. vivax combined together were identified using microscopy in 20.34% offebrile children presented to the health care facility. Forty three (4.63%) febrile children were positive for P. falciparum in their thin blood film microscopy. The sensitivity Iand specificity of RDT was 93.02% and 99.44% where as the positive likelihood ratio was 164.84 and positive predictive value was 88.89%.RDT for malaria had high sensitivity and specificity in the group tested. However, the use of RDT in home management of malaria by community workers should be investigated and the validity and reliability of the RDT should he established before recommending using with home management of malaria.The usefulness of a new rapid diagnostic test, the First Response Malaria Combo (pLDH/HRP2) card test, for malaria diagnosis in the forested belt of central India.Malaria presents a diagnostic challenge in tribal belt of central India where two Plasmodium species, Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax, are prevalent. In these areas, rapid detection of the malaria parasites and early treatment of infection remain the most important goals of disease management. Therefore, the usefulness of a new rapid diagnostic (RDT), the First Response(R) Combo Malaria Ag (pLDH/HRP2) card test was assessed for differential diagnosis between P. falciparum with other Plasmodium species in remote villages of Jabalpur district.A finger prick blood sample was collected to prepare blood smear and for testing with the RDT after taking informed consent. The figures for sensitivity, specificity, accuracy and predictive values were calculated using microscopy as gold standard.Analysis revealed that overall, the RDT was 93% sensitive, 85% specific with a positive predictive value (PPV) of 79%, and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 95%. The accuracy 88% and J-index was 0.74. For P. falciparum, the sensitivity and specificity of the test were 96% and 95% respectively, with a PPV of 85% and a NPV of 99%. The RDT accuracy 95% and J-index was 0.84. For non-falciparum malaria, the sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 83%, 94% and 92% respectively with a PPV of 69% and a NPV of 97%.The RDTs are easy to use, reliable and simple to interpret. RDTs are more suited to health workers in situations where health services are deficient or absent. Therefore, the test can be used as an epidemiological tool for the rapid screening of malaria.Use of dipstick tests for the rapid diagnosis of malaria in nonimmune travelers.Swift diagnosis of falciparum malaria in nonendemic areas is frequently complicated by lack of experience on the side of involved laboratory personnel. Diagnostic tools based on the dipstick principle for the detection of plasmodial histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP-2) (ICT Malaria P.f. (R)) and parasite-specific lactate-dehydrogenase (pLDH) (OptiMal(R)), respectively, have become available for the qualitative detection of falciparum malaria.In order to evaluate currently available assays, a series of studies was conducted: sensitivity and specificity were evaluated by investigation of specimens from 231 febrile returnees from endemic areas, cross reactivity in patients with rheumatoid factor (RF) was assessed among 92 patients from a rheumatology unit, and the quality of dipstick self-use by febrile travelers was tested in Kenya.Whereas the test kit based on the detection of HRP-2 performed with a sensitivity of 92.5% and a specificity of 98.3%, the kit for the detection of pLDH showed a sensitivity of 88.5% and a specificity of 99.4%. Cross-reactions with sera positive for rheumatoid factor occurred in 6.6% with the ICT Malaria P.f.(R), and in 3.3% with the OptiMal(R) test. Only ICT Malaria P.f.(R) was tested for quality of self-use among travelers. This dipstick assay was performed successfully by 67 patients (68.4%), but 31 (31.6%) were unable to obtain a result.Dipstick tests have the potential of enhancing speed and accuracy of the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, especially if nonspecialized laboratories are involved. However, microscopical testing remains mandatory in every single patient with the possible diagnosis of malaria. Self-use of dipstick tests for malaria diagnosis by travelers should only be recommended after appropriate instruction and training, including a successful performance of the test procedure.Evaluation of three rapid tests for diagnosis of P. falciparum and P. vivax malaria in Colombia.The diagnostic capacity of three malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs), NOW-Malaria-ICT, OptiMAL-IT, and Paracheck-Pf, was evaluated against expert microscopy in Colombia. We tested 896 patients, of whom microscopy confirmed 139 P. falciparum, 279 P. vivax, and 13 mixed P.f/P.v infections and 465 negatives. Paracheck-Pf and NOW-malaria-ICT were more accurate in detecting P. falciparum (sensitivities 90.8% and 90.1%, respectively) in comparison with Optimal-IT (83.6%). NOW showed an acceptable Pf detection rate at low densities (< 500/microL), but resulted in a higher proportion of false positives. For P. vivax diagnosis, Optimal-IT had a higher sensitivity than NOW (91.0% and 81.4%, respectively). The choice between the two Pf/Pv detecting RDTs balances P. falciparum and P. vivax detection rates. Considering some degree of P. falciparum overtreatment and failure to detect all P. vivax cases as more acceptable than missing some cases of P. falciparum, we recommend careful implementation of NOW-malaria-ICT in areas where microscopy is lacking. The price is however still a constraint.Rapid malaria diagnostic tests vs. clinical management of malaria in rural Burkina Faso: safety and effect on clinical decisions. A randomized trial.To assess if the clinical outcome of patients treated after performing a Rapid Diagnostic Test for malaria (RDT) is at least equivalent to that of controls (treated presumptively without test) and to determine the impact of the introduction of a malaria RDT on clinical decisions.Randomized, multi-centre, open clinical trial in two arms in 2006 at the end of the dry and of the rainy season in 10 peripheral health centres in Burkina Faso: one arm with use of RDT before treatment decision, one arm managed clinically. Primary endpoint: persistence of fever at day 4. Secondary endpoints: frequency of malaria treatment and of antibiotic treatment.A total of 852 febrile patients were recruited in the dry season and 1317 febrile patients in the rainy season, and randomized either to be submitted to RDT (P_RTD) or to be managed presumptively (P_CLIN). In both seasons, no significant difference was found between the two randomized groups in the frequency of antimalarial treatment, nor of antibiotic prescription. In the dry season, 80.8% and 79.8% of patients with a negative RDT were nevertheless diagnosed and treated for malaria, and so were 85.0% and 82.6% negative patients in the rainy season. In the rainy season only, both diagnosis and treatment of other conditions were significantly less frequent in RDT positive vs. negative patients (48.3% vs. 61.4% and 46.2% vs. 59.9%, P = 0.00 and 0.00, respectively).Our study was inconclusive on RDT safety (clinical outcome in the two randomized groups), because of an exceedingly and unexpectedly low compliance with the negative test result. Further research is needed on best strategies to promote adherence and on the safety of a test based strategy compared with the current, presumptive treatment strategy.Clinical trials of a new immunochromatographic test for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Goa.Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein-2 (PfHRP-2) based immunochromatographic test kit (ICT Malaria Pf) for the rapid diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria was evaluated at the clinic of Malaria Research Centre (Field Station), Goa. Of the 98 febrile patients screened, 22 were ICT positive for P. falciparum. Simultaneous microscopic examination of the blood smears of these ICT positive patients showed that 20 were positive for P. falciparum alone, whereas one had mix infection of both P. vivax and P. falciparum suggesting 100% sensitivity. Only one slide negative patient who had taken 600 mg chloroquine the previous day was positive in the ICT. Out of the remaining 76 blood smears, 41 showed P. vivax infection and none cross-reacted with P. falciparum HRP-2 antigen and were ICT negative except one mix infection case in which P. vivax and P. falciparum infections occurred concomitantly suggesting species specificity of 98.7%. The positive predictive value, negative predictive value and efficacy of the ICT were 95.4, 100 and 98.9% respectively. The band intensity of the ICT positive cases significantly correlated with P. falciparum parasitaemia (p < 0.01). The usefulness and the disadvantages of this diagnostic kit have been discussed in context of prevailing malaria situation in the country.Field evaluation of the ICT malaria P.f/P.v immunochromatographic test for detection of Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax in patients with a presumptive clinical diagnosis of malaria in eastern Indonesia.In areas such as eastern Indonesia where both Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax occur, rapid antigen detection tests for malaria need to be able to detect both species. We evaluated the new combined P. falciparum-P. vivax immunochromatographic test (ICT Malaria P.f/P.v.) in Radamata Primary Health Centre, Sumba, Indonesia, from February to May 1998 with 560 symptomatic adults and children with a presumptive clinical diagnosis of malaria. Blinded microscopy was used as the "gold standard," with all discordant and 20% of concordant results cross-checked blindly. Only 50% of those with a presumptive clinical diagnosis of malaria were parasitemic. The ICT Malaria P.f/P.v immunochromatographic test was sensitive (95. 5%) and specific (89.8%) for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, with a positive predictive value (PPV) and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 88.1 and 96.2%, respectively. HRP2 and panmalarial antigen line intensities were associated with parasitemia density for both species. Although the specificity and NPV for the diagnosis of vivax malaria were 94.8 and 98.2%, respectively, the overall sensitivity (75%) and PPV (50%) for the diagnosis of vivax malaria were less than the desirable levels. The sensitivity for the diagnosis of P. vivax malaria was 96% with parasitemias of >500/microl but only 29% with parasitemias of <500/microl. Nevertheless, compared with the test with HRP2 alone, use of the combined antigen detection test would reduce the rate of undertreatment from 14.7 to 3.6% for microscopy-positive patients, and this would be at the expense of only a modest increase in the rate of overtreatment of microscopy-negative patients from 7.1 to 15. 4%. Cost remains a major obstacle to widespread use in areas of endemicity.Parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection in an endemic area in west Uganda.The measurement of parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) has been presented as an easy and rapid method for the diagnosis of malaria in humans. In order to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of such a test we examined blood samples from 429 Ugandan patients. While pLDH activity was significantly linked to parasitaemia, sensitivity and specificity were found to be rather low at 58.8 and 62.2% respectively. The positive and negative predictive values failed to meet necessary standards. We conclude that the methods of measurement of pLDH activity in malaria infection, although potentially useful for the fast diagnosis of malaria, need to be improved to be of true value in endemic areas.Cost-effectiveness of malaria microscopy and rapid diagnostic tests versus presumptive diagnosis: implications for malaria control in Uganda.Current Uganda National Malaria treatment guidelines recommend parasitological confirmation either by microscopy or rapid diagnostic test (RDT) before treatment with artemether-lumefantrine (AL). However, the cost-effectiveness of these strategies has not been assessed at rural operational primary care centres.Three health centres (HCs) were randomized to three diagnostic arms (microscopy, RDT and presumptive diagnosis) in a district of low and another of high malaria transmission intensities in Uganda. Some 22,052 patients presenting with fever at outpatients departments were enrolled from March 2010 to February 2011. Of these, a random sample of 1,627 was selected to measure additional socio-economic characteristics. Costing was performed following the standard step-down cost allocation and the ingredients approach. Effectiveness was measured as the number and proportion of patients correctly diagnosed and treated. Incremental Cost-Effectiveness Ratios (ICERs) were estimated from the societal perspective (http://Clinicaltrials.gov, NCT00565071).Overall RDT was most cost-effective with lowest ICER US$5.0 compared to microscopy US$9.61 per case correctly diagnosed and treated. In the high transmission setting, ICER was US$4.38 for RDT and US$12.98 for microscopy. The corresponding ICERs in the low transmission setting were US$5.85 and US$7.63 respectively. The difference in ICERs between RDT and microscopy was greater in the high transmission area (US$8.9) than in low transmission setting (US$1.78). At a willingness to pay of US$2.8, RDT remained cost effective up to a threshold value of the cost of treatment of US$4.7.RDT was cost effective in both low and high transmission settings. With a global campaign to reduce the costs of AL and RDT, the Malaria Control Programme and stakeholders need a strategy for malaria diagnosis because as the cost of AL decreases, presumptive treatment is likely to become more attractive.Rapid immunochromatography-based detection of mixed-species malaria infection in Pakistan.We report the identification of mixed Plasmodium infections in four recent patients with malaria clinically refractory to empiric chloroquine therapy using the rapid antigen detection kit, NOW ICT Malaria Pf/Pv. A rapid in vitro immunodiagnostic test, the NOW ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test kit was used for the detection of circulating Plasmodium falciparum (Pf) and Plasmodium vivax (Pv) antigens in whole blood. Peripheral blood microscopy confirmed mixed-species infection in all the cases. Thick and thin peripheral blood films were made and stained with Giemsa stain and examined by both hospital laboratory staff and an experienced parasitologist who was blinded to the results of the rapid malarial antigen tests. Four recent patients (all male; mean age, 24 years) with mixed malarial infection were identified. All the subjects were males working for an oil company in a coastal area of Pakistan, and all had been diagnosed presumptively with malaria based on clinical grounds (without microbiologic confirmation), and were treated empirically with chloroquine without clinical response. Semiquantitative malaria counts via microscopy were as follows: P. vivax, scanty (2 patients) and moderate (2 patients); for P. falciparum--scanty (1 patient), moderate (2 patients), and heavy (1 patient). The present case series, although limited by the small number of patients with proven mixed P. falciparum-P. vivax infection, highlights the usefulness of the rapid antigen test in a highly malarious region of Pakistan where chloroquine resistance is prevalent. Although there was full concordance between the results of blood smear microscopy and rapid antigen testing, these techniques are potentially most useful when there is a discrepancy with microscopy findings. Accurate and rapid diagnosis of parasites, particularly in cases of mixed P. falciparum and P. vivax infection, is of immense importance for individual patient management and in reducing the burden of disease, especially in regions of chloroquine resistance.Field evaluation of malaria rapid diagnostic tests for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and non-P. falciparum infections.The objective of this study was to evaluate various malaria rapid diagnostic tests as a tool in the detection of P. falciparum and non-P. falciparum infections in field conditions. Four field surveys were conducted in malaria-endemic areas of Palawan and Davao del Norte, Philippines to validate the various rapid diagnostic tests, namely Diamed OptiMAL 48 (DiaMed AG, Switzerland), ParaHIT f (Span Diagnostics, India), Orchid OptiMAL, and Paracheck Pf (both from Orchid Biomedical Systems, India). The results of the various rapid diagnostic tests were compared to those of microscopy. Sensitivity, specificity and detection rates according to the level of parasitemia were used as parameters to describe the performance of the various rapid diagnostic tests in the field. Practical and operational assessments were also done. The results of the study show that the sensitivity and detection rates were generally lower than previously reported, with sensitivities ranging from 4.8% to 20.6%, except for Diamed OptiMAL 48, which had sensitivities of 78.8% to 96.8%, and detection rates of 50.0% to 96.8%. The rest had detection rates ranging from 0.0% to 50.0%. All the specificities ranged from 18.2% to 100.0%. Improper conditions at the time of manufacturing, storage, transport, and utilization may affect the validity of the results. Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria provide practical means of detecting malarial infections, especially in endemic areas. However, issues regarding variability in performance must to be addressed before they can be used as mainstream diagnostic tools.Use of a histidine-rich protein 2-based rapid diagnostic test for malaria by health personnel during routine consultation of febrile outpatients in a peripheral health facility in Yaounde, Cameroon.The role of a rapid diagnostic test (RDT) in the case management of Plasmodium falciparum malaria infections has not been determined in Africa. Our study was conducted during November 2007-January 2008 to assess test accuracy of an RDT in the management of febrile outpatients in a peripheral urban health facility in Cameroon. We found the overall sensitivity to be 71.4% and a specificity of 82.2%; the positive predictive value and negative predictive value were 73.8% and 80.4%, respectively. False-negative and false-positive cases represented 11.8% and 10.5% of all febrile patients. Malaria alone (31.3%) was the first cause of fever; 33.5% of fever cases were of unknown origin. Acute respiratory infections were common among children 0-2 years of age (25.5%) and decreased with age. The risk of having a clinical failure with the presumptive treatment of febrile children was seven times greater than that of the RDT-oriented management (relative risk = 6.8, 95% confidence interval = 0.88-53.4, P = 0.03) because of the delay of appropriate treatment of non-malarial febrile illness. Our results suggest that the RDT may be of limited utility for children greater than five years of age and adults and that diagnosis based on microscopic examination of blood smears should be recommended for these patient populations, as well as in areas of low transmission.Performance of OptiMAL(R) in the diagnosis of Plasmodium vivax and Plasmodium falciparum infections in a malaria referral center in Colombia.Alternative, non-microscopic methods for the diagnosis of malaria have recently become available. Among these, rapid dipstick methods stand out. One such test, OptiMAL(R), is based on the immunochromatographic detection of Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) and has the capacity to detect and distinguish infections caused by P. falciparum and Plasmodium sp. This capacity is particularly important in countries where different species of Plasmodium co-exist. In this study we evaluated the performance of OptiMAL(R) in an urban referral center for malaria diagnosis. Two sets of patients were included: one (n = 112) having predetermined infections with P. falciparum or P. vivax and individuals with negative blood smears; and another consisting of all eligible consecutive patients (n = 80) consulting for diagnosis at the referral center during one month. The overall diagnostic efficiency of OptiMAL(R) for both sets of patients was 96.9%. Efficiency was higher for P. vivax (98.1%) than for P. falciparum (94.9%). These results corroborate the diagnostic utility of OptiMAL(R) in settings where P. vivax and P. falciparum co-exist and support its implementation where microscopic diagnosis is unavailable and in circumstances that exceed the capacity of the local microscopic diagnosis facility.Malaria overdiagnosis and burden of malaria misdiagnosis in the suburbs of central Sudan: special emphasis on artemisinin-based combination therapy era.Accuracy of diagnosis is central for malaria control. Although microscopy is gold standard in malaria diagnosis, its reliability is largely dependent on user skill. In this study, we evaluated practitioners' clinical and microscopists' technical skills in diagnosis of malaria in central Sudan. In a retrospective study, 3203 blood smears from 95 peripheral health facilities (each represented by a general practitioner [GP] and general microscopist [GM]) were reexamined by expert microscopist. Furthermore, in a prospective study, 410 patients had their malaria diagnosis rechecked by rapid diagnostic test for validation of the microscopic diagnosis. Results showed that the rate of false-positive diagnosis of malaria was 75.6% and false-negative diagnosis was 0.01%. The study disclosed poor skills of the GPs and GMs in malaria diagnosis because 43% of the GPs and 44% of the GMs failed to make a single true-positive malaria diagnosis. The false-positive malaria diagnosis showed bias toward adult females. Economically, the calculated cost of diagnosis and treatment of malaria in Sudan in year 2000 is US$100 million, whereas the calculated cost of true malaria is approximately US$14 million. In conclusion, malaria overdiagnosis was widely recognized in central Sudan, with high economic burden during the era of artemisinin-based combination therapy. Finally, different scenarios were suggested for improvement of malaria diagnosis.The diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection using a new antigen detection system.With the widespread emergence of drug-resistant Plasmodium falciparum infection, febrile patients in the tropics can no longer be empirically treated with inexpensive yet effective antimalarials. The substitution of newer and more costly drugs brings with it the need for rapid, accurate, and inexpensive diagnostic procedures so that directed therapy can be used. We report a field trial comparing standard microscopic malaria diagnosis and quantitative buffy coat analysis to a new P. falciparum antigen detection system. The ParaSight F test (PFT) was found to be easy to learn, rapid to perform, and highly accurate. If confirmed, the use of the PFT in endemic areas may aid in the identification of patients requiring therapy for drug-resistant malaria.Evaluation of the performance of CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo rapid diagnostic test for the diagnosis of malaria in Jimma, southwestern Ethiopia.To evaluate the diagnostic performance of CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test relative to microscopy, for the diagnosis of falciparum and vivax malaria in Ethiopia.Two hundred and forty febrile patients visiting the Serbo health center in Jimma zone, southwestern Ethiopia, were involved in this study in 2008. Giemsa-stained thin and thick blood smears were prepared and microscopically examined under a 100x oil immersion microscope objective for Plasmodium species identification and determination of parasitemia respectively. CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test was performed as per the manufacturers' instruction.The validity of CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium was very good with a sensitivity of 95.8%, specificity of 100%, positive predictive value of 100% and negative predictive value of 96%. The test performed equally well for the identification of Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax. The diagnostic performance of this CareStart test is comparable to light microscopy of thin and thick blood smears.Although CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test and blood microscopy have comparable diagnostic performance for Plasmodium detection, the CareStart test has the added advantage of being simple to interpret, cost-efficient, and hence it is preferable to use this rapid diagnostic test for malaria diagnosis in areas where microscopy is not accessible and during times of malaria epidemics that are observed approximately every 4-5 years in Ethiopia.Reliability of rapid diagnostic tests in diagnosing pregnancy-associated malaria in north-eastern Tanzania.Accurate diagnosis and prompt treatment of pregnancy-associated malaria (PAM) are key aspects in averting adverse pregnancy outcomes. Microscopy is the gold standard in malaria diagnosis, but it has limited detection and availability. When used appropriately, rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) could be an ideal diagnostic complement to microscopy, due to their ease of use and adequate sensitivity in detecting even sub-microscopic infections. Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) is even more sensitive, but it is mainly used for research purposes. The accuracy and reliability of RDTs in diagnosing PAM was evaluated using microscopy and PCR.A cohort of pregnant women in north-eastern Tanzania was followed throughout pregnancy for detection of plasmodial infection using venous and placental blood samples evaluated by histidine rich protein 2 (HRP-2) and parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) based RDTs (Parascreen™) or HRP-2 only (Paracheck Pf® and ParaHIT®f), microscopy and nested Plasmodium species diagnostic PCR.From a cohort of 924 pregnant women who completed the follow up, complete RDT and microscopy data was available for 5,555 blood samples and of these 442 samples were analysed by PCR. Of the 5,555 blood samples, 49 ((proportion and 95% confidence interval) 0.9% [0.7 -1.1]) samples were positive by microscopy and 91 (1.6% [1.3-2.0]) by RDT. Forty-six (50.5% [40.5 - 60.6]) and 45 (49.5% [39.4 - 59.5]) of the RDT positive samples were positive and negative by microscopy, respectively, whereas nineteen (42.2% [29.0 - 56.7]) of the microscopy negative, but RDT positive, samples were positive by PCR. Three (0.05% [0.02 - 0.2]) samples were positive by microscopy but negative by RDT. 351 of the 5,461 samples negative by both RDT and microscopy were tested by PCR and found negative. There was no statistically significant difference between the performances of the different RDTs.Microscopy underestimated the real burden of malaria during pregnancy and RDTs performed better than microscopy in diagnosing PAM. In areas where intermittent preventive treatment during pregnancy may be abandoned due to low and decreasing malaria risk and instead replaced with active case management, screening with RDT is likely to identify most infections in pregnant women and out-performs microscopy as a diagnostic tool.A rapid dipstick antigen capture assay for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria. WHO Informal Consultation on Recent Advances in Diagnostic Techniques and Vaccines for Malaria.Recent advances in the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infections have made it possible to consider supplementing light microscopy with a standardized dipstick antigen capture assay based on the detection of a parasite-specific protein, which is secreted by the asexual blood stages and immature gametocytes but not by the other stages. Field trials indicate that this dipstick assay provides consistently reproducible results, with a threshold of detection of P. falciparum parasitaemia similar to that obtained by high quality routine malaria microscopy and a specificity and sensitivity of around 90% compared with standard thick blood film microscopy. The stability, reproducibility, and ease of use of the assay clearly indicate that it has potential for application in the management of malaria, particularly at the peripheral health care level, provided its accuracy can be assured and that it can be made affordable. Consideration should be given to its wider use where operational requirements and resources so justify, and where decisions are based on adequate evaluation of the existing health delivery systems.Real-time PCR assay and rapid diagnostic tests for the diagnosis of clinically suspected malaria patients in Bangladesh.More than 95% of total malaria cases in Bangladesh are reported from the 13 high endemic districts. Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax are the two most abundant malaria parasites in the country. To improve the detection and management of malaria patients, the National Malaria Control Programme (NMCP) has been using rapid diagnostic test (RDT) in the endemic areas. A study was conducted to establish a SYBR Green-based modified real-time PCR assay as a gold standard to evaluate the performance of four commercially-available malaria RDTs, along with the classical gold standard- microscopy.Blood samples were collected from 338 febrile patients referred for the diagnosis of malaria by the attending physician at MatirangaUpazila Health Complex (UHC) from May 2009 to August 2010. Paracheck RDT and microscopy were performed at the UHC. The blood samples were preserved in EDTA tubes. A SYBR Green-based real-time PCR assay was performed and evaluated. The performances of the remaining three RDTs (Falcivax, Onsite Pf and Onsite Pf/Pv) were also evaluated against microscopy and real-time PCR using the stored blood samples.In total, 338 febrile patients were enrolled in the study. Malaria parasites were detected in 189 (55.9%) and 188 (55.6%) patients by microscopy and real-time PCR respectively. Among the RDTs, the highest sensitivity for the detection of P. falciparum (including mixed infection) was obtained by Paracheck [98.8%, 95% confidence interval (CI) 95.8-99.9] and Falcivax (97.6%, 95% CI 94.1-99.4) compared to microscopy and real-time PCR respectively. Paracheck and Onsite Pf/Pv gave the highest specificity (98.8%, 95% CI 95.7-99.9) compared to microscopy and Onsite Pf/Pv (98.8, 95% CI 95.8-99.9) compared to real-time PCR respectively for the detection of P. falciparum. On the other hand Falcivax and Onsite Pf/Pv had equal sensitivity (90.5%, 95% CI 69.6-98.8) and almost 100% specificity compared to microscopy for the detection of P. vivax. However, compared to real-time PCR assay RDTs and microscopy gave low sensitivity (76.9%, 95% CI 56.4-91) in detecting of P. vivax although a very high specificity was obtained (99-100%).The results of this study suggest that the SYBR Green-based real-time PCR assay could be used as an alternative gold standard method in a reference setting. Commercially-available RDTs used in the study are quite sensitive and specific in detecting P. falciparum, although their sensitivity in detecting P. vivax was not satisfactory compared to the real-time PCR assay.Feasibility of a rapid dipstick antigen-capture assay for self-testing of travellers' malaria.This open comparative study sought to determine whether, and with what level of instruction, travellers can successfully use and interpret the rapid whole blood malaria diagnostic test, ParaSight F. 160 visitors to the Zürich University Travel Clinic took part in the study. One group received written instructions only, while another group was given combined oral and written instructions on how to test their own blood for malaria infection and interpret a series of 5 prepared test strips. Each volunteer also completed a questionnaire targeted at assessing performance in using the diagnostic, interpretation of the results and acceptability of the concept of self-testing for malaria infection. The main outcome measures were successful performance of the test, correct interpretation of prepared test strips and acceptability of the test. In the group which received only written instructions, 60/80 (75%) were successful, whilst in the group which received written and oral instructions, 72/80 (90%) successfully performed the test (P < 0.02). Overall, 565 (70.6%) test strips were correctly and 165 (20.6%) incorrectly interpreted with 113 (14.1%) false negative interpretations. No prepared test strip was interpreted as false positive. Seventy (8.8%) test strips were not interpreted. Some 91. 9% of all candidates would use such a test if it were available. While it is possible for lay persons to successfully perform the test, interpretation of results poses a problem. In particular, the proportion of false negative interpretations is unacceptable. A combination of written and oral instructions leads to a significantly higher level of successful test performance. If such a test is to be made available to the general public, written instructions must be made concise and foolproof and the test endpoint clearly defined, as the currently available test is more suitable for trained laboratory personnel. In the meantime other candidate diagnostics have become available and these should now be assessed for their suitability in the context of travellers' malaria.Comparison of HRP2- and pLDH-based rapid diagnostic tests for malaria with longitudinal follow-up in Kampala, Uganda.Presumptive treatment of malaria results in significant overuse of antimalarials. Malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) may offer a reliable alternative for case management, but the optimal RDT strategy is uncertain. We compared the diagnostic accuracy of histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2)- and plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH)-based RDTs, using expert microscopy as the gold standard, in a longitudinal study of 918 fever episodes over an 8-month period in a cohort of children in Kampala, Uganda. Sensitivity was 92% for HRP2 and 85% for pLDH, with differences primarily due to better detection with HRP2 at low parasite densities. Specificity was 93% for HRP2 and 100% for pLDH, with differences primarily due to rapid clearance of pLDH antigenemia after treatment of a previous malaria episode. RDTs may provide an effective strategy for improving rational delivery of antimalarial therapy; in Kampala, either test could dramatically decrease inappropriate presumptive treatments.[Assessment of a rapid diagnostic test for malaria in rural health care facilities in Senegal].The aim of the study was to determine the accuracy of a rapid diagnostic test in confirming presumptive malaria diagnosis in a rural zone of Senegal. Thick blood smear was used as the reference technique for comparison. METHOHDOLOGY: Testing was conducted on children between the ages of 1 and 14 years at three health care facilities located in the Niakhar are from August 2006 to June 2007. If malaria was suspected by the nurse based on clinical findings, two thick smears and one rapid diagnostic test (Core Malaria Pf) were performed. Blood slides were stained in Niakhar and read in Dakar.A total of 474 patients were examined. Three-fourths (75%) of these patients were seen during the rainy season. Malaria was suspected in 335 patients (71%). Rapid tests and thick smears were obtained in 330 of these patients with positive results in 194 (59%) and 180 (55%) respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the rapid test were 96%, 87%, 90% and 95% respectively.Our data show that the rapid diagnostic test used in this study exhibits good sensitivity and positive predictive value. Despite its cost this test could be helpful in confirming malaria diagnosis in outlying health care facilities without the necessary resources to perform blood smears. Confirmation is necessary to avoid unwarranted prescription of malaria treatment due to inaccurate clinical diagnosisPerformance of a rapid antigen test for the diagnosis of congenital malaria.To assess the performance of OptiMAL, a rapid malaria antigen capture dipstick, in diagnosing congenital malaria.Live newborns aged 0-3 days, delivered at Olabisi Onabanjo University Teaching Hospital, Sagamu, Nigeria between August 2004 and January 2005, were screened for malaria parasitaemia with an immunochromatographic test (OptiMAL) and blood film microscopy. OptiMAL detects plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH).Twenty-one of 192 newborns (10.9%) were diagnosed with congenital malaria by blood film microscopy. The OptiMAL test was negative in all infants.OptiMAL rapid malaria antigen capture dipstick might not be useful for diagnosing malaria parasitaemia in newborns. Blood film microscopy remains the gold standard for the diagnosis of congenital malaria.Rapid diagnostic tests for malaria at sites of varying transmission intensity in Uganda.In Africa, fever is often treated presumptively as malaria, resulting in misdiagnosis and the overuse of antimalarial drugs. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria may allow improved fever management.We compared RDTs based on histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) and RDTs based on Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) with expert microscopy and PCR-corrected microscopy for 7000 patients at sites of varying malaria transmission intensity across Uganda.When all sites were considered, the sensitivity of the HRP2-based test was 97% when compared with microscopy and 98% when corrected by PCR; the sensitivity of the pLDH-based test was 88% when compared with microscopy and 77% when corrected by PCR. The specificity of the HRP2-based test was 71% when compared with microscopy and 88% when corrected by PCR; the specificity of the pLDH-based test was 92% when compared with microscopy and >98% when corrected by PCR. Based on Plasmodium falciparum PCR-corrected microscopy, the positive predictive value (PPV) of the HRP2-based test was high (93%) at all but the site with the lowest transmission rate; the pLDH-based test and expert microscopy offered excellent PPVs (98%) for all sites. The negative predictive value (NPV) of the HRP2-based test was consistently high (>97%); in contrast, the NPV for the pLDH-based test dropped significantly (from 98% to 66%) as transmission intensity increased, and the NPV for expert microscopy decreased significantly (99% to 54%) because of increasing failure to detect subpatent parasitemia.Based on the high PPV and NPV, HRP2-based RDTs are likely to be the best diagnostic choice for areas with medium-to-high malaria transmission rates in Africa.Genetic deletion of HRP2 and HRP3 in Indian Plasmodium falciparum population and false negative malaria rapid diagnostic test.Genetic polymorphisms in diagnostic antigens are important factors responsible for variable performance of rapid diagnostic tests. Additionally, the failure of antigen expression due to gene deletion may also contribute to variable performance. We report Indian Plasmodium falciparum field isolates lacking both Pfhrp2 and Pfhrp3 genes leading to false negative results of rapid diagnostic tests. The study highlights need to determine the prevalence of P. falciparum isolates lacking these genes in larger field populations in India.[Efficacy of a rapid test to diagnose Plasmodium vivax in symptomatic patients of Chiapas, Mexico].To evaluate, under laboratory conditions, the sensitivity and specificity of a rapid diagnostic test (OptiMAL), based on immunoreactive strips, to detect Plasmodium vivax infection in febrile patients in Southern Chiapas, Mexico.The presence of parasites in blood samples of 893 patients was investigated by Giemsa-stained thick blood smear microscopic examination (gold standard). A blood drop from the same sample was smeared on immunoreactive strips to investigate the presence of the parasite pLDH. Discordant results were resolved by PCR amplification of the parasite's 18S SSU rRNA, to discard infection.OptiMAL had an overall sensitivity of 93.3% and its specificity was 99.5%. Its positive and negative predictive values were 96.5% and 98.9%, respectively. Signal intensity in OptiMAL strips correlated well with the parasitemia density in the blood samples (r = 0.601, p = 0.0001).This rapid test had acceptable sensitivity and specificity to detect P. vivax under laboratory conditions and could be useful for malaria diagnosis in field operations in Mexico.Evaluation of the Clearview® Malaria pLDH Malaria Rapid Diagnostic Test in a non-endemic setting.Malaria Rapid Diagnostic Tests (RDTs) are widely used to diagnose malaria. The present study evaluated a new RDT, the Clearview® Malaria pLDH test targeting the pan-Plasmodium antigen lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH).The Clearview® Malaria pLDH test was evaluated on fresh samples obtained in returned international travellers using microscopy corrected by PCR as the reference method. Included samples were Plasmodium falciparum (139), Plasmodium vivax (22), Plasmodium ovale (20), Plasmodium malariae (7), and 102 negative.Overall sensitivity for the detection of Plasmodium spp was 93.2%. For P. falciparum, the sensitivity was 98.6%; for P. vivax, P. ovale and P. malariae, overall sensitivities were 90.9%, 60.0% and 85.7% respectively. For P. falciparum and for P. vivax, the sensitivities increased to 100% at parasite densities above 100/μl. The specificity was 100%. The test was easily to perform and the result was stable for at least 1 hour.The Clearview® Malaria pLDH was efficient for the diagnosis of malaria. The test was very sensitive for P. falciparum and P. vivax detection. The sensitivities for P. ovale and P. malariae were better than other RDTs.Accuracy and reliability of malaria diagnostic techniques for guiding febrile outpatient treatment in malaria-endemic countries.The main purpose of this study was to assess the accuracy of various techniques available for diagnosis of malaria. Blood samples were collected from 313 patients with clinical suspicion of uncomplicated malaria in 2 primary health centers in Madagascar. The presence of Plasmodium parasites was assessed by conventional microscopy, 2 rapid diagnostic tests (one HRP2-based test, PALUTOP(+4), and one pLDH-based test, OptiMAL-IT), and real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR), which is used as the "gold standard" method. The degree of agreement observed was very high for microscopy (0.99) and the HRP2-based test (0.93) and high for the pLDH-based test (0.82). Public-health implications are also discussed in this paper.Study and evaluation of Wondfo rapid diagnostic kit based on nano-gold immunochromatography assay for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum.Malaria has been recognized as a human disease for thousands of years and remains one of the most common diseases affecting humans worldwide. Therefore, a method for rapidly detecting Plasmodium falciparum is necessary and useful. We have developed Wondfo rapid diagnostic kit based on nano-gold immunochromatography assay for the detection of P. falciparum in patient specimen. In the present study, we demonstrated the sensitivity and specificity of the rapid diagnostic kit in which nano-gold labeling techniques and the monoclonal antibodies against histidine-rich protein-2 of P. falciparum were used to establish two-antibody sandwich immunochromatographic assay for detecting P. falciparum. By using microscopic examination of blood smears as control, the sensitivity, specificity, and feasibility of Wondfo rapid diagnostic kit was determined in the prompt and accurate diagnosis of malaria. In this study, 1,558 blood samples were collected from outpatient clinics in China and detected by both Wondfo kit and microscopic examination. The Wondfo kit did not show cross-reaction with microfilaria, Toxoplasma gondii, and other parasites in the blood. The patient samples positive for rheumatoid factor, HIV, tuberculosis, and syphilis did not show false positivity when testing with Wondfo kit. The detection sensitivity and specificity of Wondfo rapid diagnostic kit were 95.49% and 99.53%, respectively. These results indicate that our rapid diagnostic assay may be useful for detecting P. falciparum in patient specimen.Cost-effectiveness of malaria diagnostic methods in sub-Saharan Africa in an era of combination therapy.To evaluate the relative cost-effectiveness in different sub-Saharan African settings of presumptive treatment, field-standard microscopy and rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) to diagnose malaria.We used a decision tree model and probabilistic sensitivity analysis applied to outpatients presenting at rural health facilities with suspected malaria. Costs and effects encompassed those for both patients positive on RDT (assuming artemisinin-based combination therapy) and febrile patients negative on RDT (assuming antibiotic treatment). Interventions were defined as cost-effective if they were less costly and more effective or had an incremental cost per disability-adjusted life year averted of less than US$ 150. Data were drawn from published and unpublished sources, supplemented with expert opinion.RDTs were cost-effective compared with presumptive treatment up to high prevalences of Plasmodium falciparum parasitaemia. Decision-makers can be at least 50% confident of this result below 81% malaria prevalence, and 95% confident below 62% prevalence, a level seldom exceeded in practice. RDTs were more than 50% likely to be cost-saving below 58% prevalence. Relative to microscopy, RDTs were more than 85% likely to be cost-effective across all prevalence levels, reflecting their expected better accuracy under real-life conditions. Results were robust to extensive sensitivity analysis. The cost-effectiveness of RDTs mainly reflected improved treatment and health outcomes for non-malarial febrile illness, plus savings in antimalarial drug costs. Results were dependent on the assumption that prescribers used test results to guide treatment decisions.RDTs have the potential to be cost-effective in most parts of sub-Saharan Africa. Appropriate management of malaria and non-malarial febrile illnesses is required to reap the full benefits of these tests.A comparison of three diagnostic techniques for malaria: a rapid diagnostic test (NOW Malaria), PCR and microscopy.Malaria is a common, life-threatening infection in endemic tropical areas and one that presents a diagnostic challenge to laboratories in most non-endemic countries. A rapid and accurate diagnosis is a prerequisite for effective treatment, especially for the potentially fatal cases of Plasmodium falciparum infection. In the present, multi-centre study, the performances of a rapid diagnostic test (NOW) Malaria) and several, commercial, PCR-based assays (AMS61, AMS42, AMS43, AMS4 and AMS45) were compared against the results of microscopical examination of bloodsmears (the current 'gold standard'). The subjects were either non-European immigrants (N=135) or international travellers (N=171). There was good concordance between the results of all the detection methods, with kappa values of >0.8. Although the NOW Malaria rapid test was both sensitive (100%) and specific (100%) in detecting P. falciparum infections, it was less specific (93.1%) and sensitive (90.7%) in identifying the other Plasmodium species. The results from the AMS61 assay, designed to detect any malarial infection, generally parallelled those of the microscopy (kappa = 0.89), giving a specificity of 98.2% and a sensitivity of 91.0%. Although the use of species-specific molecular primers to identify pure infections with P. falciparum and P. vivax gave results that were in good agreement with those of the microscopy, the subjects who had apparently pure infections with P. ovale or P. malariae were always found PCR-negative. Compared with the standard microscopy, both the NOW Malaria test and the PCR-based assays were therefore poor at identifying mixed infections. The NOW Malaria test and the PCR-based assays clearly need to be improved, particularly for the correct identification of infections with Plasmodium spp. other than P. falciparum, including mixed infections. For now, expert microscopy must remain the mainstay of the laboratory diagnosis of malaria.Evaluation of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria case management in Gabon.A laboratory-confirmed diagnosis is the basis of malaria case management. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) create new opportunities for improved care in endemic areas. Diagnostic performance of OptiMAL-IT and Acon was assessed in comparison with microscopy at 2 sites in Gabon. Between February 2008 and January 2009, 2125 febrile children under 11 years old were diagnosed using microscopy and RDTs. Plasmodial infection was detected more frequently using Acon (27%) and OptiMAL-IT (27%) compared to microscopy (20%) (P < 0.01). Among the samples diagnosed positive by OptiMAL-IT, 78% were infected by Plasmodium falciparum, whereas 99% of positive blood smears were P. falciparum infections, 0.5% Plasmodium malariae, and 0.5% Plasmodium ovale. Both RDTs had similar sensitivity (Se) (94.0%; 95% confidence interval [CI], 92-96), which varied depending on the site. When parasite density was >100 p/microL, the Se of the 2 tests was >98% (95% CI, 96-100). Likewise, the negative predictive values were high and comparable (>98%). Overtreatment with antimalarial drugs was 12%. These tests should be considered as a good alternative to microscopy, allowing not only an efficient and rapid diagnosis of malaria in primary health facilities but also to aid in promoting changes for antimalarial prescription behavior.Evaluation of a malaria rapid diagnostic test for assessing the burden of malaria during pregnancy.Plasmodium falciparum infection during pregnancy may cause placental malaria and subsequently low birth weight, primarily through the placental sequestration of infected red blood cells. Measuring the burden of malaria during pregnancy usually involves determining the prevalence of placental malaria infection through microscopic examination of placental blood films, a difficult and error-prone process. A number of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria have been developed, most of them immunochromatographic dipstick assays. However, none have been tested for the direct determination of malaria antigen in placental blood. We undertook an evaluation of the Malaria Rapid Test (MAKROmed in determining placental malaria infection. The prevalence of placental parasitemia was 22.6% by microscopy, 51.0% by a polymerase chain reaction (PCR), and 43.1% by RDT. When the PCR was used as the gold standard, RDTs had a sensitivity of 89% and a specificity of 76%. The MAKROmed RDT was highly sensitive in the detection of placental malaria, but had lower than expected specificity.Comparison of the Paracheck-Pf test with microscopy, for the confirmation of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Tanzania.Paracheck-Pf is a rapid, qualitative immuno-assay for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein-2 in samples of human blood. The assay has now been evaluated, against the usual 'gold standard', microscopy, using blood samples from 1655 individuals in five districts of Tanzania, four of which experience frequent malaria outbreaks. The aim was to verify whether Paracheck-Pf could be a reliable tool for the confirmation of malaria outbreaks in such areas. The overall measurements of the assay's performance were good, with a sensitivity of 90.0%, a specificity of 96.6%, a positive predictive value of 88.9%, and a negative predictive value of 97.0% (with an estimated malaria prevalence of 23.3%). There was, however, marked variation between the study districts, the assay's performance being relatively poor where the test had been stored for 12 months at room temperature (23.5+/-3.5 degrees C). The assay was easy to perform in the field and could clearly be a valuable tool in remote areas and in emergency situations, such as the early detection of malaria outbreaks. The cost of the assay (U.S.$0.62/test at the time of the present study) is sufficiently low that its routine use in the confirmation of P. falciparum malaria might also be cost-effective, particularly in areas where there are no facilities for microscopy and/or where the first-line treatment of malaria is based on relatively expensive artemisinin-based combinations.Field evaluation of the ICT malaria P.f/P.v immunochromatographic test for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and P.vivax infection in forest villages of Chhindwara, central India.A rapid new immunochromatographic test (ICT malaria P.f/P.v) for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and P.vivax was evaluated against thick blood smears in forest villages of Chhindwara, Madhya Pradesh, where both Plasmodium falciparum and P.vivax are prevalent. 344 symptomatic patients (Gond ethnic tribe) in five villages were screened by field staff of the Malaria Research Centre in October 1999. For P.falciparum, the ICT was 97.5% sensitive and 88% specific, with a positive predictive value (PPV) of 87.6% and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 97.6%. For P.vivax the sensitivity was only 72%, the specificity 99%, with a PPV of 92% and an NPV of 96%. Although a negative test result was inadequate to exclude parasitaemia < or = 300/microl for P.falciparum and < or = 1500/microl for P.vivax, the test is potentially useful in remote areas.Field evaluation of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria in Yaounde, Cameroon.Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) are affordable, alternative diagnostic tools. The present study aimed to evaluate RDTs available in Cameroon and compare their characteristics to follow the parasitological response of patients for 28 days. Malaria diagnosis was assessed in 179 febrile patients using conventional microscopy as the reference method. Parascreen detects both Plasmodium falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein 2 (Pf HRP-2) and Pan-specific plasmodial lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) in all four human Plasmodium spp. Diaspot is based on the detection of Pf HRP-2. OptiMAL-IT (pLDH specific for P. falciparum and pLDH for all four human Plasmodium spp.) was assessed for comparison. The reliability of RDTs was evaluated by calculating the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, false-positive rate, false-negative rate, and likelihood ratio. The clinical outcome of 18 children treated with atovaquone-proguanil and followed for 28 days was evaluated using microscopy and RDTs. Of 179 samples, 133 (74.3%) were pure P. falciparum-positive smears, 4 (2.2%) pure P. malariae-positive smears, and 42 (23.5%) negative smears. Parascreen and Diaspot had high sensitivity (>92%) and positive predictive values (>94%). The specificities for Parascreen and Diaspot were 81.0% and 90.5%, respectively. The false-positive rates and the false-negative rates were 19.0% and 4.5% for Parascreen and 9.5% and 8.3% for Diaspot, respectively. Most false-negatives occurred in samples with low parasitaemia (<500 asexual parasites/μL). The performance of RDTs was better at higher parasitaemia (>500 asexual parasites/μL). Four pure P. malariae were only detected by the pan-Plasmodium bands of Parascreen and OptiMAL-IT. In blood samples from patients treated and followed-up for 28 days, HRP2-based RDTs remained positive in most samples until Day 28. Despite negative smears, OptiMAL-IT remained positive in several patients until Day 7 but was negative in all patients from Day 14 onwards. RDTs can improve the management of febrile patients. The validity, ease of use, and cost of HRP2-based tests were comparable. However, one of the current weaknesses of the RDT-based strategy using the tests available in Cameroon is inadequate sensitivity for low parasitaemia. In some cases, RDT results may require correct interpretation based on clinical history, clinical examination, and microscopic diagnosis.Evaluation of rapid diagnostic tests: malaria.Comparison of Parascreen Pan/Pf, Paracheck Pf and light microscopy for detection of malaria among febrile patients, Northwest Ethiopia.Two malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDT), Parascreen Pan/Pf and Paracheck Pf, were tested in rural health centres in Ethiopia against independent expert microscopy (the gold standard). Participants (n =1997) presented with presumptive malaria to ten health centers in Amhara Regional State during the 2007 peak malaria season (October to December). By microscopy, 475 (23.8%) suspected malaria cases were positive, of which 57.7% were P. falciparum; 24.6% P. vivax and 17.7% mixed infections. Parascreen and Paracheck were positive for 442 (22.1%) and 277 (13.9%) febrile patients, respectively. For Parascreen, P. falciparum sensitivity was 79.6%, specificity 97.4%, positive predictive value (PPV) 86.9%, and negative predictive value (NPV) 95.6%. For Parascreen, P. vivax sensitivity was 74.4%, specificity 98.6%, PPV 76.3% and NPV 98.4%. For Paracheck, P. falciparum sensitivity was 73.7%, specificity 99.2%, PPV 95.3%, NPV 94.5%. Sensitivity was significantly higher for both tests (P<0.05) when parasite density was >100/microl of blood; in these cases Parascreen was 90.7% and 91.5% sensitive for P. falciparum and P. vivax, respectively, while Paracheck was 87.9% sensitive for P. falciparum. Parascreen thus performed adequately for both P. falciparum and P. vivax compared to expert microscopy and is more useful than Paracheck where microscopy is unavailable.Utility of a point-of-care malaria rapid diagnostic test for excluding malaria as the cause of fever among HIV-positive adults in rural Rakai, Uganda.We compared results of a malaria rapid diagnostic test (Binax Now Malaria, Binax-M, Inverness Medical Innovations, Inc., Waltham, MA) performed at rural mobile clinics in Uganda by clinicians evaluating febrile adult HIV patients to thick smear evaluated at a central laboratory by trained microscopists. Two hundred forty-six samples were analyzed, including 14 (5.7%) which were thick-smear positive for falciparum malaria. Sensitivity of Binax-M compared with thick smear was 85.7% (95% CI: 57.2-98.2), specificity 97.8% (95% CI: 94.9-99.3), positive and negative predictive values were 70.6% (95% CI: 44.0-89.7) and 99.1% (95% CI: 96.8-99.9), respectively. The rapid diagnostic test accurately ruled malaria "in or out" at the point-of-care, facilitating appropriate clinical management and averting unnecessary anti-malarial therapy.Quality assurance of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria in routine patient care in rural Tanzania.Histidine-rich protein II (HRP2)-based malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) have shown high sensitivity and specificity for detecting Plasmodium falciparum malaria in a variety of study settings. However, RDTs are susceptible to heat and humidity and variation in individual performance, which may affect their use in field settings. We evaluated sensitivity and specificity of RDTs during routine use for malaria case management in peripheral health facilities. From December 2007 to October 2008, HRP2-based ParaHIT-f RDTs were introduced in 12 facilities without available microscopy in Rufiji District, Tanzania. Health workers received a single day of instruction on how to perform an RDT and thick blood smear. Job aids, Integrated Management of Childhood Illness guidelines, and national malaria treatment algorithms were reviewed. For quality assurance (QA), thick blood smears for reference microscopy were collected for 2 to 3 days per week from patients receiving RDTs; microscopy was not routinely performed at the health facilities. Slides were stained and read centrally within 72 hours of collection by a reference microscopist. When RDT and blood smear results were discordant, blood smears were read by additional reference microscopists blinded to earlier results. Facilities were supervised monthly by the district laboratory supervisor or a member of the study team. Ten thousand six hundred fifty (10,650) patients were tested with RDTs, and 51.5% (5,488/10,650) had a positive test result. Blood smear results were available for 3,914 patients, of whom 40.1% (1,577/3,914) were positive for P. falciparum malaria. Overall RDT sensitivity was 90.7% (range by facility 85.7-96.5%) and specificity was 73.5% (range 50.0-84.3%). Sensitivity increased with increasing parasite density. Successful implementation of RDTs was achieved in peripheral health facilities with adequate training and supervision. Quality assurance is essential to the adequate performance of any laboratory test. Centralized staining and reading of blood smears provided useful monitoring of RDT performance. However, this level of QA may not be sustainable nationwide.Rapid diagnostic tests as a source of DNA for Plasmodium species-specific real-time PCR.This study describes the use of malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) as a source of DNA for Plasmodium species-specific real-time PCR.First, the best method to recover DNA from RDTs was investigated and then the applicability of this DNA extraction method was assessed on 12 different RDT brands. Finally, two RDT brands (OptiMAL Rapid Malaria Test and SDFK60 malaria Ag Plasmodium falciparum/Pan test) were comprehensively evaluated on a panel of clinical samples submitted for routine malaria diagnosis at ITM. DNA amplification was done with the 18S rRNA real-time PCR targeting the four Plasmodium species. Results of PCR on RDT were compared to those obtained by PCR on whole blood samples.Best results were obtained by isolating DNA from the proximal part of the nitrocellulose component of the RDT strip with a simple DNA elution method. The PCR on RDT showed a detection limit of 0.02 asexual parasites/μl, which was identical to the same PCR on whole blood. For all 12 RDT brands tested, DNA was detected except for one brand when a low parasite density sample was applied. In RDTs with a plastic seal covering the nitrocellulose strip, DNA extraction was hampered. PCR analysis on clinical RDT samples demonstrated correct identification for single species infections for all RDT samples with asexual parasites of P. falciparum (n = 60), Plasmodium vivax (n = 10), Plasmodium ovale (n = 10) and Plasmodium malariae (n = 10). Samples with only gametocytes were detected in all OptiMAL and in 10 of the 11 SDFK60 tests. None of the negative samples (n = 20) gave a signal by PCR on RDT. With PCR on RDT, higher Ct-values were observed than with PCR on whole blood, with a mean difference of 2.68 for OptiMAL and 3.53 for SDFK60. Mixed infections were correctly identified with PCR on RDT in 4/5 OptiMAL tests and 2/5 SDFK60 tests.RDTs are a reliable source of DNA for Plasmodium real-time PCR. This study demonstrates the best method of RDT fragment sampling for a wide range of RDT brands in combination with a simple and low cost extraction method, allowing RDT quality control.[Evaluation of the Optimal-IT and ICT P.f./P.v. rapid dipstick tests for diagnosing malaria within primary healthcare in the municipality of Manaus, Amazonas].Malaria is routinely diagnosed using the thick blood smear test. However, this technique requires the training of microscopists and may be time-consuming. A concordance study was conducted on two dipstick tests (Optimal-IT and ICT P.f./P.v.) and the thick blood smear test, within primary healthcare in Manaus.Performance of a prototype malaria rapid diagnostic test versus thick film microscopy among HIV-positive subjects in rural Rakai, Uganda.In this study, we report the performance of a prototype malaria rapid diagnostic test, Malaria F-test (MFT), compared with thick blood films from HIV-positive Ugandans undergoing malaria testing. In total, 21/154 samples (13.6%) were concordantly positive by both thick film and MFT and 129/154 samples (83.8%) were concordantly negative; 1 sample (0.6%) was thick film-positive but MFT-negative and 3 samples (1.9%) were thick film-negative but MFT-positive. The sensitivity of MFT was 95.5% (95% CI 77.2-99.9%) compared with thick film microscopy and the specificity was 97.7% (95% CI 93.5-99.5%). MFT was simple, rapid and effective for detection of Plasmodium falciparum among HIV-positive subjects in a rural, malaria-endemic African setting.A comparison of thick smears, QBC malaria, PCR and PATH falciparum malaria test trip in Plasmodium falciparum diagnosis.Blood samples from 182 patients presenting at the out-patient clinic in Richard-Toll. Senegal were analysed by Thick smear microscopy, the QBC, PCR and the new dipstick PATH Malaria assay which detects the histidine rich protein II antigen of Plasmodium falciparum. Thick smear microscopy was used as the reference method. Sensitivity, specificity, predictive positive and negative values were 100%, 83.6%, 93.4% and 100% QBC respectively; 100%, 72.7%, 89.4% and 100% for PCR; 96%, 92.7%, 96.8% and 91% for the PATH assay. PATH assay failed to detect one positive sample with Plasmodium malariae. Assays were also compared with regard to the expense of equipment and reagents and speed and ease of use. The rapid PATH assay can be performed with minimal training and may be specially useful in areas where P. falciparum is the predominant malaria species, in epidemic malaria regions, and where skilled microscopy is not readily available.[Value of rapid diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum using indirect monoclonal immunofluorescence].Development and use of murine specific monoclonal antibodies associated with an indirect immunofluorescent assay allows a rapid detection of P. falciparum antigens. This work compares the results obtained by interpretation of Giemsa staining technique on blood smears, to the use of a commercial reagent (Monofluo Kit P. falciparum). This monoclonal indirect immunofluorescent assay (I.F.I.M.) provides the clinician with a precious aid to diagnosis as well by its specificity and sensitivity, better than conventional staining techniques; particularly in pauciparasitaemia induced by prime-infestation or partial anti-malarial drug resistance.Malaria diagnosis and treatment under the strategy of the integrated management of childhood illness (IMCI): relevance of laboratory support from the rapid immunochromatographic tests of ICT Malaria P.f/P.v and OptiMal.The algorithm developed for the integrated management of childhood illness (IMCI) provides guidelines for the treatment of paediatric malaria. In areas where malaria is endemic, for example, the IMCI strategy may indicate that children who present with fever, a recent history of fever and/or pallor should receive antimalarial chemotherapy. In many holo-endemic areas, it is unclear whether laboratory tests to confirm that such signs are the result of malaria would be very relevant or useful. Children from a holo-endemic region of Tanzania were therefore checked for malarial parasites by microscopy and by using two rapid immunochromatographic tests (RIT) for the diagnosis of malaria (ICT Malaria P.f/P.v and OptiMal. At the time they were tested, each of these children had been targeted for antimalarial treatment (following the IMCI strategy) because of fever and/or pallor. Only 70% of the 395 children classified to receive antimalarial drugs by the IMCI algorithm had malarial parasitaemias (68.4% had Plasmodium falciparum trophozoites, 1.3% only P. falciparum gametocytes, 0.3% P. ovale and 0.3% P. malariae). As indicators of P. falciparum trophozoites in the peripheral blood, fever had a sensitivity of 93.0% and a specificity of 15.5% whereas pallor had a sensitivity of 72.2% and a specificity of 50.8%. The RIT both had very high corresponding sensitivities (of 100.0% for the ICT and 94.0% for OptiMal) but the specificity of the ICT (74.0%) was significantly lower than that for OptiMal (100.0%). Fever and pallor were significantly associated with the P. falciparum asexual parasitaemias that equalled or exceeded the threshold intensity (2000/microl) that has the optimum sensitivity and specificity for the definition of a malarial episode. Diagnostic likelihood ratios (DLR) showed that a positive result in the OptiMal test (DLR = infinity) was a better indication of malaria than a positive result in the ICT (DLR = 3.85). In fact, OptiMal had diagnostic reliability (0.93) which approached that of an ideal test and, since it only detects live parasites, OptiMal is superior to the ICT in monitoring therapeutic responses. Although the RIT may seem attractive for use in primary health facilities because relatively inexperienced staff can perform them, the high cost of these tests is prohibitive. In holo-endemic areas, use of RIT or microscopical examination of bloodsmears may only be relevant when malaria needs to be excluded as a cause of illness (e.g. prior to treatment with toxic or expensive drugs, or during malaria epidemics). Wherever the effective drugs for the first-line treatment of malaria are cheap (e.g. chloroquine and Fansidar), treatment based on clinical diagnosis alone should prove cost-saving in health facilities without microscopy.Low quality of routine microscopy for malaria at different levels of the health system in Dar es Salaam.Laboratory capacity to confirm malaria cases in Tanzania is low and presumptive treatment of malaria is being practiced widely. In malaria endemic areas WHO now recommends systematic laboratory testing when suspecting malaria. Currently, the use of Rapid Diagnostic Tests (RDTs) is recommended for the diagnosis of malaria in lower level peripheral facilities, but not in health centres and hospitals. In this study, the following parameters were evaluated: (1) the quality of routine microscopy, and (2) the effects of RDT implementation on the positivity rate of malaria test results at three levels of the health system in Dar es Salaam, Tanzania.During a baseline cross-sectional survey, routine blood slides were randomly picked from 12 urban public health facilities in Dar es Salaam, Tanzania. Sensitivity and specificity of routine slides were assessed against expert microscopy. In March 2007, following training of health workers, RDTs were introduced in nine public health facilities (three hospitals, three health centres and three dispensaries) in a near-to-programmatic way, while three control health facilities continued using microscopy. The monthly malaria positivity rates (PR) recorded in health statistics registers were collected before (routine microscopy) and after (routine RDTs) the intervention in all facilities.At baseline, 53% of blood slides were reported as positive by the routine laboratories, whereas only 2% were positive by expert microscopy. Sensitivity of routine microscopy was 71.4% and specificity was 47.3%. Positive and negative predictive values were 2.8% and 98.7%, respectively. Median parasitaemia was only three parasites per 200 white blood cells (WBC) by routine microscopy compared to 1226 parasites per 200 WBC by expert microscopy. Before RDT implementation, the mean test positivity rates using routine microscopy were 43% in hospitals, 62% in health centres and 58% in dispensaries. After RDT implementation, mean positivity rates using routine RDTs were 6%, 7% and 8%, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of RDTs using expert microscopy as reference were 97.0% and 96.8%. The positivity rate of routine microscopy remained the same in the three control facilities: 71% before versus 72% after. Two cross-sectional health facility surveys confirmed that the parasite rate in febrile patients was low in Dar es Salaam during both the rainy season (13.6%) and the dry season (3.3%).The quality of routine microscopy was poor in all health facilities, regardless of their level. Over-diagnosis was massive, with many false positive results reported as very low parasitaemia (1 to 5 parasites per 200 WBC). RDTs should replace microscopy as first-line diagnostic tool for malaria in all settings, especially in hospitals where the potential for saving lives is greatest.Comparison of a parasite lactate dehydrogenase-based immunochromatographic antigen detection assay (OptiMAL) with microscopy for the detection of malaria parasites in human blood samples.Microscopic examination of blood smears remains the gold standard for malaria diagnosis, but is labor-intensive and requires skilled operators. Rapid dipstick technology provides a potential alternative. A study was conducted in The Gambia to compare the performance of OptiMAL, an immunochromatographic antigen detection assay for the diagnosis of malaria using parasite lactate dehydrogenase, against standard microscopy in patients with suspected malaria. For initial diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum, irrespective of stage, this assay had a sensitivity of 91.3%, a specificity of 92%, a positive predictive value of 87.2%, and a negative predictive value of 94.7%. The sensitivity of the test decreased markedly at parasitemias < 0.01%. This assay can be used for the diagnosis of malaria in areas where microscopy is not available and for urgent malaria diagnosis at night and at weekends, when routine laboratories are closed and when relatively inexperienced microscopists may be on duty.Comparison of different diagnostic techniques in Plasmodium falciparum cerebral malaria.Plasmodium falciparum cerebral malaria remains a major health problem in India. The efficacy of treatment of cerebral malaria lies in its early diagnosis through rapid diagnostic methods. ParaSights-F test detects HRP-2 antigen secreted by parasitised red blood cells and quantitative buffy coat assay (QBC) is examination of buffy coat for the presence of malarial parasite stained with acridine orange. This study was performed to evaluate the effectiveness of ParaSight-F test and QBC assay as diagnostic methods in the patients of cerebral malaria.Fifty clinically diagnosed patients of cerebral malaria were included in the study. ParaSight-F test, QBC and conventional blood smear examination was done. Patients who were in coma and there were no obvious features of bacterial or viral etiology were investigated for cerebral malaria by these diagnostic methods.ParaSight-F test, QBC and peripheral blood smears were examined. Patients were followed-up for signs of clinical recovery. ParaSight-F test was positive in 47 patients, QBC in 46 while blood smear examination was positive in 28 cases.Sensitivity and specificity of ParaSight-F test were found to be 96.6 and 94% while QBC showed 97.8 and 100% respectively. ParaSight-F test and QBC were found to be novel methods for diagnosis of cerebral malaria especially in the cases where diagnosis can not be made by conventional blood smear examination due to low parasitaemia. These rapid diagnostic methods help in early therapeutic intervention.Evaluation of different methods for diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria.Rapid diagnosis is a prerequisite for institution of effective treatment and reducing the mortality and morbidity of falciparum malaria. This study was taken up to compare the efficacy of various rapid methods viz, acridine orange, Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein II antigen detection and Field's stain with traditional microscopy i.e, Leishman stain for diagnosing falciparum malaria. Thick and thin blood films of 443 consecutive patients with history of fever with chills and rigors were examined by Leishman and Field's method. Acridine orange stained wet mounts of blood were examined under fluorescence microscopy. All films were examined by two independent microbiologists. Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein II antigen was detected using commercially available kit, Paracheck Pf. Out of the 443 subjects examined for P.falciparum 18.28% were detected by Leishman stain, 6.32% by Field's stain, 18.28% by acridine orange and 18.1% by antigen based technique. Field's stain missed 53 (65.4%), while Paracheck Pf was negative in 6(7.4%) of the Leishman positive samples. All Field's stain and acridine orange positives were positive by Leishman, but five Paracheck Pf positives were negative. Leishman stain is cost effective but if facilities are available one should use acridine orange for screening. The antigen detection kits are rapid, simple and are useful but to rule out false negatives in clinically suspected cases, Leishman stain is reliable.[Can the thick drop/smear examination for malaria be replaced by a rapid diagnostic test in first intention? The Mayotte experience].Malaria is a public health problem in the French island of Mayotte (160,000 inhabitants) in the Indian Ocean. In the late 1990, resistance to chloroquine greatly increased, and so did the number of malaria cases, so that a new health policy had to be adopted. Since 2001, the initial smear/thick drop examination, the results of which took too long to obtain, has systematically been replaced by a rapid diagnosis test (Optimal IT Diamed) in all hospitals and public health centers.Epidemiological data of malaria on the island was collected and a prospective study was made from March 2005 to February 2006, on two sites (the emergency department of the main hospital and a rural health centre) on all patients presenting with malaria (104 and 139 cases respectively).The first Optimal IT test diagnosed the condition accurately in 88 and 96% of the cases, respectively. Every time symptoms would persist after negative test results and an Optimal IT test was repeated within three days, the parasitemia level was low (0.08 to 0.66%). Very low parasitemia level was very likely to account for a false negative (test result).These results concerning malaria (and its epidemiological data) in Mayotte show that the initial use of an Optimal IT test instead of the thin/thick blood smear results in a faster management of patients with malaria, although the Optimal IT test is slightly less sensitive and requires training/practice.Preliminary enquiry into the availability, price and quality of malaria rapid diagnostic tests in the private health sector of six malaria-endemic countries.This enquiry aimed to provide a snap-shot of availability, price and quality of malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) in private health facilities at selected sites in six malaria-endemic countries in Africa, South East Asia and South America.In each study site, data collectors surveyed private healthcare facilities which were selected based on accessibility from their home institution. Using a questionnaire, information was recorded about the facility itself and the malaria RDT(s) available. Where possible, a small number of RDTs were procured and quality control tested using a standardized procedure.Of the 324 private healthcare facilities visited, 35 outlets (mainly private clinics and hospitals) were found to supply 10 different types of RDTs products. RDT prices across the six countries ranged from US$1.00 to $16.81. Five of the 14 malaria RDTs collected failed quality control testing.In the private outlets sampled, the availability of RDTs was limited. Some of the RDTs whose quality we tested demonstrated inadequate sensitivity. This presents a number of risks. Given the more widespread distribution of antimalarials currently planned for private sector facilities, parasite-based diagnosis in this sector will be essential to adhere to the WHO guidelines for effective case management of malaria. Considerable regulation and quality control are also necessary to assure the availability of accurate and reliable RDTs, as well as adequate case management and provider adherence to RDT results. Public sector engagement is likely to be essential in this process.Paracheck-Pf: a new, inexpensive and reliable rapid test for P. falciparum malaria.We compared the performance of Paracheck-Pf, a new and cheap rapid malaria test, with ICT-Pf/PvR and microscopy in two malaria surveys in Thai villages on the Thai-Burmese border. The specificity, sensitivity, predictive positive and negative values of the Paracheck-PfR and ICT-PfR tests were calculated taking microscopy results as the gold standard. The 294 ICT-Pf/Pv tests resulted in two invalid (no control line) and 11 doubtful results. Both the ICT-Pf/PvR and Paracheck-PfR tests reliably detected P. falciparum infections. However, Paracheck-PfR failed to detect three P. falciparum cases and likewise, ICT-Pf/PvR failed to detect the same three cases and an additional four cases. These seven cases were detected by microscopy and had a parasitaemia under 150 parasites/microl. At a cost of c. US $1.00, the Paracheck-PfR test, based on the detection of the P. falciparum specific HRP-2 protein, is a reliable, easy to use and affordable tool for the diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria.Sensitivity and specificity of dipstick tests for rapid diagnosis of malaria in nonimmune travelers.Swift diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in areas where the disease is not endemic is frequently complicated by the lack of experience on the side of involved laboratory personal. Diagnostic tools based on the dipstick principle for the detection of plasmodial histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP-2) and parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH), respectively, have become available for the qualitative detection of P. falciparum malaria. In order to evaluate two of the currently available assays, specimens from 231 patients were screened during a prospective multicenter study. Among the screened specimens, samples from 53 patients (22.9%) were positive for P. falciparum malaria by microscopy and/or PCR. While the test kit based on the detection of HRP-2 performed with a sensitivity of 92.5% and a specificity of 98.3%, the kit for the detection of pLDH showed a sensitivity of 88.5% and a specificity of 99.4%. Dipstick tests have the potential of enhancing speed and accuracy of the diagnosis of P. falciparum malaria, especially if nonspecialized laboratories are involved.Diagnosis of malaria in a remote area of the Philippines: comparison of techniques and their acceptance by health workers and the community.To compare the efficacies of remote symptom-based diagnosis of malaria, rapid diagnostic tests and microscopy in an area of low endemicity in the Philippines.In Trial I, 350 symptomatic patients were tested within their villages using malaria Plasmodium falciparum (Pf)/Plasmodium vivax (Pv) immunochromatographic tests (ICT tests) and blood films stored and read under local conditions. The slides were later restained and read. In Trial II, unsupervised volunteer barangay health workers prepared ICT tests and slides after brief training. These slides were read at rural health units. Twenty-seven barangay health workers and 72 community members were later questioned about the three diagnostic strategies.A history of fever alone was sensitive (95.4%) but poorly specific (16.5%) for predicting parasitaemia. The inclusion of other symptoms reduced the sensitivity to below 85%, while specificity remained low. The axillary temperature was poorly predictive. ICT tests achieved high sensitivity (97.9%) but many cases indicated as positive by ICT tests were negative by microscopy. Further analysis of these cases in Trial I indicated that ICT tests were detecting low-level parasitaemias missed by microscopy, and that local microscopy had poor accuracy. ICT tests were well accepted and accurately performed by barangay health workers.These tests meet a strong desire in the community for blood-based diagnosis and may increase the compliance and treatment-seeking behaviour of patients.A comparison of two rapid field immunochromatographic tests to expert microscopy in the diagnosis of malaria.In Myanmar, we tested two rapid malaria immunochromatographic kits: the OptiMAL assay for the detection of parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH), and the ICT Malaria P.f./P.v. test for histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP2) and panmalarial antigens. A total of 229 patients were examined, of whom 133 were found to be malaria positive by Giemsa microscopy. Both OptiMAL and ICT gave lower sensitivities than previously reported. ICT sensitivity for Plasmodium falciparum and non-falciparum parasites were 86.2 and 2.9%, respectively; specificity was 76.9 and 100%, respectively. OptiMAL sensitivity for P. falciparum and non-falciparum parasites were 42.6 and 47.1%, respectively; specificity was 97.0 and 96.9%, respectively. The sensitivity of both tests for the detection of both P. falciparum and non-falciparum parasites increased with parasite density. Several explanations for these results are explored. Our results raise particular concern over batch quality variations of malaria rapid diagnostic devices (MRDDs).Evaluation of a rapid antigen capture assay for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria.A study was carried out to evaluate the accuracy of a dipstick antigen capture assay for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein II antigen (Pf HRP-II) in peripheral blood to diagnose P. falciparum malaria. The sensitivity and specificity of the test was found to be 97 and 100 per cent respectively. The persistence of the antigen varied from 5 to 15 days after initiation of antimalarial therapy. The assay was simple to perform, rapid and easy to interpret. However, infection due to other species of human malaria parasites cannot be detected by this dipstick assay. Use of more sensitive technique like polymerase chain reaction (PCR) would help in diagnosing cases with low parasitaemia and infection due to other plasmodial species.An assessment of early diagnosis and treatment of malaria by village health volunteers in the Lao PDR.Early diagnosis and treatment (EDAT) is crucial to reducing the burden of malaria in low-income countries. In the Lao PDR, this strategy was introduced in 2004-2005 and an assessment was performed at the community level in January 2007.EDAT with malaria rapid diagnostic test (MRDT) and artemisinin combination therapy (ACT) was prospectively assessed among 36 randomized village health volunteers (VHVs) and 720 patients in six malaria-endemic provinces of Laos (three pilot provinces (PP), and three non-pilots provinces (NPP)). ACT was also retrospectively assessed among 2188 patients within the same areas from June to November 2006. Two checklists were used and scores were calculated.EDAT performance of the VHVs was rated better in PP than in NPP (16.67% versus 38.89%, respectively, p = 0.004). Nearly all VHVs could diagnose malaria but only 16 (44%) could describe the symptoms of severe malaria. In January 2007, 31/720 (4%) patients tested positive using the Paracheck test, 35 (5%) with microscopy (sensibility: 74.3%, specificity 99.3%, positive and negative predictive values: 83.9% and 98.7%, respectively). Patients from June to November were at higher risk of malaria: 35.19% of 2,188 febrile patients were positive (OR: 10.6, 95%CI: 7.4-15.5, p < 0.000). VHVs reported the MRDT easy to use, and yielded a satisfactory performance score. EDAT performance was rated as poor despite satisfactory results regarding ACT treatment, duration and dosages. Pre-referral treatment of severe malaria was infrequent and often inadequate, with 20% of these patients dying. Results suggest a higher mortality from severe malaria than officially reported. Shortage of ACT was frequent.MRDT and ACT are useful and efficient and can be used by VHVs. VHVs' global EDAT performance is enhanced through training and monitoring. Persistent gaps in knowledge, care of patients and wrong treatment have to be addressed.Evaluation of the SD FK70 malaria Ag Plasmodium vivax rapid diagnostic test in a non-endemic setting.For clinical and epidemiological reasons, it is interesting to diagnose non-falciparum malaria to the species level. This retrospective study assessed the performance of the SD BIOLINE Malaria Antigen Pv test (FK70), a two-band immunochromatographic test detecting Plasmodium vivax-specific lactate dehydrogenase, on samples of international travellers in a non-endemic setting.Stored blood samples from international travellers suspected of malaria were used, with microscopy corrected by PCR as the reference method. Samples infected by Plasmodium vivax (n = 100), Plasmodium falciparum (n = 75), Plasmodium ovale (n = 75) and Plasmodium malariae (n = 25) were included, as well as 100 malaria-negative samples. End points were sensitivity, specificity, inter-reader reliability and reproducibility.The overall sensitivity of the FK70 for the diagnosis of P. vivax was 88.0% (95% confidence interval (CI): 83.6% - 90.3%). For parasite densities > 500/microl, a sensitivity of 97.2% (CI: 92.6% - 99.1%) was obtained. Specificity was 98.5%, with 4 out of 75 P. falciparum samples testing positive. None of the P. ovale samples tested positive. Nearly two-thirds (57/88, 64.7%) of positive P. vivax samples showed faint or weak line intensities, with stronger line intensities at higher parasite densities. The test showed excellent reproducibility and reliability for test results and line intensities (kappa values exceeding 0.98 and 0.87 respectively).The FK70 test performed well in diagnosing P. vivax infections in a non-endemic reference setting. It can be of added value to microscopy in species differentiation of malaria infections, especially at parasite densities > 500/microl.Assessment of three new parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pan-pLDH) tests for diagnosis of uncomplicated malaria.A study to assess the diagnostic capabilities of three parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pan-pLDH) tests, Vistapan), Carestart and Parabank), was conducted in Uganda. An HRP2 test, Paracheck-Pf), and a Giemsa-stained blood film were performed with the pLDH tests for outpatients with suspected malaria. In total, 460 subjects were recruited: 248 with positive blood films and 212 with negative blood films. Plasmodium falciparum was present in 95% of infections. Sensitivity above 90% was shown by two pLDH tests, Carestart (95.6%) and Vistapan (91.9%), and specificity above 90% by Parabank (94.3%) and Carestart (91.5%). Sensitivity decreased with low parasitaemia (chi(2) trend, P<0.001); however, all tests achieved sensitivity >90% with parasitaemia > or =100/microl. All tests had good inter-reader reliability (kappa>0.95). Two weeks after diagnosis, 4-10% of pLDH tests were still positive compared with 69.7% of the HRP2 tests. All tests had similar ease of use. In conclusion, two pLDH tests performed well in diagnosing P. falciparum malaria, and all pLDH tests became negative after treatment more quickly than the HRP2. Therefore the rapid test of choice for use with artemisinin-combination therapies in this area would be one of these new pLDH tests.The sensitivity of the OptiMAL rapid diagnostic test to the presence of Plasmodium falciparum gametocytes compromises its ability to monitor treatment outcomes in an area of Papua New Guinea in which malaria is endemic.Using in vivo samples from treatment failure malaria cases, we demonstrate the high sensitivity of the parasite lactase dehydrogenase (pLDH)-based OptiMAL rapid diagnostic test in the detection of P. falciparum gametocytes. This high sensitivity limits the use of pLDH-based tests in the monitoring of treatment outcomes in circumstances where gametocytemia is common.Malaria diagnostics: a comparative study of blood microscopy, a rapid diagnostic test and polymerase chain reaction in the diagnosis of malaria.Field evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test (Parascreen) for malaria diagnosis in the Peruvian Amazon.The rapid diagnostic tests for malaria (RDT) constitute a fast and opportune alternative for non-complicated malaria diagnosis in areas where microscopy is not available. The objective of this study was to validate a RDT named Parascreen under field conditions in Iquitos, department of Loreto, Peru. Parascreen is a RDT that detects the histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) antigen from Plasmodium falciparum and lactate deshydrogenase from all Plasmodium species.Parascreen was compared with microscopy performed by experts (EM) and polymerase chain reaction (PCR) using the following indicators: sensitivity (Se), specificity (Sp), positive (PV+) and negative predictive values (PV-), positive (LR+) and negative likehood ratio (LR-).332 patients with suspected non-complicated malaria who attended to the MOH health centres were enrolled between October and December 2006. For P. falciparum malaria, Parascreen in comparison with EM, had Se: 53.5%, Sp: 98.7%, PV+: 66.7%, PV-: 97.8%, LR+: 42.27 and LR-: 0.47; and for non-P. falciparum malaria, Se: 77.1%, Sp: 97.6%, PV+: 91.4%, PV-: 92.7%, LR+: 32.0 and LR-: 0.22. The comparison of Parascreen with PCR showed, for P. falciparum malaria, Se: 81.8%, Sp: 99.1%, PV+: 75%, PV-: 99.4, LR+: 87.27 and LR-: 0.18; and for non-P. falciparum malaria Se: 76.1%, Sp: 99.2%, PV+: 97.1%, PV-: 92.0%, LR+: 92.51 and LR-: 0.24.The study results indicate that Parascreen is not a valid and acceptable test for malaria diagnosis under the field conditions found in the Peruvian Amazon. The relative proportion of Plasmodium species, in addition to the genetic characteristics of the parasites in the area, must be considered before applying any RDT, especially after the finding of P. falciparum malaria parasites lacking pfhrp2 gene in this region.A rapid malaria appraisal in the Venezuelan Amazon.While the federal state of Amazonas bears the highest risk for malaria in Venezuela (2007: 68.4 cases/1000 inhabitants), little comprehensive information about the malaria situation is available from this area. The purpose of this rapid malaria appraisal (RMA) was to provide baseline data about malaria and malaria control in Amazonas.The RMA methodology corresponds to a rapid health impact assessment (HIA) as described in the 1999 Gothenburg consensus. In conjunction with the actors of the malaria surveillance system, all useful data and information, which were accessible within a limited time-frame of five visits to Amazonas, were collected, analysed and interpreted.Mortality from malaria is low (< 1 in 105) and slide positivity rates have stayed at the same level for the last two decades (15% +/- 6% (SD)). Active case detection accounts for ca. 40% of slides taken. The coverage of the censured population with malaria notification points (NPs) has been achieved in recent years. The main parasite is Plasmodium vivax (84% of cases). The proportion of Plasmodium falciparum is on the decline, possibly driven by the introduction of cost-free artemisinin-based combination therapy (ACT) (1988: 33.4%; 2007: 15.4%). Monitoring and documentation is complete, systematic and consistent, but poorly digitalized. Malaria transmission displayed a visible lag behind rainfall in the capital municipality of Atures, but not in the other municipalities. In comparison to reference microscopy, quality of field microscopy and rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) is suboptimal (kappa < 0.75). Hot spots of malaria risk were seen in some indigenous ethnic groups. Conflicting strategies in respect of training of community health workers (CHW) and the introduction of new diagnostic tools (RDTs) were observed.Malaria control is possible, even in tropical rain forest areas, if the health system is working adequately. Interventions have to be carefully designed and the features of the particular local Latin American context considered.Evaluation of three parasite lactate dehydrogenase-based rapid diagnostic tests for the diagnosis of falciparum and vivax malaria.In areas where non-falciparum malaria is common rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) capable of distinguishing malaria species reliably are needed. Such tests are often based on the detection of parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH).In Dawei, southern Myanmar, three pLDH based RDTs (CareStart Malaria pLDH (Pan), CareStart Malaria pLDH (Pan, Pf) and OptiMAL-IT)were evaluated in patients presenting with clinically suspected malaria. Each RDT was read independently by two readers. A subset of patients with microscopically confirmed malaria had their RDTs repeated on days 2, 7 and then weekly until negative. At the end of the study, samples of study batches were sent for heat stability testing.Between August and November 2007, 1004 patients aged between 1 and 93 years were enrolled in the study. Slide microscopy (the reference standard) diagnosed 213 Plasmodium vivax (Pv) monoinfections, 98 Plasmodium falciparum (Pf) mono-infections and no malaria in 650 cases. The sensitivities (sens) and specificities (spec), of the RDTs for the detection of malaria were- CareStart Malaria pLDH (Pan) test: sens 89.1% [CI95 84.2-92.6], spec 97.6% [CI95 96.5-98.4]. OptiMal-IT: Pf+/- other species detection: sens 95.2% [CI95 87.5-98.2], spec 94.7% [CI95 93.3-95.8]; non-Pf detection alone: sens 89.6% [CI95 83.6-93.6], spec 96.5% [CI95 94.8-97.7]. CareStart Malaria pLDH (Pan, Pf): Pf+/- other species: sens 93.5% [CI95 85.4-97.3], spec 97.4% [95.9-98.3]; non-Pf: sens 78.5% [CI95 71.1-84.4], spec 97.8% [CI95 96.3-98.7]. Inter-observer agreement was excellent for all tests (kappa > 0.9). The median time for the RDTs to become negative was two days for the CareStart Malaria tests and seven days for OptiMAL-IT. Tests were heat stable up to 90 days except for OptiMAL-IT (Pf specific pLDH stable to day 20 at 35 degrees C).None of the pLDH-based RDTs evaluated was able to detect non-falciparum malaria with high sensitivity, particularly at low parasitaemias. OptiMAL-IT performed best overall and would perform best in an area of high malaria prevalence among screened fever cases. However, heat stability was unacceptable and the number of steps to perform this test is a significant drawback in the field. A reliable, heat-stable, highly sensitive RDT, capable of diagnosing all Plasmodium species has yet to be identified.A review of malaria diagnostic tools: microscopy and rapid diagnostic test (RDT).The absolute necessity for rational therapy in the face of rampant drug resistance places increasing importance on the accuracy of malaria diagnosis. Giemsa microscopy and rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) represent the two diagnostics most likely to have the largest impact on malaria control today. These two methods, each with characteristic strengths and limitations, together represent the best hope for accurate diagnosis as a key component of successful malaria control. This review addresses the quality issues with current malaria diagnostics and presents data from recent rapid diagnostic test trials. Reduction of malaria morbidity and drug resistance intensity plus the associated economic loss of these two factors require urgent scaling up of the quality of parasite-based diagnostic methods. An investment in anti-malarial drug development or malaria vaccine development should be accompanied by a parallel commitment to improve diagnostic tools and their availability to people living in malarious areas.Comparison of the OptiMAL rapid antigen test with field microscopy for the detection of Plasmodium vivax and P. falciparum: considerations for the application of the rapid test in Afghanistan.To establish the sensitivity and specificity of a batch of 'OptiMAL 48' rapid antigen tests procured by the World Health Organization in Afghanistan, a sample was tested, in parallel with routine, microscopical diagnosis, at basic health units (BHU) within Afghan refugee camps in Pakistan. The results of both methods of field diagnosis were compared with those of cross-checking microscopy at a reference laboratory, which were taken as the 'gold standard'. Out of 499 patients examined, 36% were diagnosed as malaria cases by field microscopy and 34% by the rapid test. For the OptiMAL 48 test, cross-checking of the corresponding smears at the reference laboratory gave a sensitivity of 79.3% and a specificity of 99.7% for Plasmodium falciparum and corresponding values of 86.1% and 98.7% for P. vivax infections. The performance of the field microscopy was better, with a sensitivity and specificity of 85.2% and 99.7% for P. falciparum, and 90.4% and 98.7% for P. vivax, respectively. These results show that the performance of OptiMAL 48 is adequate for acute- and post-emergency situations when the alternative is just clinical diagnosis. However, in the developing health system of Afghanistan, the main focus should be on the expansion of the existing network for microscopical diagnosis and quality control, to meet the needs of a stable situation. Rapid antigen tests are more suited to investigations of outbreaks in remote situations, where health services are deficient or absent.Management of uncomplicated malaria in febrile under five-year-old children by community health workers in Madagascar: reliability of malaria rapid diagnostic tests.Early diagnosis, as well as prompt and effective treatment of uncomplicated malaria, are essential components of the anti-malaria strategy in Madagascar to prevent severe malaria, reduce mortality and limit malaria transmission. The purpose of this study was to assess the performance of the malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) used by community health workers (CHWs) by comparing RDT results with two reference methods (microscopy and Polymerase Chain Reaction, PCR).Eight CHWs in two districts, each with a different level of endemic malaria transmission, were trained to use RDTs in the management of febrile children under five years of age. RDTs were performed by CHWs in all febrile children who consulted for fever. In parallel, retrospective parasitological diagnoses were made by microscopy and PCR. The results of these different diagnostic methods were analysed to evaluate the diagnostic performance of the RDTs administered by the CHWs. The stability of the RDTs stored by CHWs was also evaluated.Among 190 febrile children with suspected malaria who visited CHWs between February 2009 and February 2010, 89.5% were found to be positive for malaria parasites by PCR, 51.6% were positive by microscopy and 55.8% were positive by RDT. The performance accuracy of the RDTs used by CHWs in terms of sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values was greater than 85%. Concordance between microscopy and RDT, estimated by the Kappa value was 0.83 (95% CI: 0.75-0.91). RDTs stored by CHWs for 24 months were capable of detecting Plasmodium falciparum in blood at a level of 200 parasites/μl.Introduction of easy-to-use diagnostic tools, such as RDTs, at the community level appears to be an effective strategy for improving febrile patient management and for reducing excessive use of anti-malarial drugs.Performance of two malaria rapid diagnostic tests in febrile adult patients with and without human immunodeficiency virus-1 infection in Blantyre, Malawi.The performance of two histidine-rich protein type-2-based malaria rapid diagnostic tests (mRDTs) was examined in a rural area with a high prevalence of malaria and human immunodeficiency virus type-1 (HIV-1) infection in 113 and 445 febrile patients ≥ 15 years of age with and without HIV-1 infection, respectively. Patients were tested for HIV-1 infection by using a standard assay and for Plasmodium falciparum by using two mRDTs and microscopy. When microscopy was used as the gold standard, both mRDTs performed similarly in patients with and without HIV-1 infection: Bioline SD Malaria Antigen P.f, sensitivity 94.4% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 81.3-99.3%) versus 97.1% (95% CI:92.8-99.2%) and specificity 50.6% (95% CI: 39.0-62.2%) versus 47.2% (95% CI: 41.4-53.1%); and ICT diagnostics Malaria Pf, sensitivity 94.4% (95% CI: 81.3-99.3%) versus 97.1% (95% CI: 92.8-99.2%) and specificity 50.6% (95% CI:39.0-62.2%) versus 50.3% (95% CI: 44.4-56.1%). Infection with HIV-1 does not appear to affect the performance of these histidine-rich protein type-2 (HRP-2)-based mRDTs.False-negative rapid diagnostic tests for malaria and deletion of the histidine-rich repeat region of the hrp2 gene.We identified 480 persons with positive thick smears for asexual Plasmodium falciparum parasites, of whom 454 had positive rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for the histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) product of the hrp2 gene and 26 had negative tests. Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) amplification for the histidine-rich repeat region of that gene was negative in one-half (10/22) of false-negative specimens available, consistent with spontaneous deletion. False-negative RDTs were found only in persons with asymptomatic infections, and multiplicities of infection (MOIs) were lower in persons with false-negative RDTs (both P < 0.001). These results show that parasites that fail to produce HRP2 can cause patent bloodstream infections and false-negative RDT results. The importance of these observations is likely to increase as malaria control improves, because lower MOIs are associated with false-negative RDTs and false-negative RDTs are more frequent in persons with asymptomatic infections. These findings suggest that the use of HRP2-based RDTs should be reconsidered.Comparison of three antigen detection methods for diagnosis and therapeutic monitoring of malaria: a field study from southern Vietnam.To compare the sensitivity, specificity and post-treatment persistence of three commonly used rapid antigen detection methods.We studied 252 Vietnamese patients aged from 4 to 60 years, 157 with falciparum and 95 with vivax malaria and 160 healthy volunteers. An initial blood sample was taken for microscopy, and OptiMAL, immunochromatographic test (ICT) malaria P.f./P.v. and Paracheck-Pf tests. Patients with falciparum malaria were treated with an artesunate-based combination regimen and those with vivax malaria received chloroquine. Eighty-seven patients with falciparum malaria who were initially positive for one of the antigen tests and who remained blood smear-negative underwent follow-up testing over 28 days.Paracheck-Pf was the most sensitive test for Plasmodium falciparum (95.8% vs. 82.6% for ICT malaria P.f./P.v. and 49.7% for OptiMAL). Specificities were all 100%. For vivax malaria, OptiMAL performed better than ICT malaria P.f./P.v. (sensitivities 73.7% and 20.0%, respectively), with 100% specificity in both cases. All tests had low sensitivities (< or = 75.0%) at parasitaemias < 1000/microl regardless of malaria species. During follow-up, Paracheck-Pf remained positive in the greatest proportion of patients, especially at higher parasitaemias (> 10,000/microl). Residual OptiMAL positivity occurred only in a relatively small proportion of patients (< 10%) with parasitaemias > 10,000/microl during the first 2 weeks after treatment.Although microscopy remains the gold standard for malaria diagnosis, Paracheck-Pf may prove a useful adjunctive test in uncomplicated falciparum malaria in southern Vietnam. OptiMAL had the lowest sensitivity for P. falciparum but it might have a use in the diagnosis of vivax malaria and perhaps to monitor efficacy of treatment for falciparum malaria where microscopy is unavailable.Comparison of the ParaSight-F test and the ICT Malaria Pf test with the polymerase chain reaction for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in travellers.Rapid and accurate methods are needed for the diagnosis of imported malaria. The ParaSight-F test and the ICT Malaria Pf test are commercially available kits marketed for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria. Both tests are antigen-capture assays based on the detection of P. falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 in peripheral blood. Using microscopy and a polymerase chain reaction (PCR)-based method as reference standards, we performed a 'blinded' comparison of these assays for the detection of P. falciparum infection in 200 febrile travellers returning from malaria-endemic areas. As determined by PCR and microscopy, 148 travellers had malaria and, of these patients, 54.7% (81/148) were infected with P. vivax only, 31.1% (46/148) with P. falciparum only, 9.5% (14/148) with P. ovale, 0.7% (1/148) with P. malariae, and 4.1% (6/148) had mixed infections. Compared to PCR, the ParaSight-F and ICT Malaria Pf tests had initial sensitivities of 94% and 90% and specificities of 95% and 97%, respectively, for the detection of P. falciparum malaria. When discrepant samples were retested with day 0 and day 1 bloods, the sensitivities improved to 96% and 94%, respectively. The 2 remaining false negative results with the Para-Sight-F test and 2 of the 3 false negative results with the ICT Malaria Pf test occurred in samples with < 100 parasites/microL. The performance of these kits was not significantly different (P = 0.75) and both are simple, rapid, and accurate tests for the detection of P. falciparum infection in the returned traveller.Diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria using ParaSight F, ICT malaria PF and malaria IgG CELISA assays.A battery of sixty-six blood samples from Senegal was analysed by the ParaSight F test, the ICT Malaria PF and the Malaria IgG CELISA. These three assays detect the histidine rich protein 2 antigen of Plasmodium falciparum. Thick smear microscopy was used as the reference method. Sensitivity, specificity, predictive positive and negative values were respectively 89%, 100%, 100%, 88% for the ICT; 86%, 93%, 94%, 85% for the paraSight and 88%, 87%, 88%, 87% for the Malaria IgG CELISA. The three assays failed to detect two positive samples with P. ovale and P. malariae. Assays were also compared with regard to the expense of equipment and reagents and speed and ease of use. The rapid ICT and ParaSight F test can be performed with minimal training and may be specially useful in areas where P. falciparum is the predominant malaria species, in epidemic malaria regions, and where skilled microscopy is not readily available.End-user errors in applying two malaria rapid diagnostic tests in a remote area of Sudan.We assessed end-user practice for numerous procedural steps of two types of RDTs: Core Malaria Pf (the cassette format) and OptiMAL IT (the dipstick format). Two types of errors occurred: generic errors common to both types of test and specific errors caused by the test design and manufacturer's instructions. End-user errors were more frequent with OptiMAL IT than Core Pf tests. To improve malaria diagnosis with rapid tests, users require training and better manufacturer's instructions that take into account local conditions.Paracheck Pf compared with microscopy for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria among children in Tanga City, north-eastern Tanzania.Malaria is a major public health problem particularly in rural Sub-Saharan Africa. In most urban areas, malaria transmission intensity is low thus monitoring trends using reliable tools is crucial to provide vital information for future management of the disease. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) such as Paracheck Pf are now increasingly adopted for Plasmodium falciparum malaria diagnosis and are advantageous and cost effective alternative to microscopy. This cross sectional survey was carried out during June 2005 to determine the prevalence of malaria in an urban setting and compare microscopy diagnosis versus Paracheck Pf for detecting Plasmodium falciparum. Blood samples from a total of 301 children (< 10 years) attending outpatient clinic at Makorora Health Centre, in Tanga, Tanzania were examined for the presence of malaria. Twenty-nine (9.6%) of the children were positive to malaria by microscopy while 30 (10.0%) were positive by Paracheck test. Three out of 30 positive cases detected by Paracheck were negative by microscopy; thus considered to be false positive results. For the 271 Paracheck Pf negative cases, 2 were positive by microscopy; yielding 2 false negative results. Paracheck Pf sensitivity and specificity were 93.1% and 98.9%, respectively. P. falciparum was the only malarial species observed among the 29 microscopy positive cases. The prevalence of anaemia among the children was 53.16%. These findings indicate a low prevalence of malaria in Tanga City and that Paracheck Pf can be an effective tool for malaria diagnosis.Diagnosis of imported malaria by Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) and histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP-2)-based immunocapture assays.This study was conducted to evaluate the performance of two rapid non-microscopic assays: Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) assay (OptiMAL) and Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP-2) assay (ICT Malaria). The assays were used to detect malaria infection in 515 immigrants living in Kuwait. The performance of both assays was compared to that of microscopy of Giemsa-stained thick blood films and to each other. Of the 515 patients tested, 163 were positive for malaria parasites by microscopy of thick blood film. Of these, 87 were infected with Plasmodium vivax parasites, 63 with P. falciparum, 1 with Plasmodium malariae, and 12 had mixed infections of P. falciparum and P. vivax. The PfHRP-2 assay detected 53 P. falciparum infections and, as expected, failed to detect all but one case of P. vivax. Three cases of mixed infections were also not detected by this assay. The pLDH assay detected 56 P. falciparum cases and 77 P. vivax infections but failed to detect 4 cases of mixed infections. Compared to microscopy, the performance of both the assays to diagnose P. falciparum infection was comparable. The sensitivity for the PfHRP-2 assay was 82% with a specificity of 99.0% and for the pLDH assay the sensitivity was 89% with a specificity of 99.5%. The PfHRP-2 assay detected 4 false positive cases, 2 of which were also detected by the pLDH assay. These patients reported treatment with chloroquine in the last 2-5 weeks. Though the immunocapture diagnostic assays may be helpful in certain situations, microscopy of thick blood film is still the method of choice in diagnosing imported malaria.Rapid diagnosis of Falciparum malaria by using the ParaSight F test in travellers returning to the United Kingdom: prospective study.Assessing the economic impact of a rapid on-site malaria diagnostic test.A set of three models has been developed for assessing the economic impact of existing and new malaria diagnostic technology, specifically microscopy of blood slides and rapid on-site diagnostic tests (RDT). The models allow for phased introduction of the new technology in targeted areas. The derived computer software program facilitates evaluation of costs to the supplier, to the consumer and aggregate costs, with comparison among the three models to give relative costs of progressive transition from blood slides to RDT technology. The models and the related software program can assist planners in the health sector in determining costs of current programs and assessing the potential economic impact of introducing rapid on-site diagnosis. Details of the models and the operational software program are available on request.Which malaria rapid test for Madagascar? Field and laboratory evaluation of three tests and expert microscopy of samples from suspected malaria patients in Madagascar.Field and laboratory studies were carried out in October and November 2005 to provide a comparative evaluation of the performance of three rapid malaria detection tests, two of which were recently introduced (the CareStart Malaria test and the SD Malaria Antigen Bioline test) and the well-known OptiMAL-IT test. Compared with microscopy, the sensitivity of the three tests to detect Plasmodium falciparum malaria was 97% for the CareStart Malaria test, 89.4% for the SD Malaria Antigen Bioline test, and 92.6% for the OptiMAL-IT test. The three tests were less sensitive in detecting non-P. falciparum infections, and the sensitivity decreased at levels of parasitemia<or=500 parasites/microL for P. falciparum and<or=5,000 parasites/microL for other Plasmodium spp. On the basis of World Health Organization recommendations, only the CareStart Malaria test and the OptiMAL-IT test had sensitivities greater than 95% for samples with parasitemias>or=100 parasites/microL.Comparative study of sensitivity of rapid diagnostic (hexagon) test with calculated malarial parasitic density in peripheral blood.Different diagnostic test kits are used for rapid diagnosis of malaria. Most are based on antigen detection (pLDH, Pan Aldolase, HRP-2). In context of Nepal the diagnostic reliability and sensitivity of these tests is unknown. Hexagon Malaria Combi™ is one of the most commonly used test kit in Nepal for rapid diagnosis of malaria. The aim of the present study is to evaluate the sensitivity of the Hexagon malaria Combi test in comparison with parasitic density by microscopy technique.A Cross sectional prospective study was conducted in three districts of Nepal from September to November 2009. Blood samples were collected from the suspected cases of malaria. Thick and thin smear were prepared from all the samples and Giemsa stain was done. Simultaneously RDT (hexagon) for malaria was done. When RDT was found to be positive, blood was serially diluted in 6 tubes as 1:2, 1:4, 1:8, 1:16, 1:32 and 1:64. RDT was done on diluted blood till RDT test gave negative result. Parasitic density was calculated for undiluted and diluted blood samples and sensitivity of RDT in various parasitic densities was calculated.Hexagon malaria combi test is sensitive (86%) when malarial parasitic density is >500/μl. Sensitivity was found to be directly related to parasitic density. Its sensitivity is very low (2.9%) when parasitic density is less than 500/ μl.The sensitivity of rapid diagnostic test (hexagon Combi test detecting malarial pLDH antigen) is high only if the parasitic density is more than 500/μl.Multicenter study to evaluate the OptiMAL test for rapid diagnosis of malaria in U.S. hospitals.More than 1,000 cases of malaria are diagnosed each year in the United States. Reported numbers, however, may be artificially low because many clinicians fail to consider the diagnosis on presentation, U.S. hospital laboratory technologists have very limited experience in detecting and identifying malaria parasites, and reporting of malaria to state health departments is sporadic in many states. In this study, a rapid malaria diagnostic test, the OptiMAL test (DiaMed; under license from Flow Inc., Portland, Oreg.) was evaluated in six U.S. hospitals and compared with results of microscopy. The OptiMAL test is a 15-min rapid immunochromatographic test that both identifies and differentiates Plasmodium falciparum from non-P. falciparum malaria parasites on the basis of the detection of parasite lactate dehydrogenase in a drop of patient blood. A total of 216 specimens from patients suspected of having malaria were tested. Results indicated that 43 samples (20%) were positive for malaria parasites by microscopy (32 P. falciparum, 11 non-P. falciparum) while 42 (19%) were positive by OptiMAL (31 P. falciparum, 11 non-P. falciparum). The sensitivity of the OptiMAL test was 98%; its specificity was 100%, with positive and negative predictive values of 100 and 99%, respectively. Participating hospital physicians and laboratory directors independently reported that the OptiMAL rapid malaria test was accurate, easy to use, and well accepted by those working in their diagnostic laboratories. The overall conclusion was that integration of the OptiMAL rapid malaria test into the U.S. health care infrastructure would provide an important and easy-to-use tool for the timely diagnosis of malaria.Evaluation of the sensitivity of a pLDH-based and an aldolase-based rapid diagnostic test for diagnosis of uncomplicated and severe malaria caused by PCR-confirmed Plasmodium knowlesi, Plasmodium falciparum, and Plasmodium vivax.Plasmodium knowlesi can cause severe and fatal human malaria in Southeast Asia. Rapid diagnosis of all Plasmodium species is essential for initiation of effective treatment. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) are sensitive for detection of uncomplicated and severe falciparum malaria but have not been systematically evaluated in knowlesi malaria. At a tertiary referral hospital in Sabah, Malaysia, we prospectively evaluated the sensitivity of two combination RDTs for the diagnosis of uncomplicated and severe malaria from all three potentially fatal Plasmodium species, using a pan-Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH)-P. falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP2) RDT (First Response) and a pan-Plasmodium aldolase-PfHRP2 RDT (ParaHIT). Among 293 hospitalized adults with PCR-confirmed Plasmodium monoinfection, the sensitivity of the pLDH component of the pLDH-PfHRP2 RDT was 74% (95/129; 95% confidence interval [CI], 65 to 80%), 91% (110/121; 95% CI, 84 to 95%), and 95% (41/43; 95% CI, 85 to 99%) for PCR-confirmed P. knowlesi, P. falciparum, and P. vivax infections, respectively, and 88% (30/34; 95% CI, 73 to 95%), 90% (38/42; 95% CI, 78 to 96%), and 100% (12/12; 95% CI, 76 to 100%) among patients tested before antimalarial treatment was begun. Sensitivity in severe malaria was 95% (36/38; 95% CI, 83 to 99), 100% (13/13; 95% CI, 77 to 100), and 100% (7/7; 95% CI, 65 to 100%), respectively. The aldolase component of the aldolase-PfHRP2 RDT performed poorly in all Plasmodium species. The pLDH-based RDT was highly sensitive for the diagnosis of severe malaria from all species; however, neither the pLDH- nor aldolase-based RDT demonstrated sufficiently high overall sensitivity for P. knowlesi. More sensitive RDTs are needed in regions of P. knowlesi endemicity.Comparative evaluation of bivalent malaria rapid diagnostic tests versus traditional methods in field with special reference to heat stability testing in Central India.Malaria presents a diagnostic challenge in areas where both Plasmodium falciparum and P.vivax are co-endemic. Bivalent Rapid Diagnostic tests (RDTs) showed promise as diagnostic tools for P.falciparum and P.vivax. To assist national malaria control programme in the selection of RDTs, commercially available seven malaria RDTs were evaluated in terms of their performance with special reference to heat stability.This study was undertaken in four forested districts of central India (July, 2011- March, 2012). All RDTs were tested simultaneously in field along with microscopy as gold standard. These RDTs were stored in their original packing at 25°C before transport to the field or they were stored at 35°C and 45°C upto 100 days for testing the performance of RDTs at high temperature. In all 2841 patients with fever were screened for malaria of which 26% were positive for P.falciparum, and 17% for P.vivax. The highest sensitivity of any RDT for P.falciparum was 98% (95% CI; 95.9-98.8) and lowest sensitivity was 76% (95% CI; 71.7-79.6). For P.vivax highest and lowest sensitivity for any RDT was 80% (95% CI; 94.9 - 83.9) and 20% (95% CI; 15.6-24.5) respectively. Heat stability experiments showed that most RDTs for P.falciparum showed high sensitivity at 45°C upto 90 days. While for P.vivax only two RDTs maintained good sensitivity upto day 90 when compared with RDTs kept at room temperature. Agreement between observers was excellent for positive and negative readings for both P.falciparum and P.vivax (Kappa >0.6-0.9).This is first field evaluation of RDTs regarding their temperature stability. Although RDTs are useful as diagnostic tool for P.falciparum and P.vivax even at high temperature, the quality of RDTs should be regulated and monitored more closely.Application of the ParaSight-F dipstick test for malaria diagnosis in a district control program.A rapid test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infections based on the detection of histidine-rich-protein II, the ParaSight-F test, was evaluated after introduction in a district malaria control program in Uganda. Suspected treatment failures, pregnant women and infants with clinical malaria and general fever cases were tested at health facilities in malaria hypo-, meso- and holoendemic areas. A total of 1326 tests were carried out by health unit staff, cross read by experienced laboratory staff and results compared with thick film microscopy as the standard. Rater agreement in reading the dipstick result between health unit staff and laboratory staff was high, kappa index 0.94 (0.88-0.99). Sensitivity was 99.6% (99.0-100) for parasite densities above 500/microl, 98.6% (97.7-99.6) for densities above 50/microl and 22.2% (8.6-42.3) for densities below 10/microl. With the applied testing strategies no differences were found between endemicity levels or patient categories. Specificity was 86.2% (83.3-88.8) overall, but significantly higher in general fever cases (92.7%) compared to the other patient groups (84.3%, P=0.009). At the given prevalences positive predictive values (ppv) were above 80% and negative predictive values (npv) above 90% in all cases except in pregnant women (ppv: 77.8%). We conclude that in certain situations this test is an alternative to microscopy to improve diagnostic facilities for case management in malaria control programs in endemic African countries.Operational trial of ParaSight-F (dipstick) in the diagnosis of falciparum malaria at the primary health care level.The rapid manual ParaSight-F test of Plasmodium falciparum malaria, an antigen capture test for detecting trophozoite-derived histidine rich protein-2 (PF HRP-2), is simple to perform and provides a definite diagnosis within 10 minutes. During an operational trial at health centers and mobile malaria units where microscopical diagnosis is not available and using defined symptom screening criteria, 3,361 subjects were tested yielding 618 positives (18.4%) for PF-HRP-2 by ParaSight-F. Microscopic examination of the same subjects by thick blood film examined 7 days later at a malaria clinic showed 578 falciparum, and 349 vivax and mixed infection (F+V) 41. The technology proved highly effective in detecting falciparum malaria at the peripheral levels where access to malaria laboratory services are difficult, thus allowing immediate administration of a complete course of treatment in the absence of a microscopic examination.Evaluation of a rapid whole blood immunochromatographic assay for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax malaria.Microscopic examination of blood smears is the 'gold standard' for malaria diagnosis, but is labour intensive and requires skilled operators. Plasmodium vivax malaria accounts for up to 70% of infections in Sri Lanka. The objective of this study was to determine the effectiveness of an immunochromatographic test which can detect both the species of Plasmodium, P. vivax and P. falciparum, present in Sri Lanka.Prospective study from May 2001 to March 2002.All persons above 5 years of age who presented to the Malaria Research Station, Kataragama or the Anti-malaria Clinic, Kurunegala, with a history of fever were recruited to the study. Thick and thin blood smears were examined for malarial parasites. The rapid diagnostic test (RDT), ICT Malaria P.f/P.v (AMRAD ICT, Australia) was performed simultaneously by an independent investigator. The severity of clinical disease of all patients was evaluated.The study sample comprised 328 individuals of whom 126 (38%) were infected, 102 with P. vivax (31.1%) and 24 with P. falciparum (7.3%). The RDT was found to be highly sensitive (100%) and specific (100%) for the diagnosis of P. falciparum when compared with field microscopy. The sensitivity for the diagnosis of P. vivax malaria was only 70%. When P. vivax parasitaemia was greater than 5000 parasites/microL the RDT was 96.2% sensitive. A significant association was noted between the band intensity on the dipstick and both peripheral blood parasitaemia (p < 0.001) and clinical severity of disease with P. vivax (p = 0.011).The ICT Malaria P.f/P.v test can be used in Sri Lanka in the absence of microscopists.Influence of rapid malaria diagnostic tests on treatment and health outcome in fever patients, Zanzibar: a crossover validation study.The use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for Plasmodium falciparum malaria is being suggested to improve diagnostic efficiency in peripheral health care settings in Africa. Such improved diagnostics are critical to minimize overuse and thereby delay development of resistance to artemisinin-based combination therapies (ACTs). Our objective was to study the influence of RDT-aided malaria diagnosis on drug prescriptions, health outcomes, and costs in primary health care settings.We conducted a cross-over validation clinical trial in four primary health care units in Zanzibar. Patients of all ages with reported fever in the previous 48 hours were eligible and allocated alternate weeks to RDT-aided malaria diagnosis or symptom-based clinical diagnosis (CD) alone. Follow-up was 14 days. ACT was to be prescribed to patients diagnosed with malaria in both groups. Statistical analyses with multilevel modelling were performed. A total of 1,887 patients were enrolled February through August 2005. RDT was associated with lower prescription rates of antimalarial treatment than CD alone, 361/1005 (36%) compared with 752/882 (85%) (odds ratio [OR] 0.04, 95% confidence interval [CI] 0.03-0.05, p<0.001). Prescriptions of antibiotics were higher after RDT than CD alone, i.e., 372/1005 (37%) and 235/882 (27%) (OR 1.8, 95%CI 1.5-2.2, p<0.001), respectively. Reattendance due to perceived unsuccessful clinical cure was lower after RDT 25/1005 (2.5%), than CD alone 43/882 (4.9%) (OR 0.5, 95% CI 0.3-0.9, p = 0.005). Total average cost per patient was similar: USD 2.47 and 2.37 after RDT and CD alone, respectively.RDTs resulted in improved adequate treatment and health outcomes without increased cost per patient. RDTs may represent a tool for improved management of patients with fever in peripheral health care settings.(Clinicaltrials.gov) NCT00549003.Evaluation of a rapid dipstick test, Malar-Check, for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Brazil.The present study was carried out to evaluate the Malar-Check trade mark Pf test, an immunochromatographic assay that detects Plasmodium falciparum Histidine Rich Protein II, does not require equipment, and is easy and rapid to perform. In dilution assays performed to test sensitivity against known parasite density, Malar-Check were compared with thick blood smear (TBS), the gold standard for diagnosis. Palo Alto isolate or P. falciparum blood from patients with different parasitemias was used. The average cut-off points for each technique in three independent experiments were 12 and 71 parasites/mm3 (TBS and Malar-Check, respectively). In the field assays, samples were collected from patients with fever who visited endemic regions. Compared to TBS, Malar-Check yielded true-positive results in 38 patients, false-positive results in 3, true-negative results in 23, and false-negative result in 1. Malar-Check performed with samples from falciparum-infected patients after treatment showed persistence of antigen up to 30 days. Malar-Check should aid the diagnosis of P. falciparum in remote areas and improve routine diagnosis even when microscopy is available. Previous P. falciparum infection, which can determine a false-positive test in cured individuals, should be considered. The prompt results obtained with the Malar-Check for early diagnosis could avoid disease evolution to severe cases.Comparison of clinical, microscopic and rapid diagnostic test methods in the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in Enugu, Nigeria.To compare the use of clinical, microscopic and immunochromato-graphic methods in the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria.Children with history of fever were consecutively recruited. Information on personal characteristics, and clinical features were obtained with the parental consent before enrolment. Malaria parasite density was done with quantitative microscopy, as well as specie identification in both local and reference laboratories. Rapid diagnostic test (RDT) kits were also used for parasite detection.Eighty three children had clinical diagnosis of malaria, while the remaining 6 had other diagnoses. On microscopy 89 and 26 patients had parasitaemia by the local and reference laboratories respectively. With the RDT, 15 patients had parasitaemia with corresponding minimum densities of 1200 and 716 parasites per ul from the local and reference laboratories. The sensitivity and specificity of the RDT to the reference laboratory were 42.31% and 93.65% respectively, while concordance was 57.69% for RDT, 30.49% for clinical diagnosis (all symptoms), 43.75% for clinical diagnosis (fever alone), and 29.21% for local laboratory.There was a significant deficiency in malaria diagnosis using any of the methods alone. For reliable diagnosis of malaria a combination of the methods of diagnosis is recommended. Degradation of the RDTs might have contributed to its low sensitivity. Training and better quality assurance should be established for the medical and laboratory workers in order to improve malaria diagnosis.Evaluation of the ICT malaria P.f/P.v and the OptiMal rapid diagnostic tests for malaria in febrile returned travellers.Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) are less reliant on expert microscopy and have the potential to reduce errors in malaria diagnosis but have not been extensively evaluated in nonimmune persons or in countries where infection is not endemic. We evaluated the ICT P.f/P.v (ICT-Amrad, Sydney, Australia) and OptiMal (Flow Inc., Portland, Oreg.) assays prospectively for the diagnosis of malaria in 158 specimens from 144 febrile returned travellers in Australia by using expert microscopy and PCR as reference standards. Malaria was diagnosed in 93 specimens from 87 patients by expert microscopy, with 3 additional specimens from recently treated patients testing positive for Plasmodium falciparum by PCR. For the diagnosis of asexual-stage P. falciparum malaria, the sensitivity and specificity of the ICT P.f/P.v assay were 97 and 90%, respectively, and those of the OptiMal assay were 85 and 96%, respectively. The ICT P.f/P.v assay missed one infection with a density of 45 parasites/ micro l, whereas the OptiMal assay missed infections up to 2,500/ micro l; below 1,000/ micro l, its sensitivity was only 43%. For the diagnosis of P. vivax malaria, the sensitivity and specificity of the ICT P.f/P.v assay were 44 and 100%, respectively, and those of the OptiMal assay were 80 and 97%, respectively. Both assays missed infections with parasite densities over 5,000/ micro l: up to 10,000/ micro l with the former and 5,300/ micro l with the latter. Despite the high sensitivity of the ICT P.f/P.v assay for P. falciparum malaria, caution is warranted before RDTs are widely adopted for the diagnosis of malaria in nonimmune patients or in countries where malaria is not endemic.Comparison of the OptiMAL rapid test and microscopy for detection of malaria in pregnant women in Nigeria.Malaria during pregnancy causes anaemia in pregnant women and low birthweight in infants. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the OptiMAL rapid malaria test in comparison with standard microscopy for malaria diagnosis in 268 pregnant women attending antenatal clinics at the Jos University Teaching Hospital and the Federal Medical Centre-Gombe in Nigeria. Positive results by either method were confirmed using a polymerase chain reaction assay for malaria. Although the OptiMAL assay did not detect malaria in the blood of pregnant women with low levels of parasitaemia, it may be useful for the detection of placental malaria which predisposes to low birthweight infants.Field evaluation of the OptiMAL rapid malaria diagnostic test during anti-malarial therapy in Guyana.Rapid diagnostic modalities for malaria.Short report: Field evaluation of posttreatment sensitivity for monitoring parasite clearance of Plasmodium falciparum malaria by use of the Determine Malaria pf test in central India.The posttreatment performance of the Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein rapid diagnostic test Determine Malaria pf (Abbott Laboratories, Tokyo, Japan) was assessed in 70 patients in central India with uncomplicated falciparum malaria who were treated with chloroquine, sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine, and arteether. Data were compared with those of microscopy. Results revealed that the sensitivity for predicting recrudescence by means of the Determine test after treatment with chloroquine on Day 14 was 75%, with 50% specificity. However, antigenemia was detected in 16% of patients as late as Day 21 in sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine-treated subjects with a drug-sensitive response. Clearance of parasitemia in thick blood smear and clearance of antigenemia appeared to parallel each other only in arteether-treated subjects. The observed diagnostic trends therefore mean that the potential of the Determine test to detect recrudescent infection is limited.Rapid diagnostic testing for malaria.Malaria rapid diagnostic devices (MRDD) have been developed with the hope that they would offer accurate, reliable, rapid, cheap and easily available alternatives to traditional methods of malaria diagnosis. The results from early malaria rapid diagnostic studies were quite promising, especially for detecting Plasmodium falciparum at densities of more than 100-500 parasites/microl. Despite the introduction of these devices over a decade ago, only a few target antigens have been introduced. Of greater concern, these devices have shown limitations in sensitivity, ability to differentiate species and robustness under field conditions in the tropics. Recent trials have revealed wide variability in sensitivity both within and between products. We review the recent trials assessing MRDD use for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and non-P. falciparum infections in endemic and non-endemic countries and describe the various aspects of these devices which need further improvement. High quality, accurate, rapid and affordable diagnostic tools are urgently needed now that new antimalarial regimens, characterized by higher cost and increased toxicity, have been introduced more widely in response to emerging multi-drug resistance.Field trial of the RTM dipstick method for the rapid diagnosis of malaria based on the detection of Plasmodium falciparum HRP-2 antigen in whole blood.The performance of the Quorum RapidTest Malaria (RTM) dipstick method that detects Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein-2 (PfHRP-2) antigen in whole blood was evaluated in a malaria endemic area. Results were compared with conventional Giemsa-stained blood films. Of 306 people tested 37.9% (116/306) were found to be parasitaemic; of these 66.4% (77/116) were P. vivax and 32.8% (38/116) were P. falciparum infections. There was only one (0.9%) mixed P. falciparum plus P. vivax infection. The RTM test was positive in 35/36 patients with P. falciparum identified on blood smear examination, resulting in a sensitivity of 97.2% [95% confidence interval (CI): 91.6-102.8%]. Specificity was 96.3% (95% CI: 93.9-98.6%). The RTM test had a positive predictive value of 77.8% (95% CI: 65.7-89.9%) and a negative predictive value of 99.6% (95% CI: 98.4-100.8%). Of the 10 false positives, seven reported recent malaria episode and treatment, indicating persistence of antigenaemia. If these were assumed truly infected, the positive predictive value is increased to 93.3% (95% CI: 85.8-100.8%). The RTM test was positive in all seven P. falciparum infections with gametocytes and one mixed infection, but was negative in all falciparum gametocytes and relapsing fever cases. All but one P. vivax infection gave negative result on the RTM test. The RTM test missed one patient with parasitaemia. The test is highly sensitive and specific requiring no instrument or trained personnel. It appears to be a very useful tool for rapid diagnosis of malaria, especially in the rural health institutions with limited diagnostic facilities.Seasonal performance of a malaria rapid diagnosis test at community health clinics in a malaria-hyperendemic region of Burkina Faso.Treatment of confirmed malaria patients with Artemisinin-based Combination Therapy (ACT) at remote areas is the goal of many anti-malaria programs. Introduction of effective and affordable malaria Rapid Diagnosis Test (RDT) in remote areas could be an alternative tool for malaria case management. This study aimed to assess performance of the OptiMAL dipstick for rapid malaria diagnosis in children under five.Malaria symptomatic and asymptomatic children were recruited in a passive manner in two community clinics (CCs). Malaria diagnosis by microscopy and RDT were performed. Performance of the tests was determined.RDT showed similar ability (61.2%) to accurately diagnose malaria as microscopy (61.1%). OptiMAL showed a high level of sensitivity and specificity, compared with microscopy, during both transmission seasons (high & low), with a sensitivity of 92.9% vs. 74.9% and a specificity of 77.2% vs. 87.5%.By improving the performance of the test through accurate and continuous quality control of the device in the field, OptiMAL could be suitable for use at CCs for the management and control of malaria.Comparison of different methods for delayed post-mortem diagnosis of falciparum malaria.Between 10,000 and 12,000 cases of imported malaria are notified in the European Union each year. Despite an excellent health care system, fatalities do occur. In case of advanced autolysis, the post-mortem diagnostic is impaired. Quicker diagnosis could be achieved by using rapid diagnostic malaria tests.In order to evaluate different methods for the post-mortem diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in non-immunes, a study was performed on the basis of forensic autopsies of corpses examined at variable intervals after death in five cases of fatal malaria (with an interval of four hours to five days), and in 20 cases of deaths unrelated to malaria. Detection of parasite DNA by PCR and an immunochromatographic test (ICT) based upon the detection of P. falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP2) were compared with the results of microscopic examination of smears from cadaveric blood, histopathological findings, and autopsy results.In all cases of fatal malaria, post-mortem findings were unsuspicious for the final diagnosis, and autoptic investigations, including histopathology, were only performed because of additional information by police officers and neighbours. Macroscopic findings during autopsy were unspecific. Histopathology confirmed sequestration of erythrocytes and pigment in macrophages in most organs in four patients (not evaluable in one patient due to autolysis). Microscopy of cadaveric blood smears revealed remnants of intraerythrocytic parasites, and was compromised or impossible due to autolysis in two cases. PCR and ICT performed with cadaveric blood were positive in all malaria patients and negative in all controls.In non-immune fatalities with unclear anamnesis, ICT can be recommended as a sensitive and specific tool for post-mortem malaria diagnosis, which is easier and faster than microscopy, and also applicable when microscopic examination is impossible due to autolysis. PCR is more expensive and time-consuming, but may be used as confirmatory test. In highly endemic areas where asymptomatic parasitaemia is common, confirmation of the diagnosis of malaria as the cause of death has to rely on histopathological findings.[Malaria diagnosis and treatment in a rural Health Centre in Mayotte (Comoro archipelago, 2002)].With a marked increase in both morbidity and mortality, as well as a high level of resistance to chloroquine (CQ), malaria is once again a major public health problem in Mayotte, a French overseas territory in the Comoro archipelago. The object of this study is to assess the contribution in the field of two new antimalarial fight steps taken in 2001-2002: The use of the rapid diagnostic test (RDT) for malaria OptiMAL in the rural health centres and the drop of the CQ alone for the simultaneous administration of CQ and sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine (SP) as the first-line treatment for uncomplicated malaria. All 581 suspected malaria attacks, diagnosed by RDT during the year 2002 in a rural health centre of the island, were registered. The good positive predictive value of the RDT used (97.2%) calculated during the study has permitted an important reduction of the rate of wrongly administer antimalarial treatment. Before RDT was used, through lack of emergency microscopic diagnosis, the antimalarial treatment was presumptive in the isolated health centres and that rate was superior to 90%. It is now below 3%. Before the introduction of the new protocol, in the middle of the year 2002, the rate of therapeutic failures with CQ used alone was 40.2% (33/82). With the simultaneous administration of CQ and SP as a first-line treatment, this rate fell down to 1.8% (6/337). For the time being, this new treatment policy is acceptable in Mayotte. But the experience of the countries who have adopted this therapeutic policy shows that the effectiveness of the association CQ-SP is likely to be temporary. It is necessary to set up a "durable long-term" therapy strategy in Mayotte as soon as possible by adopting as first-line treatment for uncomplicated malaria a combination therapy according to the recommendations of the World Health Organization. It could be the artemether-lumefantrine combination which has already been the subject of an efficacy survey in the island.Rapid testing for malaria in settings where microscopy is available and peripheral clinics where only presumptive treatment is available: a randomised controlled trial in Ghana.To test in West Africa the impact of rapid diagnostic tests on the prescription of antimalarials and antibiotics both where microscopy is used for the diagnosis of malaria and in clinical (peripheral) settings that rely on clinical diagnosis.Randomised, controlled, open label clinical trial.Four clinics in the rural Dangme West district of southern Ghana, one in which microscopy is used for diagnosis of malaria ("microscopy setting") and three where microscopy is not available and diagnosis of malaria is made on the basis of clinical symptoms ("clinical setting").Patients with suspected malaria. Interventions Patients were randomly assigned to either a rapid diagnostic test or the current diagnostic method at the clinic (microscopy or clinical diagnosis). A blood sample for a research microscopy slide was taken for all patients.The primary outcome was the prescription of antimalarials to patients of any age whose double read research slide was negative for malaria. The major secondary outcomes were the correct prescription of antimalarials, the impact of test results on antibiotic prescription, and the correct prescription of antimalarials in children under 5 years.Of the 9236 patients screened, 3452 were randomised in the clinical setting and 3811 in the microscopy setting. Follow-up to 28 days was 97.6% (7088/7263). In the microscopy setting, 722 (51.6%) of the 1400 patients with negative research slides in the rapid diagnostic test arm were treated for malaria compared with 764 (55.0%) of the 1389 patients in the microscopy arm (adjusted odds ratio 0.87, 95% CI 0.71 to 1.1; P=0.16). In the clinical setting, 578 (53.9%) of the 1072 patients in the rapid diagnostic test arm with negative research slides were treated for malaria compared with 982 (90.1%) of the 1090 patients with negative slides in the clinical diagnosis arm (odds ratio 0.12, 95% CI 0.04 to 0.38; P=0.001). The use of rapid diagnostic tests led to better targeting of antimalarials and antibiotics in the clinical but not the microscopy setting, in both children and adults. There were no deaths in children under 5 years at 28 days follow-up in either arm.Where microscopy already exists, introducing rapid diagnostic tests had limited impact on prescriber behaviour. In settings where microscopy was not available, however, using rapid diagnostic tests led to a significant reduction in the overprescription of antimalarials, without any evidence of clinical harm, and to better targeting of antibiotics. Trial registration ClinicalTrials.gov NCT00493922.Comparison of optimal malarial test with light microscopy for the diagnosis of malaria.To evaluate the efficacy of a parasite lactate dehydrogenase-based immunochromatographic antigen detection assay (optimal) against conventional light microscopy in the diagnosis of malaria at Military Hospital, Rawalpindi and Department of Pathology Army Medical College Rawalpindi from August to October 2002 in patients reporting sick with history suggestive of malaria.The blood samples were collected from 215 patients reporting with symptoms suggestive of malaria. Thick and thin blood films were prepared, stained with Leishman's stain and examined by light microscopy for the presence of malarial parasites. Parasitaemia was estimated on all positive slides. All samples were tested for presence of malarial parasite by optimal dipstick method according to the manufacturer's instructions.A total of 215 cases were studied. Malarial parasites were visualized in 98 (45.5%) cases with light microscopy. Optimal test revealed 93 (43.2%) of these samples as positive. Microscopy showed 61 out of 98 positive cases to be P. vivax and 37 P. falciparum. The Optimal dipstick method revealed that 58 out of 93 were positive for P. vivax and 35 positive for P. falciparum. These results demonstrated that Optimal had sensitivities of 95% and 94.5% for P. vivax and P. falciparum respectively. It has 100% specificity for both malarial species, when compared to conventional microscopy.Optimal test showed excellent correlation with microscopy in the diagnosis of P. vivax and P. falciparum. It is expensive but it has an advantage of being simple, rapid and effective test in the diagnosis of malaria especially where well trained microscopists are not available or work load is too high.Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2-based immunocapture diagnostic assay for malaria: cross-reactivity with rheumatoid factors.Recently introduced rapid nonmicroscopic immunocapture assays for the diagnosis of malaria infection are being evaluated for their sensitivity and specificity in various epidemiological settings. A Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP-2)-based assay (ICT) and a Plasmodium-specific lactate dehydrogenase test (OptiMAL) were evaluated for their specificities in different groups of patients who tested negative for malaria infection by microscopy. The patients were selected from different disease groups: rheumatoid arthritis, hepatitis C, toxoplasmosis, schistosomiasis, and hydatid disease. One hundred thirty-three of the 225 patients were positive for rheumatoid factor. Thirty-five of the 133 (26%) rheumatoid factor-positive patients gave a false-positive reaction with the ICT assay, but only 4 of these gave false-positive reactions with the OptiMAL test. Thirty-three of the 35 false-positive specimens became negative when repeat tested with the ICT assay after absorbing out the rheumatoid factor activity. Our study shows that the PfHRP-2-based ICT assay gave a false-positive reaction in 26% of the patients who had rheumatoid factors, but were negative for malaria by microscopy.Comparison of a rapid field immunochromatographic test to expert microscopy for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum asexual parasitemia in Thailand.We assessed a rapid, Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein 2 (PfHRP2)-based immunochromatographic test (ICT Malaria Pf Test), for detection of asexual P. falciparum parasitemia in 551 subjects in three groups: (1) symptomatic patients self-referring for diagnosis, (2) villagers in a screening survey, and (3) patients recently treated for P. falciparum malaria. Expert light microscopy was the reference standard. ICT test performance was similar for diagnostic and screening modes. Four findings emerged: (1) test sensitivity correlated directly with parasite density, (2) test band intensity correlated directly with parasite density, (3) persistent test positivity after parasite clearance precludes its use for monitoring early therapeutic responses, and (4) a false negative test at 18,000 parasites/microl is unexplained. We conclude that a strong positive ICT test is highly predictive of falciparum asexual parasitemia for the diagnosis of new cases of falciparum malaria in Thailand, but a negative test result is inadequate to exclude parasitemia < 300/microl, and in some instances, even a higher parasitemia.The ParaSight-F rapid dipstick antigen capture assay for monitoring parasite clearance after drug treatment of Plasmodium falciparum malaria.Three methods for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum infection in peripheral blood were compared during antimalarial treatment and follow-up in 32 Burundian patients: dipstick antigen capture assay, standard (TBF) and prolonged thick blood film examination (PTBF) (3 x 5 min and 3 x 20 min examination respectively). Parasitaemia was determined daily by comparison with total white blood cell counts (determined by Coulter counter) until no parasite was detected on 2 consecutive days by PTBF. Cumulatively, 231 observations were made with each assay: 64 were negative and 167 positive by PTBF (59 had parasite counts < or = 100/microL). Compared to PTBF, the sensitivities of TBF and the dipstick assay were 1.0 for parasite counts > 100/microL and 0.458 and 0.966 respectively for counts < or = 100/microL. Overall, the dipstick assay was significantly more sensitive (0.988 vs. 0.808; P < 0.001) but less specific (P = 0.013) than TBF. The dipstick assay is of potential use for monitoring response to drug treatment and for detecting low parasitaemias.Malaria diagnosis by field workers using an immunochromatographic test.A rapid immunodiagnostic test (ICT Malaria PfTest) has been developed by ICT Diagnostics (Sydney, Australia) for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection. The test is an antigen capture assay based on the detection of P. falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 in peripheral blood. This study was undertaken to assess the performance and usefulness of the test as a diagnostic method in highly malarious, inaccessible forested villages of Mandla district, central India. In all, 353 patients with fever were scanned by the test in parallel with thick blood film examination. The sensitivity and specificity were 100% and 84.5%, respectively. The whole test took about 5 min. The test results became negative in most cases (70%) within 7 d after initiation of curative chemotherapy. The test is simple, easy to learn and accurate, and may prove to be an important tool in the battle against falciparum malaria.Use of malaria rapid diagnostic test to identify Plasmodium knowlesi infection.Reports of human infection with Plasmodium knowlesi, a monkey malaria, suggest that it and other nonhuman malaria species may be an emerging health problem. We report the use of a rapid test to supplement microscopic analysis in distinguishing the 5 malaria species that infect humans.[Malaria diagnosis: thickdrop and bloodsmear examination, and rapid test].Evaluation of a rapid and inexpensive dipstick assay for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria.Rapid, accurate and affordable methods are needed for the diagnosis of malaria. Reported here is an evaluation of a new immunochromatographic strip, the PATH Falciparum Malaria IC Strip, which is impregnated with an immobilized IgM monoclonal antibody that binds to the HRP-II antigen of Plasmodium falciparum. In contrast to other commercially available kits marketed for the rapid diagnosis of falciparum malaria, this kit should be affordable in the malaria-endemic world. Using microscopy and polymerase chain reaction (PCR)-based methods as reference standards, we compared two versions of the PATH test for the detection of P. falciparum infection in 200 febrile travellers. As determined by PCR and microscopy, 148 travellers had malaria, 50 of whom (33.8%) were infected with P. falciparum. Compared with PCR, the two versions of the PATH test had initial sensitivities of 90% and 88% and specificities of 97% and 96%, respectively, for the detection of falciparum malaria. When discrepant samples were retested blindly with a modified procedure (increased sample volume and longer washing step) the sensitivity and specificity of both kits improved to 96% and 99%, respectively. The two remaining false negatives occurred in samples with < 100 parasites per microliter of blood. The accuracy, simplicity and predicted low cost may make this test a useful diagnostic tool in malaria-endemic areas.Cross-reactivity in rapid diagnostic tests between human malaria and zoonotic simian malaria parasite Plasmodium knowlesi infections.Plasmodium knowlesi has a relatively broad host range extending to humans, in whom it causes zoonotic malaria. Recent studies have shown that human infection with P. knowlesi is widely distributed in forested areas of Southeast Asia. In the present study, we evaluated commercial rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for human malaria to assess their reactivity and sensitivity in detecting P. knowlesi parasites using blood samples obtained from infected monkeys. The blood samples were assayed using two commercial RDTs based on immunochromatographic assays: (i) the OptiMAL-IT, designed to detect parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) of both P. falciparum and other plasmodia, and (ii) the Entebe Malaria Cassette (MC), designed to detect P. falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP2) and P. vivax-specific pLDH. Interestingly, when the P. knowlesi-infected blood samples were examined with the RDTs, OptiMAL test results were interpreted as falciparum malaria-positive, while Entebe MC test results were interpreted as vivax malaria-positive. The sensitivities of both tests in detecting P. knowlesi parasite were similar to those for P. falciparum and higher than P. vivax. Thus, commercial RDTs based on detection of pLDH should be used with great caution, and should not replace conventional microscopy in the diagnosis of suspected cases of P. knowlesi malaria.Cost-effectiveness analysis of rapid diagnostic test, microscopy and syndromic approach in the diagnosis of malaria in Nigeria: implications for scaling-up deployment of ACT.The diagnosis and treatment of malaria is often based on syndromic presentation (presumptive treatment) and microscopic examination of blood films. Treatment based on syndromic approach has been found to be costly, and contributes to the development of drug resistance, while microscopic diagnosis of malaria is time-consuming and labour-intensive. Also, there is lack of trained microscopists and reliable equipment especially in rural areas of Nigeria. However, although rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) have improved the ease of appropriate diagnosis of malaria diagnosis, the cost-effectiveness of RDTs in case management of malaria has not been evaluated in Nigeria. The study hence compares the cost-effectiveness of RDT versus syndromic diagnosis and microscopy.A total of 638 patients with fever, clinically diagnosed as malaria (presumptive malaria) by health workers, were selected for examination with both RDT and microscopy. Patients positive on RDT received artemisinin-based combination therapy (ACT) and febrile patients negative on RDT received an antibiotic treatment. Using a decision tree model for a hypothetical cohort of 100,000 patients, the diagnostic alternatives considered were presumptive treatment (base strategy), RDT and microscopy. Costs were based on a consumer and provider perspective while the outcome measure was deaths averted. Information on costs and malaria epidemiology were locally generated, and along with available data on effectiveness of diagnostic tests, adherence level to drugs for treatment, and drug efficacy levels, cost-effectiveness estimates were computed using TreeAge programme. Results were reported based on costs and effects per strategy, and incremental cost-effectiveness ratios.The cost-effectiveness analysis at 43.1% prevalence level showed an incremental cost effectiveness ratio (ICER) of 221 per deaths averted between RDT and presumptive treatment, while microscopy is dominated at that level. There was also a lesser cost of RDT ($0.34 million) compared to presumptive treatment ($0.37 million) and microscopy ($0.39 million), with effectiveness values of 99,862, 99,735 and 99,851 for RDT, presumptive treatment and microscopy, respectively. Cost-effectiveness was affected by malaria prevalence level, ACT adherence level, cost of ACT, proportion of non-malaria febrile illness cases that were bacterial, and microscopy and RDT sensitivity.RDT is cost-effective when compared to other diagnostic strategies for malaria treatment at malaria prevalence of 43.1% and, therefore, a very good strategy for diagnosis of malaria in Nigeria. There is opportunity for cost savings if rapid diagnostic tests are introduced in health facilities in Nigeria for case management of malaria.Laboratory diagnosis of malaria by village health workers using the rapid manual ParaSight-F test.Rapid immunochromatographic malarial antigen detection unreliable for detecting Plasmodium malariae and Plasmodium ovale.In order to determine the reliability of two commercial tests for the rapid detection of plasmodial antigen in cases of infection with Plasmodium ovale and Plasmodium malariae, the products were evaluated in four centers and a search of the relevant literature was performed. The results of the present and previous studies were compared. With overall sensitivities ranging between 18.8% and 47.6% for Plasmodium malariae and between 20% and 31.3% for Plasmodium ovale, it is evident that neither test is reliable for the detection of Plasmodium ovale and Plasmodium malariae infections.Comparison of two rapid, HRP2-based diagnostic tests for Plasmodium falciparum.Comparison of three antigen detection tests for diagnosis and follow-up of falciparum malaria in travellers returning to Berlin, Germany.We determined the sensitivity and specificity of three rapid immunochromatographic malarial antigen detection test systems (RDTs) for the detection of Plasmodium falciparumand assessed the quality of follow-up results. ParaSight-F and ICT Malaria detect histidine-rich protein-2 (HRP-2), whereas OptiMal detects plasmodial lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH). ParaSight-F performed with 95.1% sensitivity and 97.1% specificity (554 patients tested of whom 144 had falciparum malaria). ICT Malaria performed with 95.7% sensitivity and 99.2% specificity (718 patients tested of whom 184 had falciparum malaria). OptiMal performed with 76.2% sensitivity and 99.7% specificity (539 patients tested of whom 130 had falciparum malaria). In follow-up investigations, HRP-2 did not appear to be a useful antigen due to its long half-life, whereas pLDH offers a reasonable correlation with the presence of viable parasites in those cases initially detected. We therefore conclude that a combination of both antigens might be the best option for creating a reliable RDT for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria.[Rapid diagnostic test for malaria: preliminary study in Madagascar in 2003].This study was conducted in 2003 as part of the training of laboratory technicians in the use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria and to evaluate these tests in Madagascar in field conditions for the first time. Two types of RDT were used separately. The dipstick (Optimal-I) that detects circulating pLDH was tested in 168 patients with clinically suspected malaria (fever or recent history of fever) at primary health centers. Microscopy confirmed malaria in 93/168 (55.4%) cases. Monoparasitic P. falciparum infection was identified in 86/93, P. malariae in 3/93, P. vivax in 3/93 and P. ovale in 1/93. A positive Optimal-I test was a highly sensitive indicator of P. falciparum infection with parasitemia exceeding 500 trophozoites/mul (sensitivity of 97.2%; with a specificity of 100%); it also confirmed 6/7 cases of non-P. falciparum malaria. A community malaria survey used the Malaria Hexagon dipstick (detecting P. falciparum-specific HRP2) for 273 patients: 17 (6.2%) RDT tests were positive, and 16 (5.9%) microscopic tests. Although this dipstick did not detect the only case of infection with P. vivax, its specificity was 100% for detection of P. falciparum infection. Installing microscopes and qualified microscopists in the health centers of the one hundred and eleven districts in Madagascar would be extremely difficult, but our results show that RDT is an effective alternative diagnostic tool for daily use as well as for sporadic malaria epidemics. The revised antimalarial treatment policy, involving a drug ten to twenty times more expensive than chloroquine, demonstrates the need to improve malaria diagnosis: presumptive treatment has become prohibitively expensive. RDT can be used to improve malaria case management at the primary heath centers in Madagascar. We discuss the choice of RDTs.Evaluation of the Binax NOW ICT test versus polymerase chain reaction and microscopy for the detection of malaria in returned travelers.Microscopic detection of Plasmodium species has been the reference standard for the diagnosis of malaria for more than a century. However, maintaining a sufficient level of expertise in microscopic diagnosis can be challenging, particularly in non-endemic countries. The objective of this study was to compare a new rapid malaria diagnostic device (NOW ICT Malaria Test; Binax, Inc., Portland, ME) to polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and expert microscopy for the diagnosis of malaria in 256 febrile returned travelers. Compared with PCR, the NOW ICT test showed a sensitivity of 94% for the detection of P. falciparum malaria (96% for pure P. falciparum infection) and 84% for non-P. falciparum infections (87% for pure P. vivax infections and 62% for pure P. ovale and P. malariae infections), with an overall specificity of 99%. The Binax NOW ICT may represent a useful adjunct for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and P. vivax malaria in febrile returned travelers.Low sensitivity of ParaHIT-f rapid malaria test among patients with fever in rural health centers, Northern Tanzania.Several rapid diagnostic tools for malaria are currently available in local markets. However, diagnostic accuracy varies widely. The present study was conducted to evaluate a cheaply and easily available rapid diagnostic malaria test (ParaHIT-f) in rural Tanzania.Participants presenting with fever at health centers in the Kilimanjaro and Manyara regions were eligible. Parasitological thin and thick smears were examined from finger-prick blood samples and compared to ParaHIT-f test results. Sensitivity, specificity and predictive values were calculated using microscopic parasitological examination as the gold standard.In total, 236/743 (31.8%) individuals had a positive malaria microscopy, and 25/715 (3.4%) were positive in the rapid diagnostic test. The sensitivity of ParaHIT-f was 10.7% (95% CI, 6.7-14.7) and specificity was 100% (95% CI, 97.4-102), with positive and negative predictive values (PPV and NPV) of 100% (95% CI, 99.1-100.2) and 70.9% (95% CI, 66.9-74.9) respectively. Sensitivity of ParaHIT-f increased with increasing P. falciparum density (P > 0.003) from 5.8% (95% CI, 0-12.9) at < 100 parasites/µl to 20.5% (95% CI, 13.5-27) at ≥ 100 parasites/µl.Sensitivity of the ParaHIT-f rapid test was very low in this setting, therefore concomitant use of rapid diagnostic tests and microscopy is recommended. In the case of positive test results, confirmation by parasitological techniques is not necessary. Further monitoring of ParaHIT-f in various epidemiological settings in Tanzania is warranted. Paracheck-Pf accuracy and recently treated Plasmodium falciparum infections: is there a risk of over-diagnosis?An assessment of the accuracy of Paracheck Pf, a malaria rapid diagnostic test (RDT) detecting histidine rich protein 2 was undertaken amongst children aged 6-59 months in eastern Democratic Republic of Congo.This RDT assessment occurred in conjunction with an ACT efficacy trial. Febrile children were simultaneously screened with both RDT and high quality microscopy and those meeting inclusion criteria were followed for 35 days.358 febrile children were screened with 180 children recruited for five weeks follow-up. On screening, the RDT accurately diagnosed all 235 true malaria cases, indicating 100% RDT sensitivity. Of the 123 negative slides, the RDT gave 59 false-positive results, indicating 52.0% (64/123) RDT specificity. During follow-up after treatment with an artemisinin-based combination therapy, 98.2% (110/112), 94.6% (106/112), 92.0% (103/112) and 73.5% (50/68) of effectively treated children were still false-positive by RDT at days 14, 21, 28 and 35, respectively.Results show that though the use of Paracheck-Pf is as sensitive as microscopy in detecting true malaria cases, a low specificity did present a high frequency of false-positive RDT results. What's more, a duration of RDT false-positivity was found that significantly surpassed the 'fortnight' after effective treatment reported by its manufacturer. Though further research is needed in assessing RDT accuracy, study results showing the presence of frequent false positivity should be taken into consideration to avoid clinicians inappropriately focusing on malaria, not identifying the true cause of illness, and providing unnecessary treatment.Evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test for assessing the burden of malaria at delivery in India.All pregnant women who came for delivery at a district hospital in Mandla and a civil hospital in Maihar were screened for Plasmodium falciparum (placental parasitemia using a rapid test and microscopy and peripheral and umbilical cord parasitemia using microscopy alone). Two rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs), Paracheck Pf and ParaHITf, were used. At Mandla, the sensitivity and specificity of the Paracheck Pf for P. falciparum were 93% and 84%, respectively. The positive predictive values (PPVs) and negative predictive values (NPVs) were 50% and 99%, respectively. At Maihar, the sensitivity and specificity of the ParaHITf for P. falciparum were 87.5% and 97%, respectively. The PPVs and NPVs were 75.4% and 98.7%, respectively. Placental infection was significantly associated with low birth weight. The RDTs for the identification of P. falciparum were more sensitive in placental blood than the placental blood smear by microscopy. Thus, the RDTs should be useful for rapid assessment of malaria at delivery.Relative utility of dipsticks for diagnosis of malaria in mesoendemic area for Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax in northeastern India.For diagnosis of malaria, popular brands of rapid test kits collectively termed as "dipsticks" were subject to field evaluation in northeastern India for their comparative sensitivity and specificity vis-à-vis conventional microscopic results. Dipsticks based on Plasmodium falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein (Pf HRP-2) antigen capture assay revealed 100% sensitivity and high specificity (94-100%); thus, they were concluded to be reliable tools for confirmed diagnosis of malarial infection. However, an advanced version of the same kit, having incorporated additional pan-malarial monoclonal antibody, was found to be less sensitive (71%) for non-falciparum infections. Besides, Pf HRP-2-based kits continued to show positive results up to day 7, even after clearance of parasitemia on account of persistent antigenemia. This very limitation seemed to have been overcome by parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) enzyme-based kit. This kit was observed to have high sensitivity (81-89%) and specificity (100%) for both falciparum and non-falciparum malaria, but cannot distinguish mono-infection from mixed infections. It is concluded that the rational use of these kits would accord health benefits in terms of early detection and prompt treatment, reduce drug pressure, and possibly delay the emergence and spread of multi-drug-resistant strains of malarial parasites.Role of immunochromatographic test for rapid diagnosis of malaria.The study was conducted to compare among the different diagnostic procedures for malaria in the department of Microbiology, Mymensingh Medical College, Mymensingh during the period from July 2005 to June 2006. In this study a total of 98 malaria patients were included as cases. Another 30 age and sex matched healthy people were included as controls. Blood sample from each of the case and control was collected and examined for malarial parasite by microscopic examination of peripheral blood film. Subsequently antigen and antibody were detected by immuno-chromatographic test (ICT). Out of 98 clinically suspected cases 59(60.20%) were positive for malarial parasite by microscopic examination of peripheral blood film, 57(58.16%) were positive by ICT for antigen and 58(59.19%) were positive by ICT for antibody. Sensitivity and specificity of ICT for antigen were 93.22% and 94.87% respectively. For antibody, sensitivity and specificity were 89.83% and 87.17% respectively. From this study, sensitivity and specificity of ICT for malaria was found quite satisfactory, so it is suggested that ICT for malaria could be an alternative to peripheral blood film for the diagnosis of malaria where parasite could not be detected in peripheral blood film.[Rapid methods for the diagnosis of tropical malaria].Evaluation of the malaria rapid diagnostic test VIKIA malaria Ag Pf/Pan™ in endemic and non-endemic settings.Malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) are a useful tool in endemic malaria countries, where light microscopy is not feasible. In non-endemic countries they can be used as complementary tests to provide timely results in case of microscopy inexperience. This study aims to compare the new VIKIA Malaria Ag Pf/Pan™ RDT with PCR-corrected microscopy results and the commonly used CareStart™ RDT to diagnose falciparum and non-falciparum malaria in the endemic setting of Bamako, Mali and the non-endemic setting of Lyon, France.Blood samples were collected during a 12-months and six-months period in 2011 from patients suspected to have malaria in Lyon and Bamako respectively. The samples were examined by light microscopy, the VIKIA Malaria Ag Pf/Pan™ test and in Bamako additionally with the CareStart™ RDT. Discordant results were corrected by real-time PCR. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were used to evaluate test performance.Samples of 877 patients from both sites were included. The VIKIA Malaria Ag Pf/Pan™ had a sensitivity of 98% and 96% for Plasmodium falciparum in Lyon and Bamako, respectively, performing similar to PCR-corrected microscopy.The VIKIA Malaria Ag Pf/Pan™ performs similar to PCR-corrected microscopy for the detection of P. falciparum, making it a valuable tool in malaria endemic and non-endemic regions.Rapid diagnosis of falciparum malaria by detection of Plasmodium falciparum HRP-2 antigen.Malaria is a resurging problem all over the country and rapid diagnosis is mandatory to decrease the morbidity and mortality and for control of malaria. In the current study the aim was to evaluate the usefulness of rapid Plasmodium falciparum antigen detection and to compare its utility over conventional peripheral thick and thin smear examination.Three hundred fifty seven randomly selected patients with pyrexia and or atypical presentations of malaria, found initially negative for malaria were subjected to thick and thin smear examination and Plasmodium falciparum antigen detection test by using commercially available Parasight F. kit.54.6% of cases presented with pyrexia, while other presentations of falciparum malaria were less frequently encountered (162/357). Eighty five patients (23.8%) were diagnosed as having falciparum malaria based on smear/Parasight F. Test. Eighty- four of these patients were positive for Parasight F. test and only 34.51% of these cases were also positive on smear examination.The antigen detection test for Plasmodium falciparum is useful for rapid diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria. It could detect 65.5% cases of falciparum malaria which were initially negative by peripheral smear examination. Hence, this technique is superior to peripheral smear staining and helps early diagnosis.A comparison of three malaria diagnostic tests, under field conditions in North-west Thailand.A hospital-based trial to compare the clinical diagnosis of malaria; microscopy, and a rapid diagnostic antigen capture detection dipstick (ParaSight-F) was conducted in North-west Thailand. 301 people who presented themselves at the hospital were selected. 204 (68%) were presumptively diagnosed as having malaria by the triage nurses; 64 (21.3%) were P. falciparum parasite positive, and 94 (32%) tested positive for P. falciparum with the ParaSight-F test strips. There was no association between hemoglobin levels (<10g/dl and > or = 10g/dl) and malaria, and although there was a good statistical association between temperature and malaria the specificity, sensitivity and positive predictive values were all low, indicating that temperature alone is a poor indicator of the disease. Based on the microscopy results, we found that a presumptive clinical diagnosis dramatically over-diagnosed malaria, and similarly there were a large number of false positives using the ParaSight-F test. We believe that many of the patients had received some form of malaria treatment prior to presentation at the hospital, and that the high number of false positives are explained by persistent antigenemia and the possibility of there being sequestered parasites following incomplete chemotherapy.Field and laboratory comparative evaluation of rapid malaria diagnostic tests versus traditional and molecular techniques in India.Malaria presents a diagnostic challenge in most tropical countries. Microscopy remains the gold standard for diagnosing malaria infections in clinical practice and research. However, microscopy is labour intensive, requires significant skills and time, which causes therapeutic delays. The objective of obtaining result quickly from the examination of blood samples from patients with suspected malaria is now made possible with the introduction of rapid malaria diagnostic tests (RDTs). Several RDTs are available, which are fast, reliable and simple to use and can detect Plasmodium falciparum and non-falciparum infections or both. A study was conducted in tribal areas of central India to measure the overall performance of several RDTs for diagnosis of P. falciparum and non-falciparum infections in comparison with traditional and molecular techniques. Such data will be used to guide procurement decisions of policy makers and programme managers.Five commercially available RDTs were tested simultaneously in field in parallel with peripheral blood smears in outbreak-affected areas. The evaluation is designed to provide comparative data on the performance of each RDT. In addition, molecular method i.e. polymerase chain reaction (PCR) was also carried out to compare all three methods.A total of 372 patients with a clinical suspicion of malaria from Bajag Primary Health Centre (PHC) of district Dindori and Satanwada PHC of district Shivpuri attending the field clinics of Regional Medical Research Centre were included in the study. The analysis revealed that the First Response Malaria Antigen pLDH/HRP2 combo test was 94.7% sensitive (95% CI 89.5-97.7) and 69.9% specific (95% CI 63.6-75.6) for P. falciparum. However, for non-falciparum infections (Plasmodium vivax) the test was 84.2% sensitive (95% CI 72.1-92.5) and 96.5% specific (95% CI 93.8-98.2). The Parascreen represented a good alternative. All other RDTs were relatively less sensitive for both P. falciparum and non-falciparum infections.The results in this study show comparative performance between microscopy, various RDTs and PCR. Despite some inherent limitation in the five RDTs tested, First Response clearly has an advantage over other RDTs. The results suggest that RDTs could play and will play an important role in malaria diagnosis.Trial of the ParaSight-F test for malaria diagnosis in the primary health care system, Zimbabwe.Rapid diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria remains one of the main limitations to prompt treatment. Diagnosis based on clinical symptoms is decidedly unreliable, especially in areas of seasonal transmission like Zimbabwe. In view of this, the Plasmodium falciparum histidine rich protein (HRP-II) antigen detection assay (ParaSight-F test) was tried at 10 health centres in 3 malaria endemicity zones of Zimbabwe, as a malaria diagnostic tool for primary health care. Parasitological evaluations were conducted using thick and thin film microscopy as gold standard, and ease of test operation and practicability to nurses were ascertained by questionnaire. The sensitivity of the test did not vary substantially by endemicity zone and was approximately 93%. Specificities were 85, 72 and 92% in the hyperendemic, mesoendemic and hypoendemic zones, respectively. Positive predictive values varied considerably with endemicity, the lowest being in the hypoendemic zone (56%). However, negative predictive values did not change significantly, with a mean of 94%. It was found that the ParaSight-F test reduced mistreatment for malaria, relative to clinical diagnosis, by up to 81%, especially in the hypoendemic region. Test acceptability evaluations were good.Laboratory evaluation on the sensitivity and specificity of a novel and rapid detection method for malaria diagnosis based on magneto-optical technology (MOT).This study describes the laboratory evaluation of a novel diagnostic platform for malaria. The Magneto Optical Test (MOT) is based on the bio-physical detection of haemozoin in clinical samples. Having an assay time of around one minute, it offers the potential of high throughput screening.Blood samples of confirmed malaria patients from different regions of Africa, patients with other diseases and healthy non-endemic controls were used in the present study. The samples were analysed with two reference tests, i.e. an histidine rich protein-2 based rapid diagnostic test (RDT) and a conventional Pan-Plasmodium PCR, and the MOT as index test. Data were entered in 2 x 2 tables and analysed for sensitivity and specificity. The agreement between microscopy, RDT and PCR and the MOT assay was determined by calculating Kappa values with a 95% confidence interval.The observed sensitivity/specificity of the MOT test in comparison with clinical description, RDT or PCR ranged from 77.2 - 78.8% (sensitivity) and from 72.5 - 74.6% (specificity). In general, the agreement between MOT and the other assays is around 0.5 indicating a moderate agreement between the reference and the index test. However, when RDT and PCR are compared to each other, an almost perfect agreement can be observed (k = 0.97) with a sensitivity and specificity of >95%.Although MOT sensitivity and specificity are currently not yet at a competing level compared to other diagnostic test, such as PCR and RDTs, it has a potential to rapidly screen patients for malaria in endemic as well as non-endemic countries.False-positive results of a Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2-detecting malaria rapid diagnostic test due to high sensitivity in a community with fluctuating low parasite density.The persistence of parasite histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) in the circulation after parasite clearance has been considered a drawback for rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) targeting HRP2 and a major cause of false-positive results. This paper reports results of a study into whether a proportion of RDT HRP2 false-positive cases carried parasites using polymerase chain reaction analysis as the gold standard rather than microscopy. The high rate of RDT false-positive parasitemia results in comparison with microscopy was shown to predominantly represent cases that had a parasite density below the threshold for detection by microscopy. Despite the generally low disease-endemic prevalence of malaria in the area, there was a high prevalence of chronic infections with low, fluctuating, parasite densities that were better detected by RDT. Our results suggest that in areas known to have low-density parasitemias, RDTs targeting HRP2 may increase diagnostic sensitivity in comparison with microscopy. While microscopy remains the standard for comparison of malaria diagnostic accuracy, the limitations of microscopy, and the possibility that RDTs may have superior accuracy in some circumstances, should be taken into account when interpreting results of diagnostic trials.Evaluation of a dipstick test for the rapid diagnosis of imported malaria among patients presenting within the network TropNetEurop.Lack of experience on the part of involved laboratory personnel frequently complicates swift diagnosis of imported falciparum malaria in non-endemic areas. Diagnostic tools based on the dipstick principle for the detection of plasmodial histidine-rich protein 2 have been marketed for several years and have been extensively evaluated. Recently, a test kit capable of detecting antigen of Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax has been introduced. In order to evaluate this newly available tool, specimens from 664 patients were screened during the course of a prospective multicentre study within the European Network on Imported Infectious Disease Surveillance (TropNetEurop). Among the screened specimens, samples from 82 patients (12.3%) were positive for falciparum malaria using expert microscopy. A further 17 samples were positive for vivax malaria. The evaluated test kit performed with a sensitivity of 87.8% and a specificity of 99% for detection of falciparum malaria. Respective values for vivax malaria were 76.5% and 100%. Dipstick tests have the potential of improving the speed and accuracy of the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, especially if non-specialized laboratories are involved. However, decreased values of sensitivity and specificity, in comparison with expert microscopy, still impose a clear limit on the usefulness of the currently available kits.Short communication: An assessment of the use of malaria rapid tests by village health volunteers in rural Laos.Rapid malaria diagnosis, a key component of malaria control strategies, is hampered by the expense and training requirements of reliable microscopy. Rapid malaria antigen tests may improve the diagnosis of malaria in the rural tropics. After 1 h training 64 village health volunteers (VHVs) from rural Laos, with no previous laboratory experience, performed two malaria rapid diagnostic tests (ParacheckPf and OptiMAL) accurately. The reliability of six VHVs was assessed longitudinally, over 10 months with different frequencies of retraining. Compared with microscopy, error rates in dipstick interpretation were low (<2%) for both tests and were not associated with retraining frequency (P>0.2). Previously untrained Lao VHVs performed malaria rapid tests reliably with high sensitivity and specificity after minimal training.Feasibility and acceptability of home-based management of malaria strategy adapted to Sudan's conditions using artemisinin-based combination therapy and rapid diagnostic test.Malaria remains a major public health problem especially in sub-Saharan Africa. Despite the efforts exerted to provide effective anti-malarial drugs, still some communities suffer from getting access to these services due to many barriers. This research aimed to assess the feasibility and acceptability of home-based management of malaria (HMM) strategy using artemisinin-based combination therapy (ACT) for treatment and rapid diagnostic test (RDT) for diagnosis.This is a study conducted in 20 villages in Um Adara area, South Kordofan state, Sudan. Two-thirds (66%) of the study community were seeking treatment from heath facilities, which were more than 5 km far from their villages with marked inaccessibility during rainy season. Volunteers (one per village) were trained on using RDTs for diagnosis and artesunate plus sulphadoxine-pyrimethamine for treating malaria patients, as well as referral of severe and non-malaria cases. A system for supply and monitoring was established based on the rural health centre, which acted as a link between the volunteers and the health system. Advocacy for the policy was done through different tools. Volunteers worked on non-monetary incentives but only a consultation fee of One Sudanese Pound (equivalent to US$0.5).Pre- and post-intervention assessment was done using household survey, focus group discussion with the community leaders, structured interview with the volunteers, and records and reports analysis.The overall adherence of volunteers to the project protocol in treating and referring cases was accepted that was only one of the 20 volunteers did not comply with the study guidelines. Although the use of RDTs seemed to have improved the level of accuracy and trust in the diagnosis, 30% of volunteers did not rely on the negative RDT results when treating fever cases. Almost all (94.7%) the volunteers felt that they were satisfied with the spiritual outcome of their new tasks. As well, volunteers have initiated advocacy campaigns supported by their village health committees which were found to have a positive role to play in the project that proved their acceptability of the HMM design. The planned system for supply was found to be effective. The project was found to improve the accessibility to ACTs from 25% to 64.7% and the treatment seeking behaviour from 83.3% to 100% before- and after the HMM implementation respectively.The evaluation of the project identified the feasibility of the planned model in Sudan's condition. Moreover, the communities as well as the volunteers found to be satisfied with and supportive to the system and the outcome. The problem of treating other febrile cases when diagnosis is not malaria and other non-fever cases needs to be addressed as well.Out with the old, in with the new: the utility of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria diagnosis in Africa.After many years of development, rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria are now being rolled out in many African countries to support the introduction of artemisinin-based combination therapies (ACT). RDTs create new opportunities both for improved care and as research tools, but it is important that the research agenda continues to address the many challenges, both operational and technical, that still need to be met. Here we review what is known and what new evidence is needed to maximise the utility of RDTs in Africa.Malarigen malaria Pf/Pv antigen rapid test: a simple and effective tool for diagnosis of malaria in the far-flung hilly areas of Bangladesh.Microscopic visualization of malarial parasites on thick and/or thin film is considered as "Gold Standard" for diagnosis of malaria. But it needs skilled microscopist as well as good laboratory set up, which are scarce in Chittagong Hill Tracts (CHT) in Bangladesh. A study was carried out to evaluate the efficacy of a newly introduced Rapid Diagnostic Test (RDT) device based on immunochromatographic test (ICT) format, for malarial parasite. This study was carried out at Balipara, a remote village 64 km away from Bandarban Hill District headquarters, during January 2007 to September 2007. A total 271 patients who reported to Sickbay of 37 Rifle Battalion, Balipara were tested by MALARIAGEN MALARIA Pf/Pv Antigen Rapid Test kit on the spot. Thick & thin blood films were prepared and stained by laboratory technician at the sick bay, properly labeled, preserved and sent to pathologist working at Armed Forces Medical College, Dhaka Cantonment, Dhaka for microscopy. Three (1.11%) cases were excluded as control band of RDT were negative or test band appeared after long incubation. Six (2.22%) were excluded for poor quality of staining blood film. Among 262 cases malarial parasites were detected in 74(28.24%). Of these 62(83.78%) were Plasmodium falciparum and 12(16.22%) were Plasmodium vivax. Parasite count ranged from 2500/mµL to 527500/mµL with mean 67400/mµL (+/-93400). Among 262 cases, 97(37.02%) were positive for malarial antigen(s) in RDT. Of these 74(76.29%) were P. falciparum and 23(23.71%) were P. vivax. Overall sensitivity and specificity of RDT for detection of malarial antigen(s) irrespective of their species were 95.95% and 86.71% respectively with positive and negative predictive value 73% & 98% respectively. Relative to microscopy, the device has shown sensitivity 94.6% and specificity 88.52% for detection of P. falciparum with positive and negative predictive value 72% and 98% respectively. The device sensitivity and specificity for detection of P. vivax were 100% and 93.1% with respective positive and negative predictive value 47% and 100%. Malariagen Malaria Pf/Pv Antigen Rapid Test (RDT) performs as a better sensor and discriminator of malarial parasites and their species and appears to be an acceptable tool for diagnosis of malaria in symptomatic patient.Parasight F test compared with the polymerase chain reaction and microscopy for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in travelers.Imported malaria is an increasing problem worldwide. A rapid and accurate test for Plasmodium falciparum infection would facilitate the diagnosis of malaria in the returned traveler. The ParaSight F antigen capture assay (dipstick test) is a new diagnostic test for P. falciparum based on detection of circulating histidine-rich protein-2 antigen. We performed a blinded evaluation of this assay compared with microscopy and the polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for the detection of P. falciparum infection in 151 febrile travelers. Compared with the PCR, the dipstick test had a sensitivity of 88% and a specificity of 97%. The ability of the dipstick test to detect P. falciparum was similar with that of microscopy (88% versus 83%) since the species of Plasmodium in 14 of 133 malaria-infected patients could not be determined by microscopy due to low parasite numbers. The dipstick test was 40% sensitive for infections with < 50 parasites/microliter, 89% with 50-100 parasites/microliter, and > or = 93% with > 100 parasites/microliter. Circulating antigen was detectable in 68% of the patients seven days after initiation of treatment and in 27% at day 28. The dipstick test represents a simple and accurate test for the diagnosis of P. falciparum infection in the returned traveler.Performance of three multi-species rapid diagnostic tests for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax malaria in Oromia Regional State, Ethiopia.Malaria transmission in Ethiopia is unstable and variable, caused by both Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax. The Federal Ministry of Health (FMoH) is scaling up parasitological diagnosis of malaria at all levels of the health system; at peripheral health facilities this will be through use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs). The present study compared three RDT products to provide the FMoH with evidence to guide appropriate product selection.Performance of three multi-species (pf-HRP2/pan-pLDH and pf-HRP2/aldolase) RDTs (CareStart, ParaScreen and ICT Combo) was compared with 'gold standard' microscopy at three health centres in Jimma zone, Oromia Regional State. Ease of RDT use by health extension workers was assessed at community health posts. RDT heat stability was tested in a controlled laboratory setting according to WHO procedures.A total of 2,383 patients with suspected malaria were enrolled between May and July 2009, 23.2% of whom were found to be infected with Plasmodium parasites by microscopy. All three RDTs were equally sensitive in detecting P. falciparum or mixed infection: 85.6% (95% confidence interval 81.2-89.4). RDT specificity was similar for detection of P. falciparum or mixed infection at around 92%. For detecting P. vivax infection, all three RDTs had similar sensitivity in the range of 82.5 to 85.0%. CareStart had higher specificity in detecting P. vivax (97.2%) than both ParaScreen and ICT Combo (p < 0.001 and p = 0.05, respectively). Health extension workers preferred CareStart and ParaScreen to ICT Combo due to the clear labelling of bands on the cassette, while the 'lab in a pack' style of CareStart was the preferred design. ParaScreen and CareStart passed all heat stability testing, while ICT Combo did not perform as well.CareStart appeared to be the most appropriate option for use at health posts in Ethiopia, considering the combination of quantitative performance, ease of use and heat stability. When new products become available, the choice of multi-species RDT for Ethiopia should be regularly re-evaluated, as it would be desirable to identify a test with higher sensitivity than the ones evaluated here.Parasight-F dipstick antigen test in the diagnosis of falciparum malaria in Ethiopia.To determine the shelf life, rapidity and diagnostic performance of ParaSight-F.Prospective randomised study.Malaria diagnostic and treatment posts and health centres in central-southern part of the Ethiopian Rift Valley.Three hundred and eighty two subjects randomly selected.Double blind evaluation of the sensitivity, specificity and predictive values of PFT versus CBF.The point prevalence was found to be 29.7% with species dominance of P. falciparum to P. vivax in the ratio of 4:1. The ParaSight-F test showed, considering P. falciparum only, a sensitivity of 92.5% and specificity of 93%. A remarkably high positive predictive value (PPV) of 82% as well as a negative predictive value (NPV) of 99% was obtained. Considering all species of Plasmodium, sensitivity was 78.6% and specificity 93%, with PPV and NPV of 82% and 91% respectively. Moreover, PFT was found to be rapid with a batch of ten-strips--a rack completed in 30 to 50 minutes, which was five to six times faster than CBF reading. In shelf-life studies, after one year of storage at room temperature, results were found similar to the original readings, indicating the stability and long durability of the test strips.In their durability and high diagnostic performances, both the microscopic slide readings and PFT were found comparable and interchangeable, and advantage in endemic areas where laboratory facilities are not available. The rapidity of PFT may be of greater value during malaria epidemics. But during non-epidemic seasons, the inability of PFT not to detect all forms of malaria remains a draw back.Evaluation of the Makromed dipstick assay versus PCR for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in returned travelers.Microscopy has been the traditional reference standard for malaria diagnosis. However, difficulty in maintaining the required technical skills, particularly in areas where malaria is not endemic, has prompted the development of rapid nonmicroscopic diagnostic assays based on the detection of malaria parasite antigen in whole blood. In this study, we evaluated the performance of one such device, the Makromed dipstick test, blindly compared to PCR and microscopy for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in 200 febrile returned travelers. The Makromed assay detects the presence of P. falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein II with an antigen capture immunochromatographic strip format. Compared to PCR as the reference standard, the dipstick assay had a sensitivity of 97.0% and a specificity of 96.0%. The positive and negative predictive values were 81.2% and 99.5%, respectively. Rapid malaria diagnostic devices may provide a useful diagnostic adjunct in a clinical setting.Evaluation of the KAT-Quick Malaria Rapid Test for rapid diagnosis of falciparum malaria in Thailand.In recent years, several rapid diagnostic tests for falciparum malaria have been developed. KAT test results were compared with microscopy on 90 consecutive patients hospitalized at the Hospital for Tropical Diseases, Bangkok, Thailand. Fifty-one patients had P. falciparum infections while 49 had malaria due to other plasmodium species. For a geometric mean +/-SD (Min;Max;range) parasitemia of 11,481 +/- 5.0 (88;713,838;713,750), the sensitivity of the KAT test was 96% (95% CI = 86-99.5), the specificity was 92% (95% CI = 80-99), the accuracy was 94% and the reliability was 85%. These findings suggest that the KAT test is of potential interest in the diagnosis of falciparum malaria in Thailand.Modeling the financial and clinical implications of malaria rapid diagnostic tests in the case-management of older children and adults in Kenya.Using data on clinical practices for outpatients 5 years and older, test accuracy, and malaria prevalence, we model financial and clinical implications of malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) under the new artemether-lumefantrine (AL) treatment policy in one high and one low malaria prevalence district in Kenya. In the high transmission district, RDTs as actually used would improve malaria treatment (61% less over-treatment but 8% more under-treatment) and lower costs (21% less). Nonetheless, the majority of patients with malaria would not be correctly treated with AL. In the low transmission district, especially because the treatment policy was new and AL was not widely used, RDTs as actually used would yield a minor reduction in under-treatment errors (36% less but the base is small) with 41% higher costs. In both districts, adherence to revised clinical practices with RDTs has the potential to further decrease treatment errors with acceptable costs.Invalid result of Plasmodium falciparum malaria detection with the BinaxNOW Malaria rapid diagnostic test.Evaluation of the RealArt Malaria LC real-time PCR assay for malaria diagnosis.PCR-based methods have advantages over traditional microscopic methods for the diagnosis of malaria, especially in cases of low parasitemia and mixed infections. However, current PCR-based assays are often labor-intensive and not readily quantifiable and have the potential for contamination due to a requirement for postamplification sample handling. Real-time PCR can address these limitations. This study evaluated the performance characteristics of a commercial malaria real-time PCR assay (RealArt Malaria LC Assay; Artus GmbH, Hamburg, Germany) on the LightCycler platform for the detection of malaria parasites in 259 febrile returned travelers. Compared to nested PCR as the reference standard, the real-time assay had a sensitivity of 99.5%, specificity of 100%, positive predictive value of 100%, and negative predictive value of 99.6% for the detection of malaria. Our results indicate that the RealArt assay is a rapid (<45 min), sensitive, and specific method for the detection of malaria in returned travelers.Evaluation of a rapid immunochromatographic card test for Plasmodium falciparum in Ibadan, Nigeria.This short report describes the results of a rapid, simple and cost effective immunodiagnostic test for malaria in Ibadan, Nigeria. A total of 77% patients presenting at the children outpatient clinic, University College Hospital with malaria symptoms were screened for malaria parasites by microscopy using Giemsa stain and by the immunochromatographic card test. The immunodiagnostic test had a sensitivity of 93.1% and a specificity of 95.8%, making a good alternative for malaria diagnosis especially in rural areas without electricity, where microscopy is not possible, and a decision is to be made on when to start treatment.PfHRP2 and PfLDH antigen detection for monitoring the efficacy of artemisinin-based combination therapy (ACT) in the treatment of uncomplicated falciparum malaria.An assessment of the accuracy of two malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP2) or Pf lactate dehydrogenase (PfLDH) was undertaken in children aged between six and 59 months included in an anti-malarial efficacy study in Benin.In Allada (Benin), 205 children aged 6-59 months with falciparum malaria received either artesunate-amodiaquine (ASAQ), artemether-lumefantrine (AL), or sulphadoxine-pyrimethamine (SP). Children included in the study were simultaneously followed by both RDT and high-quality microscopy for up to 42 days.At the time of inclusion, PfHRP2-based tests were positive in 203 children (99%) and PfLDH-based tests were positive in 204 (99.5%). During follow-up, independent of the treatment received, only 17.3% (28/162) of children effectively cured were negative with the PfHRP2 RDT at day 3, with a gradual increase in specificity until day 42. The specificity of antigen detection with the PfLDH test was 87% (141/162) on day 3, and between 92% and 100% on days 7 to 42. A statistical difference was observed between the persistence of PfHRP2 and PfLDH antigenaemia during follow-up in children treated with artemisinin-based combination therapy (ACT) but not with SP.Although both RDTs are as sensitive as microscopy in detecting true malaria cases, the PfHRP2 RDT had very low specificity during follow-up until day 28. On the other hand, the PfLDH test could be used to detect failures and, therefore, to assess anti-malarial efficacy.Evaluation of four rapid diagnostic tests for the diagnosis of Plasmodium vivax in Korea.To evaluate 4 rapid malaria diagnostic kits (RDTs) in Korea: OptiMAL test, SD BIOLINE Malaria Ag P.f/Pan test, Humasis Malaria P.f/Pan antigen test and CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test.Hundred malaria patients with Plasmodium vivax (P. vivax) and 100 healthy volunteers were recruited. The results from earlier four RDTs were compared with the reference standard, the Giemsa-stained traditional microscopic diagnosis.Compared with the reference standard, the sensitivity and specificity for Plasmodium vivax were 92.7 and 100% for SD BIOLINE Malaria Ag P.f/Pan; and 94.6% and 100% for OptiMAL; 95.5% and 100% for both Humasis Malaria P.f/Pan antigen test and CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test.The performances of all four malaria RDT kits were acceptable, although Humasis Malaria P.f/Pan antigen test and CareStart Malaria Pf/Pv Combo test gave superior performances with ROK isolates.Operational response to malaria epidemics: are rapid diagnostic tests cost-effective?To compare the cost-effectiveness of malaria treatment based on presumptive diagnosis with that of malaria treatment based on rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs).We calculated direct costs (based on experience from Ethiopia and southern Sudan) and effectiveness (in terms of reduced over-treatment) of a free, decentralised treatment programme using artesunate plus amodiaquine (AS + AQ) or artemether-lumefantrine (ART-LUM) in a Plasmodium falciparum epidemic. Our main cost-effectiveness measure was the incremental cost per false positive treatment averted by RDTs.As malaria prevalence increases, the difference in cost between presumptive and RDT-based treatment rises. The threshold prevalence above which the RDT-based strategy becomes more expensive is 21% in the AS + AQ scenario and 55% in the ART-LUM scenario, but these thresholds increase to 58 and 70%, respectively, if the financing body tolerates an incremental cost of 1 euro per false positive averted. However, even at a high (90%) prevalence of malaria consistent with an epidemic peak, an RDT-based strategy would only cost moderately more than the presumptive strategy: +29.9% in the AS + AQ scenario and +19.4% in the ART-LUM scenario. The treatment comparison is insensitive to the age and pregnancy distribution of febrile cases, but is strongly affected by variation in non-biomedical costs. If their unit price were halved, RDTs would be more cost-effective at a malaria prevalence up to 45% in case of AS + AQ treatment and at a prevalence up to 68% in case of ART-LUM treatment.In most epidemic prevalence scenarios, RDTs would considerably reduce over-treatment for only a moderate increase in costs over presumptive diagnosis. A substantial decrease in RDT unit price would greatly increase their cost-effectiveness, and should thus be advocated. A tolerated incremental cost of 1 euro is probably justified given overall public health and financial benefits. The RDTs should be considered for malaria epidemics if logistics and human resources allow.Antigen capture immuno-chromatographic strip format in detecting parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase to diagnose malaria in nonimmune patients.Several rapid diagnostic test devices (RDT) based on detection of malaria antigen in the whole blood were developed. OptiMal test the presence of parasite-specific lactate dehydrogenase (LDH) enzyme using three monoclonal antibodies was used. Two monoclonal antibodies were pan-specific and recognized all malaria species. The third one was specific only for Plasmodium falciparum. The parasite antigens were detected using an antigen-capture immunochromatographic strip format. One hundred-nine malaria positive and 730 malaria negative cases diagnosed by microscopy were included. 75/109 were P. falciparum 26 as P. vivax, 3 P. malariae and 5 mixed infection of P. falciparum & P. vivax. The RDT showed a low sensitivity (85%, 95% Confidence Interval [CI], 79-92%) with a much lower sensitivity in detecting species other than P. falciparum as well as in mixed infections. The sensitivity was 50% for less than 200 parasites/micro. The sensitivity of OptiMal for P. falciparum was 87% (95% CI, 79-94), 81% (95% CI, 66-96) for P. vivax, and failed with P. malariae. Mixed infections were misdiagnosed as Pfalciparum. The sensitivity of OptiMal was quite good in detecting both P. falciparum & P. vivax (98%; 95% CI, 97-99 & 100%; 95% CI, 100-100 respectively) and 99% (95% CI, 98-99) for all species. The positive and negative ratio for all malaria species was: (+LR = 62.3, -LR = 0.01); for P. falciparum (+LR = 38.9, -LR = 0.01) and for P. vivax (+LR = 0.8077/0, -LR = 0.2). The test value to assess drug resistance in post treatment days was discussed.The diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection in Gambian children, by field staff using the rapid, manual, ParaSight-F test.A rapid immunodiagnostic test for Plasmodium falciparum, the ParaSight-F test, was evaluated in the diagnosis of malaria in 139 children with uncomplicated malaria, who presented at the Medical Research Council's clinic at Basse in Upper River division, The Gambia. The aim was to evaluate the performance and usefulness of the test as a diagnostic method in a malaria-endemic area, when performed by a field worker. Compared with microscopy, the test had a sensitivity of 96.5%, a specificity of 90.5%, a negative predictive value of 94.2% and a positive predictive value of 94.3%. Because of its sensitivity, specificity and simplicity, the ParaSight-F test will be of value in situations where microscopy is not possible.Evaluation of the OnSite (Pf/Pan) rapid diagnostic test for diagnosis of clinical malaria.Accurate diagnosis of malaria is an essential prerequisite for proper treatment and drug resistance monitoring. Microscopy is considered the gold standard for malaria diagnosis but has limitations. ELISA, PCR, and Real Time PCR are also used to diagnose malaria in reference laboratories, although their application at the field level is currently not feasible. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) however, have been brought into field operation and widely adopted in recent days. This study evaluates OnSite (Pf/Pan) antigen test, a new RDT introduced by CTK Biotech Inc, USA for malaria diagnosis in a reference setting.Blood samples were collected from febrile patients referred for malaria diagnosis by clinicians. Subjects were included in this study from two different Upazila Health Complexes (UHCs) situated in two malaria endemic districts of Bangladesh. Microscopy and nested PCR were considered the gold standard in this study. OnSite (Pf/Pan) RDT was performed on preserved whole blood samples.In total, 372 febrile subjects were included in this study. Of these subjects, 229 (61.6%) tested positive for Plasmodium infection detected by microscopy and nested PCR. OnSite (Pf/Pan) RDT was 94.2% sensitive (95% CI, 89.3-97.3) and 99.5% specific (95% CI, 97.4-00.0) for Plasmodium falciparum diagnosis and 97.3% sensitive (95% CI, 90.5-99.7) and 98.7% specific (95% CI, 96.6-99.6) for Plasmodium vivax diagnosis. Sensitivity varied with differential parasite count for both P. falciparum and P. vivax. The highest sensitivity was observed in febrile patients with parasitaemia that ranged from 501-1,000 parasites/μL regardless of the Plasmodium species.The new OnSite (Pf/Pan) RDT is both sensitive and specific for symptomatic malaria diagnosis in standard laboratory conditions.Operational accuracy and comparative persistent antigenicity of HRP2 rapid diagnostic tests for Plasmodium falciparum malaria in a hyperendemic region of Uganda.Parasite-based diagnosis of malaria by microscopy requires laboratory skills that are generally unavailable at peripheral health facilities. Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) require less expertise, but accuracy under operational conditions has not been fully evaluated in Uganda. There are also concerns about RDTs that use the antigen histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) to detect Plasmodium falciparum, because this antigen can persist after effective treatment, giving false positive test results in the absence of infection. An assessment of the accuracy of Malaria Pf immuno-chromatographic test (ICT) and description of persistent antigenicity of HRP2 RDTs was undertaken in a hyperendemic area of Uganda.Using a cross-sectional design, a total of 357 febrile patients of all ages were tested using ICT, and compared to microscopy as the gold standard reference. Two independent RDT readings were used to assess accuracy and inter-observer reliability. With a longitudinal design to describe persistent antigenicity of ICT and Paracheck, 224 children aged 6-59 months were followed up at 7-day intervals until the HRP2 antigens where undetectable by the RDTs.Of the 357 patients tested during the cross-sectional component, 40% (139) had positive blood smears for asexual forms of P. falciparum. ICT had an overall sensitivity of 98%, a specificity of 72%, a negative predictive value (NPV) of 98% and a positive predictive value (PPV) of 69%. ICT showed a high inter-observer reliability under operational conditions, with 95% of readings having assigned the same results (kappa statistics 0.921, p < 0.001). In children followed up after successful antimalaria treatment, the mean duration of persistent antigenicity was 32 days, and this duration varied significantly depending on pre-treatment parasitaemia. In patients with parasite density >50,000/microl, the mean duration of persistent antigenicity was 37 days compared to 26 days for parasitaemia less than 1,000/microl (log rank 21.9, p < 0.001).ICT is an accurate and appropriate test for operational use as a diagnostic tool where microscopy is unavailable. However, persistent antigenicity reduces the accuracy of this and other HRP2-based RDTs. The low specificity continues to be of concern, especially in children below five years of age. These pose limitations that need consideration, such as their use for diagnosis of patients returning with symptoms within two to four weeks of treatment. Good clinical skills are essential to interpret test results.A field trial of the ParaSight-F test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection.The rapid manual ParaSight-F test for Plasmodium falciparum is an antigen capture test detecting trophozoite-derived histidine rich protein II, is simple and provides a definitive diagnosis within 10 min. Compared with 913 thick blood film examinations, the ParaSight-F test had 93.4% sensitivity and 98.2% specificity. Compared with 520 blood samples within the same study examined with the aid of the polymerase chain reaction, the ParaSight-F test had 91.6% sensitivity and 99.4% specificity. The ParaSight-F test could be a valuable diagnostic tool for falciparum malaria in any situation requiring rapid diagnosis in the absence of microscopical examination.Comparison of methods for the rapid laboratory assessment of children with malaria.Rapid diagnosis and accurate quantification of Plasmodium falciparum parasitemia are important for the management of malaria. The assessment of disease severity also depends on evaluation of metabolic indexes such as blood glucose and lactate concentrations. Here we describe an accurate and rapid alternative to conventional thick film examination (Lambaréné method). We also assess near-patient methods for measuring blood glucose (OneTouch) and lactate (Accusport). The accuracy of the Lambaréné method is similar to that of thin films. Results from the OneTouch glucose meter also are in good agreement with a YSI 2300 reference meter. Overall, the Accusport lactate meter agrees poorly with the YSI 2300 reference meter. However, the sensitivity and specificity to detect hyperlactatemia (blood lactate > or = 5 mmol/L) are 0.94 and 0.98, respectively.Detection of histidine rich protein 2 and panmalarial ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test antigens after chloroquine treatment of uncomplicated falciparum malaria does not reliably predict treatment outcome in eastern Indonesia.In regions with drug-resistant malaria, the ability to rapidly detect or predict treatment failure (TF) soon after a course of standard therapy for Plasmodium falciparum malaria would facilitate the prompt institution of second-line therapy. We thus evaluated longitudinally the ability of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv immunochromatographic test to predict treatment outcome. Sixty-six Sumbanese Indonesians with uncomplicated falciparum malaria were treated with chloroquine and followed for 28 days by use of 1997 World Health Organization criteria for assessment of therapeutic efficacy of antimalarial drugs. The ICT Pf/Pv testing could be compared with microscopy in approximately half of the patients on each day of follow-up. Although strongly positive histidine rich protein 2 (HRP2) line intensities (equal to or greater than the control band) in convalescence were highly predictive of TF, any degree of positivity for the HRP2 and panmalarial antigens in convalescence was only moderately predictive of TE Positive predictive values of the HRP2 and panmalarial antigens for TF were 76.9% and 87.0%, respectively, on Day 3, 82.4% and 87.5% on Day 7, and 78.9% and 78.9% on Day 14. Negative HRP2 and panmalarial antigen results in convalescence were even less predictive of an adequate clinical response, and false-negative HRP2 and panmalarial antigen test results were found in one-sixth (6 of 37) of recrudescent infections diagnosed by microscopy among patients with late treatment failure. To reliably predict treatment outcome with rapid antigen tests, further development appears necessary to improve sensitivity for viable asexual parasites while avoiding detection of both gametocytes and persistent antigen in convalescence.Co-reactivity of plasmodial histidine-rich protein 2 and aldolase on a combined immuno-chromographic-malaria dipstick (ICT) as a potential semi-quantitative marker of high Plasmodium falciparum parasitaemia.The combined immuno-chromographic-malaria dipstick (ICT) for the rapid diagnosis of malaria detects both Plasmodium falciparum (P.f.)-specific, histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP-2) and a plasmodial aldolase expressed by all Plasmodium species pathogenic to humans. ICT was applied in 674 febrile returnees from malaria-endemic regions attending our Tropical Diseases Unit. Microscopy confirmed malaria in 69/674 cases, of whom 67/69 had returned from Africa or Madagascar, and 2/69 from the Caribbean. Monoparasitic P.f. infection occurred in 52/69, mixed infection was due to P.f.+ P. ovale (P.o.) in 3/69, and P.f.+P. malariae (P.m.) in 1/69 cases. Monoparasitic P. vivax (P.v.) infection occurred in 8/69 , P.o. in 3/69, and P.m. in 2/69 cases . Whereas a positive HRP-2 band on the test was a highly sensitive indicator for P.f. infection (52/52 patients; sensitivity 100%), this was not the case for a positive aldolase band (25/52 patients; sensitivity 48.1%). Sensitivity of aldolase band for non-falciparum plasmodia was even lower: aldolase was positive in only 3/8 (37.5%) of patients with vivax malaria, and in 0/5 cases with P.o.- or P.m. infection. Co-reaction of both bands occurred more frequently in patients with P.f. parasitaemia of > or =40,000/microl (20/25, 80.0%) as compared to patients with P.f. parasitaemia <40,000/microl (5/27, 18.5%; P<0.00005), and to patients with mixed infection (P.f.+ P.o., P.f.+ P.m.: 2/4, 50.0%; diff. n.s.). In our series, co-reaction of HRP-2 and aldolase indicated monoparasitic falciparum malaria with high P.f. parasitaemia, rather than mixed infection. Whereas the aldolase band is not a reliable qualitative marker for malaria, co-reaction of HRP-2 and aldolase band may have a potential for indicating high parasitaemia in falciparum malaria.Rapid diagnostic tests for the home-based management of malaria, in a high-transmission area.Rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) are sometimes recommended to improve the home-based management of malaria. The accuracy of an RDT for the detection of clinical malaria and the presence of malarial parasites has recently been evaluated in a high-transmission area of southern Mali. During the same study, the cost-effectiveness of a 'test-and-treat' strategy for the home-based management of malaria (based on an artemisinin-combination therapy) was compared with that of a 'treat-all' strategy. Overall, 301 patients, of all ages, each of whom had been considered a presumptive case of uncomplicated malaria by a village healthworker, were checked with a commercial RDT (Paracheck-Pf). The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of this test, compared with the results of microscopy and two different definitions of clinical malaria, were then determined. The RDT was found to be 82.9% sensitive (with a 95% confidence interval of 78.0%-87.1%) and 78.9% (63.9%-89.7%) specific compared with the detection of parasites by microscopy. In the detection of clinical malaria, it was 95.2% (91.3%-97.6%) sensitive and 57.4% (48.2%-66.2%) specific compared with a general practitioner's diagnosis of the disease, and 100.0% (94.5%-100.0%) sensitive but only 30.2% (24.8%-36.2%) specific when compared against the fulfillment of the World Health Organization's (2003) research criteria for uncomplicated malaria. Among children aged 0-5 years, the cost of the 'test-and-treat' strategy, per episode, was about twice that of the 'treat-all' (U.S.$1.0. v. U.S.$0.5). In older subjects, however, the two strategies were equally costly (approximately U.S.$2/episode). In conclusion, for children aged 0-5 years in a high-transmission area of sub-Saharan Africa, use of the RDT was not cost-effective compared with the presumptive treatment of malaria with an ACT. In older patients, use of the RDT did not reduce costs. The question remains whether either of the strategies investigated can be made affordable for the affected population.Comparative performance of the ParaSight F test for detection of Plasmodium falciparum in malaria-immune and nonimmune populations in Irian Jaya, Indonesia.A comparison was made of the performance of the ParaSight F test (F test) for detection of Plasmodium falciparum in blood from malaria-immune (410 native Irianese) and nonimmune (369 new transmigrants) populations in Irian Jaya, Indonesia, where malaria is hyperendemic and all four species of human malaria occur. There were highly significant differences between populations in the sensitivity (Irianese, 60% versus transmigrants, 84%; P < 0.001) and specificity (Irianese, 97% versus transmigrants, 84%; P < 0.001) of the F test. The test had comparably high levels of sensitivity for Irianese children aged < or = 10 years, both age groups of transmigrants (76-85%), but low sensitivity for Irianese aged > 10 years (40%), among whom only 7% of parasitaemias < 120 per microliter and 69% of those > 120 per microliter were detected. Specificity was comparably high for transmigrant children aged < or = 10 years and both age groups of Irianese (93-98%). The low specificity for transmigrants aged > 10 years (79%) was due to a preponderance of false positives, frequently identified by microscopy as P. vivax. The results suggest that comparison based on microscopy underestimated the performance of the ParaSight F test and that malaria immune status, irrespective of P. falciparum density, may influence the test's sensitivity.The ParaSight F test uses a nonmicroscopic dipstick approach to the rapid detection of Plasmodium falciparum in blood. The performance of this test was assessed in serum samples collected in Irian Jaya, Indonesia, from 410 native Irianese (malaria-immune) and 369 new transmigrants (nonimmune). Of particular interest was the capability of the F test to detect P. falciparum prevalence among children, whose immunity is less than that of adults. There were highly significant differences by population in the F test's sensitivity (60% for Irianese vs. 84% for transmigrants) and specificity (97% for Irianese vs. 84% for transmigrants). The test had high sensitivity levels (76-85%) for Irianese children 10 years of age and under and both child and adult transmigrants, but low sensitivity (40%) for Irianese over 10 years of age. Specificity was comparably high (93-98%) for transmigrant children and both age groups of Irianese. The low specificity (79%) for transmigrants over 10 years of age reflected a preponderance of false positives, frequently identified by microscopy as P. vivax. These findings suggest that microscopy comparisons underestimate the performance of the ParaSight F test and that malaria immune status, regardless of P. falciparum density, may influence the test's sensitivity.Evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test specific for Plasmodium vivax.Plasmodium vivax is the only human malaria indigenous to the Republic of Korea (ROK). A rapid and sensitive diagnostic test (RDT) that detects P. vivax is appropriate for evaluating suspected malaria patients with no travel history abroad. The RDTs, SD Malaria Antigen P.v (SD diagnostic, Kyonggi, ROK) specific for P. vivax and the well documented OptiMAL (DiaMed, Cressier, Switzerland) were compared among 282 volunteers for specificity and sensitivity of P. vivax and Plasmodium falciparum malaria infections against Giemsa-stained blood smears read by an experienced microscopist. A total of 137 volunteers were diagnosed with P. vivax, 45 cases (returned travellers from overseas) were diagnosed with P. falciparum and 100 healthy volunteers were diagnosed as negative for malaria. Correspondingly, the SD Malaria Antigen P.v test identified P. vivax infections in 128/137 malaria patients (93.4%) and 0/100 (0%) healthy volunteers. Three patients identified with P. falciparum also were interpreted as P. vivax by the SD Malaria Antigen P.v test; however, these patients were later confirmed as mixed infections of P. vivax and P. falciparum by polymerase chain reaction. OptiMAL interpreted the three mixed infections only as P. falciparum and detected 130/137 (94.9%) patients with P. vivax. The sensitivity of the SD Malaria Antigen P.v test decreased from 100% (>5000 parasite/microl) to 81.3% (1-100 parasites/microl) as parasitaemia levels declined. For the regions where P. vivax is the primary malaria parasite, the SD P. vivax-specific rapid diagnostic test may be useful for screening suspected malaria patients when sufficient material and human resources (e.g. trained microscopists) are unavailable for malaria diagnosis.Comparative field performance and adherence to test results of four malaria rapid diagnostic tests among febrile patients more than five years of age in Blantyre, Malawi.Malaria rapid diagnostics tests (RDTs) can increase availability of laboratory-based diagnosis and improve the overall management of febrile patients in malaria endemic areas. In preparation to scale-up RDTs in health facilities in Malawi, an evaluation of four RDTs to help guide national-level decision-making was conducted.A cross sectional study of four histidine rich-protein-type-2- (HRP2) based RDTs at four health centres in Blantyre, Malawi, was undertaken to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of RDTs, assess prescriber adherence to RDT test results and explore operational issues regarding RDT implementation. Three RDTs were evaluated in only one health centre each and one RDT was evaluated in two health centres. Light microscopy in a reference laboratory was used as the gold standard.A total of 2,576 patients were included in the analysis. All of the RDTs tested had relatively high sensitivity for detecting any parasitaemia [Bioline SD (97%), First response malaria (92%), Paracheck (91%), ICT diagnostics (90%)], but low specificity [Bioline SD (39%), First response malaria (42%), Paracheck (68%), ICT diagnostics (54%)]. Specificity was significantly lower in patients who self-treated with an anti-malarial in the previous two weeks (odds ratio (OR) 0.5; p-value < 0.001), patients 5-15 years old versus patients > 15 years old (OR 0.4, p-value < 0.001) and when the RDT was performed by a community health worker versus a laboratory technician (OR 0.4; p-value < 0.001). Health workers correctly prescribed anti-malarials for patients with positive RDT results, but ignored negative RDT results with 58% of patients with a negative RDT result treated with an anti-malarial.The results of this evaluation, combined with other published data and global recommendations, have been used to select RDTs for national scale-up. In addition, the study identified some key issues that need to be further delineated: the low field specificity of RDTs, variable RDT performance by different cadres of health workers and the need for a robust quality assurance system. Close monitoring of RDT scale-up will be needed to ensure that RDTs truly improve malaria case management.Diagnosis of malaria by detection of Plasmodium falciparum HRP-2 antigen with a rapid dipstick antigen-capture assay.Two field studies in Kenya and an experimental challenge study in the USA were done to assess the accuracy of a dipstick antigen-capture assay based on qualitative detection of Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 (PfHRP-2) in peripheral blood for diagnosis of P falciparum infection. In these studies, the assay was 96.5-100% sensitive for detection of greater than 60 P falciparum asexual parasites/microL blood, 70-81% sensitive for 11-60 parasites/microL blood, and 11-67% sensitive for 10 parasites or less/microL blood. Specificity was 95% (95% CI 85-105%; n = 20) among naive American volunteers, 98% (96-101%; n = 112) among volunteers exposed to the bite of P falciparum-infected mosquitoes, and 88% (84-92%; n = 285) among Kenyans living in an area with holoendemic malaria. Our results also indicated that PfHRP-2 antigen was not detectable in blood 6 days after initiation of curative chemotherapy, and suggest that such circulating antigens rarely lead to false-positive tests. The dipstick assay's sensitivity, specificity, simplicity, and speed may make it an important tool in the battle against malaria.Development and evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test for Plasmodium falciparum, P. vivax, and mixed-species malaria antigens.Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax malaria are endemic to many parts of the world and humans can be co-infected with both species. Because each Plasmodium species has different biological and clinical characteristics, accurate differentiation of the infecting species is essential for effective treatment. Therefore, we produced three monoclonal antibodies that recognize the lactate dehydrogenase of P. falciparum, P. vivax, or both to develop the first P. falciparum, P. vivax, and mixed-species infections malaria antigen detection kit. The detection limits of this kit were 150 and 250 parasites/μL for P. falciparum and P. vivax, respectively, and the kit was able to detect mixed-species infections. The sensitivity and specificity of this kit was assessed with 722 clinical specimens. Our results showed that its sensitivities for P. falciparum, P. vivax, and mixed-species infection were 96.5%, 95.3%, and 85.7%, respectively. In addition, its specificity was high (99.4%).Diagnostic and prognostic utility of rapid strip (OptiMal and Paracheck) versus conventional smear microscopy in adult patients of acute, uncomplicated P. falciparum malaria in Mumbai, India.The present study compared the diagnostic and prognostic utility of two rapid tests the (Paracheck and OptiMal) versus conventional smear microscopy.Using two independent microscopists we carried out the three tests in 31 adult cases of smear positive, acute, uncomplicated Plasmodium falciparum malaria. All three tests were done pretreatment, and on Days 8, 15 and 29.Compared to microscopy, the Paracheck had a sensitivity of 100%, while the OptiMal had a sensitivity of 83.7%. The lower sensitivity of OptiMal resulted from misidentification by both microscopists of 6/31 cases as Plasmodium vivax. As a follow up tool, the OptiMal was better than Paracheck, due to the earlier disappearance of the parasite LDH. Also in the Paracheck, between microscopists, there was a significant difference in reading the tests, on Days 8 and 15.Our study reiterates, the continued utility of conventional smear microscopy.Dispensary level pilot implementation of rapid diagnostic tests: an evaluation of RDT acceptance and usage by providers and patients--Tanzania, 2005.Malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) may assist in diagnosis, improve prescribing practices and reduce potential drug resistance development. Without understanding operational issues or acceptance and usage by providers and patients, the costs of these tests may not be justified.To evaluate the impact of RDTs on prescribing behaviours, assess prescribers' and patients' perceptions, and identify operational issues during implementation.Baseline data were collected at six Tanzanian public dispensaries. RDTs were implemented for eight weeks and data collected on frequency of RDT use, results, malaria diagnoses and the prescription of antimalarials. Patients referred for RDTs completed a standardised exit interview. Qualitative methods assessed attitudes toward and satisfaction with RDTs, perceptions about the test and operational issues related to implementation.Of 595 patients at baseline, 200 (33%) were diagnosed clinically with malaria but had a negative RDT. Among the 2519 RDTs performed during implementation, 289 (11.5%) had a negative result and antimalarials prescribed. The proportion of "over-prescriptions" at baseline was 54.8% (198/365). At weeks four and eight this decreased to 16.1% (27/168) and 16.4% (42/256) respectively.A total of 355 patient or parent/caregiver and 21 prescriber individual interviews and 12 focus group discussions (FGDs) were conducted. Patients, caregivers and providers trusted RDT results, agreed that use of RDTs was feasible at dispensary level, and perceived that RDTs improved clinical diagnosis. Negative concerns included community suspicion and fear that RDTs were HIV tests, the need for additional supervision in interpreting the results, and increased work loads without added compensation.Overprescriptions decreased over the study period. There was a high degree of patient/caregiver and provider acceptance of and satisfaction with RDTs. Implementation should include community education, sufficient levels of training and supervision and consideration of the need for additional staff.Comparison of the novel Partec rapid malaria test to the conventional Giemsa stain and the gold standard real-time PCR.Malaria remains the single most frequent cause of death in Africa, killing one child every 30 s, but treatment decisions are often made only on clinical diagnosis, as laboratory techniques to confirm the clinical suspicion are labor intensive and costly. In this study, we evaluated the recently developed Partec rapid malaria test (PM) for the detection of Plasmodium spp. in human blood from patients in an area where malaria is endemic and compared the results with those of thick blood film Giemsa stain (GS) in terms of its performance and operational characteristics, using real-time (RT) PCR as the gold standard. The sensitivities of the PM and the GS were 62.2% (95% CI, 56.3 to 67.8) and 61.8% (95% CI, 55.9 to 67.4), respectively, while the specificities were 96.0% (95% CI, 92.3 to 98.3) and 98% (95% CI, 95.0 to 99.5), respectively. There was an excellent agreement between the results for the PM and those of the GS (k [level of agreement] = 0.96; P < 0.001). The results for the PM were obtained more quickly and at less cost than those for the GS. The performance characteristics of the PM were almost equal to those of the GS, but the operational characteristics were better, and the PM can therefore be considered as an alternative method for GS.The role of rapid diagnostic tests in managing malaria.Assessment of the prozone effect in malaria rapid diagnostic tests.The prozone effect (or high doses-hook phenomenon) consists of false-negative or false-low results in immunological tests, due to an excess of either antigens or antibodies. Although frequently cited as a cause of false-negative results in malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs), especially at high parasite densities of Plasmodium falciparum, it has been poorly documented. In this study, a panel of malaria RDTs was challenged with clinical samples with P. falciparum hyperparasitaemia (> 5% infected red blood cells).Twenty-two RDT brands were tested with seven samples, both undiluted and upon 10 x, 50 x and 100 x dilutions in NaCl 0.9%. The P. falciparum targets included histidine-rich protein-2 (HRP-2, n = 17) and P. falciparum-specific parasite lactate dehydrogenase (Pf-pLDH, n = 5). Test lines intensities were recorded in the following categories: negative, faint, weak, medium or strong. The prozone effect was defined as an increase in test line intensity of at least one category after dilution, if observed upon duplicate testing and by two readers.Sixteen of the 17 HRP-2 based RDTs were affected by prozone: the prozone effect was observed in at least one RDT sample/brand combination for 16/17 HRP-2 based RDTs in 6/7 samples, but not for any of the Pf-pLDH tests. The HRP-2 line intensities of the undiluted sample/brand combinations with prozone effect (n = 51) included a single negative (1.9%) and 29 faint and weak readings (56.9%). The other target lens (P. vivax-pLDH, pan-specific pLDH and aldolase) did not show a prozone effect.This study confirms the prozone effect as a cause of false-negative HRP-2 RDTs in samples with hyperparasitaemia.Multiplex real-time quantitative PCR, microscopy and rapid diagnostic immuno-chromatographic tests for the detection of Plasmodium spp: performance, limit of detection analysis and quality assurance.Accurate laboratory diagnosis of malaria species in returning travelers is paramount in the treatment of this potentially fatal infectious disease.A total of 466 blood specimens from returning travelers to Africa, Asia, and South/Central America with suspected malaria infection were collected between 2007 and 2009 at the reference public health laboratory. These specimens were assessed by reference microscopy, multipex real-time quantitative polymerase chain reaction (QPCR), and two rapid diagnostic immuno-chromatographic tests (ICT) in a blinded manner. Key clinical laboratory parameters such as limit of detection (LOD) analysis on clinical specimens by parasite stage, inter-reader variability of ICTs, staffing implications, quality assurance and cost analysis were evaluated.QPCR is the most analytically sensitive method (sensitivity 99.41%), followed by CARESTART (sensitivity 88.24%), and BINAXNOW (sensitivity 86.47%) for the diagnosis of malaria in returning travelers when compared to reference microscopy. However, microscopy was unable to specifically identify Plasmodia spp. in 18 out of 170 positive samples by QPCR. Moreover, the 17 samples that were negative by microscopy and positive by QPCR were also positive by ICTs. Quality assurance was achieved for QPCR by exchanging a blinded proficiency panel with another reference laboratory. The Kappa value of inter-reader variability among three readers for BINAXNOW and CARESTART was calculated to be 0.872 and 0.898 respectively. Serial dilution studies demonstrated that the QPCR cycle threshold correlates linearly with parasitemia (R(2) = 0.9746) in a clinically relevant dynamic range and retains a LOD of 11 rDNA copies/microl for P. falciparum, which was several log lower than reference microscopy and ICTs. LOD for QPCR is affected not only by parasitemia but the parasite stage distribution of each clinical specimen. QPCR was approximately 6-fold more costly than reference microscopy.These data suggest that multiplex QPCR although more costly confers a significant diagnostic advantage in terms of LOD compared to reference microscopy and ICTs for all four species. Quality assurance of QPCR is essential to the maintenance of proficiency in the clinical laboratory. ICTs showed good concordance between readers however lacked sensitivity for non-falciparum species due to antigenic differences and low parasitemia.Multiplex QPCR but not ICTs is an essential adjunct to microscopy in the reference laboratory detection of malaria species specifically due to the superior LOD. ICTs are better suited to the non-reference laboratory where lower specimen volumes challenge microscopy proficiency in the non-endemic setting.Informed decision-making before changing to RDT: a comparison of microscopy, rapid diagnostic test and molecular techniques for the diagnosis and identification of malaria parasites in Kassala, eastern Sudan.Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) are promoted for the diagnosis of malaria in many countries. The question arises whether laboratories where the current method of diagnosis is microscopy should also switch to RDT. This problem was studied in Kassala, Sudan where the issue of switching to RDT is under discussion.Two hundred and three blood samples were collected from febrile patients suspected of having malaria. These were subsequently analysed with microscopy, RDT (SD Bioline P.f/P.v) and PCR for the detection and identification of Plasmodium parasites.Malaria parasites were detected in 36 blood samples when examined microscopically, 54 (26.6%) samples were found positive for malaria parasites by RDT, and 44 samples were positive by PCR. Further analysis showed that the RDT used in our study resulted in a relatively high number of false positive samples. When microscopy was compared with PCR, an agreement of 96.1% and k = 0.88 (sensitivity 85.7% and specificity 100%) was found. However, when RDT was compared with PCR, an agreement of only 81.2 and k = 0.48 (sensitivity 69% and specificity 84%) was found.PCR has proven to be one of the most specific and sensitive diagnostic methods, particularly for malaria cases with low parasitaemia. However, this technique has limitations in its routine use under resource-limited conditions, such as our study location. At present, based on these results, microscopy remains the best option for routine diagnosis of malaria in Kassala, eastern Sudan.Comparative evaluation of two rapid field tests for malaria diagnosis: Partec Rapid Malaria Test® and Binax Now® Malaria Rapid Diagnostic Test.About 90% of all malaria deaths in sub-Saharan Africa occur in children under five years. Fast and reliable diagnosis of malaria requires confirmation of the presence of malaria parasites in the blood of patients with fever or history suggestive of malaria; hence a prompt and accurate diagnosis of malaria is the key to effective disease management. Confirmation of malaria infection requires the availability of a rapid, sensitive, and specific testing at an affordable cost. We compared two recent methods (the novel Partec Rapid Malaria Test® (PT) and the Binax Now® Malaria Rapid Diagnostic Test (BN RDT) with the conventional Giemsa stain microscopy (GM) for the diagnosis of malaria among children in a clinical laboratory of a hospital in a rural endemic area of Ghana.Blood samples were collected from 263 children admitted with fever or a history of fever to the pediatric clinic of the Agogo Presbyterian Hospital. The three different test methods PT, BN RDT and GM were performed independently by well trained and competent laboratory staff to assess the presence of malaria parasites. Results were analyzed and compared using GM as the reference standard.In 107 (40.7%) of 263 study participants, Plasmodium sp. was detected by GM. PT and BN RDT showed positive results in 111 (42.2%) and 114 (43.4%), respectively. Compared to GM reference standard, the sensitivities of the PT and BN RDT were 100% (95% CI: 96.6-100) and 97.2% (95% CI: 92.0-99.4), respectively, specificities were 97.4% (95% CI: 93.6-99.3) and 93.6% (95% CI: 88.5-96.9), respectively. There was a strong agreement (kappa) between the applied test methods (GM vs PT: 0.97; p < 0.001 and GM vs BN RDT: 0.90; p < 0.001). The average turnaround time per tests was 17 minutes.In this study two rapid malaria tests, PT and BN RDT, demonstrated a good quality of their performance compared to conventional GM. Both methods require little training, have short turnaround times, are applicable as well as affordable and can therefore be considered as alternative diagnostic tools in malaria endemic areas. The species of Plasmodium cannot be identified.Performance of malaria rapid diagnostic tests as part of routine malaria case management in Kenya.Data on malaria rapid diagnostic test (RDT) performance under routine program conditions are limited. We assessed the attributes of RDTs performed by study and health facility (HF) staffs as part of routine malaria case management of patients > or = 5 years of age in Kenya. Expert microscopy was used as our gold standard. A total of 1,827 patients were enrolled; 191 (11.6%) were parasitemic by expert microscopy. Sensitivity and specificity of RDTs performed by study staff were 86.6% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 79.8-93.5%) and 95.4% (95% CI: 93.9-96.9%), respectively. Among tests performed by HF staff, RDTs were 91.7% (95% CI: 80.8-100.0%) sensitive and 96.7% (95% CI: 92.8-100.0%) specific, whereas microscopy was 52.5% (95% CI: 33.2-71.9%) sensitive and 77.0% (95% CI: 67.9-86.2%) specific. Our findings suggest that RDTs perform better than microscopy under routine conditions. Further efforts are needed to maintain this high RDT performance over time.Evaluation of diagnostic methods of re-emerging malaria in Korean patients.Malaria is one of the most important parasitic diseases especially in tropical areas. Over 300 million people are affected and the condition causes 1-3 million deaths each year. It is transmitted by the bite of infected Anopheles mosquitoes. Although Korea was declared to be free of Malaria by the WHO in 1979, malaria re-emergence has been apparent since 1993 amongst soldiers located near the De-Militarized Zone (DMZ) in the northern part of the country. Conventional microscopic examination of thin and thick blood films demonstrates the presence of the parasite and thus this method has been used to confirm the diagnosis of malaria, but it is a labor-intensive procedure and relies upon subjective interpretation. To overcome these limitations, fast and reliable methods for malaria detection have been recently introduced. In this study, we compared three kinds of antibody detection kits and one biochemical test kit that determines the presence of Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) with conventional peripheral blood smears. The antibody detection methods examined were, two rapid test pack format methods and a single microplate format enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) kit, as manufactured by Korean companies. The sensitivities of the three commercial antibody detection kits in the early stage of malaria were 70.8%, 77.4%, and 63.6%, their corresponding specificities 90.5%, 91.8%, and 80.9%, and their accuracies 87.6%, 87.0%, and 76.7%. The sensitivity and specificity of the pLDH assay were 100% apiece and the results were in 100% concordance with the microscopy of thick blood films. Thus, the pLDH assay may be used as an alternative for conventional microscopic blood film examination, especially in emergency situations when prompt treatment is necessary.Over-diagnosis of malaria by microscopy in the Kilombero Valley, Southern Tanzania: an evaluation of the utility and cost-effectiveness of rapid diagnostic tests.Early and accurate diagnosis of febrile patients is essential to treat uncomplicated malaria cases properly, prevent severe malaria, and avert unnecessary anti-malarial treatments. Improper use of anti-malarials increases the risk of adverse drug reaction and the evolution of drug/parasite resistance. While microscopy is the most common form of malaria diagnosis, concerns over its accuracy have prompted the incorporation of malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) into many national malaria control programmes.Over a three-month period, a direct comparison between microscopy and RDTs was made in a rural, private dispensary in the Kilombero Valley, Morogoro District, southern Tanzania, with the aim of estimating the extent of malaria over-diagnosis and over-treatment with anti-malarials. The study cohort was made up of patients referred by the dispensary's clinician for malaria testing. One hundred percent of patients approached agreed to participate in this study and were then tested using both microscopy and RDTs. Using the results from the comparison of the two tests at this dispensary, the potential cost effectiveness of introducing RDTs to a neighbouring public health centre was estimated on the basis of this centre's past malaria records spanning December 2007 to August 2011.At the private dispensary, the apparent prevalence of malaria was 78% based on microscopy whereas the true prevalence, calculated using RDTs as the gold standard, was estimated at 14%. This discrepancy indicates that when using microscopy as the sole diagnostic test, malaria is being over-diagnosed by approximately a factor of five in this setting. At the public clinic, apparent malaria prevalence based on microscopy was 74%. If similar rates of over-diagnosis are assumed, 5,285 patients of the 6,769 patients positively diagnosed with malaria using microscopy were likely given unnecessary anti-malarials, and their true cause of illness was not addressed. The introduction of RDTs to the public clinic would be highly cost-efficient, with an estimated net saving of over 96 USD/month.Compared with RDTs, microscopy led to almost four out of five patients being over-diagnosed with malaria in this rural part of Tanzania. A policy that encompasses both the private and public sectors of health care is needed to ensure quality diagnostic testing for febrile patients. With estimated prevalence at 14%, RDT introduction is recommended given WHO findings that RDTs are predicted to be cost-effective in prevalence areas of less than 20%. The use of RDTs in malaria diagnosis would not only reduce government spending but would prove beneficial to ensuring appropriate care and treatment of febrile illness.Determinants of the accuracy of rapid diagnostic tests in malaria case management: evidence from low and moderate transmission settings in the East African highlands.The accuracy of malaria diagnosis has received renewed interest in recent years due to changes in treatment policies in favour of relatively high-cost artemisinin-based combination therapies. The use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) based on histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) synthesized by Plasmodium falciparum has been widely advocated to save costs and to minimize inappropriate treatment of non-malarial febrile illnesses. HRP2-based RDTs are highly sensitive and stable; however, their specificity is a cause for concern, particularly in areas of intense malaria transmission due to persistence of HRP2 antigens from previous infections.In this study, 78,454 clinically diagnosed malaria patients were tested using HRP2-based RDTs over a period of approximately four years in four highland sites in Kenya and Uganda representing hypoendemic to mesoendemic settings. In addition, the utility of the tests was evaluated in comparison with expert microscopy for disease management in 2,241 subjects in two sites with different endemicity levels over four months.RDT positivity rates varied by season and year, indicating temporal changes in accuracy of clinical diagnosis. Compared to expert microscopy, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the RDTs in a hypoendemic site were 90.0%, 99.9%, 90.0% and 99.9%, respectively. Corresponding measures at a mesoendemic site were 91.0%, 65.0%, 71.6% and 88.1%. Although sensitivities at the two sites were broadly comparable, levels of specificity varied considerably between the sites as well as according to month of test, age of patient, and presence or absence of fever during consultation. Specificity was relatively high in older age groups and increased towards the end of the transmission season, indicating the role played by anti-HRP2 antibodies. Patients with high parasite densities were more likely to test positive with RDTs than those with low density infections.RDTs may be effective when used in low endemicity situations, but high false positive error rates may occur in areas with moderately high transmission. Reports on specificity of RDTs and cost-effectiveness analyses on their use should be interpreted with caution as there may be wide variations in these measurements depending upon endemicity, season and the age group of patients studied.Assessment of malaria in pregnancy using rapid diagnostic tests and its association with HIV infection and hematologic parameters in South-Eastern Nigeria.P. falciparum malaria in pregnancy was evaluated using histidine-rich proteins-2 RDT and related to HIV infection and hematologic parameters. Prevalence of malaria, HIV and anemia were 19.7%, 3.1% and 17.2% respectively. Primigravidae were significantly more infected with malaria. Malaria was not significantly associated with anemia, blood group, genotype and HIV infection.Comparison of rapid diagnostic tests for the detection of Plasmodium vivax malaria in South Korea.South Korea is one of many countries with endemic Plasmodium vivax malaria. Here we report the evaluation of four rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for diagnosis of this disease. A total of 253 subjects were enrolled in the study. The sensitivities, specificities and agreement frequencies were estimated by comparing the four RDTs against the standard of nested-PCR and microscopic examination. The CareStart(TM) and SD Bioline had higher test sensitivities (99.4 and 98.8%, respectively) compared with the NanoSign and Asan Easy tests (93.0 and 94.7%, respectively). The CareStart(TM) and SD Bioline tests could detect P. vivax in samples with parasite densities <150/μl, which was a slightly better performance than the other two RDTs. The quantitative accuracy of the four RDTs was also estimated by comparing results with P. vivax counts from blood samples. Lower test price would result in increased use of these RDTs in the field. The results of this study contribute valuable information that will aid in the selection of a diagnostic method for the detection of malaria.The use of a dipstick antigen-capture assay for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection in a remote forested area of central India.A study was carried out in a highly malarious forested belt of central India (Madhya Pradesh) to evaluate the usefulness of a dipstick antigen-capture assay (ParaSight F) as a diagnostic method for Plasmodium falciparum appropriate for field use. In all, 1,231 patients with fever were screened in parallel with the taking of thick blood smears. The sensitivity and specificity of the dipstick test for detection of P. falciparum were 93% and 92.5%, respectively. Results also indicate that the dipstick test result became negative within seven days after initiation of curative chemotherapy in the majority of cases (95%). Tribal populations in remote forested areas are important reservoirs of P. falciparum that are mostly resistant to standard antimalarial drugs and a source of malaria to the rest of the country. Control of malaria is limited by inaccessibility, lack of medical services, public ignorance of the disease, and other technical problems. In this population, the dipstick assay was found to be highly accurate, simple, and rapid, suggesting that it may be used in remote forested areas without the need for microscopic examination. The simplicity of the dipstick test enabled administration of more effective and expensive antimalarials preventing further buildup and dissemination of resistant parasites and a return of symptoms.ParaSight-F rapid manual diagnostic test of Plasmodium falciparum infection.The ParaSight(R)-F test is a qualitative diagnostic test of Plasmodium falciparum, which is based on the detection by a monoclonal antibody of a species-specific soluble antigen (histidine-rich protein (HRP-II)) in whole blood and which can be performed without special equipment. A visual reading is given by a polyclonal antibody coupled with dye-loaded liposomes; when positive, a pink line appears. The test has been compared with microscopic examination of thin blood smears and with Quantitative Buffy Coat malaria test (QBC(R) in a single-blind study. A total of 358 patients who had returned to France from malarial areas and consulted their doctor with symptoms or for a routine examination were enrolled in the study; 33 of them were found to have a falciparum malaria infection by the diagnostic test. On the day of consultation, the specificity of the ParaSight(R)-F test was 99% and its sensitivity 94%. The follow-up of infected patients after treatment showed that the test became negative later than the other reference tests. There was no correlation between antigen persistence and the intensity of the ParaSight(R)-F signal or circulating parasitaemia. No cross-reaction was noted for seven malaria cases due to other Plasmodium species. The test was performed quickly (10 tests in 20 minutes), was easy to read, and required minimal space. For cases of imported malaria, the test's specificity and low threshold for detection could make it a valuable adjunct test. However, in its present form, it cannot replace microscopic techniques which are species-specific and quantitative. In endemic areas, the test seems to be very promising by its results and ease of use according to published field studies.Field evaluation of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv immunochromatographic test for the detection of asymptomatic malaria in a Plasmodium falciparum/vivax endemic area in Thailand.Rapid antigen assays provide an effective tool for the detection of malaria in symptomatic patients. However, the efficacy of these devices for detecting asymptomatic malaria, where parasite levels are normally significantly lower than in symptomatic patients, is less well established. We evaluated the efficacy of a new combined Plasmodium falciparum-Plasmodim vivax immunochromatographic test (ICT Malaria Pf/Pv) in a cross-sectional malaria survey of the village of Ban Kong Mong Tha, Kanchanaburi Provice, Thailand, from August to December 2000. A total of 1,976 bleeds were made from 559 individuals over the course of the study. Blinded microscopy of thick and thin blood films was used as the gold standard; all discordant and 10% of concordant results were cross-checked. Of 1,976 ICT Malaria Pf/Pv dipsticks tested, 98.3% (n = 1,943) performed as expected, as evidenced by the appearance of the control line. The ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test was both sensitive (100.0%) and specific (99.7 %) for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria with parasitemias of > or = 500 trophozoites/microL; however, only 15.9% (13/82) of infected individuals had parasitemia rates this high. When P. falciparum parasitemia rates were < 500/microL, the sensitivity of the diagnosis was only 23.3%, with a positive predictive value (PPV) and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 76.2 and 97.2%, respectively. The ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test was specific, but not sensitive, for the diagnosis of vivax malaria with parasite rates of > or = 500 trophozoites/microl, with sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV of 66.7%, 99.9%, 66.7%, and 99.9%, respectively. At parasite rates of < 500/microL, corresponding values were 0.0%, 99.9%, 0%, and 95.1%. Because of the relatively high cost of these assays, low parasite rates found in the majority of asymptomatic individuals, and low sensitivity of this assay with rates of < 500/microl, use of this assay as a tool for active case detection is of limited value in western Thailand.Comparison of CareStart™ HRP2/pLDH COMBO rapid malaria test with light microscopy in north-west Ethiopia.In Ethiopia, light microscopy is the gold standard for malaria diagnosis although it is not available in most peripheral health facilities. It is time consuming, requires trained personnel and needs careful preparation and application of reagents to ensure quality results. This study was aimed at testing the diagnostic performance of CareStart™ malaria rapid diagnostic test (RDT) with reference to light microscopy for the diagnosis of falciparum and vivax malaria in Ethiopia.Blood samples were collected from 254 patients suspected to have malaria at Kola Diba Health Center in the late malaria transmission peak season from November 2011 to December 2011. The samples were examined immediately by light microscopy and the RDT (CareStart™ Malaria HRP2/pLDH COMBO Test kit). Statistical analysis was performed using SPSS version 16 and the JavaStat two-way contingency table analysis.The overall sensitivity and specificity of CareStartTM RDT was found to be 95% (90-97.9%, 95% CI) and 94.2% (90.9-96%, 95% CI), respectively. The sensitivity of the CareStartTM RDT for Plasmodium falciparum or mixed infection was calculated to be 92.9% (82.5-98%, 95%CI) while a sensitivity of 90.9% (74.1-98.4%, 95%CI) was found for non-falciparum species. The specificity for P. falciparum or mixed infections was found to be 95.4% (92.5-96.8%, 95%CI) while it was 97.3% (94.8-98.4%, 95%CI) for non-falciparum species. There was an excellent agreement between the two tests with a kappa value of 0.918.The CareStartTM RDT test showed good sensitivity and specificity with an excellent agreement to the reference light microscopy. The RDT could therefore be used in place of light microscopy, which in poor set-ups cannot be used routinely.Rapid diagnosis of malaria--a new approach.Should countries implementing an artemisinin-based combination malaria treatment policy also introduce rapid diagnostic tests?Within the context of increasing antimalarial costs and or decreasing malaria transmission, the importance of limiting antimalarial treatment to only those confirmed as having malaria parasites becomes paramount. This motivates for this assessment of the cost-effectiveness of routine use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) as an integral part of deploying artemisinin-based combination therapies (ACTs).The costs and cost-effectiveness of using RDTs to limit the use of ACTs to those who actually have Plasmodium falciparum parasitaemia in two districts in southern Mozambique were assessed. To evaluate the potential impact of introducing definitive diagnosis using RDTs (costing $0.95), five scenarios were considered, assuming that the use of definitive diagnosis would find that between 25% and 75% of the clinically diagnosed malaria patients are confirmed to be parasitaemic. The base analysis compared two ACTs, artesunate plus sulfadoxine/pyrimethamine (AS+SP) costing $1.77 per adult treatment and artemether-lumefantrine (AL) costing $2.40 per adult treatment, as well as the option of restricting RDT use to only those older than six years. Sensitivity analyses considered lower cost ACTs and RDTs and different population age distributions.Compared to treating patients on the basis of clinical diagnosis, the use of RDTs in all clinically diagnosed malaria cases results in cost savings only when 29% and 52% or less of all suspected malaria cases test positive for malaria and are treated with AS+SP and AL, respectively. These cut-off points increase to 41.5% (for AS+SP) and to 74% (for AL) when the use of RDTs is restricted to only those older than six years of age. When 25% of clinically diagnosed patients are RDT positive and treated using AL, there are cost savings per malaria positive patient treated of up to $2.12. When more than 29% of clinically diagnosed cases are malaria test positive, the incremental cost per malaria positive patient treated is less than US$1. When relatively less expensive ACTs are introduced (e.g. current WHO preferential price for AL of $1.44 per adult treatment), the RDT price to the healthcare provider should be $0.65 or lower for RDTs to be cost saving in populations with between 30 and 52% of clinically diagnosed malaria cases being malaria test positive.While the use of RDTs in all suspected cases has been shown to be cost-saving when parasite prevalence among clinically diagnosed malaria cases is low to moderate, findings show that targeting RDTs at the group older than six years and treating children less than six years on the basis of clinical diagnosis is even more cost-saving. In semi-immune populations, young children carry the highest risk of severe malaria and many healthcare providers would find it harder to deny antimalarials to those who test negative in this age group.Prevalence and density-related concordance of three diagnostic tests for malaria in a region of Tanzania with hypoendemic malaria.Accurate malaria diagnosis has dual roles in identification of symptomatic persons for effective malaria treatment and also enumeration of asymptomatic persons who contribute to the epidemiologic determinants of transmission. Three currently used diagnostic tests, microscopy, rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs), and real-time PCR, all have different sensitivities and specificities, which are parasite density dependent. Here, we compare their concordance among 451 febrile episodes in a cohort of 2,058 children and adults followed over 6 months in a region in central Tanzania with hypoendemic malaria. Microscopy, a histidine-rich protein-based RDT, and two different real-time PCR gene probes detected Plasmodium falciparum in 20, 54, 41, and 78 episodes of fever, respectively. They had complete concordance in only 9 episodes. Real-time PCR with an 18S probe was more sensitive than with a mitochondrial probe for cytochrome b despite higher copy numbers of mitochondrial DNA. Both PCR yields were increased 4-fold by glycogen/acetate precipitation with low-speed centrifugation. Duplicate PCR increases low-density malaria detection. RDT had the highest number of unique positives, presumably from persistent antigen despite the absence of parasites, although RDT did not detect 3 parasitemias with over 1,000 parasites/μl. In a latent class analysis, real-time PCR had significantly higher sensitivity than did microscopy or RDT. Agreement between real-time PCR, RDT, and microscopy was highest in March and April, when both the P. falciparum parasite rate and parasite densities are highest. Real-time PCR is more sensitive and specific than RDT and microscopy in low-prevalence, low-parasite-density settings.[Concordance between thick blood smear, immunochromatography and polymerase chain reaction for malaria diagnosis].The rapid and effective diagnosis of malaria is the determining condition for an appropriate treatment and control of the disease.The sensitivity, specificity and the positive and negative predictive values were evaluated in cases of suspected malaria in Colombia in a comparison of a rapid diagnostic test. the PCR test and the thick blood smear-the traditional gold standard.A group of 100 patients with symptoms compatible with malaria, were included in the study. They were selected from the following Colombian regions: Urabá, Córdoba, lower Cauca, and relatively fewer from other malaria endemic areas of Colombia including the provinces of Valle, Chocó in the central west of Colombia and Vichada to the east. To each patient the following three tests were performed: the rapid OptiMAL test, the PCR identification and the thick blood smear. The PCR amplified specific DNA sequences with primers designed to identify the genus Plasmodium, and the two species present in Colombia, P. falciparum and P. vivax.The sensitivity of the rapid test versus the thick smear, for the diagnosis of both species of Plasmodium was 93.9% (95% CI: 87-100%) and the specificity was 94.3% (95% CI:.253 85-100%). The PCR compared with the thick smear showed a sensitivity of 100% (95% CI: 99-100%) and a specificity of 97.1% (95% CI: 90-100%).The sensitivity and specificity of the three tests did not present statistically significant differences. However, the thick blood smear was recommended as the standard test, mainly due to its low cost.Field studies on the sensitivity and specificity of an immunochromatographic test for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum malaria in tribal areas of Orissa.A rapid immunodiagnostic test developed by an Australian Biotechnology company for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum in the peripheral blood has been evaluated in the field for its sensitivity, specificity and efficacy in comparison to microscopic examination. The results showed that the tests sensitivity, specificity and efficacy were 98.2, 96.9 and 97.5 per cent respectively. The positive and negative predictive values of the test were 96.4 and 98.4 per cent respectively. The test when compared to the conventional microscopy did not show any statistically significant difference suggesting that the two diagnostic methods are equally good. The test performed did not show cross-reactions with other parasite species. It is a simple and rapid field diagnostic method, which does not require any expensive laboratory equipment or skilled personnel.Reliability of rapid diagnostic test for diagnosing peripheral and placental malaria in an area of unstable malaria transmission in Eastern Sudan.Diagnosing Plasmodium falciparum malaria during pregnancy is a great challenge for clinicians because of the low density of parasites in the peripheral blood and parasite sequestration in the placenta. Nevertheless, few data on the use of malaria rapid diagnostic test (RDT) during pregnancy have been published.P. falciparum infections were assessed in 156 febrile pregnant women by microscopic examination of their blood smears and by RDT and polymerase chain reactions (PCR). In addition, 150 women were assessed at the time of delivery by microscopy, RDT, PCR and placental histology investigations. The study was conducted at the Gadarif Hospital, Eastern Sudan. The SD Bioline P. f / P. v (Bio Standard Diagnostics, Gurgaon, Korea) RDT kit was evaluated in this study.Among the febrile pregnant women, 17 (11.0%), 26 (16.7%) and 18 (11.5%) positive cases of P. falciparum were detected by microscopy, RDT, and PCR, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of the microscopy was 94.4% and 100%, respectively. The corresponding values for RDT evaluation were 83.3% and 92.0%, as compared with PCR as the gold standard.While there were no detected cases of malaria by microscopic examination of blood smears, 27 (18.0%), 21(14.0%) and 46 (30.7%) out of the 150 placentae investigated had P. falciparum as determined by RDT, PCR, and histology, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity for RDT was 17.4% and 81.7%, respectively. The corresponding values for PCR were 6.5% and 82.7%, where histology was used as the gold standard.The RDT kit used in this study has poor performance for peripheral and placental P. falciparum malaria detection in this setting.The virtual slide(s) for this article can be found here: http://www.diagnosticpathology.diagnomx.eu/vs/1092363465928479.Evaluation of Paracheck-Pf(TM) rapid malaria diagnostic test for the diagnosis of malaria among HIV-positive patients in Ibadan, south-western Nigeria.Febrile illnesses occur frequently among HIV positive patients and these are often treated presumptively as malaria in endemic areas. Parasite-based diagnosis of malaria will eliminate unnecessary treatment, reduce drug-drug interactions and the chances for the emergence of drug resistant Plasmodium. We evaluated finger prick blood samples from 387 people living with HIV (PLWHIV) and suspected of having malaria by expert microscopy and Paracheck-Pf(TM) - a histidine-rich protein-II based malaria rapid diagnostic test. The study was conducted at the PEPFAR supported AIDS Prevention Initiative in Nigeria (APIN) Clinic of the University College Hospital Ibadan, southwest Nigeria. Outcome parameters were prevalence of malaria parasitemia, sensitivity and specificity of Paracheck-Pf as well as the positive and negative predictive values for Paracheck-Pf using microscopy of Giemsa-stained blood film as gold standard. Malaria parasites were detected in 19·1% (74/387) of enrollees by microscopy and 19·3% (74/383) by Paracheck-Pf. Geometric mean parasite density was 501/μl (range 39-749 202/μl). Sensitivity and specificity of Paracheck-Pf at all parasite densities were 55·4% and 89·3% while corresponding figures at parasite densities ≥200/μl were 90·9% and 90·3%. Sensitivity and specificity at parasite densities ≥500/μl was 97·6% and 90·3%. Positive and negative predictive values for parasite density ≥200/μl were 55·4% and 98·7%, respectively. Paracheck-Pf was found to be a useful malaria diagnostic tool at parasite densities ≥200/μl facilitating appropriate clinical management.Comparative diagnostic performance of two commercial rapid tests for malaria in a non-endemic area.In the study reported here, the diagnostic performance of two new rapid tests for the diagnosis of malaria was evaluated in symptomatic patients in a non-endemic area. Of 557 consecutive patients, 109 (19.6%) had documented malaria. For the NOW ICT MALARIA P.f./P.v. (Binax, Portland, ME, USA) and OptiMAL IT (Diamed, Cressier, Switzerland) tests, respectively, sensitivity values were 96.3% and 79.8% (P-value, 0.0001), and specificity values were 98.8% and 98.4%. The NOW ICT test did not detect two of 80 Plasmodium falciparum infections, and it generated false-positive results for five patients. The OptiMAL IT test failed to detect ten of the P. falciparum infections, and it generated seven false-positive results. The results suggest that these rapid diagnostic tests for malaria may be useful, but they cannot replace microscopic examination of blood films.Evaluation of a new Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase assay (OptiMAL-IT) for the detection of malaria.The new OptiMAL-IT(R) rapid diagnostic test for malaria was evaluated in 271 patients in Thailand with uncomplicated malaria between June and July 2002. The sensitivity and specificity for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum parasites were 88% and 92%, respectively. For species other than P. falciparum, the sensitivity was 65% and specificity was 99%. The performance of the new test decreased markedly at low levels of parasitaemia.[Tests for rapid diagnosis of malaria].Evaluation of two new immunochromatographic assays for diagnosis of malaria.We assessed the performance of two new commercially available rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria (SD Bioline Malaria Ag Pf test and Ag Pf/Pan test) in 200 patients with uncomplicated malaria between August and October 2007 in Madagascar. Results of the two RDTs were compared with those obtained by microscopy and real-time polymerase chain reaction. The sensitivity and specificity for detection of Plasmodium falciparum were 93% and 98.9%, respectively, for the SD Bioline Malaria Ag Pf test and 92.9% and 98.9% for the SD Bioline Malaria Ag Pf/Pan test. The sensitivity of the SD Bioline Malaria Ag Pf/Pan test was much lower for detection of other species (63.6%). The sensitivity of the two new assays decreased to 77.3% at parasitemia levels < 100 parasites/microL for detection of P. falciparum.Evaluation of the Palutop+4 malaria rapid diagnostic test in a non-endemic setting.Palutop+4 (All. Diag, Strasbourg, France), a four-band malaria rapid diagnostic test (malaria RDT) targeting the histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP-2), Plasmodium vivax-specific parasite lactate dehydrogenase (Pv-pLDH) and pan Plasmodium-specific pLDH (pan-pLDH) was evaluated in a non-endemic setting on stored whole blood samples from international travellers suspected of malaria.Microscopy corrected by PCR was the reference method. Samples include those infected by Plasmodium falciparum (n = 323), Plasmodium vivax (n = 97), Plasmodium ovale (n = 73) and Plasmodium malariae (n = 25) and 95 malaria negative samples.The sensitivities for the diagnosis of P. falciparum, P. vivax, P. malariae and P. ovale were 85.1%, 66.0%, 32.0% and 5.5%. Sensitivities increased at higher parasite densities and reached 90.0% for P. falciparum >100/microl and 83.8% for P. vivax > 500/microl. Fourteen P. falciparum samples reacted with the Pv-pLDH line, one P. vivax sample with the HRP-2 line, and respectively two and four P. ovale and P. malariae samples reacted with the HRP-2 line. Two negative samples gave a signal with the HRP-2 line. Faint and weak line intensities were observed for 129/289 (44.6%) HRP-2 lines in P. falciparum samples, for 50/64 (78.1%) Pv-pLDH lines in P. vivax samples and for 9/13 (69.2%) pan-pLDH lines in P. ovale and P. malariae samples combined. Inter-observer reliabilities for positive and negative readings were excellent for the HRP-2 and Pv-pLDH lines (overall agreement > 92.0% and kappa-values for each pair of readers >or= 0.88), and good for the pan-pLDH line (85.5% overall agreement and kappa-values >or= 0.74).Palutop+4 performed moderately for the detection of P. falciparum and P. vivax, but sensitivities were lower than those of three-band malaria RDTs.Comparison of two commercial assays with expert microscopy for confirmation of symptomatically diagnosed malaria.Conventional light microscopy has been the established method for malaria diagnosis. However, recently several nonmicroscopic rapid diagnostic tests have been developed for situations in which reliable microscopy may not be available. This study was conducted to evaluate the diagnostic performance of a recently introduced ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test. This assay detects Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein 2 antigen (PfHRP-2) for P. falciparum diagnosis and pan-malarial antigen for P. vivax diagnosis. In this study we compared the performance of ICT Malaria Pf/Pv with microscopy of Giemsa-stained blood films and with an OptiMAL test that detects Plasmodium lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) antigen. A total of 750 clinically suspected malaria patients were examined at local health centers in Kuwait. Both the antigen tests had a high degree of specificity (>98%) for detection of malaria infection. However, they were less sensitive than microscopy. Compared with microscopy the ICT Malaria PF/pf test failed to detect malaria infection in 93 (34%) of 271 malaria patients (11% of patients with P. falciparum and 37% of patients with P. vivax) and the OptiMAL test failed to detect malaria infection in 41 (15%) of 271 malaria patients (7% of patients with P. falciparum and 13% of patients with P. vivax). The sensitivities of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv and OptiMAL tests for detection of P. falciparum infection were 81 and 87%, and those for detecting P. vivax were 58 to 79%, respectively. The sensitivity of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv and OptiMAL tests decreased significantly to 23 and 44%, respectively, at parasite densities of <500/ micro l. Both of the tests also produced a number of false-positive results. Overall, the performance of the OptiMAL test was better than that of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test. However, our results raise particular concern over the sensitivity of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test for detection of P. vivax infection. Further developments appear necessary to improve the performance of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test.The ICT Malaria Pf: a simple, rapid dipstick test for the diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria at the Thai-Myanmar border.The ICT Malaria Pf test for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum infection was evaluated in the diagnosis of 305 patients with fever who were admitted to a hospital located on the Thai-Myanmar border. All patients were admitted for at least one week to exclude reinfection. The test was performed using admission blood samples collected into ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid. The sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of the test were 92.7%, 95.1% and 94.7% respectively, compared to standard microscopic diagnosis. The ICT Malaria Pf test is an accurate method for the diagnosis of P. falciparum infection. Its simplicity and rapidity make it particularly appropriate for use in remote areas where microscopic examination of blood films is unavailable.Use of a pLDH-based dipstick in the diagnostic and therapeutic follow-up of malaria patients in Mali.Malaria is a major public health problem in Mali and diagnosis is typically based on microscopy. Microscopy requires a well trained technician, a reliable power source, a functioning microscope and adequate supplies. The scarcity of resources of community health centres (CHC) does not allow for such a significant investment in only one aspect of malaria control. In this context, Rapid Diagnostic Tests (RDTs) may improve case management particularly in remote areas.This multicentre study included 725 patients simultaneously screened with OptiMal-IT test and thick smears for malaria parasite detection. While evaluating the therapeutic efficacy of choroquine in 2 study sites, we compared the diagnostic values of thick smear microscopy to OptiMal-IT test applying the WHO 14 days follow-up scheme using samples collected from 344 patients.The sensitivity and the specificity of OptiMal-IT compared to thick smear was 97.2% and 95.4%, whereas the positive and negative predictive values were 96.7 and 96.1%, respectively. The percent agreement between the two diagnostic tests was 0.93. The two tests were comparable in detecting malaria at day 0, day 3 and day 14. The only difference was observed at day 7 due to high gametocytemia. Subjectively, health care providers found OptiMal-IT easier to use and store under field conditions.OptiMal-IT test revealed similar results when compared to microscopy which is considered the gold standard for malaria diagnostics. The test was found to have a short processing time and was easier to use. These advantages may improve malaria case management by providing a diagnostic and drug efficacy follow-up tool to peripheral health centres with limited resources.[Rapid immunochromatographic tests for detection of malaria: principles and strategies for use].Malaria is a parasitological emergency requiring safe quick accurate diagnosis so that appropriate therapy can be implemented. A number of rapid diagnostic tests based on detection of HRP2 Ag, enzymes, LDH or aldolase are now available. However the use of these tests is restricted to trained, experienced staff in special situations. The purpose of this report is to describe the different tests on the market and clarify the limitations for their use.MalaQuick versus ParaSight F as a diagnostic aid in travellers' malaria.In this study we assessed whether travellers can perform malaria rapid tests, following the provided information leaflet, and correctly interpret performed and pre-prepared test strips. Two Plasmodium falciparum testing systems, namely MalaQuick (ICT) and ParaSight F were used. Test performance and test interpretation of pre-prepared tests were compared. There was no significant difference in test performance between the 2 tests. Interpretation of prepared test strips in both test systems was very reliable in blood parasite densities between 0.1% and 2%, but major problems were encountered at low parasitaemia (< 0.1% blood parasites) and also in ParaSight F test strips showing high parasitaemia (> 2% blood parasites). Low parasitaemia ParaSight F test strips were correctly interpreted by 52.1% compared with 10.8% correct interpretations with MalaQuick (P < 0.0001). Correct interpretation of highly positive (> 2% blood parasites) pre-prepared test strips was higher with MalaQuick (96.8%) than with ParaSight F (33.8%), P < 0.0001. Both tests were associated with high levels of false-negative interpretations which render them unsuitable as self-diagnostic kits. Efforts must be made to assist lay individuals in test performance by technical test improvement, by equiping the test strips with an additional reading aid for interpretation, and by providing instruction by a skilled person.Diagnostic methods of malaria in Eastern Nepal: a comparative study of traditional and two rapid diagnostic tests.This study compared the diagnostic accuracy of Quantitative Buffy Coat (QBC) a fluorescent microscopy test and OptiMAL, an immunochromatographic dip stick test against conventional microscopy for the detection of malaria at a tertiary teaching hospital situated in Eastern Nepal. 100 clinically suspected malaria patients with positive and negative parasitemia were assessed under conventional microscopy. The blood samples withdrawn from these subjects were further evaluated by the QBC Method and OptiMAL dipstick test. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and diagnostic accuracy of QBC and OptiMAL tests as compared with microscopy were 100%, 100%, 100%, 100%, 1 and 96%, 100%, 100%, 96.15% and 0.98 respectively. In Nepal, thick and thin blood smears remain the gold standard for malaria species diagnosis in routine diagnostic laboratories. In this study the efficacy of newer malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) surpassed the diagnostic efficacy of clinical microscopy and hence these RDT's will have a greater role in clinical practice. The cost of QBC technique may impose limitations on its use in Nepal but the OptiMAL test is likely to play an important part in urgent malaria diagnosis.Estimation of parasite load using Rapid diagnostic test ICT Now Malaria P.f/P.v in Plasmodium falciparum malaria.Rapid tests such as ICT Malaria are an effective field tool in determining the presence of malarial parasites but do not provide an estimate of parasite load. We have evaluated the utility of ICT for providing semi-quantitative estimates of parasite load. Circulating parasite load in the blood of patients with malaria (n =54), were compared with the circulating HRP2 protein levels. Blood was serially diluted and analysed by a rapid diagnostic test (ICT(R) Now P.f/P.v) for assessment of endpoint PfHRP2 antigen titres. Significant correlation was observed between parasite load and PfHRP2 antigen titres (Spearman rank; rho = 0.821; p<0.001) with plasma dilutions > 1:16 corresponding to a parasite load of 0.1% parasitaemia. Variability in haematological parameters had no effect on the antibody titres obtained with the ICT test. Rapid semi-quantitative assessment of parasite load in conjunction with the Plasmodium speciation may provide a useful bedside and field aid in the diagnosis of malaria.Malaria rapid diagnostic devices: performance characteristics of the ParaSight F device determined in a multisite field study.Microscopic detection of parasites has been the reference standard for malaria diagnosis for decades. However, difficulty in maintaining required technical skills and infrastructure has spurred the development of several nonmicroscopic malaria rapid diagnostic devices based on the detection of malaria parasite antigen in whole blood. The ParaSight F test is one such device. It detects the presence of Plasmodium falciparum-specific histidine-rich protein 2 by using an antigen-capture immunochromatographic strip format. The present study was conducted at outpatient malaria clinics in Iquitos, Peru, and Maesod, Thailand. Duplicate, blinded, expert microscopy was employed as the reference standard for evaluating device performance. Of 2,988 eligible patients, microscopy showed that 547 (18%) had P. falciparum, 658 (22%) had P. vivax, 2 (0.07%) had P. malariae, and 1,750 (59%) were negative for Plasmodium. Mixed infections (P. falciparum and P. vivax) were identified in 31 patients (1%). The overall sensitivity of ParaSight F for P. falciparum was 95%. When stratified by magnitude of parasitemia (no. of asexual parasites per microliter of whole blood), sensitivities were 83% (>0 to 500 parasites/microl), 87% (501 to 1,000/microl), 98% (1,001 to 5,000/microl), and 98% (>5,000/microl). Device specificity was 86%.Prozone in malaria rapid diagnostics tests: how many cases are missed?Prozone means false-negative or false-low results in antigen-antibody reactions, due to an excess of either antigen or antibody. The present study prospectively assessed its frequency for malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) and Plasmodium falciparum samples in an endemic field setting.From January to April 2010, blood samples with P. falciparum high parasitaemia (≥ 4% red blood cells infected) were obtained from patients presenting at the Provincial Hospital of Tete (Mozambique). Samples were tested undiluted and 10-fold diluted in saline with a panel of RDTs and results were scored for line intensity (no line visible, faint, weak, medium and strong). Prozone was defined as a sample which showed no visible test line or a faint or weak test line when tested undiluted, and a visible test line of higher intensity when tested 10-fold diluted, as observed by two blinded observers and upon duplicate testing.A total of 873/7,543 (11.6%) samples showed P. falciparum, 92 (10.5%) had high parasitaemia and 76 were available for prozone testing. None of the two Pf-pLDH RDTs, but all six HRP-2 RDTs showed prozone, at frequencies between 6.7% and 38.2%. Negative and faint HRP-2 lines accounted for four (3.8%) and 15 (14.4%) of the 104 prozone results in two RDT brands. For the most affected brand, the proportions of prozone with no visible or faint HRP-2 lines were 10.9% (CI: 5.34-19.08), 1.2% (CI: 0.55-2.10) and 0.1% (CI: 0.06-0.24) among samples with high parasitaemia, all positive samples and all submitted samples respectively. Prozone occurred mainly, but not exclusively, among young children.Prozone occurs at different frequency and intensity in HRP-2 RDTs and may decrease diagnostic accuracy in the most affected RDTs.[Evaluation of ICT malaria immunochromatographic Binax NOW ICT P.f/P.v test for rapid diagnosis of malaria in a Colombian endemic area].One of the strategies to reduce malarial morbidity and mortality is to make an early diagnosis, using simple rapid tests which are highly sensitive and specific. Furthermore, the tests must be easy to perform and understand by local people in such a way that a suitable and prompt antimalarial treatment is guaranteed.The sensitivity and specificity was determined for the immuno-chromographic malaria dipstick (ICT Pf/Pv) test for the rapid diagnosis of malaria in Turbo, Antioquia.The sample consisted of 171 patients distributed into two groups: the first group was 118 patients with acute febrile syndrome compatible with malaria to which ICT Pf/Pv and thick smears were applied simultaneously; a second group was 53 patients with positive diagnosis by thick smear, with follow-up on the 4th and 7th days after beginning treatment.Sensitivity and specificity of the ICT Pf/Pv test for Plasmodium falciparum infections were 54.2% (95%CI: 52.0-53.4%) and 93.6% (95%CI: 93.1-94.2%), respectively. In addition, for Plasmodium vivax the sensitivity and specificity were 80% (95%CI: 77.9-82.1%) and 100% (95%CI: 99.5-100%); there was a 21.4% loss of sensitivity for P. falciparum 21.4% and a 33% loss for P. vivax malaria with parasitaemias under 500 parasites/ul. For the confirmatory test, ICT Pf/Pv showed a global sensitivity of 71.6% with 20.7% false positive and 5.6% false negative results. During follow-up, ICT showed 36% and 34% false positive results for day 4 and 7, respectively.The ICT Pf/Pv test has a poor sensitivity for P. falciparum malaria and its capacity to detect parasitemias under 500 parasites/ul is minimal. As a confirmatory test, the ICT Pf/Pv has a good sensitivity for P. falciparum. Its use for patient follow-up is not recommended.Performance of the Now Malaria rapid diagnostic test with returned travellers: a 2-year retrospective study in a French teaching hospital.Malaria caused by Plasmodium falciparum remains the major life-threatening parasitic infection in the world. The number of cases in non-endemic countries continues to increase, and it is important that misdiagnosis of malaria should not occur, especially in non-immune travellers, because of the high risk of a fatal outcome. In a retrospective study of 399 sera, the Now Malaria rapid test was compared with the quantitative buffy coat (QBC) test and microbiological examination of thin blood films. Compared with the QBC test and thin blood films, the Now Malaria test had sensitivity and specificity values of 96.4% and 97%, respectively, for the detection of pure P. falciparum infection. A negative predictive value of 99.4% allows this test to be included in diagnostic strategies for patients presenting with clinical suspicion of malaria. Two false-negative results were associated with low levels of parasitaemia in the specimens. Thus, use of the Now Malaria test alone to detect P. falciparum infection in non-endemic countries could lead to misdiagnosis of malaria. This rapid diagnostic test should therefore be performed in association with another prompt traditional method such as examination of thin blood films.Low sensitivity of malaria rapid diagnostic tests stored at room temperature in the Brazilian Amazon Region.In remote areas of the Amazon Region, diagnosis of malaria by microscopy is practically impossible. This study aimed to evaluate the performance of two rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) targeting different malaria antigens stored at room temperature in the Brazilian Amazon Region.Performance of the OptiMal Pf/Pan test and ICT-Now Pf/Pan test was analyzed retrospectively in 1,627 and 1,602 blood samples, respectively. Tests were performed over a 15-month period. Kits were stored at room temperature in five community health centres located in the Brazilian Amazon Region. RDT results were compared with thick blood smear (TBS) results to determine sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of the RDT.The sensitivities of the OptiMal Pf/Pan test were 79.7% for Plasmodium falciparum malaria diagnosis and 85.7% for non-P. falciparum infections. The results showed a crude agreement of 88.5% for P. falciparum, and 88.3% for non-P. falciparum infections (Kappa index = 0.74 and 0.75, respectively). For the ICT-Now Pf/Pan test (CI 95%), the sensitivities were 87.9% for P. falciparum malaria diagnosis and 72.5% for non-P. falciparum infection. Crude agreement between the ICT-Now Pf/Pan test and TBS was 91.4% for P. falciparum and 79.7% for non-P. falciparum infection. The Kappa index was 0.81 and 0.59 for the final diagnosis of P. falciparum and non-P. falciparum, respectively. Higher levels of parasitaemia were associated with higher crude agreement between RDT and TBS.The sensitivities of RDTs stored at room temperature over a 15-month period and performed in field conditions were lower than those previously reported.Evaluation of the OptiMAL test for rapid diagnosis of Plasmodium vivax and Plasmodium falciparum malaria.The development of rapid and specific diagnostic tests to identify individuals infected with malaria is of paramount importance in efforts to control the severe public health impact of this disease. This study evaluated the ability of a newly developed rapid malaria diagnostic test, OptiMAL (Flow Inc., Portland, Oreg.), to detect Plasmodium vivax and Plasmodium falciparum malaria during an outbreak in Honduras. OptiMAL is a rapid (10-min) malaria detection test which utilizes a dipstick coated with monoclonal antibodies against the intracellular metabolic enzyme parasite lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH). Differentiation of malaria parasites is based on antigenic differences between the pLDH isoforms. Since pLDH is produced only by live Plasmodium parasites, this test has the ability to differentiate live from dead organisms. Results from the OptiMAL test were compared to those obtained by reading 100 fields of traditional Giemsa-stained thick-smear blood films. Whole-blood samples were obtained from 202 patients suspected of having malaria. A total of 96 samples (48%) were positive by blood films, while 91 (45%) were positive by the OptiMAL test. The blood films indicated that 82% (79 of 96) of the patients were positive for P. vivax and 18% (17 of 96) were infected with P. falciparum. The OptiMAL test showed that 81% (74 of 91) were positive for P. vivax and 19% (17 of 91) were positive for P. falciparum. These results demonstrated that the OptiMAL test had sensitivities of 94 and 88% and specificities of 100 and 99%, respectively, when compared to traditional blood films for the detection of P. vivax and P. falciparum malaria. Blood samples not identified by OptiMAL as malaria positive normally contained parasites at concentrations of less than 100/microl of blood. Samples found to contain P. falciparum were further tested by two other commercially available rapid malaria diagnostic tests, ParaSight-F (Becton Dickinson, Cockeysville, Md.) and ICT Malaria P.f. (ICT Diagnostics, Sydney, Australia), both of which detect only P. falciparum. Only 11 of the 17 (65%) P. falciparum-positive blood samples were identified by the ICT and ParaSight-F tests. Thus, OptiMAL correctly identified P. falciparum malaria parasites in patient blood samples more often than did the other two commercially available diagnostic tests and showed an excellent correlation with traditional blood films in the identification of both P. vivax malaria and P. falciparum malaria. We conclude that the OptiMAL test is an effective tool for the rapid diagnosis of malaria.[Interpreteation of immunochromatographic tests with HRP-2 antigen in children under 5 years in an area of high risk of malaria transmission in Papua New Guinea].The immunochromatographic tests with HRP-2 antigen (histidine-rich protein) Vision Biotech Pf Rapid Malaria Test was performed in 291 children under 5 years presenting fever or history of fever (malaria presumptive cases) admitted to Children Out-Patient Department of the Modilon Hospital in Madang, in a high malaria risk area of Papua New Guinea. The results of the tests were compared to the results of the parasitic examination of the peripheral blood with light microscopy (thick and thin smears). The HRP-2 test showed very high sensitivity (95.4%) and specificity (94.1%) for Plasmodiumfalciparum parasitaemia and none or very low sensitivity and specificity for other malaria species. The HRP-2 test detected both asexual and sexual stages of the Plasmodium falciparum parasites. The test did not show significant changes in detection of different levels of parasitaemia. These findings enable to conclude that the HRP-2 immunochromatographic assay can be very helpful to diagnose Plasmodium falciparum malaria when microscopy examination is not available, but as qualitative tests can be difficult for interpretation especially in high malaria risk areas. Therefore it can require re-examination of blood with microscopy to confirm species and development stages of Plasmodium spp. and to assess parasite load.Use and limitations of malaria rapid diagnostic testing by community health workers in war-torn Democratic Republic of Congo.Accurate and practical malaria diagnostics, such as immunochromatographic rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs), have the potential to avert unnecessary treatments and save lives. Volunteer community health workers (CHWs) represent a potentially valuable human resource for expanding this technology to where it is most needed, remote rural communities in sub-Saharan Africa with limited health facilities and personnel. This study reports on a training programme for CHWs to incorporate RDTs into their management strategy for febrile children in the Democratic Republic of Congo, a tropical African setting ravaged by human conflict.Prospective cohort study, satisfaction questionnaire and decision analysis.Twelve CHWs were trained to safely and accurately perform and interpret RDTs, then successfully implemented rapid diagnostic testing in their remote community in a cohort of 357 febrile children. CHWs were uniformly positive in evaluating RDTs for their utility and ease of use. However, high malaria prevalence in this cohort (93% by RDTs, 88% by light microscopy) limited the cost-effectiveness of RDTs compared to presumptive treatment of all febrile children, as evidenced by findings from a simplified decision analysis.CHWs can safely and effectively use RDTs in their management of febrile children; however, cost-effectiveness of RDTs is limited in zones of high malaria prevalence.Test characteristics of the SD FK80 Plasmodium falciparum/Plasmodium vivax malaria rapid diagnostic test in a non-endemic setting.The SD FK80 P.f/P.v Malaria Antigen Rapid Test (Standard Diagnostics, Korea) (FK80) is a three-band malaria rapid diagnostic test detecting Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein-2 (HRP-2) and Plasmodium vivax-specific lactate dehydrogenase (Pv-pLDH). The present study assessed its performance in a non-endemic setting.Stored blood samples (n = 416) from international travellers suspected of malaria were used, with microscopy corrected by PCR as the reference method. Samples infected by Plasmodium falciparum (n = 178), Plasmodium vivax (n = 99), Plasmodium ovale (n = 75) and Plasmodium malariae (n = 24) were included, as well as 40 malaria negative samples.Overall sensitivities for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and P. vivax were 91.6% (95% confidence interval (CI): 86.2% - 95.0%) and 75.8% (65.9% - 83.6%). For P. falciparum, sensitivity at parasite densities >or= 100/microl was 94.6% (88.8% - 97.6%); for P. vivax, sensitivity at parasite densities >or= 500/microl was 86.8% (75.4% - 93.4%). Four P. falciparum samples showed a Pv-pLDH line, three of them had parasite densities exceeding 50.000/microl. Two P. vivax samples, one P. ovale and one P. malariae sample showed a HRP-2 line. For the HRP-2 and Pv-pLDH lines, respectively 81.4% (136/167) and 55.8% (43/77) of the true positive results were read as medium or strong line intensities. The FK80 showed good reproducibility and reliability for test results and line intensities (kappa values for both exceeding 0.80).The FK80 test performed satisfactorily in diagnosing P. falciparum and P. vivax infections in a non-endemic setting.Limited level of accuracy provided by available rapid diagnosis tests for malaria enhances the need for PCR-based reference laboratories.The rise of imported malaria cases and the high fatality rate in Europe make the search for new and easy diagnostic methods necessary. Rapid diagnosis tests (RDTs) are, in part, developed to cover the lack of diagnosis experience. Unfortunately, our data suggest that the accuracy of RDTs is insufficient and could increase the number of incorrect malaria diagnoses.Usefulness of a rapid on-site Plasmodium falciparum diagnosis (Paracheck PF) in forest migrants and among the indigenous population at the site of their occupational activities in central India.Logistic, economic, and technical factors limit rapid access to microscopic confirmation of malaria in many tropical countries, including India. The occurrence of high-grade fever and three deaths during the hot summer months in some forest migrants created an emergency situation in Jabalpur in central India. A cheap and rapid malaria test, Paracheck Pf, was tested in this group of migrants in parallel with microscopy. The indigenous population at the site of occupational activities of these migrants approximately 250 km from Jabalpur was also screened by both methods. The results of this field investigation are very encouraging. Among migrants, the test had a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 67%. The positive and negative predictive values were 94% and 100%, respectively. Among indigenous population, the corresponding values were 100%, 97.3%, 98.4%, and 100%, respectively, indicating the usefulness of test as a diagnostic tool for providing on-site confirmation of symptomatic diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum malaria.Sequence variation does not confound the measurement of plasma PfHRP2 concentration in African children presenting with severe malaria.Plasmodium falciparum histidine-rich protein PFHRP2 measurement is used widely for diagnosis, and more recently for severity assessment in falciparum malaria. The Pfhrp2 gene is highly polymorphic, with deletion of the entire gene reported in both laboratory and field isolates. These issues potentially confound the interpretation of PFHRP2 measurements.Studies designed to detect deletion of Pfhrp2 and its paralog Pfhrp3 were undertaken with samples from patients in seven countries contributing to the largest hospital-based severe malaria trial (AQUAMAT). The quantitative relationship between sequence polymorphism and PFHRP2 plasma concentration was examined in samples from selected sites in Mozambique and Tanzania.There was no evidence for deletion of either Pfhrp2 or Pfhrp3 in the 77 samples with lowest PFHRP2 plasma concentrations across the seven countries. Pfhrp2 sequence diversity was very high with no haplotypes shared among 66 samples sequenced. There was no correlation between Pfhrp2 sequence length or repeat type and PFHRP2 plasma concentration.These findings indicate that sequence polymorphism is not a significant cause of variation in PFHRP2 concentration in plasma samples from African children. This justifies the further development of plasma PFHRP2 concentration as a method for assessing African children who may have severe falciparum malaria. The data also add to the existing evidence base supporting the use of rapid diagnostic tests based on PFHRP2 detection.An exploratory study of factors that affect the performance and usage of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria in the Limpopo Province, South Africa.Malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) are relatively simple to perform and provide results quickly for making treatment decisions. However, the accuracy and application of RDT results depends on several factors such as quality of the RDT, storage, transport and end user performance. A cross sectional survey to explore factors that affect the performance and use of RDTs was conducted in the primary care facilities in South Africa.This study was conducted in three malaria risk sub-districts of the Limpopo Province, in South Africa. Twenty nurses were randomly selected from 17 primary health care facilities, three nurses from hospitals serving the study area and 10 other key informants, representing the managers of the malaria control programmes, routine and research laboratories, were interviewed, using semi-structured questionnaires.There was a high degree of efficiency in ordering and distribution of RDTs, however only 13/20 (65%) of the health facilities had appropriate air-conditioning and monitoring of room temperatures. Sixty percent (12/20) of the nurses did not receive any external training on conducting and interpreting RDT. Fifty percent of nurses (10/20) reported RDT stock-outs. Only 3/20 nurses mentioned that they periodically checked quality of RDT. Fifteen percent of nurses reported giving antimalarial drugs even if the RDT was negative.Storage, quality assurance, end user training and use of RDT results for clinical decision making in primary care facilities in South Africa need to be improved. Further studies of the factors influencing the quality control of RDTs, their performance of RDTs and the ways to improve their use of RDTs are needed.Evaluation of rapid immunocapture assays for diagnosis of Plasmodium vivax in Korea.The rapid immunocapture assays, OptiMal and ICT, were evaluated from 87 individuals for the diagnosis of malaria infections directly from whole blood. A total of 87 individuals was examined for malaria parasites by microscopic examination of Giemsa-stained blood smears, and 65 cases were positive for Plasmodium vivax by microscopy. Correspondingly, the OptiMal test identified malaria infection in 45 cases (69.2%) of microscopy positive cases. Of these, two cases were misinterpreted as Plasmodium falciparum, whereas ICT detected P. vivax infection in 29 (44.6%) patients. We would like to propose that rapid immuno capture assays are an easy method that can serve as a useful tool in addition to microscopy for the diagnosis of malaria, but sensitivity is not yet satisfactory for diagnosis of P. vivax in Korea.Field trial of three different Plasmodium vivax-detecting rapid diagnostic tests with and without evaporative cool box storage in Afghanistan.Accurate parasitological diagnosis of malaria is essential for targeting treatment where more than one species coexist. In this study, three rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) (AccessBio CareStart (CSPfPan), CareStart PfPv (CSPfPv) and Standard Diagnostics Bioline (SDBPfPv)) were evaluated for their ability to detect natural Plasmodium vivax infections in a basic clinic setting. The potential for locally made evaporative cooling boxes (ECB) to protect the tests from heat damage in high summer temperatures was also investigated.Venous blood was drawn from P. vivax positive patients in Jalalabad, Afghanistan and tested against a panel of six RDTs. The panel comprised two of each test type; one group was stored at room temperature and the other in an ECB. RDT results were evaluated against a consensus gold standard based on two double-read reference slides and PCR. The sensitivity, specificity and a measure of global performance for each test were determined and stratified by parasitaemia level and storage condition.In total, 306 patients were recruited, of which 284 were positive for P. vivax, one for Plasmodium malariae and none for Plasmodium falciparum; 21 were negative. All three RDTs were specific for malaria. The sensitivity and global performance index for each test were as follows: CSPfPan [98.6%, 95.1%], CSPfPv [91.9%, 90.5%] and SDBPfPv [96.5%, 82.9%], respectively. CSPfPv was 16% less sensitive to a parasitaemia below 5,000/μL. Room temperature storage of SDBPfPv led to a high proportion of invalid results (17%), which reduced to 10% in the ECB. Throughout the testing period, the ECB maintained ~8°C reduction over ambient temperatures and never exceeded 30°C.Of the three RDTs, the CSPfPan test was the most consistent and reliable, rendering it appropriate for this P. vivax predominant region. The CSPfPv test proved unsuitable owing to its reduced sensitivity at a parasitaemia below 5,000/μL (affecting 43% of study samples). Although the SDBPfPv device was more sensitive than the CSPfPv test, its invalid rate was unacceptably high. ECB storage reduced the proportion of invalid results for the SDBPfPv test, but surprisingly had no impact on RDT sensitivity at low parasitaemia.Rapid malaria tests: where do we go after 20 years?Great advances have been made in developing rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for diagnosing malaria. To date, RDTs present an exceedingly practical format for malaria diagnosis that outperforms traditional microscopy and more experimental next generation devices in the development pipeline. However, although use of such tests is accepted in principle, their actual use has lagged. Furthermore, study of how these tests perform, what their limitations are, and how to work with these limitations to still use them effectively has stagnated. We propose that the study and implementation of such RDTs should be aggressively advanced and propose a series of questions that can guide efforts.Genetic variation in histidine rich proteins among Indian Plasmodium falciparum population: possible cause of variable sensitivity of malaria rapid diagnostic tests.Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) have revolutionized the diagnosis of malaria. Among the various factors affecting RDTs sensitivity is genetic variation of the antigen used. The genetic variation in PfHRP2 and PfHRP3 proteins was studied among the Indian Plasmodium falciparum isolates.One hundred and forty isolates of P. falciparum were collected from six geographical regions of India. Target genes encoding PfHRP2 and PfHRP3 antigens were sequenced to study genetic polymorphism. Minimum detection limit giving a positive rapid diagnostic test was also determined.Extensive variations were observed in amino acid repeat types of PfHRP2 and PfHRP3. PfHRP2 exhibited more polymorphism than PfHRP3. Significant relation was observed between type 2 and type 7 repeats and RDT detection rate as higher number of these repeats showed better sensitivity with RDTs.The results provide insights into the genetic diversity of Pfhrp2 and Pfhrp3 genes among Indian P. falciparum population and its relation to RDT sensitivity.Use of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria in an emergency situation after the flood disaster in Mozambique.To determine how diagnosis of malaria may be improved by combining the use of rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for Plasmodium falciparum malaria with clinical diagnosis by the presence or history of fever compared with clinical diagnosis alone in emergency situations with flood-affected displaced populations in Mozambique.A cross-sectional study conducted at the emergency outpatient clinic in a village in the Chòkwè district of Gaza Province, 3 weeks after Cyclone Eline hit Mozambique in February 2000.A hundred and thirty children aged less than 15 years with clinical malaria were selected for examination by RDT and fluorescent microscopy using acridine orange as a reference test. The diagnosis of clinical malaria was made by a history of fever in the last three days or axillary temperature above 37.0 degrees C at the time of attending the emergency outpatient clinic. Two positive predictive values were calculated; RDTs combined with clinical diagnosis and clinical diagnosis alone.Positive predictive values of RDTs combined with clinical diagnosis by the presence of fever or history of fever were 87.6% (92/105) (95% confidence interval (CI) 80.8-92.8) compared with 74.6% (97/130) (95% CI 66.2-81.8) for clinical diagnosis alone. Five patients were diagnosed false negative.RDTs combined with clinical diagnosis has sufficient positive predictive value to be used in emergency situations, while RDTs could result in increasing failure to treat when they are used for decisions of treatment compared with clinical diagnosis alone.Rapid diagnostic tests compared with malaria microscopy for guiding outpatient treatment of febrile illness in Tanzania: randomised trial.To compare rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for malaria with routine microscopy in guiding treatment decisions for febrile patients.Randomised trial.Outpatient departments in northeast Tanzania at varying levels of malaria transmission.2416 patients for whom a malaria test was requested.Staff received training on rapid diagnostic tests; patients sent for malaria tests were randomised to rapid diagnostic test or routine microscopyProportion of patients with a negative test prescribed an antimalarial drug.Of 7589 outpatient consultations, 2425 (32%) had a malaria test requested. Of 1204 patients randomised to microscopy, 1030 (86%) tested negative for malaria; 523 (51%) of these were treated with an antimalarial drug. Of 1193 patients randomised to rapid diagnostic test, 1005 (84%) tested negative; 540 (54%) of these were treated for malaria (odds ratio 1.13, 95% confidence interval 0.95 to 1.34; P=0.18). Children aged under 5 with negative rapid diagnostic tests were more likely to be prescribed an antimalarial drug than were those with negative slides (P=0.003). Patients with a negative test by any method were more likely to be prescribed an antibiotic (odds ratio 6.42, 4.72 to 8.75; P<0.001). More than 90% of prescriptions for antimalarial drugs in low-moderate transmission settings were for patients for whom a test requested by a clinician was negative for malaria.Although many cases of malaria are missed outside the formal sector, within it malaria is massively over-diagnosed. This threatens the sustainability of deployment of artemisinin combination treatment, and treatable bacterial diseases are likely to be missed. Use of rapid diagnostic tests, with basic training for clinical staff, did not in itself lead to any reduction in over-treatment for malaria. Interventions to improve clinicians' management of febrile illness are essential but will not be easy.Clinical trials NCT00146796 [ClinicalTrials.gov].Accuracy of malaria diagnosis by microscopy, rapid diagnostic test, and PCR methods and evidence of antimalarial overprescription in non-severe febrile patients in two Tanzanian hospitals.The study was aimed to evaluate the malaria over/underdiagnosis and over/underprescription of antimalarial drugs. Between February and March 2007 blood samples were collected from 336 non-severe febrile outpatients attended in two peripheral Tanzanian hospitals. Microscopy and a rapid diagnostic test (RDT) were done locally and the accuracy evaluated by qualitative polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for Plasmodium spp. The testing was performed at National Institute for Infectious Diseases Lazzaro Spallanzani (INMI), Rome, Italy. As a result of PCR, we identified 26 malaria cases out of 336 (7.7%) patients. Microscopy and RDT accuracies were 93.5% and 97.6%, respectively. Overprescription and underdiagnosis rates were 29.3% and 30.8%, respectively. On-field training, clinical management of febrile illness, and malaria microscopy in remote settings should be considered.Short report: Failure of the OptiMAL rapid malaria test as a tool for the detection of asymptomatic malaria in an area of Thailand endemic for Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax.We evaluated the efficacy of the OptiMAL assay in a cross-sectional malaria survey in western Thailand from April to August 2001. Expert microscopy of Giemsa-stained thick and thin blood films was used as the gold standard. Positive control lines were evident in 99% (1,128 of 1,137) of the assays tested. However, 34% (384 of 1,128) of assays produced an aberrant result (a positive P. falciparum-specific line and a negative panmalarial line). False-positive panmalarial and Plasmodium falciparum-specific lines occurred in 25.9% (270 of 1,042) and 60.3% (628 of 1,042) of microscopy-negative samples, respectively. Due to the preponderance of false-positive test results, it was necessary to develop subjective criteria for test positivity based on line intensity. For determination of assay performance during this study, we therefore considered all test lines that were scored as intermediate or strong as positive and lines that were faint as negative. Using these criteria, we determined that the sensitivity of the OptiMAL assay for P. falciparum was 25% with > 500 parasites/microl and 10.5% with > 100 parasites/microl, while for P. vivax, the sensitivity at the same parasite rates was 100% and 41.7%, respectively. Further studies are required to determine whether the problems we identified are limited to this particular lot of OptiMAL assays.Evaluation of CareStart™ malaria Pf/Pv combo test for Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax malaria diagnosis in Butajira area, south-central Ethiopia.Malaria is a major public health problem in Ethiopia. Plasmodium falciparum and Plasmodium vivax co-exist and malaria rapid diagnostic test (RDTs) is vital in rendering parasite-confirmed treatment especially in areas where microscopy from 2008 to 2010 is not available. CareStartTM Malaria Pf/Pv combo test was evaluated compared to microscopy in Butajira area, south-central Ethiopia. This RDT detects histidine-rich protein-2 (HRP2) found in P. falciparum, and Plasmodium enzyme lactate dehydrogenase (pLDH) for diagnosis of P. vivax. The standard for the reporting of diagnostic accuracy studies was complied. Among 2,394 participants enrolled, 10.9% (n=87) were Plasmodium infected (household survey) and 24.5% (n=392) health facility-based using microscopy. In the household surveys, the highest positivity was caused by P. vivax (83.9%, n=73), P. falciparum (15.0%, n=13), and the rest due to mixed infections of both (1.1%, n=1). In health facility, P. vivax caused 78.6% (n=308), P. falciparum caused 20.4% (n=80), and the rest caused by mixed infections 1.0% (n=4). RDT missed 9.1% (n=8) in household and 4.3% (n=17) in health facility-based surveys among Plasmodium positive confirmed by microscopy while 3.3% (n=24) in household and 17.2% (n=208) in health facility-based surveys were detected false positive. RDT showed agreement with microscopy in detecting 79 positives in household surveys (n=796) and 375 positives in health centre survey (n=1,598).RDT performance varied in both survey settings, lowest PPV (64.3%) for Plasmodium and P. falciparum (77.2%) in health centres; and Plasmodium (76.7%) and P. falciparum (87.5%) in household surveys. NPV was low in P. vivax in health centres (77.2%) and household (87.5%) surveys. Seasonally varying RDT precision of as low as 14.3% PPV (Dec. 2009), and 38.5% NPV (Nov. 2008) in health centre surveys; and 40-63.6% PPV was observed in household surveys. But the influence of age and parasite density on RDT performance was not ascertained. Establishing quality control of malaria RDT in the health system in areas with low endemic and where P. falciparum and P. vivax co-exist is recommendable. CareStartTM RDT might be employed for epidemiological studies that require interpreting the results cautiously. Future RDT field evaluation against microscopy should be PCR corrected. Challenges in diagnosing paediatric malaria in Dar es Salaam, Tanzania.Malaria is a major cause of paediatric morbidity and mortality. As no clinical features clearly differentiate malaria from other febrile illnesses, and malaria diagnosis is challenged by often lacking laboratory equipment and expertise, overdiagnosis and overtreatment is common.Children admitted with fever at the general paediatric wards at Muhimbili National Hospital (MNH), Dar es Salaam, Tanzania from January to June 2009 were recruited consecutively and prospectively. Demographic and clinical features were registered. Routine thick blood smear microscopy at MNH was compared to results of subsequent thin blood smear microscopy, and rapid diagnostics tests (RDTs). Genus-specific PCR of Plasmodium mitochondrial DNA was performed on DNA extracted from whole blood and species-specific PCR was done on positive samples.Among 304 included children, 62.6% had received anti-malarials during the last four weeks prior to admission and 65.1% during the hospital stay. Routine thick blood smears, research blood smears, PCR and RDT detected malaria in 13.2%, 6.6%, 25.0% and 13.5%, respectively. Positive routine microscopy was confirmed in only 43% (17/40), 45% (18/40) and 53% (21/40), by research microscopy, RDTs and PCR, respectively. Eighteen percent (56/304) had positive PCR but negative research microscopy. Reported low parasitaemia on routine microscopy was associated with negative research blood slide and PCR. RDT-positive cases were associated with signs of severe malaria. Palmar pallor, low haemoglobin and low platelet count were significantly associated with positive PCR, research microscopy and RDT.The true morbidity attributable to malaria in the study population remains uncertain due to the discrepancies in results among the diagnostic methods. The current routine microscopy appears to result in overdiagnosis of malaria and, consequently, overuse of anti-malarials. Conversely, children with a false positive malaria diagnosis may die because they do not receive treatment for the true cause of their illness. RDTs appear to have the potential to improve routine diagnostics, but the clinical implication of the many RDT-negative, PCR-positive samples needs to be elucidated.Is molecular biology the best alternative for diagnosis of malaria to microscopy? A comparison between microscopy, antigen detection and molecular tests in rural Kenya and urban Tanzania.To assess the agreement of different diagnostic methods for the diagnosis and confirmation of the clinical suspicion of Plasmodium infection in children in Tanzania and Kenya.Blood samples were collected by the finger prick method from 338 children. Blood samples were collected from 338 children with the clinical suspicion of uncomplicated malaria in health clinics in Tanzania and Kenya. The presence of Plasmodium parasites was assessed with microscopy, rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) and the molecular assays, quantitative nucleic acid sequence based amplification (QT-NASBA) and polymerase chain reaction (PCR). The results were compared and analysed for agreement.There was a high degree of agreement (88.6-100%) between RDTs or molecular tests and microscopy. In rural Kenya, with a high incidence of malaria cases, the correlation coefficient ranged from 0.94 for RDTs to 0.76 for PCR. In urban Tanzania, where there was a low incidence of cases, R for RDTs was 1.0 but only 0.25 for PCR and 0.33 for NASBA.Malaria is overestimated if the diagnosis is based solely on clinical signs. Therefore, laboratory confirmation is essential. Microscopy is a reliable method in rural areas where malaria is prevalent, but RDTs offer a good alternative with the advantage that it is an easy and rapid method. Molecular tests are more sensitive but difficult to implement in rural areas. In areas with lower incidence, molecular tests detect a significantly higher number of Plasmodium infections than RDTs or microscopy. Although implementation of molecular tools can be difficult, the prospect of an easy and cheap detection system makes them promising tools for the near future.Persistent ICT malaria P.f/P.v panmalarial and HRP2 antigen reactivity after treatment of Plasmodium falciparum malaria is associated with gametocytemia and results in false-positive diagnoses of Plasmodium vivax in convalescence.A problem with rapid Plasmodium falciparum-specific antigen histidine-rich protein 2 (HRP2) detection tests for malaria is the persistence of antigen in blood after the disappearance of asexual-stage parasitemia and clinical symptoms, resulting in false-positive (FP) test results following treatment. The ICT P.f/P.v immunochromatographic test detects both HRP2 and a panmalarial antigen (PMA) found in both P. falciparum and Plasmodium vivax. To examine posttreatment antigen persistence with this test and whether persistent sexual-stage forms (gametocytes) are a cause of FP tests after treatment, we compared serial antigen test results with microscopy results from patients symptomatic with P. falciparum malaria in Indonesia for 28 days following treatment with chloroquine (CQ; n = 66), sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine (SP; n = 36), and artesunate plus sulfadoxine-pyrimethamine (ART + SP; n = 15). Persistent FP antigenemia following SP treatment occurred in 29% (HRP2) and 42% (PMA) of the patients on day 7 and in 10% (HRP2) and 23% (PMA) on day 14. The high rates of persistent HRP2 and PMA antigenemia following CQ and SP treatment were strongly associated with the presence of gametocytemia, with the proportion with gametocytes on day 7 posttreatment being significantly greater in those with FP results than in those with true-negative PMA and HRP2 results. Gametocyte frequency on day 14 post-SP treatment was also greater in those with FP PMA results. Following SP treatment, PMA persisted longer than HRP2, giving an FP diagnosis of P. vivax in up to 16% of patients on day 14, with all FP P. vivax diagnoses having gametocytemia. In contrast, PMA was rapidly cleared following ART + SP treatment in association with rapid clearance of gametocytemia. Gametocytes appear to be an important cause of persistent posttreatment panmalarial antigenemia in areas of endemicity and may also contribute in part to persistent HRP2 antigenemia following treatment.Comparison of two commercial assays and microscopy with PCR for diagnosis of malaria.This study compared conventional PCR with microscopy and 2 rapid detection methods, the pLDH which detected lactic dehydrogenase enzyme produced by actively metabolizing organisms and the malaria antibody tests. The sensitivity of PCR was 1 parasite/microl, i.e.: 50 times more sensitive than microscopy. When PCR was compared with microscopy, the sensitivity and specificity were 90% & 100% respectively. The sensitivity recorded was pLDH test in comparison to PCR (95%). The malaria antibody test recorded the least sensitivity (68%) PCR proved as the gold standard for evaluation of applied tests and the newly introduced ones. In absence of an expert microscopist, the pLDH test could substitute for microscopy. The test proved valuable to assess clinical cure, and predict drug resistance. Its advantage over microscopy was the ability to diagnose infection with low parasitemic patients. Antibody rapid tests might be not valuable in acute cases, but still accepted as a tool in epidemiological studies and in screening patients in blood banks in malaria endemic areas.Laboratory diagnosis of malaria: conventional and rapid diagnostic methods.The global control of malaria is more challenging than that of many other infectious diseases: malaria is vector borne, it is caused by 5 species of Plasmodium with different geographic distributions, infection is widespread in many regions, drug resistance is common, and the disease overlaps clinically with other infectious diseases. Therefore, malaria control programs, in addition to diagnosis and testing, must also target limiting spread of the disease through vector control. Although malaria control efforts have been successful in some regions, malaria remains one of the most important causes of death in sub-Saharan Africa, particularly in women and children.To review the current literature regarding diagnostic methods available to detect clinical malaria, with an emphasis on comparing the strengths and limitations of each method.Current World Health Organization malaria control report and other information, recent meta-analyses of diagnostic tests, primary literature concerning the performance characteristics of different tests, and primary literature concerning how diagnostic tests are used in daily practice.The most commonly used method for identifying cases of malaria remains microscopic examination of peripheral blood, but there is growing use of malaria rapid diagnostic tests in many regions. One of the most important findings in the recent literature is that despite the widespread use of diagnostic tests, treatment is too often based on clinical findings rather than on results of diagnostic tests.[Imported malaria: diagnostic traps and rapid tests].Imported malaria is a disease prevalent in France: 6,000 to 8,000 cases a year, of which 15% are pediatric cases. Despite this high incidence, the diagnosis is often delayed. The patient may then evolve to a severe form. This diagnostic delay is due to non-specific clinical symptoms in children. The most common symptoms are fever and digestive disorders (diarrhea, vomiting). In the absence of thrombocytopenia, the laboratory tests are not very useful for diagnosis. Parasitological examinations are dependent on the experience of the biologist, particularly in cases of low parasitemia as those observed in children who have received partial chemoprophylaxis. The recent introduction of rapid tests based on the detection of Plasmodium proteins, allows emergency remedy to this problem. The blood smears remains the gold standard and has to be used to confirm the results of rapid tests. If rapid tests improve the detection of Plasmodium in 2009, it remains mandatory to evoke the diagnosis of malaria in any febrile child coming from an endemic area.Accuracy of malaria rapid diagnostic tests in community studies and their impact on treatment of malaria in an area with declining malaria burden in north-eastern Tanzania.Despite some problems related to accuracy and applicability of malaria rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs), they are currently the best option in areas with limited laboratory services for improving case management through parasitological diagnosis and reducing over-treatment. This study was conducted in areas with declining malaria burden to assess; 1) the accuracy of RDTs when used at different community settings, 2) the impact of using RDTs on anti-malarial dispensing by community-owned resource persons (CORPs) and 3) adherence of CORPs to treatment guidelines by providing treatment based on RDT results.Data were obtained from: 1) a longitudinal study of passive case detection of fevers using CORPs in six villages in Korogwe; and 2) cross-sectional surveys (CSS) in six villages of Korogwe and Muheza districts, north-eastern, Tanzania. Performance of RDTs was compared with microscopy as a gold standard, and factors affecting their accuracy were explored using a multivariate logistic regression model.Overall sensitivity and specificity of RDTs in the longitudinal study (of 23,793 febrile cases; 18,154 with microscopy and RDTs results) were 88.6% and 88.2%, respectively. In the CSS, the sensitivity was significantly lower (63.4%; χ2=367.7, p<0.001), while the specificity was significantly higher (94.3%; χ2=143.1, p<0.001) when compared to the longitudinal study. As determinants of sensitivity of RDTs in both studies, parasite density of<200 asexual parasites/μl was significantly associated with high risk of false negative RDTs (OR≥16.60, p<0.001), while the risk of false negative test was significantly lower among cases with fever (axillary temperature ≥37.5 °C) (OR≤0.63, p≤0.027). The risk of false positive RDT (as a determinant of specificity) was significantly higher in cases with fever compared to afebrile cases (OR≥2.40, p<0.001). Using RDTs reduced anti-malarials dispensing from 98.9% to 32.1% in cases aged ≥5 years.Although RDTs had low sensitivity and specificity, which varied widely depending on fever and parasite density, using RDTs reduced over-treatment with anti-malarials significantly. Thus, with declining malaria prevalence, RDTs will potentially identify majority of febrile cases with parasites and lead to improved management of malaria and non-malaria fevers.Diagnostic performance of rapid diagnostic tests versus blood smears for malaria in US clinical practice.Approximately 4 million US travelers to developing countries are ill enough to seek health care, with 1500 malaria cases reported in the United States annually. The diagnosis of malaria is frequently delayed because of the time required to prepare malaria blood films and lack of technical expertise. An easy, reliable rapid diagnostic test (RDT) with high sensitivity and negative predictive value (NPV), particularly for Plasmodium falciparum, would be clinically useful. The objective of this study was to determine the diagnostic performance of a RDT approved by the US Food and Drug Administration compared with traditional thick and thin blood smears for malaria diagnosis.This prospective study tested 852 consecutive blood samples that underwent thick and thin smears and blinded malaria RDTs at 3 hospital laboratories during 2003-2006. Polymerase chain reaction verified positive test results and discordant results.Malaria was noted in 95 (11%) of the 852 samples. The RDT had superior performance than the standard Giemsa thick blood smear (p = .003). The RDT's sensitivity for all malaria was 97% (92 of 95 samples), compared with 85% (81 of 95) for the blood smear, and the RDT had a superior NPV of 99.6%, compared with 98.2% for the blood smear (p = .001). The P. falciparum performance was excellent, with 100% rapid test sensitivity, compared with only 88% (65 of 74) by blood smear (p = .003).This operational study demonstrates that the US Food and Drug Administration-approved RDT for malaria is superior to a single set of blood smears performed under routine US clinical laboratory conditions. The most valuable clinical role of the RDT is in the rapid diagnosis or the exclusion of P. falciparum malaria, which is particularly useful in outpatient settings when evaluating febrile travelers.Performance of local light microscopy and the ParaScreen Pan/Pf rapid diagnostic test to detect malaria in health centers in Northwest Ethiopia.Diagnostic tests are recommended for suspected malaria cases before treatment, but comparative performance of microscopy and rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) at rural health centers has rarely been studied compared to independent expert microscopy.Participants (N = 1997) with presumptive malaria were recruited from ten health centers with a range of transmission intensities in Amhara Regional State, Northwest Ethiopia during October to December 2007. Microscopy and ParaScreen Pan/Pf® RDT were done immediately by health center technicians. Blood slides were re-examined later at a central laboratory by independent expert microscopists.Of 1,997 febrile patients, 475 (23.8%) were positive by expert microscopists, with 57.7% P. falciparum, 24.6% P. vivax and 17.7% mixed infections. Sensitivity of health center microscopists for any malaria species was >90% in five health centers (four of which had the highest prevalence), >70% in nine centers and 44% in one site with lowest prevalence. Specificity for health center microscopy was very good (>95%) in all centers. For ParaScreen RDT, sensitivity was ≥90% in three centers, ≥70% in six and <60% in four centers. Specificity was ≥90% in all centers except one where it was 85%.Health center microscopists performed well in nine of the ten health centers; while for ParaScreen RDT they performed well in only six centers. Overall the accuracy of local microscopy exceeded that of RDT for all outcomes. This study supports the introduction of RDTs only if accompanied by appropriate training, frequent supervision and quality control at all levels. Deficiencies in RDT use at some health centers must be rectified before universal replacement of good routine microscopy with RDTs. Maintenance and strengthening of good quality microscopy remains a priority at health center level.[Efficiency of KAT-quick P.f. test (KAT medical, SAR) among the populations of drug-resistant parasites].The KAT-Quick P.f. test (KAT Medical, South African Republic) is based on the detection of protein HPR II produced by trophozoites and young gametocytes of P. falciparum. This test was conducted by the authors in the distribution areas of P. falciparum strains differing in the spectrum of drug resistance. Five hundred and forty-nine blood samples from febrile patients in Vietnam (n=84), Sierra Leone (n=41), Nigeria (n=14), Tanzania (n=8), Kenya (n=5), and Tadjikistan (n=397) were tested. Microscopy served as a primary control. Detection of P. falciparum DNA, using polymerase chain reaction (PCR) with included primers (nested PCR) of the most sensitive modification of PCR was a final control. The efficiency of the KAT-Quick P.f. test was estimated as a ratio of the number of its positive results to those of PCR. It was equal to 98-95%. The KAT-Quick P.f. test revealed no false-positive case associated with the genome of the parasite. The specificity of the test was determined as a ratio of the number of its negative (no P. falciparum) results to those of PCR. The blood samples from patients with vivax malaria and from those with nonmalarial fever were investigated. There was no cross reaction of the KAT-Quick P.f. test system for P. falciparum with that for P. vivax. The KAT-Quick P.f. test yielded no positive reaction with the blood from patients with non-malarial fever. Drug resistance depending on the spectrum of specific drugs caused its emergence may be determined by one or several mechanisms that are ultimately determined by one, the key mechanism. Thus, the findings suggest that multidrug resistance of P. falciparum does not trigger the occurrence of changes in its surface antigen--HRPII that is responsible for the efficiency of the KAT-Quick P.f. test. These may be also extrapolated to other rapid tests patterned after the same principle.Assessment of routine malaria diagnosis in the Venezuelan Amazon.The quality of routine malaria diagnosis is a crucial topic of malaria control. The aim of this assessment was to monitor and evaluate the quality of routine malaria diagnosis in Amazonas (Venezuela) and to improve the quality control system. The traditional non-blinded quality control system was found to be overburdened with diagnostic samples. A modified sampling system with fewer samples to be tested was proposed. Expert microscopists blindly double-checked 1000 slides and 550 rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) (OptiMAL-IT) from health posts (HP). For Plasmodium vivax, HP microscopy and OptiMAL-IT showed sensitivies of 86% and 63%, respectively. For P. falciparum, HP microscopy and OptiMAL-IT showed sensitivities of 68% and 89%, respectively. Both methods lost accuracy when fewer parasites occurred in the sample. HP microscopists from different municipalities displayed significant differences in diagnostic quality. Overall, quality of routine malaria diagnosis in the Venezuelan Amazon is good but not optimal. The change from the traditional non-blinded quality control system to blinded cross-checking of a minimal selection of samples is - comparatively - a low cost intervention with possibly high impact on the quality of routine malaria diagnosis. The introduction of RDTs should be discussed carefully in order not to displace an existing network of HP microscopists.Evidence behind the WHO guidelines: hospital care for children: what is the precision of rapid diagnostic tests for malaria?The evaluation of a dipstick test for Plasmodium falciparum in mining areas of Venezuela.A field trial comparing a dipstick test, an antigen-capture test detecting trophozoite-derived histidine-rich protein-II, and the quantitative buffer coat (QBC) (acridine orange staining technique) assay for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum was carried out on a population of 1,398 suspected malaria patients in gold mining areas of Venezuela. Sensitivity, specificity, and positive predictive values were higher for the dipstick test than for the acridine orange staining compared with the thick blood smear. The sensitivity for the dipstick method was 86.7% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 82-90%), the specificity was 99.3% (95% CI = 98.5-99.7%), and the positive predictive value was 97.1% (95% CI = 94-98%) as compared with the thick blood smear. The sensitivity for acridine orange staining was 82.2% (95% CI = 77-86%), the specificity was 98.5% (95% CI = 97.6-99.1%), and the positive predictive value was 94.1% (95% CI = 90-97%); with a P. falciparum asexual parasitemia higher than 21 parasites/microliter, the dipstick was 100% sensitive, when parasitemia was 10-20/microliter, sensitivity was 88%, and when parasitemia was less than 10/microliter, it was only 13.4%. The dipstick assay meets the criteria for an appropriate, rapid, and reliable test for the diagnosis of P. falciparum and has advantages over the acridine orange staining method. Nonetheless, its effectiveness seems limited in areas with low prevalence and among patients with low levels of parasitemia.Malaria diagnosis under field conditions in the Venezuelan Amazon.To improve practical, accurate diagnosis of malaria in the Amazon rainforest of Venezuela, two rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) (OptiMAL-IT) and FalciVax) and a laboratory light microscope, used in the field with a battery-operated head lamp as an external light source, were evaluated against the standard laboratory microscope procedure for malaria detection. One hundred and thirty-six Yanomami patients were studied for the presence of malaria parasites. Thirty-three patients (24%) were positive for malaria (Plasmodium falciparum, P. vivax, P. malariae). Twenty-one (64%) of the positive patients had <100 parasites/microl. Both RDTs showed poor sensitivity (24.2% for OptiMAL-IT) and 36.4% for FalciVax) but good specificity (99% both for OptiMAL-IT) and FalciVax). Field and laboratory microscopy showed sensitivities of 94% and 91%, respectively. The kappa coefficient was 0.90, indicating a high agreement between field and laboratory microscopy. We conclude that (i) adequate slide reading cannot be substituted by either of the two RDTs in the Venezuelan Amazon and (ii) the use of a light source such as that described above makes slide reading more feasible than hitherto in remote areas without electricity.[Diagnosis of Falciparum malaria by immunochromatographic test].To evaluate the applicability of rapid immunochromatographic test(ICT) for diagnosing falciparum malaria in outpatient clinics in endemic area.With thick blood smear method as control, ICT was used for the detection of P. falciparum.The sensitivity and specificity of ICT in detecting P. falciparum was 94.7% and 90.3%, respectively. No cross-reaction with P. vivax was found (P > 0.05).ICT is much more rapid and simple than thick blood smear method for the diagnosis of falciparum malaria, and can be applied in the outpatient clinics in endemic area.Colorimetric detection of Plasmodium falciparum and direct sequencing of amplified gene fragments using a solid phase method.A rapid colorimetric assay for the detection of DNA from Plasmodium falciparum malaria is described, allowing direct sequencing of amplified fragments in the positive samples. The method is based on amplification by the polymerase chain reaction (PCR), with incorporation of biotin and a lac operator sequence in the amplified target DNA. The PCR product was immobilized on streptavidin-coupled magnetic beads, and detected by the specific binding of an Escherichia coli lac repressor beta-galactosidase fusion protein. Positive samples were subsequently treated with alkali to generate single stranded templates, which were used for solid phase genomic sequencing. As targets for amplification and sequencing we selected a region of the gene for the antigen Pf155/RESA and a region of the parasite dihydrofolate reductase gene (PfDHFR/TS). We show here that both of these gene targets can be used for specific detection of P. falciparum in patient blood samples. Genomic sequencing of five patient isolates revealed no variation in the Pf155/RESA gene fragment. In a comparison of this sequence with conserved protein domains, a marked similarity to the src homology region 3 was detected. A point mutation was found in the PfDHFR/TS gene fragment of one of the clinical samples, replacing Ser108 with Asn. This mutation has earlier been described in pyrimethamine and cycloguanile-resistant strains of P. falciparum.An assessment of the usefulness of a rapid immuno-chromatographic test, "Determine trade mark malaria pf" in evaluation of intervention measures in forest villages of central India.Plasmodium falciparum malaria, is a major health problem in forested tribal belt of central India. Rapid and accurate methods are needed for the diagnosis of P. falciparum. We performed a blinded evaluation of the recently introduced Determine trade mark malaria pf test (Abbott, Laboratories, Japan) compared with microscopy and splenomegaly in children in epidemic prone areas of district Mandla to assess the impact of intervention measures.Children aged 2-10 yrs with and without fever were examined for spleen enlargement by medical specialist by establishing a mobile field clinic. From these children thick blood smears were prepared from finger prick and read by a technician. Simultaneously, rapid tests were performed by a field lab attendant. The figures for specificity, sensitivity and predictive values were calculated using microscopy as gold standard.In all 349 children were examined. The sensitivity and specificity for Determine rapid diagnostic test were 91 and 80% respectively. The positive predictive values (PPV), negative predictive values (NPV) and accuracy of the test were respectively 79, 91 and 85%. On the contrary, the sensitivity and specificity of spleen in detecting malaria infection were 57 and 74 % respectively with PPV of 73%, NPV 59 % and an accuracy of 65%.Determine trade mark malaria rapid diagnostic test is easier and quicker to perform and has other advantages over microscopy in not requiring prior training of personnel or quality control. Thus, highlighting the usefulness of a rapid antigen test in assessing prevailing malaria situation in remote areas.Test characteristics of two rapid antigen detection tests (SD FK50 and SD FK60) for the diagnosis of malaria in returned travellers.Two malaria rapid diagnostic tests were evaluated in a travel clinic setting: the SD FK50 Malaria Ag Plasmodium falciparum test (a two-band test) and the SD FK60 Malaria Ag P. falciparum/Pan test (a three-band test).A panel of stored whole blood samples (n = 452 and n = 614 for FK50 and FK60, respectively) from returned travellers was used. The reference method was microscopy with PCR in case of discordant results.For both tests, overall sensitivity for the detection of P. falciparum was 93.5%, reaching 97.6% and 100% at parasite densities above 100 and 1,000/microl respectively. Overall sensitivities for Plasmodium vivax, Plasmodium ovale and Plasmodium malariae for the FK60 test were 87.5%, 76.3% and 45.2%, but they reached 92.6% and 90.5% for P. vivax and P. ovale at parasite densities above 500/microl. Specificities were above 95% for all species and both tests when corrected by PCR, with visible histidine-rich protein-2 lines for P. malariae (n = 3) and P. vivax and P. ovale (1 sample each). Line intensities were reproducible and correlated to parasite densities. The FK60 tests provided clues to estimate parasite densities for P. falciparum below or above 1,000/microl.Both the FK50 and FK60 performed well for the diagnosis of P. falciparum in the present setting, and the FK60 for the diagnosis of P. vivax and P. ovale at parasite densities > 500/microl. The potential use of the FK60 as a semi-quantitative estimation of parasite density needs to be further explored.Evaluation of a rapid test for histidine rich protein 2 for diagnosis of Plasmodium falciparum infection in Cameroonian children.Performance and usefulness of the Hexagon rapid diagnostic test in children with asymptomatic malaria living in the Mount Cameroon region.Rapid and correct diagnosis of malaria is considered an important strategy in the control of the disease. However, it remains to be determined how well these tests can perform in those who harbour the parasite, but are asymptomatic, so that rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) could be used in rapid mass surveillance in malaria control programmes.Microscopic and immunochromatographic diagnosis of malaria were performed on blood samples from the hyperendemic Mount Cameroon region. Thin and thick blood films were stained with Giemsa and examined under light microscopy for malaria parasites. The RDT was performed on the blood samples for the detection of Plasmodium species. In addition, the performance characteristics of the test were determined using microscopy as gold standard.Results revealed 40.32% to be positive for microscopy and 34.41% to be positive for the RDT. Parasites were detected in a greater proportion of samples as the parasite density increase. Plasmodium falciparum was the predominant Plasmodium species detected in the study population either by microscopy or by the RDT. Overall, the test recorded a sensitivity and specificity of 85.33% and 95.05% respectively, and an accuracy of 91.40%. The sensitivity and specificity of the RDT increased as parasite densities increased.The Hexagon Malaria Combi test showed a high sensitivity and specificity in diagnosing malaria in asymptomatic subjects and so could be suitable for use in mass surveillance programmes for the management and control of malaria.Performance appraisal of rapid on-site malaria diagnosis (ICT malaria Pf/Pv test) in relation to human resources at village level in Myanmar.Logistic, economic and technical factors limit rapid access to microscopic confirmation of symptomatic diagnosis of malaria in many rural areas in endemic countries such as Myanmar. A study was conducted to evaluate a rapid on-site immunochromatographic test (ICT Malaria Pf/Pv) for detection of Plasmodium falciparum and P. vivax in two villages in the Taikkyi region of Myanmar. The ICT Malaria tests were performed by a volunteer health worker (VHW) in Yae-Aye-San village and by a professionally trained midwife (MW) in Kankone village. A total of 1000 symptomatic patients participated in the study by providing blood samples for an ICT test and for microscopy. The ICT performance indices, relative to microscopy, were better for the trained MW compared with the less experienced VHW. For P. falciparum and/or P. vivax infections, the sensitivities were 82.7% for the VHW compared with 93.7% for the MW. For P. falciparum infections, the sensitivities were 82.2% for the VHW and 91.3% for the MW, while the corresponding values for P. vivax infections were 66.7 and 79%, respectively. Although the test kit appeared to perform better in more experienced hands, this study questions whether this difference is related to the use of the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test kit, or related to other factors such as differences in the quality of blood slides prepared by the VHW and MW for microscopic examination. Overall, the results suggest that a rapid diagnostic assay such as the ICT Malaria Pf/Pv test kit can be used in rural settings by relatively inexperienced persons, such as VHWs, with a reasonable degree of sensitivity, thus providing on-site confirmation of symptomatic diagnosis of malaria.Rapid diagnostic devices for malaria: field evaluation of a new prototype immunochromatographic assay for the detection of Plasmodium falciparum and non-falciparum Plasmodium.The NOW ICT Malaria P.f./P.v. for Whole Blood (Binax, Inc., Portland, ME) is a new malaria rapid diagnostic device that represents a technical advance over previous assays, such as ICT Malaria P.f./P.v. and ICT Malaria P.f.. We evaluated this device in March 2001 in symptomatic patients at malaria clinics in Maesod, Thailand. Microscopic examination of Giemsa-stained blood smears was the reference standard. In 246 patients, microscopy showed 32 (13.0%) infected with Plasmodium falciparum, 63 (25.6%) with P. vivax, 6 (2.4%) with mixed infections of P. falciparum and P. vivax, 5 (2.0%) with P. malariae, and 140 (56.9%) negative. Sensitivity for P. falciparum was 100% and specificity was 96.2% (200 of 208; 95% confidence interval [CI] = 92-98). For P. vivax, sensitivity was 87.3% (55 of 63; 95% CI = 77-93) and specificity was 97.7% (173 of 177; 95% CI = 95-99), but all the four false-positive results were microscopically positive for P. malariae; thus, specificity for non-falciparum Plasmodium was 100%. These results suggest improved performance over NOW ICT predecessors.Monitoring malaria control in Khammouane province, Laos: an active case detection survey of Plasmodium falciparum malaria using the Paracheck rapid diagnostic test.In Khammouane province, Laos, over 5000 slide-positive malaria cases were reported at local health facilities in 1997. To combat the spread of malaria, insecticide-treated nets (ITNs) and community health education were provided to the people in this province by the Lao Ministry of Health and the Japan International Cooperation Agency. In order to document the current malaria situation, an active case detection (ACD) survey using rapid diagnostic tests was conducted at 23 sites from June to July, the rainy season, in 2005. A total of 1711 villagers from 403 households participated in the survey. The proportion of positive cases was 0.7% (12/1711) with a range in each village of 0-8.2%. The low infection rate observed in this ACD survey was consistent with the decrease in the number of slide-positive malaria cases at local health facilities (from over 5000 cases to 536 cases), indicating the substantial progress made in malaria control. Although the reduction of malaria cases can be attributed to multiple factors, continued promotion of the proper use of ITNs as well as community-based testing and treatment services, especially in remote areas, may lead to a further reduction of malaria cases in the province.